EVANSTON, Ill. — From the sidelines at a recent practice, Northwestern Coach Pat Fitzgerald looked as if he could have been a player. Fitzgerald, a baby-faced 38-year-old, wore a black, long-sleeved T-shirt and black shorts that revealed muscular calves. He was a bundle of energy, sprinting from player to player during drills, bumping chests and shouting encouragement. Only his clipboard and whistle gave him away."I think I have A.D.D., but I'm not diagnosed," Fitzgerald said, referring to attention deficit disorder.His players do not seem to mind."Fitz has more fun than anyone," linebacker Damien Proby said. "And it rubs off on the players. That's the kind of program he's built here."Fitzgerald's Wildcats (9-3) will meet Mississippi State in the Gator Bowl on New Year's Day, their fifth straight bowl appearance. Despite Northwestern's having won none of them, it marks an achievement for a program that won little of anything for the better part of the 20th century. The Wildcats have lost nine consecutive bowl games, a drought that dates to the team's lone bowl win: the Rose Bowl on Jan. 1, 1949.But as Fitzgerald leads a program that has now tasted success, his task has grown beyond establishing Northwestern as respectable. His job has become building a Big Ten power. The next rung on the climb is a bowl win."We want to be champions, and we haven't accomplished it yet," Fitzgerald said.When Northwestern lost its 29th straight game in 1981, setting a Football Bowl Subdivision record, students tore down the goal posts and chanted, "We're the worst." Perhaps no individual has played a greater role in Northwestern's journey from doormat to credibility than Fitzgerald.He was a linebacker on the surprising 1995-96 team, which broke the university's 47-year bowl drought and reached the Rose Bowl, where it lost to Southern California. He was a two time all-American and a two-time winner of the Bronko Nagurski Trophy, given to college football's best defensive player, and he is in the sport's Hall of Fame. In 2006, he was named the coach of Northwestern after Randy Walker died of a heart attack.Fitzgerald grew up in Chicago's south suburbs, an Irish Roman Catholic with one university in mind, and it was not in Evanston."The only school I ever heard about was the one in South Bend," Fitzgerald said, referring to Notre Dame.But it was Northwestern and its coach at the time, Gary Barnett, who wanted Fitzgerald."We needed him more than Notre Dame did," said Barnett, now a college football analyst for Sports USA Radio.Fitzgerald broke his leg ahead of the Rose Bowl that his team played in, and in his office hangs the jersey he wore on the sideline. Inside the frame are a pin and screw that were inserted into his ankle after the injury. It was one of the first items he hung in his office when he took over the program.The framed memento belies the secret to Fitzgerald's popularity here. His heartfelt connection to the university, in addition to his buoyant personality, has made him the face of the football program and a beloved figure."You see the carousel of coaches going into new teams, who have no clue of the culture of the school or the community, or the tradition of what it's taken to get to that point," Fitzgerald said. "When you look at all these changes, it doesn't equal success. I get it here."Barnett said: "It's the entire community. He's one of theirs, he stayed at home, turned the whole culture around. You can't have a bigger hero."Last year, Fitzgerald signed a 10-year contract extension that runs through 2020, and he is every bit the players' coach he appears to be. He created a leadership council made up of players from all classes. During one meeting this season, players said, they were feeling sluggish on game day, so Fitzgerald added nap time to that week's travel itinerary.Northwestern has responded to the football team's growing profile with plans unveiled in September for an estimated $220 million worth of improvements to athletic facilities. Asked if that financial commitment puts greater pressure on his program to take the next step, Fitzgerald said: "No, because they're matching my commitment now. Everybody's expectations are starting to rise to ours, and I would say it's about time."I think the minute you feel like you're secure, you get comfortable, which leads to complacency, which leads to you getting fired."Of the impatience that seems to be endemic around college football, Barnett said: "Northwestern has not traditionally fallen into that trap. Hopefully, Pat's never in that situation."Fitzgerald, with a record of 49-39 in his seven seasons at Northwestern, including a 26-30 mark in the Big Ten, is one win from becoming the coach with the most victories in program history. He would like to get it out of the way on Tuesday."It will mean something because we'll have won a bowl game," Fitzgerald said. "That's the only negative left here."
The father received the text from his son late last winter. It was brief and on point: "How would you feel if I saved you fifty grand?"Patrick Salvi immediately felt like a man of considerable fortune, though the money, while relevant, was not of primary significance.He knew right away what this message from Chris, his fourth-born son of five, meant as he prepared for his fifth-year senior football season at Notre Dame. The improbable ascension, from transfer student to scout team candidate to special-teams walk-on to full scholarship player, was complete."The best moment of my life," he said, sitting in the stands Saturday morning at Sun Life Stadium in a crowd of Notre Dame's players that included his younger brother, Will, in the run-up to Monday night's national championship game against Alabama.On second thought, could we please modify that ranking before it found its way into print? There was also a very best moment, Chris decided, and that was the Navy game on Oct. 29, 2011; he was named a co-captain by Coach Brian Kelly, alongside Harrison Smith, a first-round draft pick this season with the Minnesota Vikings.In such company, Chris Salvi believed the distinction best reflected what he had achieved from the day he told his father he wanted to transfer from Butler — a speck on the college football map — to Notre Dame and try out."You may never see the field again," Patrick Salvi had said, offering doses of paternal wisdom and caution. Years later — Chris having not only walked on but played on America's most celebrated gridirons and most of all Notre Dame's — the father would recall with pride how his son had ignored them."It's all been a great joy, but not for any other reason than the recognition of his hard work," Patrick said.There is no abundance of wide-eyed innocence left in the business of big-time college football. At the level of Alabama, the defending champion, and Notre Dame, the resurrected colossus, the sport is about mammoth television deals, $100 million training facilities and virtual coaching monarchies.On occasion, increasingly rare, intruders infiltrate the armies of four- and five-star recruits. Patrick Salvi and his wife, Lindy, will look for two of them — Chris, No. 24, and Will, No. 36 — when the Irish take the field against the favored Crimson Tide.Having made the practice or scout team under the former coach Charlie Weis, Chris Salvi has been a regular for Kelly on special teams since the 2010 season, best known for taking out two Michigan State players and springing George Atkinson III on an 89-yard kickoff return for a touchdown last year.When the network television announcers made special note of Chris — all 5 feet 10 inches, 190 pounds of him — while dissecting the replay, the Rudy analogy was officially ground into the turf like a defenseless tackling dummy."At this level, in the real world, Rudy doesn't get playing time," Patrick said. "If you can't block the best athletes from Michigan State and all the others, you can't play."It was during the 2010 season that Chris, a safety in high school and at Butler, called to say that he was on the punt-return team and would be making his game debut that weekend at Michigan State. Off to Lansing went the Salvis, where they took seats in the Notre Dame parents' section. Down the row was Joe Montana, whose son, Nate, was a spare quarterback."It was a night game, a lot of drinking leading up to it," Patrick said. "The fans were on Joe so much that he had to get up and leave."For the Salvis, the experience was as surreal as it was superb. Out of Lake Forest, Ill., the family had long followed Notre Dame football. Patrick is a graduate of the law school. His father went to Notre Dame as well, and so did a brother and a niece and two of his older sons — one currently in law school — before Chris and Will took more circuitous routes.
The Baseball Hall of Fame , the most august fraternity of its kind in American sports, unveils its latest induction class Wednesday. For the first time this year, balloters must weigh the fate of two eminent stars, Barry Bonds and Roger Clemens , who are also the most celebrated poster boys for the game's disgraced steroid era.Players linked to steroid use have been resoundingly rejected by Hall of Fame voters in recent years, shunned as synthetically enhanced frauds. But drawing an integrity line in the sand is a tenuous stance at a Hall of Fame with a membership that already includes multiple virulent racists, drunks, cheats, brawlers, drug users and at least one acknowledged sex addict.In the spirit of Groucho Marx, who refused to join any club that would have him as a member, would not baseball's 77-year-old gallery of rogues be the perfect fit for Bonds and Clemens?Robert W. Cohen, who wrote the 2009 book "Baseball Hall of Fame — or Hall of Shame?", readily recalled a catalog of reprehensible acts by Hall of Fame inductees."Baseball has always had some form of hypocrisy when it comes to its exalted heroes," he said. "In theory, when it comes to these kinds of votes, it's true that character should matter, but once you've already let in Ty Cobb, how can you exclude anyone else?"Cobb, portrayed as a sociopath in biographies and a Hollywood film starring Tommy Lee Jones, is without question the Hall of Famer mentioned most often whenever the integrity of the game's top players is questioned. Known as the Georgia Peach, he was often painted a racist and had numerous documented altercations with African-Americans off the field, including one that led to a charge of attempted murder.Cobb, along with his fellow Hall of Famer Tris Speaker, was also implicated in a game-fixing scheme. Several researchers have written that Cobb and Speaker were members of the Ku Klux Klan, although that has never been conclusively verified."Plaster saints is not what we have in the Hall of Fame," said John Thorn, perhaps the nation's most widely known baseball historian and the author of more than a dozen baseball books. "Many were far from moral exemplars."Cobb, who was included on 222 of 226 ballots during the inaugural 1936 Hall of Fame voting, is far from alone when it comes to baseball elite old-timers and imputations of racism, some of them blatant, recurring and historic."Cap Anson helped make sure baseball's color line was established in the 1880s," Thorn said of the Chicago Cubs first baseman and manager who was enshrined in the Hall of Fame the year it opened in Cooperstown, N.Y., in 1939. "He was relentless in that cause."Anson repeatedly refused to take the field if the opposing roster included black players. Anson had plenty of co-conspirators. The Chicago White Sox owner Charles Comiskey, also a member of the Hall of Fame class of 1939, "outed" the African-American infielder Charlie Grant, who was posing as a Cherokee on the preseason exhibition roster of the Baltimore Orioles team led by John McGraw (Hall of Fame class of 1937).Overseeing baseball's segregationist policy in three decades was Commissioner Kenesaw Mountain Landis (Hall of Fame class of 1944). When Landis died in 1944, an initiative was begun to break the color barrier, an effort that culminated with Jackie Robinson's Brooklyn Dodgers debut in the spring of 1947.However, the Boston Red Sox, owned by Tom Yawkey (class of 1980), did not field their first black player until 1959.Often, the miscreants in the Hall of Fame are viewed more like rascals than scoundrels or bigots. Babe Ruth (class of 1936), a prodigious drinker and womanizer and yet popular and revered, fits the category.Casey Stengel (class of 1966) once called right fielder Paul Waner (class of 1952) a graceful player. Why?"Because," Stengel said, "he could slide into second base without breaking the bottle in his hip pocket."The famed Chicago newspaper columnist Mike Royko once wrote that Hack Wilson (class of 1979) should have been moved to first base from the outfield, where he usually played, "because he wouldn't have as far to stagger to the dugout."Grover Cleveland Alexander (class of 1938) pitched better drunk than sober, according to the team owner Bill Veeck (class of 1991).
New Orleans Saints Coach Sean Payton signed a five-year contract extension Wednesday that will run through the 2017 season.The team announced the extension but did not release financial details. Payton had agreed to the deal in principle Dec. 29."Sean has been a critical part of our success, getting him signed to a long-term deal is very important to our organization and we are pleased to have it finalized," Saints General Manager Mickey Loomis said in statement. "We have already begun the process of planning for the 2013 season, turning the page on 2012."Payton has guided the most successful period in the franchise's history, leading the Saints to three N.F.C. South division titles and four postseason appearances. Two of his teams advanced to the N.F.C. championship and the 2009 squad won Super Bowl XLIV.Payton, who was suspended for the entire 2012 season in connection with the N.F.L.'s bounty investigation, can return to work Feb. 4, the day after the Super Bowl.JETS WIDEN G.M. SEARCH The Jets, no closer to selecting their next general manager, widened their search. Their latest pool of candidates, according to a person briefed on the search, includes Jerry Angelo, the former general manager of the Chicago Bears; Omar Khan, the Steelers' director of business and football administration; and Brian Gaine, the Dolphins' assistant general manager. Interviews will resume Thursday.John Idzik, the Seahawks' vice president for football administration, is also in the mix, according to CBSSports.com.The Jets expanded their pursuit one day after a top choice, David Caldwell, agreed to become the Jaguars' general manager.This next wave of contenders is loaded with intriguing options.Angelo, who built a Chicago team that won three division titles and advanced to a Super Bowl, is the lone known candidate with previous experience as a general manager.Khan, who has interviewed for previous general manager jobs, is regarded as an expert in salary-cap management and contract negotiations.Gaine, a native of Rockland County, spent a year on the Jets' practice squad and also worked in their scouting department before heading to Dallas and Miami.GIANTS LOSE GETTLEMAN The Carolina Panthers hired the Giants senior pro personnel analyst David Gettleman as their new general manager to end their lengthy search. Gettleman, 61, spent 13 seasons with the Giants as their director of pro personnel before taking over last year as the senior pro personnel analyst. He has been a part of six Super Bowl teams, including three championship squads. (AP)CHARGERS HIRE G.M. The San Diego Chargers hired Tom Telesco from the Indianapolis Colts to replace the fired general manager A. J. Smith. Telesco, 40, spent the last 15 seasons with the Colts, most recently as vice president for football operations. He had a hand in the moves that helped the Colts go from 2-14 in 2011 to 11-5 and the playoffs this year, including taking quarterback Andrew Luck with the first pick in April's draft. (AP)ARIANS OUT OF HOSPITAL The agent for the Colts offensive coordinator Bruce Arians said that his client had been released from an Indianapolis hospital and that they were completing details to begin interviewing for head-coaching jobs. (AP)SEAHAWKS SIGN TWO PLAYERS The Seattle Seahawks signed the veteran kicker Ryan Longwell and defensive end Patrick Chukwurah after placing Steven Hauschka and Chris Clemons on injured reserve. Neither Longwell nor Chukwurah played in the N.F.L. this season. (AP)
FOXBOROUGH, Mass. — Matt Schaub called it an "oh no" moment. There was his fullback, James Casey, open for a short pass in the middle of the field. All Schaub needed to do was put enough arc on the ball to ensure that New England's Rob Ninkovich would not get a hand on the ball.Schaub saw Ninkovich. He knew he was there. It still ended up being an "oh no" moment for Houston's quarterback."When they ultimately get the ball, that's definitely an oh no moment," Schaub said. "You want to get your guy a chance to make a play."Casey never got that chance. Ninkovich got two hands on the ball for what turned out to be the game-turning play in last Sunday's 41-28 New England victory over the Texans in their A.F.C. divisional playoff game.Houston trailed by 11 points in the third quarter and was driving into New England territory. Ninkovich's interception stopped the drive. The Patriots scored a touchdown six plays later, taking a 31-13 lead. Houston fell behind, 38-13, before making a late, inconsequential run. For New England, it might well have been an "oh yeah" moment. Ninkovich not only accounted for the game's only turnover, but he also recovered an onside kick after Houston pulled to 38-28 with 5 minutes 15 seconds left.Ninkovich has a nose for the ball, whether it is making an interception (his fifth as a Patriot), forcing fumbles (five this season, matching the highest total in the last 20 years for the team) or recovering fumbles (four, a team high). Throw in a career-best eight sacks this season and 61 tackles (47 unassisted) and Ninkovich does seem to have a habit of being around the ball.This is how Ninkovich said he learned to play the game, crediting Rob Glielmi, his high school coach in New Lenox, Ill."I was taught at a young age to always be around the football because that is where things happen," Ninkovich said. "If you are around the ball, that is what makes those opportunities come up. The ball comes out, you are right there. It goes back to Rob Glielmi."Ninkovich is a classic late bloomer. He went unrecruited out of high school and attended Joliet (Ill.) Junior College, where he won a national championship in his first of two seasons. He then moved to Purdue, where he started only five games over two seasons but was still among the team and conference leaders in sacks. The Saints drafted him in the fifth round in the 2006 draft.However valuable and critical he is deemed to be as the Patriots prepare to face the Baltimore Ravens in Sunday's A.F.C. championship game, he was anything but before arriving in New England in 2009. Before then, he had appeared in only eight games over three seasons in two stints with the Saints and one with the Dolphins. The Saints even tried to make a long snapper out of Ninkovich before releasing him.The Patriots swooped in almost immediately. In four years with New England, he has missed one game, playing both defensive end and outside linebacker. Coach Bill Belichick credited Ninkovich's skill, adding, "He has good body control, good balance, good hand-eye coordination.""He's a high motor guy; he's always running around the field to make those plays," defensive back Devin McCourty said.The big difference in New England? Ninkovich actually got a chance to play — and make plays."I think really with Rob it was just a matter of opportunity," the Patriots' player personnel director, Nick Caserio, said. "He came here and he took advantage of his opportunities. Basically, every player that comes in here gets the same opportunity. Rob took advantage and he's made himself into a pretty good player."That is exactly how Ninkovich sees it. He is one of only two starters on defense (safety Steve Gregory is the other) not drafted or acquired via trade. But as the Patriots slowly said goodbye to such defensive stalwarts as Mike Vrabel, Junior Seau and Tedy Bruschi, Ninkovich was there to take over. He is as much a fixture on defense now as the All-Pro nose tackle Vince Wilfork."I think there are a lot of guys that aren't in the N.F.L. right now because it is about right place, right time, having the opportunity to play," Ninkovich said. "I was blessed to be able to stick around a couple years without really doing anything."He is doing plenty now. And if Joe Flacco has an oh no moment Sunday, do not be surprised if Ninkovich is responsible.
ATLANTA — Colin Kaepernick toppled the Atlanta Falcons and wowed a national television audience and boosted the San Francisco 49ers back into the Super Bowl as a quarterback. Not as a mobile quarterback, a running quarterback, an athletic quarterback, or a Pistol offense quarterback.Kaepernick again shredded those misperceptions at the Georgia Dome on Sunday, again proved more than a runner who happens to throw the football on occasion. When he ran, it was onto the field, or back toward the sideline, or away from defenders.One week after he set an N.F.L. quarterback record with 181 rushing yards against Green Bay, Kaepernick carried twice for 21 yards — and one of those rushes was actually a scramble. He did beat the Falcons with his legs, but not the way everyone expected.It was not the run but the threat to run that made the difference.The threat to run fueled the 49ers' comeback in their 28-24 victory. It left vulnerable the middle of the Falcons' defense, opened holes wide enough for a family of elephants to lumber through. It allowed Frank Gore to gash Atlanta for 90 rushing yards and 2 touchdowns. It opened up the play-action pass, which meant Kaepernick unleashed tight end Vernon Davis, which meant the Falcons grew dizzy trying to figure out which part of the field to defend.That is the beauty of Kaepernick and this 49ers' offense under the coordinator Greg Roman: the myriad ways that it can move the ball and score. That is why San Francisco is back in the Super Bowl, because Coach Jim Harbaugh made the midseason change to Kaepernick and continued to add wrinkle upon wrinkle to an offense as unpredictable as any in the N.F.L.The last two weeks underscored that notion. Against the Packers, Kaepernick looked like an improved version of Fran Tarkenton as he scrambled this way and that. Against the Falcons, he played the role of prototypical passer, all drop-backs and handoffs and throws downfield.Afterward, Kaepernick tugged an N.F.C. championship T-shirt over his shoulder pads and conducted his news conference with his play-call sheet still on his wrist, the black stripes still underneath his eyes. Reporters continued to press with the same question they have asked since he first started in Week 11 against Chicago. Was he worried?Sunday marked his ninth start in professional football. Think about that. Kaepernick watched an entire game from the bench as late as late October. But worried? No, he was not.Gore entered the room while Kaepernick dismissed any concerns over the 17-0 deficit the 49ers faced early. Gore embraced his quarterback and pulled him close, both men still in pads."He can do whatever," Gore told reporters, unprompted, with his arm still around Kaepernick. "He can throw the ball. He can run the ball. He's a football player. If it wasn't for him, it would have been tough today."The words seemed to linger there an extra second, if only because of how Kaepernick arrived here and who would have played if he did not. Alex Smith was injured when Kaepernick replaced him, but despite what Harbaugh said initially, Kaepernick remained the starter when Smith recovered.The reasons for that became clearer Sunday. Kaepernick completed 16 of 21 passes for 233 yards and a touchdown. He made smart decisions. He shook off another slow start, same as against the Packers.While Smith also led the 49ers to an N.F.C. title game, just last season, the difference between victory and defeat, in reaching the Super Bowl or not, was the threat that Kaepernick would run. For as difficult as it was for Harbaugh to stick with Kaepernick, to bench Smith and not for playing poorly, he made the correct decision, despite the risk inherent in it.Smith had reached or at least neared his ceiling. Kaepernick had barely left the floor.His college coach at Nevada, Chris Ault, created the Pistol to work exactly as it did against Atlanta. He wanted to run the ball straight ahead and accomplished that with options and misdirection. The Falcons decided to contain Kaepernick, and that took commitment, with an extra defender or two required to monitor the edge. Against Green Bay, the 49ers ran Kaepernick outside, off zone reads, into the alleys they created off the tackles. When the Falcons took that away, Kaepernick simply handed the ball off to Gore, who dashed inside, between the tackles."Gore's scores were the read," Ault wrote in a text message on Sunday night. "Kaep just handed it off. That's the beauty of the play."Indeed. And the beauty of the offense. The greatest concern with the Pistol, the reason some pundits believe it is more of a phase than a transformative offensive concept, is that requires quarterbacks to venture upfield, into danger. On Sunday, Kaepernick executed the Pistol and rarely ventured anywhere.Instead, Kaepernick slung the football around the field, using the throwing motion he revamped at Nevada, from sidearm to a more typical over-the-top motion. He looked like a quarterback, but not one who needed a disclaimer, or a backhanded compliment — mobile, athletic, etc. — in way of a description.Kaepernick rarely ran and still beat the Falcons with his legs. This marked another step in his evolution.
CHICAGO — Like the woebegone teams it has put on the field in recent seasons, Chicago Cubs management has struck out the last three years when it comes to renovating Wrigley Field, the aging yet treasured ballpark on this city's North Side. But while the Cubs — and their long-suffering fans — will soon begin another rebuilding year, there is no such patience for the future of Wrigley.In a ballroom at a downtown hotel Saturday, Cubs executives delivered a presentation titled "Restoring Wrigley Field" during the team's annual fan convention. It is an ambitious construction project that will include renovations to the interior, exterior, baseball facilities and infrastructure of one of the crown jewels of American stadiums.Colorful artistic renderings showed a fan deck in left field, expanded suites and concourses, and a restored outer facade to its 1930s design. The amenities and aesthetic changes will go hand in hand with larger and updated clubhouses (including indoor batting cages accessible during games) and a nuts-and-bolts infrastructure overhaul that will replace the current wood roof as well as concrete and seats in the lower bowl and upper deck.There has been no official financing agreement reached with the city, but the Cubs indicated Saturday for the first time that the Ricketts family, which owns the team, may be prepared to pay for the renovations. The Cubs expect the work to be completed over five off-seasons at a cost of $300 million and would like to break ground next year.A standing-room-only crowd of fans was on hand for the announcement, drawn to learn the fate of their beloved ballpark, which opened in 1914. General Manager Jed Hoyer cited the example of Fenway Park, where he and the Cubs president for baseball operations, Theo Epstein, were involved in a decade-long project while both worked in the Red Sox's front office.Architects and engineers leading the renovation traveled to Fenway, as well as the Rose Bowl in Pasadena, Calif., and Lambeau Field, the home of the Packers. All are stadiums that pride themselves on strong traditions that have undergone recent improvements to help them generate more revenue while still maintaining the allure of antiquity."The thing we got that was very clear was you don't change the field," said Steven Jacobsen, a restoration consultant on the Wrigley project. "You can get better seats, but you don't change the dimensions. You preserve that feeling a fan has walking up to his seat and seeing the field."Since buying the Cubs and Wrigley in 2009 for $845 million, the Ricketts family has sought aggressively to renovate the stadium. In 2010, a bill in the state legislature seeking state bonds to help finance the project stalled amid severe backlash to public assistance with Illinois facing financial difficulties.In May 2012, there were hopes a deal was near before a report in The New York Times detailed the patriarch of the Ricketts family, Joe Ricketts, was considering financing a race-baiting ad campaign against President Obama. Joe Ricketts has no involvement with the day-to-day operations of the Cubs, but Chicago's mayor, Rahm Emanuel, Obama's former chief of staff, reportedly cut off negotiations.Tax dollars are off the table for now, but the team is still in talks with the city, which must approve the project. The hope, the Cubs said, is that by paying for the project privately, they will be able to loosen some of the zoning and landmark restrictions in and around Wrigley, located in a densely populated urban neighborhood. The Cubs would like to close down neighboring streets for fairs on game days, in the model of Yawkey Way next to Fenway, as well as schedule more night games and concert events and expand advertising inside the stadium. Additionally, the Ricketts family also has a deal with the Starwood Hotels chain to build a Sheraton hotel across from Wrigley on Clark Street."We'd like to run our business without restrictions," said Crane Kenney, the Cubs' president for business operations. "If this is an asset that is going to be restricted, then we should get some help. If we're not going to be restricted, then it's right to ask us to do this ourselves."Cubs fans, for the most part, appeared pleased with what was in store for Wrigley. An especially boisterous cheer greeted the news that bathroom capacity would be increased by 42 percent."I think the Ricketts family did it the right way," Therese Pudela, 37, said. "They're preserving what Wrigley is, what it means to all of us."The only noticeable rumble came with the announcement that a Jumbotron is still under consideration."People boo that because they don't want the Jumbotron," said Joe Hafenscher, 80, who said he attended the 1945 World Series at Wrigley. "I'm concerned that in the quest for modernization we may lose the charm that once was Wrigley Field."
Nobody knows what Kevin Garnett will say or do when Carmelo Anthony steps onto the floor in Boston on Thursday night, when the Knicks and the Celtics meet for the first time since Garnett's on-court posturing turned Anthony into a backstage vigilante early this month in New York.That is the point. Garnett is as unpredictable as he is emotional. He is as calculating as he is quick-witted. If that sounds contradictory, Garnett has always come across as a little stranger than the average professional basketball player, and at least that much sharper.When he announced at a Chicago pizza restaurant in May 1995 his intention to join the N.B.A. right out of high school, he was asked if he had consulted with Moses Malone or Shawn Kemp, who had successfully made the leap without playing in college.No, Garnett said, he had called Bill Willoughby, who had not lasted long as a pro, to determine what pitfalls to avoid.When he attended the league's rookie transition program the following September, he, alone, spoke out when an acting troupe staged a hypothetical situation in which a player would have to decide whether to give money to his own brother because he was in debt to drug dealers."He's a junkie," Garnett, then 19, said. If he handed over the cash, Garnett added, the brother would "still be a junkie."As a rookie with the Minnesota Timberwolves, he invited a couple of friends from his childhood home in Mauldin, S.C., to share an apartment with him, provided they got jobs or went to school."It was not the typical entourage thing, and Kevin was never your typical N.B.A. star," said Flip Saunders, who became Minnesota's coach during that season and remained there with Garnett for almost a decade. "For him, the team was like a family, and if you're part of it, there's nothing he won't do for you."Over the years, Garnett has bought suits for younger teammates, even a car in one case. When his teammate and close friend Malik Sealy was killed in an early-morning crash by a drunken driver on the way home from Garnett's 24th birthday bash, he paid for the funeral and wrote Sealy's widow a check in the tens of thousands.In or out has always been the determining factor in which Garnett — Jekyll or Hyde, tender spirit or trash-talker — a person might see. Ray Allen was a beloved teammate in Boston until he signed with the Heat. Garnett ignored him when the Celtics opened the season in Miami."Classic Kevin," said Terry Porter, who played three seasons with Garnett in Minnesota in the mid-1990s and is now the acting coach of the Timberwolves. "If you play with him, he's good people, great people, off-the-charts people. Other guys, yeah, he'll rub them the wrong way."Anthony may be another member of the N.B.A. superstar fraternity, a fellow All-Star starter for the Eastern Conference for the annual dunk-and-pony show next month in Houston. But he is a Knick and, more important, the key to defeating the Knicks.With the Celtics struggling to qualify for a low playoff spot in the East, Porter speculated that Garnett might have already have been envisioning a first-round series, trying to attach figurative puppet strings onto Anthony, the Knicks' best player, when he incited him. Or, Porter conceded, Garnett might have merely been conniving in the moment."Always hard to know with Kevin," he said, laughing.While Garnett and Celtics Coach Doc Rivers have denied that Garnett went so far as to comment on Anthony's wife, Porter said Garnett was old school enough — in the manner of notorious trash-talkers like Michael Jordan and Larry Bird — to believe that nothing was off-limits."I just assumed based on Melo's reaction that maybe Kevin went there," Porter said. "Because when you see someone go after a guy after the game — and Melo obviously lost it — you have to wonder if he did cross a line."Saunders, too, acknowledged that Garnett's intensity and team loyalty had always been a combustible mix, even in practice with teammates and coaches. But typically with purpose.
Matt Moulson and Michael Grabner scored two goals each, helping the Islanders rally for a 7-4 road victory Thursday over the Toronto Maple Leafs .Moulson had one of four third-period goals for the Islanders (2-1), who overcame a 3-1 first-period deficit. Grabner scored both of his goals in the third, including a short-handed, empty-net one at 18 minutes 50 seconds.Toronto (2-2) fell to 0-2 at home. Frustrated fans chanted "Let's go, Blue Jays" with 2:40 remaining.With the score tied, 3-3, Grabner gave the Islanders a lead at 3:23 of the third, firing a wrist shot past Ben Scrivens for his second goal of the season. Keith Aucoin scored his first about a minute later to put the Islanders ahead, 5-3.Matt Frattin had a goal and two assists for the Maple Leafs, hours after he was recalled from the American Hockey League's Toronto Marlies.BLACKHAWKS 3, STARS 2 Marian Hossa scored his league-leading fifth goal 1:41 into overtime, giving Chicago (4-0) a comeback victory over host Dallas (2-1-1).With the Blackhawks on a power play, Hossa fired a one-timer from the slot past goalie Kari Lehtonen.CANADIENS 4, CAPITALS 1 Andrei Markov continued his resurgence with a goal and an assist, helping Montreal beat host Washington. The Capitals are 0-3 for the first time in nearly two decades.Finally healthy after twice tearing the anterior cruciate ligament in his right knee, Markov was part of a four-goal spree by the Canadiens (2-1) in the second period.HURRICANES 6, SABRES 3 Eric Staal scored three goals, Jeff Skinner added two, and host Carolina (1-2) beat Buffalo (2-1).SENATORS 3, PANTHERS 1 Erik Karlsson scored the go-ahead goal midway through the second period, helping Ottawa (3-0) defeat host Florida (1-3).BLUES 3, PREDATORS 0 Patrik Berglund scored on a penalty shot as host St. Louis (3-1) shut out Nashville (1-1-2).AVALANCHE 4, BLUE JACKETS 0 Matt Duchene scored two goals and set up another, Semyon Varlamov made 33 saves, and host Colorado (2-1) routed Columbus (1-2-1).LEAFS' LUPUL BREAKS FOREARM Maple Leafs forward Joffrey Lupul will miss at least six weeks because of a broken forearm.Lupul was injured Wednesday during Toronto's 5-2 win at Pittsburgh. He was in front of the net during a power play when he was hit by a slap shot.
CHICAGO — On a dark and cold morning last month, 19-year-old Aaron Liberman woke at his apartment and walked a block and a half to a two-story, redbrick synagogue in West Rogers Park, a predominantly Orthodox Jewish neighborhood in northwest Chicago. Inside, he was met by the hum of worship and a smattering of older men — some in black hats, some wrapped in prayer shawls — seated at long tables, surrounded by shelves packed with books, Hebrew letters on their spines.Liberman removed his jacket and unpacked his worn prayer book. He unfurled his tefillin, small boxes holding prayers printed on parchment, and bound them to his left arm and his forehead with black leather straps. Then he prayed.During the service, a man walked over, politely interrupting Liberman's meditation, asked how he was, and then, rather proudly, said: "We're going to get tickets for one of your games. My kids, they are very excited."So met two worlds — Orthodox Judaism and N.C.A.A. Division I basketball — that are making an unlikely connection through Liberman. Liberman, a freshman at Northwestern, is 6 feet 10 inches of lean muscle, topped on and off the court by a skullcap. He did not play basketball seriously until he was a sophomore in high school. Now, he is believed to be the third practicing Orthodox Jew to be part of a Division I team.Tamir Goodman is widely recognized as the first Orthodox Jew to play Division I basketball. He received a scholarship to Maryland, but chose to play at Towson because the university tailored its schedule to his decision not to play on the Sabbath. Naama Shafir, a fifth-year senior at Toledo, is the first Orthodox Jewish woman to play Division I basketball. Shafir, who wears a short-sleeve shirt under her jersey to keep with customs of modesty, scored 40 points in the National Invitation Tournament championship game in 2011.Liberman, though, says he recognizes his situation is a bit unusual."If I had to choose, I wouldn't be known as the Jewish basketball player," Liberman said. "But I see how that might be difficult."After the morning service, Liberman drove his black pickup truck 15 minutes to Northwestern's campus in suburban Evanston, Ill., where he went straight to the training room. Liberman, who has had shin splints and has not appeared in a game, has decided to redshirt this season but continues to practice and travel with the team.As noted by Paul Lukas of the Web site Uni Watch, Liberman will probably be the first Division I player to wear zizit, the knotted tassels at the four corners of a prayer shawl, under a uniform."It wasn't very long ago that I couldn't make a layup, probably freshman year in high school," he said. "It's pretty strange that I'm here."The life of an Orthodox basketball player is one of discipline. Liberman prays three times a day, keeps kosher and travels only by foot on the Sabbath, from sundown Friday to sundown Saturday.However, Liberman has decided, after much reflection and consultation with rabbis, to play on the Sabbath, the Jewish day of rest. On one Saturday afternoon, he walked eight miles to practice."Actually, playing basketball is not breaking any of the 39 laws of the Sabbath," he said. "But I'll only be taking cold showers afterward because you can't use hot water."Liberman grew up in Valley Village, an area of northwestern Los Angeles, where he was discovered almost by happenstance by Josh Moore, a former N.B.A. player and a cousin of Shaquille O'Neal's. During the summer after Liberman's freshman year, Moore saw him play in a scrimmage and approached him, noting that his length and natural athleticism would be attractive to college coaches.Lenard Liberman, Aaron's 6-6 father, played high school basketball and tried unsuccessfully to walk on at Stanford. His son, thoughtful and soft-spoken, preferred games of a slower pace. He fished as a child and played some baseball as he grew older.But after Moore raised the possibility of playing in college, Liberman began training with him.
Andrei Markov scored on a power play 4 minutes 22 seconds into overtime, as the Montreal Canadiens recovered from blowing a two-goal lead to beat the visiting Devils , 4-3, on Sunday.Markov was at the edge of the crease and lifted the rebound of Rene Bourque's shot off the end boards into an open side for his fourth goal.Brendan Gallagher scored his first N.H.L. goal, and his linemate Brandon Prust got his first with the Canadiens. Ryan White also scored for Montreal (3-1-0).The Canadiens took a 3-1 lead in the third period, but David Clarkson scored on a power play for the Devils (3-0-1) and Dainius Zubrus tied the game at 13:02. Patrik Elias scored and had two assists to reach 900 career points.JETS 5, ISLANDERS 4 Evander Kane scored 1:59 into overtime to give Winnipeg (3-1-1) a come-from-behind victory over the visiting Islanders (2-3-0).Kane, who also had an assist, tapped the puck in past goalie Evgeni Nabokov after a rebound.Alexei Ponikarovsky, Bryan Little, Dustin Byfuglien and Alexander Burmistrov also scored for Winnipeg, which was down, 4-2, midway through the third.The Islanders' John Tavares had a goal and two assists. David Ullstrom, Matt Moulson and Mark Streit also scored.BLUES 5, WILD 4 Vladimir Sobotka scored at 2:16 of overtime as St. Louis beat visiting Minnesota, which got two goals and an assist from Zach Parise.LIGHTNING 5, FLYERS 1 Teddy Purcell had a goal and two assists, Martin St. Louis contributed four assists, and host Tampa Bay routed Philadelphia.CAPITALS 3, SABRES 2 Alex Ovechkin scored his first goal of the season, and host Washington (1-3-1) became the last N.H.L. team to get a win.BLACKHAWKS 2, RED WINGS 1 Nick Leddy scored 2:45 into overtime, and host Chicago improved to 6-0-0.PENGUINS 2, SENATORS 1 Sidney Crosby, Evgeni Malkin and James Neal scored in a shootout to give visiting Pittsburgh a win.SHARKS 4, CANUCKS 1 Joe Pavelski had two goals to lead visiting San Jose (5-0-0) over Vancouver.
The Yankees had dated Alex Rodriguez for four years before popping the question after the 2007 season: Will you take this 10-year, $275 million contract? Rodriguez said yes, and together they have had some fun. But a marriage that starts with a lie is bound to fall apart, and that is what has happened.Rodriguez's contract, which now strangles the Yankees' future, might be the most lucrative con in baseball history. It colors everything about him. Tuesday's revelation in the Miami New Times, which tied him to a supplier of performance-enhancing drugs as recently as last season, was another reminder of his deceit.The relationship might be over soon. Rodriguez's latest public-relations firm (he has had several) issued a statement Tuesday in which he denied being a patient of the shuttered anti-aging clinic in the story. But baseball is investigating, and with good cause; three of the players named in the report — Melky Cabrera, Bartolo Colon and Yasmani Grandal — were suspended last year after positive drug tests.The results of baseball's investigation, in theory, could help the Yankees if they attempt to void Rodriguez's contract. That would not be easy — the Yankees failed to do it with Jason Giambi — but there may be another exit strategy.The Yankees have continued to emphasize the seriousness of Rodriguez's hip injury, with General Manager Brian Cashman asserting last week that it could keep him out all season, not just for the first half. The natural next step in that progression is that the injury would end his career, as it did for Albert Belle of the Baltimore Orioles in 2001. This would allow Rodriguez to collect his money — but with insurance, not the Yankees, covering most of it.That is the dream outcome, anyway, but for now the Yankees are still obligated to pay Rodriguez the five years and $114 million remaining on the deal they gave him before they knew of his chemical past.That folly is mostly on the Yankees, of course. Hank Steinbrenner had assumed command that fateful winter, vowing to cut Rodriguez loose after he opted out of his contract. Instead, he rewarded Rodriguez with the richest deal in baseball history, even though no other team was known to be bidding, say, nine years. In retaining Rodriguez, the Yankees also passed on a much younger third baseman, Miguel Cabrera, who was traded to Detroit and now annually knocks the Yankees from the playoffs.It is an amusing footnote that Rodriguez's contract was officially announced on Dec. 13, 2007, the day Major League Baseball released the Mitchell Report on steroids. Rodriguez, who had always denied steroid use, was not named in the report. Part of the reason for the length of the deal was the presumption that he was clean and would chase Barry Bonds's tainted home run record in pinstripes.It was all a fraud, or "A-Fraud," to use the term that Joe Torre revealed in his book to be a clubhouse nickname for Rodriguez. Fourteen months after signing the contract, Rodriguez admitted he had used steroids from 2001 to 2003.Lying about steroid use is hardly shocking, but Rodriguez was pathological. Consider this passage from a recent interview by the writer Jeff Pearlman with Sports Illustrated's Tom Verducci, who recalled a conversation with Rodriguez in 2002:"It was in his hotel suite in Chicago after a game one night. He looked at me like I had two heads. 'Steroids? Gee, why would anybody take them? What do they do? I don't know anything about it.' I walked out of the suite shaking my head about his complete and theatrical lack of knowledge about the worst-kept secret in the game. It would be seven years later that we all discovered, by his own admission, that he was loaded to the gills on steroids at that very moment."When Sports Illustrated finally exposed Rodriguez as a steroid user, part of his response was to smear the reporter, Selena Roberts, by falsely claiming that she tried to break into his home while his children were sleeping. He sounded vaguely like Michael Corleone with that line, except Rodriguez has always been the Fredo of the Yankee family, awkward and envious and insecure.Such insecurity has surely fueled Rodriguez's drive to achieve, while also influencing his many bizarre decisions. He has denied many of them, like sending a baseball to some women in the stands during a playoff game last fall, but with his history of lying, who knows what to believe?Rodriguez will always have his apologists, mostly people who have never had to deal with him and have never been part of his web of deceit. To some who know him well, including the Yankees and Major League Baseball, he is a source of irritation at best, slippery and duplicitous at worst.Remember that Rodriguez continued to lie to the Yankees even after admitting his past steroid use. After his first hip surgery, in 2009, he maintained to the team that he had not seen Anthony Galea, the Canada-based physician who pleaded guilty two years later to federal charges stemming from his distribution of human growth hormone to professional athletes.Rodriguez had, in fact, seen Galea, and baseball officials and the Yankees remain unsure that they know the extent of his links to performance-enhancing drugs. The Yankees might be inclined to overlook that if Rodriguez were still an elite player. But his production slips every year.That fact, of course, cannot be forgotten. If Rodriguez were a healthy superstar, the Yankees would still want him around. They might have even supported him in their terse statement on Tuesday, which pledged support for baseball's drug program and noted that the matter was now under the jurisdiction of the commissioner's office.Rodriguez has won a championship and two Most Valuable Player awards in New York. He is a historically significant Yankee, emblematic of a complicated era for the game and the team. But the sideshows never end, and it is hard to argue he belongs here anymore.
NEW ORLEANS — When the gossip finally reached the Western Kentucky athletic department — that the daughter of the football coach was dating the young basketball assistant — there was one natural reaction."I remember laughing to myself thinking, with all the coaches and athletes in Joani's family, is she sure she wants to get involved with a coach?" said Paul Just, a former Western Kentucky sports information director."Joani might have had enough."Apparently not, because Joani Harbaugh, the youngest child of the football coach Jack Harbaugh, and the sister of John and Jim, eventually married Tom Crean, the young basketball assistant she started dating in the early 1990s. He is now the head coach of the Indiana Hoosiers, the third-ranked team in the country, and Joani Crean might be the most anxiety-ridden sports fan in the United States this week."I don't know how that happened," she said, laughing, about her fate. "It was not a plan. Twenty years ago, we were all different people. Twenty years ago, we were all scrapping and scraping to make a few bucks."Those days are long gone, of course, but ever since John Harbaugh's Baltimore Ravens and Jim Harbaugh's San Francisco 49ers advanced to the Super Bowl 10 days ago, the Harbaugh family dynamics have been analyzed with a depth usually reserved for a psychiatrist's sofa.Joani, though, was more worried about basketball. Last week, a few days after her husband had tried to catch a few minutes of the N.F.C. championship game in an airport while his team prepared to leave Chicago after a victory at Northwestern — Crean admitted he would have stood there longer if he had not had 50 people waiting for him — she had a mental checklist for the next few days ."In my mind-set, we have three games before the Super Bowl; my son has a game and he has a science test," she said last week. "Honestly, I'm more nervous watching Tom's games. That affects our life every day. That affects my kids going to school every day. I would say Jim and John's jobs don't affect my daily life."The Harbaugh and Crean families are, in many ways, like most others that do not involve powerful figures in tremendously high-profile enterprises. Jackie, Jack Harbaugh's wife, is the chief executive of the family, Tom Crean said. The three Harbaugh children worry most about seeing their parents, who live in Wisconsin now, and about getting all of their own children together. They do not all get together often enough, they admit, mostly because of the demands of their jobs. When they do, Joani said, "it's no different than any other family. Diapers need to be changed, babies need to be fed."Well, not exactly. Other families don't usually coordinate visits around the N.F.L. scouting combine, the way the Harbaugh brothers do when they are in Indianapolis in February. Crean said the last time he could remember the entire family being together was last year during Super Bowl week. The Hoosiers had just lost on a Wednesday night, and at their practice Thursday, Jim and John showed up and addressed the team."It was really them talking to our team like they talk to their own teams," Crean said. " 'This is what you need to do to win.' It was all about attitude."Crean said it was the jolt the Hoosiers needed to propel them through the rest of the season and into the N.C.A.A. tournament. But the communication among the brothers-in-law goes much deeper. Crean said he receives text messages from the Harbaugh brothers before or after almost every Indiana game asking about the Hoosiers. Crean follows their teams closely, too, reading as much as he can about them. He watches their games live or on tape, in part because he tries to glean things from the way the Ravens and the 49ers play and apply them to the Hoosiers. Crean said that even if those teams were not coached by his wife's brothers, he would have a file of the things they do because the Harbaughs are excellent coaches."Some techniques with how you use screens, with using hands and leverage, attacking shoulders, definitely some drill ideas I get from them," Crean said. "When you talk about leverage and staying low, no question about it, to me those things parallel. The discipline of practice, the structure of practice. I learned a lot when John was in Philadelphia on grading of film; I learned more and more from Jim about how long to be in front of your team. Those are ongoing discussions. I am very, very fortunate in this deal to have them as friends, and certainly as resources."
NEW ORLEANS — Jacoby Jones is not the most notable native Louisianian on the Baltimore Ravens ; that would be safety Ed Reed. He is also not the Ravens player best known for on-field dancing; that honor goes to the retiring linebacker Ray Lewis.On Sunday, though, as the Ravens beat the San Francisco 49ers, 34-31, in the Super Bowl, Jones starred in his home city and shimmied with a rhythm that surely made Lewis proud. Jones caught one touchdown pass and returned a kickoff 108 yards for another, setting an N.F.L. postseason record, in providing the most explosive moments of the Ravens' victory.In a prescient moment, Jones warned the 49ers early in the week not to give him an opportunity in the return game."If I were them, I wouldn't kick it to me, not at all," he told reporters. But San Francisco kicker David Akers apparently did not get the news. On the opening kickoff of the second half, Akers blasted the ball deep into the Ravens' end zone, and Jones, eschewing a touchback, brought the ball out.There was little subtlety to his path. He essentially went right up the middle, sprinkling in a few sidesteps but mostly sprinting straight ahead as if he were on an interstate highway. Once he got past Akers, there was little hope for the 49ers to catch him, and he swayed in the end zone, doing a version of Lewis's dance, known as the Squirrel.How did it feel for Jones? "Like a million dollars," he said afterward. "I saw daylight because of my blockers."It was the first kickoff return for a touchdown in the Super Bowl since Devin Hester ran one back for Chicago in 2007. During the buildup to the Super Bowl, Jones said he recalled watching Hester's run and had thought of doing the same thing "hundreds of times."He added: "On returns that go for a touchdown, they happen when you least expect it. In games like this we just want to work for good drive starts and field position. So if one pops open, that's a blessing."Jones also took advantage of an opening in the 49ers' secondary in the second quarter, slipping behind Chris Culliver and pulling in a pass that quarterback Joe Flacco heaved some 50 yards in the air. Jones, who also caught the critical 70-yard late-game touchdown pass that allowed the Ravens to force overtime against Denver in the divisional round, pulled in Flacco's floater as he fell to the ground just inside the 10.That would have been an important gain if the play stopped there, but Jones realized that Culliver had not touched him. Jones jumped to his feet and dashed into the end zone."He had a little space, went up and made a great catch," Flacco said. "He was a beast out there."Jones's performance was an upbeat conclusion to an experience that began with a return home. Jones grew up in New Orleans East and attended Abramson High School, but his family's house and his high school were destroyed in Hurricane Katrina. Still, Jones's mother remained in New Orleans, and she cooked dinner for Jones and several of his teammates last Monday.Gumbo, jambalaya, macaroni and potato salad were among the items on the menu, Jones said, and the feast was the perfect way to begin a week that Jones, who was cut after five seasons with Houston and signed with the Ravens last May, had imagined for some time."I can't explain it," he said amid the celebration afterward. "We got the W. I got the W at home, and, Monday morning, I'm headed to my second home, which is Baltimore, and bringing that win."
Ilya Kovalchuk broke a 1-1 tie with a short-handed goal late in the second period Thursday, helping the Devils beat the slumping Tampa Bay Lightning , 4-2, for their third straight win.Andy Greene and Patrik Elias sealed the victory with goals 14 seconds apart with less than five minutes left, sending the visiting Lightning to their third consecutive loss after a 6-1 start.The Devils' Adam Henrique scored for the second straight game.Kovalchuk's goal, his third of the season and second while short-handed, came after he intercepted a pass by Sami Salo and skated into the Lightning zone on a two-on-one break with Travis Zajac. Kovalchuk used Zajac as a decoy and snapped a shot from the left circle that beat goalie Anders Lindback.PENGUINS 5, CAPITALS 2 Sidney Crosby had a goal and two assists, extending his points streak to six games, as host Pittsburgh pounded Washington.Evgeni Malkin also had a goal and two assists for the Penguins, who won their fifth straight.SABRES 5, CANADIENS 4 Thomas Vanek scored twice in regulation, including the tying goal with two seconds left, and also came through in a shootout, leading Buffalo past visiting Montreal.RED WINGS 5, BLUES 1 Petr Mrazek made 26 saves in his N.H.L. debut as Detroit won at St. Louis.CANUCKS 4, WILD 1 Mason Raymond had a power-play goal and an assist in the second period, leading Vancouver past host Minnesota for its fourth straight win.PANTHERS 3, FLYERS 2 Jonathon Huberdeau and Peter Mueller scored in a shootout to lead Florida past host Philadelphia.Before the game, the Flyers signed defenseman Kimmo Timonen to a one-year extension through the 2013-14 season.MAPLE LEAFS 3, JETS 2 Phil Kessel's first goal of the season lifted Toronto at Winnipeg.PREDATORS 3, KINGS 0 Pekka Rinne made 32 saves for his first shutout of the season, Colin Wilson scored twice and host Nashville defeated Los Angeles.FLAMES 4, BLUE JACKETS 3 Alex Tanguay scored on a one-timer in overtime, leading Calgary to a road victory over Columbus.BLACKHAWKS 6, COYOTES 2 Patrick Kane had two goals, and visiting Chicago remained the only team without a loss in regulation.DEVILS STICK WITH MATTEAU The Devils are keeping the first-round draft pick Stefan Matteau in the N.H.L. for now. Stephane Matteau, his father and a former Ranger, eliminated the Devils in the 1994 Eastern Conference finals with an overtime goal.Matteau, 18, was in the lineup Thursday against the Lightning, marking his sixth game of the season. The decision meant that the first year of his contract kicked in for the lockout-shortened 48-game season.
Ilya Kovalchuk and David Clarkson scored less than two minutes apart in the second period Sunday night, leading the Devils to a 3-1 win over the Pittsburgh Penguins .It was the visiting Devils' fifth straight victory, and their second in two days against Pittsburgh. On Saturday, they defeated the Penguins at home.Clarkson's power-play goal at 13 minutes 20 seconds of the second period, giving the Devils a 3-0 lead, was his second goal of the game and his team-leading ninth of the season.The backup goalie Johan Hedberg, a former Penguin, made 23 saves and earned his second win of the year.James Neal scored Pittsburgh's only goal, 15 seconds into the third period. The Devils held Sidney Crosby without a point for the second straight game.RED WINGS 3, KINGS 2 Jonathan Ericsson's goal with five seconds left, less than a minute after Los Angeles had tied the score, gave Detroit its third win in four days.Jimmy Howard made 45 saves, his highest total in more than a year, for the host Red Wings.BRUINS 3, SABRES 1 Patrice Bergeron's go-ahead goal on a third-period power play led Boston to a victory at Buffalo.With 17 points in their first 10 games, the Bruins (8-1-1) are off to their best start.BLACKHAWKS 3, PREDATORS 0 Marcus Kruger and Jonathan Toews scored 66 seconds apart in the second period, and Chicago won at Nashville to remain the N.H.L.'s lone undefeated team in regulation (10-0-2).Magnus Paajarvi broke a 1-1 tie with a short-handed goal with 3:10 left. Sam Gagne assisted on the winner and added an empty-net goal.The Blue Jackets, who lost their third straight, outshot the Oilers by 40-14.MAPLE LEAF ACCUSED OF BITING Toronto Maple Leafs forward Mikhail Grabovski will have a disciplinary hearing with the N.H.L. on Monday over allegations of biting an opponent.Montreal Canadiens forward Max Pacioretty said Grabovski bit him during a fight in Toronto's 6-0 victory Saturday. After the incident, Pacioretty showed his wrist to the officials.HALAK REJOINS BLUES The St. Louis Blues activated goalie Jaroslav Halak from injured reserve, a sign that the struggling Brian Elliott may be headed to the bench.
In 1990, when C. Vivian Stringer was coaching at Iowa, she received in the mail what she described as a gold letter with a diamond on it from the university congratulating her for her 300th win."I thought, what's this for?" Stringer said. She had been so focused on winning daily that she had overlooked her totals.Today, on the doorstep of another milestone, with 899 wins, Stringer has reached a level of success too rarefied to ignore. With a victory at DePaul on Tuesday, Stringer would join three other women's Division I coaches to reach that mark.Not much else has changed over the years, though. Winning every day remains Stringer's soul-burning objective — particularly this season, with an 11th straight N.C.A.A. tournament berth for her team in jeopardy.Stringer, ever fiery, does not want to entertain the notion of missing the tournament."It scares me half to death," Stringer said before the team's flight to Chicago on Monday. "In my mind, it's hard for me to handle that."At 64, Stringer seems as hungry as when she started, in 1971, coaching basketball, volleyball and soccer at Cheyney State, a historically black college outside Philadelphia. She spoke of the struggle getting her current young team — there are nine underclassmen — to invoke their passion the same way it burns in her."Sometimes they don't even know what they don't know," she said, her soft voice rising. "They mean well. I thoroughly enjoy working with them; they're great. But sometimes I wonder — Do they even know? Do they even know? And what's it going to take for them to know?"I'm looking at this group and thinking, do they really know what's in jeopardy?" Stringer added. "I talk about our sense of urgency. Sometimes I wonder. I think they think we'll just turn it on."With one victory, Stringer would join two retired coaches, Pat Summitt of Tennessee and Jody Conradt of Texas, and the active Sylvia Hatchell of North Carolina with 900 wins or more. Mike Krzyzewski, Jim Boeheim and Bobby Knight are the only men to do it.But at 14-8, tied for sixth place in the Big East at 5-4, Rutgers has an unsettling status this season. The program went to the last 16 every year between 2005 and 2009, including a losing trip to the N.C.A.A. title game in 2007. This season, Rutgers is 13th in the conference in scoring and last among the 15 teams in 3-point shooting and free-throw percentage.Attendance has fallen steadily off its peak of 4,740 a game in the 2007-8 season. There have been grumblings that Rutgers might soon look for a change after Stringer's contract expires in 2014.Stringer said Monday that her team had the talent to succeed but has not yet grasped the right mind-set."With this young group. I've just got to be a little more patient with myself," Stringer said, "and certainly more patient with them."Rutgers has had the No. 3-rated recruiting class in the nation two years in a row, according to ESPN's scouting site, HoopGurlz, including two McDonald's All-Americans."The caliber of player isn't an issue," said Rosalyn Gold-Onwude, an ESPN analyst. But she pointed to the rise of other talented programs that recruit heavily in New York City, like Syracuse, West Virginia, St. John's and even Fordham, which is in the midst of a resurgent season."It's not a one or two or three-coach picking pool for East Coast players anymore," Gold-Onwude said.Carlene Mitchell, a Rutgers assistant under Stringer from 2002 to 2011, said the demands on the program were nearly impossible to consistently satisfy after all the success the team has had over the years."What's enough to make everyone content?" said Mitchell, now the coach at U.C. Santa Barbara. "Is it every year playing in a national championship game? Is it elite eight? The standards she had set are so high, how do you stay there every year?"On the court, Mitchell soaked in Stringer's brilliance as a defensive tactician — her trademark 55 full-court press is stitched to her winning legacy — while marveling at her tirelessness."She has more energy than I have," Mitchell said, "and I'm half her age."Stringer said coaching had not become any easier, but had remained as much fun. She revels in the prepractice planning. Lately, the wins have been harder to come by. But she has not lost the thrill of attaining all 899."It's kind of poetic that this year probably reflects an accumulation of every year over the years, the struggles, the good, the bad," Stringer said. "I'm so frustrated with them at times, but then I'm so happy and elated because I've watched them grow."
CHICAGO — During the national anthem at Chicago Blackhawks home games, the fans not only rise, but cheer, hoot and holler at the top of their lungs.On Tuesday night, the capacity crowd at the United Center might have been as loud as it has ever been in welcoming home its team, off to one of the hottest starts in N.H.L. history.The Blackhawks returned from a 6-game, 12-day trip with a 10-0-2 record, and though they lost in a shootout Tuesday to Anaheim, their season-opening 13-game stretch without a regulation loss put them three games from the league record. The Ducks set the mark for such a streak when they started 12-0-4 in 2006-7, the season they won the Stanley Cup.Considering the N.H.L.'s 48-game schedule this year, Chicago has achieved a rather incredible feat: earning at least one point in each game more than a quarter of the way through the season. (The Blackhawks' other two losses also came in shootouts.)"It's awesome," the rookie Brandon Saad said. "It's really just awesome to be playing like this."Blackhawks players seemed at a loss to explain their scorching start.Right wing Patrick Kane, tied for second in the league through Wednesday with 20 points, said of his success, "Sometimes the puck finds you."Or as the captain Jonathan Toews put it, "I don't know if there's a method to the madness."What is clear is that Chicago, which plays the San Jose Sharks on Friday in only its fourth home game of the season, is the N.H.L.'s best team right now.Entering Thursday's games, the Blackhawks were second in the league in scoring (3.31 goals per game), fourth in goals-against average (1.92), and first in goal differential (1.38 per game) by nearly half a goal.Kane, 24, is leading the charge. He spent the lockout playing in Europe, scoring 23 points in 20 games and living in a small city in Switzerland with his mother. "Maybe I had a little bit of a head start playing over in Switzerland," he said, almost sheepishly.Kane, whose point totals the last three seasons had fallen from 88 to 73 to 66, noted that he had off-season wrist surgery two summers ago, while this past year he has been able to focus on hockey, not health.Kane is part of a core group that led the Blackhawks to the Stanley Cup in 2010 and is still around. The group also includes Toews, Marian Hossa, Patrick Sharp, Brent Seabrook and Duncan Keith.But despite the continuity of Chicago's stars, the chemistry of 2010 eluded the team the last two seasons, which ended in first-round playoff exits. Depth has been a factor after the championship team lost key pieces because of salary-cap limitations."That team won the Stanley Cup because it had more good players than anyone else from top to bottom," the longtime Blackhawks television announcer Pat Foley said.This season, contributions have come from every line, particularly from Bryan Bickell (7 points) and Viktor Stalberg (6 points), both third-liners. Niklas Hjalmarsson and Johnny Oduya have formed another solid defensive pairing behind Keith and Seabrook, and the goaltending combination of Corey Crawford and Ray Emery is much improved, too."There's kind of a diffusion of responsibility where every single guy takes responsibility, takes ownership that he can do the job," Toews said.Foley said he noticed a more businesslike approach to this year's team, something that was perhaps missing during the last two seasons."There's less frivolity," he said.After an abbreviated training camp because of the lockout, Toews cited the benefits of the early-season road trip, saying: "It was a huge thing for a team to come together and hang out in the hotel and spend a lot of time together. We can use that and let it carry onto the ice."It all adds up to high expectations. Only two games into the season, Hossa, who has recovered from a concussion sustained on a vicious hit by Phoenix's Raffi Torres during the playoffs, broached the often taboo subject of championship comparisons."Right now, it feels like 2010," he said.Chicago, meanwhile, has fallen head over heels for the Blackhawks — and not only during "The Star-Spangled Banner." The Blackhawks' home sellout streak is at 193 games, and their season-ticket-holder waiting list, which is near 11,000, grew by about 250 during the lockout, the team said.The five highest-rated Blackhawks broadcasts on Comcast SportsNet Chicago, their local cable partner, have all come this year."I see more Indian heads than I've ever seen around town, and I grew up here in the '60s with Stan Mikita and Bobby Hull," Foley said, referring to the team's logo. "It's been that way for a few years now, and, of course, the winning stokes excitement."
PORT ST. LUCIE, Fla. — Marlon Byrd arrived at the Mets ' spring training center on Friday afternoon, and though his stay there has no guarantees, it started with a ringing endorsement that spoke to the team's underwhelming talent in the outfield.Minutes after the 35-year-old Byrd, who signed with the Mets this winter on a minor league contract, told reporters he was looking forward to merely battling for a spot on the 25-man roster, Manager Terry Collins said he thought Byrd could earn a job as the full-time right fielder."This guy was one of the best players in the National League not too long ago," Collins said of Byrd, who was an All-Star in 2010. "If he's the same player he was in Chicago a couple of years ago, we might have found ourselves a right fielder. I know he's that kind of talent."The Mets' outfield, considered the weakest component of the team, comes into the 2013 season with one of the least impressive track records in the majors. The perception at the start of camp was that Lucas Duda would be the team's left fielder, while the remaining players would fight to earn a place in center- and right-field platoons.Byrd, who made his debut with the Philadelphia Phillies in 2002, was seen mostly as a low-risk reclamation project who might, or might not, enter into the mix.But Collins challenged those assumptions. "We've come into camp saying, 'Well, we're looking to platoon here, we're looking to platoon there,' " Collins said. "If Marlon Byrd is the same offensive player that he's capable of being, we don't need to platoon. We've got that guy."It was a highly conditional statement, though, for good reason.Byrd put together four productive seasons in a row — three with the Texas Rangers and one with the Cubs — by batting .294 with an .807 on-base-plus-slugging percentage from 2007 to 2010. In the last of those years, he made the National League All-Star team.But Byrd's drop-off has been significant, and his recent seasons have been plagued by frustration and controversy. Last season, he batted .210 in 47 games combined for the Cubs and the Boston Red Sox before he was released.Then, on June 25, Byrd was suspended for 50 games after testing positive for Tamofixen, a medication that blocks estrogen production and is sometimes used by athletes to block the side effects of steroids. Byrd noted Friday that the drug was used to treat gynecomastia — the enlargement of breast tissue in men — and he said he did not realize it was on baseball's list of banned substances."It was something I took not knowing, because of the name, that I was taking, me not checking the list for the first time in my career," he said Friday. "I've said it before, I think you have to be an idiot to test positive, and I was one of those idiots."He added: "It was something stupid. I was not trying to cheat. It was a banned substance. It was not a steroid."Byrd said he still worked with Victor Conte, founder of the Bay Area Laboratory Cooperative, which produced performance-enhancing drugs and distributed them to athletes. Conte's actions resulted in an extended federal investigation and a series of guilty pleas and convictions that spanned several sports and ensnared prominent figures, including Barry Bonds.Conte, who served four months in prison as part of his plea bargain, remains a contentious figure, but Byrd said Friday that if he had consulted with Conte last year, he would not have mistakenly taken the medication. "I should have been doing what I've been doing the whole time, consulting Victor, because he's on the right side of the fence right now," Byrd said.Byrd has not played for a major league team since the suspension. Last week, he finished his first stint playing winter ball, spending three months in Mexico. Looking to revive his career, he said his goal was to compete hard for the chance to break camp with the Mets. "I can help out in any position, left, center or right field," Byrd said. "So this is a perfect spot for me."Collins seemed to raise the stakes. "He's under the radar a little bit," he said, "but he has a chance to make a huge impact with us."Terry Collins said his preference would be that Johan Santana not pitch for Venezuela next month in the World Baseball Classic. He said he told Santana that he wanted him to be prepared to take the mound for the Mets on opening day.
Clockwise from top left, Barton Silverman/The New York Times; Barton Silverman/The New York Times; Jeff Roberson/Associated Press; Marc Serota for The New York Times; Barton Silverman/The New York Times; and Marc Serota for The New York TimesMost of the time, it takes an awkward hop to drop a ballplayer to one knee. But in a mass move toward matrimony, six Mets proposed to their significant others before arriving here. The team's fanciful chase for championship rings was preceded this season by a much more realistic search for engagement gold and diamonds."Well, we got together and all planned to do it over the same off-season," deadpanned David Wright, 30, who popped the question to his longtime girlfriend, Molly, over the Christmas holidays. As Wright jokingly noted, the timing of the engagements did make them seem prearranged. But the extent of the marriage bug's infectiousness became clear only when the half-dozen players engaged in small talk at the start of camp.Outfielder Kirk Nieuwenhuis, 25, laughed while describing a scene that was repeated several times as players arrived from around the country. "It was like, 'Oh, yeah, I got engaged.' 'You, too? So did so and so, and so and so, and so and so. Oh, yeah, and so and so, too!' "Wright's engagement was covered by news outlets and gossip pages this winter; the others were under the radar.For the record, Nieuwenhuis proposed on the beach to his girlfriend, Bethany, on Feb. 1, a couple of days after Zach Lutz, a 26-year-old infielder, and his girlfriend, Lindsay, became engaged. Reese Havens, a 26-year-old second baseman, popped the question to his girlfriend, Leigh, on Dec. 29 while sailing his family's boat. And Josh Satin, a 28-year-old infielder, proposed to his girlfriend, Allyson, the day before Thanksgiving."It would have been a big elephant in the room," Satin said laughingly of waiting until the holiday. "Twenty-five people were going to be there. We knew we had to get it done."The marital mood was not confined to homegrown Mets. Anthony Recker, 29, who was claimed by the Mets in October as a possible backup catcher, arrived in camp newly engaged, too, having proposed to his girlfriend, Kelly, late in the 2012 season.As each of the players noted, the engagement run was largely because of their schedules. Baseball requires on-the-job commitment for nine months, often relegating some of life's major moments to the brief time between seasons. As a result, the proliferation of Mets engagements this winter will mean a glut of weddings next winter. But Recker has learned not to let baseball permeate his life too much."We know someone with the Chicago Cubs who just got engaged, had his engagement pictures taken at Wrigley Field, and then he got designated for assignment," he said. "It's not worth it. Don't even go there. Keep baseball out of it."As a team, the young Mets are going through a transitional phase, and the six newly engaged players — only two of whom, Wright and Nieuwenhuis, are assured of spots on the roster — are not the only ones experiencing what could be termed big life moments. Reliever Josh Edgin, 26, and his wife are expecting their first child next month. Outfielder Mike Baxter, 28, and his wife are due to have their first in June. Starter Jon Niese married this winter, as did second baseman Daniel Murphy.Murphy, 27, was happy to impart some wisdom to his teammates. Communication was the key to marital success, he said, as were gestures, even if only symbolic, to show you were invested in planning the wedding.Murphy said his engaged teammates should consider themselves lucky. "The profession is a madhouse," he said, gesturing toward some clubhouse commotion. "You've got to find that special woman."Amid the marriage talk, the players joked about who could be next. "We didn't get him this time," Nieuwenhuis said, looking at outfielder Lucas Duda, 27, who came up through the minors with much of the group. Lutz said Duda would be a member of his wedding party but had no insight on whether there might be any additional pressure for him to marry as well."Duda's real quiet," Lutz said, laughing. "You never know with Duda."Wright noted that he attended four baseball weddings this winter in three states and the Turks and Caicos Islands. He could not attend Niese's wedding because it fell on the same weekend as his annual charity event."I called it the Winter of Weddings," Wright said, laughing. Another such winter awaits after the 2013 season.As for championship rings, that may take a while.Daniel Murphy was sent back to New York on Monday to see team doctors after feeling discomfort in his right rib cage. The Mets hoped the injury, possibly a muscle strain, would not sideline him for more than a week. ...The Mets informed Major League Baseball that they would not permit Johan Santana to pitch for Venezuela in the World Baseball Classic next month. "I know how important it is, and I really wanted to be a part of it," said Santana, who made clear he respected the Mets' position. ... Before the team's first full-squad workout, Manager Terry Collins spoke to the team for half an hour. "He made it a point to say he wasn't going to get too fiery during the speech, but by the end of it, he was yelling and screaming at us. So it was same old Terry," David Wright said. "But it was good."
If ever the Yankees could use their Greatest Living Player and catcher extraordinaire around spring training camp, it would be now. But Yogi Berra, holder of those conferred venerations, isn't up to coming south from his home in New Jersey anymore to advise the — shall we say — unexceptional gentlemen currently competing for the starting catching position.There is a tender symmetry to Posada's anticipated arrival here Friday as a first-time guest instructor. General Manager Brian Cashman said Posada, who retired following the 2011 season after 17 years as a Yankee, had asked the co-owner Hal Steinbrenner if there might be room for him on the list of former players who return each spring to fit a little less flatteringly into their pinstripes."Jorge came in and met with Hal when he was here for the fantasy camp," Cashman said."He said he'd love to have some way to get back in, slowly, not looking for anything big, not for all of spring training. He said he'd like to give us about seven days. So he'll start with a few now and then come back at the end of March."Time marches on, often unmercifully, which is why Berra, 87, is not here to light up the clubhouse with his smile and lighten it with his famous witticisms. It was in 2000, or the year after George Steinbrenner trekked from Tampa to North Jersey to beg Berra's forgiveness for firing him as manager through an intermediary in 1985, that Berra reappeared in uniform at the behest of Steinbrenner and Joe Torre.Torre had been a pretty fair catcher in his time, but as manager he had a whole camp to supervise. He asked Berra to work with Posada, already the starter behind the plate but about to increase his workload to 151 games from 112 with Joe Girardi having defected to Chicago. The organization's consensus was that Posada, an accomplished hitter, needed work defensively.During his last season as an active player, Posada recalled that 2000 spring, saying: "Yogi was always with the catchers, going through the drills, blocking balls, watching us, laughing with us. It was amazing — you could tell how much he was enjoying it. I mean, we're thinking: 'This is Yogi Berra. We should be honored to be in his presence.' But the way he acted, it was almost like it was the other way around."Berra, already 75, still spry enough to be on the field daily, was indeed thrilled to be back in uniform after his self-imposed 14-year exile. Just from watching on television, he had come to the opinion that the young and sensitive Posada worried too much about base runners and consequently called for too many fastballs. Posada actually reminded Berra of himself when he was breaking in in the mid-to-late 1940s — confident with a bat, less certain with the mitt.Berra had a Hall of Fame-level mentor in Bill Dickey, who in 1949 came out of retirement to — as Berra put it then — "learn me his experience." Fifty-one years later, it was Berra's turn in the generational continuum.In 2011, Posada said of Berra: "Maybe the most important thing he helped me with was with his view of the game, knowing how hard it is but that you really needed to keep a positive attitude every day — that was big for me."The contenders for this season's catching job — vacated by Russell Martin, who left the suddenly budget-conscious Yankees for, of all teams, Pittsburgh — are the organization holdovers Francisco Cervelli and Chris Stewart and the once highly regarded prospect Austin Romine.None fit the Berra-Posada mold. All, in fact, are considered solid glove men but unlikely to replace Martin's 2012 power production, much less rise to the level of a Berra or Posada.Romine, coming off back surgery that limited his progression to AAA ball last season, said: "I'm here to show them I can do it. I can handle it back there." But Cashman said he was the decisive underdog."First of all I got two guys, Cervelli and Stewart, who are out of options," Cashman said.He added: "Romine's had maybe a month of experience at Triple A. Barring an injury, I don't see how the two guys with more experience don't take it at the front end."No matter which catcher prevails, Cashman conceded, "offensively, it's going to be something different than we're used to running out there."He even issued this overall warning to Yankee fans: "The lineup is different — less power, less discipline — and that's going to equate to less runs scored."Posada's presence here for six days or six weeks would not alter the perception that at catcher, offensively, the Yankees are maybe a 2 on a scale of 10. But things being what they are, with Berra reduced to pestering his close friend and pitching instructor Ron Guidry by telephone — demanding that the frog legs Guidry has cooked for him every spring be shipped north — it seemed pitch perfect to hear that Posada would be back for a spell.As was true for Berra with Torre, the manager is a former catcher, Girardi. And as was the case for Berra's return under Steinbrenner, Posada's reappearance punctuates a cloud of acrimony that marked his departure. In 2011, Posada was unhappy about being phased out and incurred management's wrath by removing himself from the lineup of a nationally televised game against the Red Sox, rather than hit ninth.The past, Cashman said, is only prelude when it comes to the matter of linking those with championship credentials across the decades."There is no hangover," he said. "It was something we had to deal with. We dealt with it and turned the page."
Jonathan Toews scored twice on Thursday night, helping the Chicago Blackhawks extend their season-opening points streak to 20 games with a 3-0 road victory over the St. Louis Blues .Goalies Ray Emery and Corey Crawford combined on the shutout for Chicago (17-0-3), off to the best start in N.H.L. history.Crawford, who had missed four games in February with an upper-body injury, was pulled in the first period. Coach Joel Quenneville said it was because of a different upper-body injury.JETS 3, DEVILS 1 Andrew Ladd had two goals and an assist as host Winnipeg beat the Devils.MAPLE LEAFS 5, ISLANDERS 4 Nazem Kadri's first career hat trick and Dion Phaneuf's overtime goal lifted Toronto to a road win over the Islanders.BRUINS 2, SENATORS 1 Patrice Bergeron scored with 1 minute 21 seconds left in overtime, and host Boston edged Ottawa.IN OTHER GAMES Jiri Tlusty had two goals and an assist, helping the Hurricanes beat the visiting Penguins, 4-1. ... Nathan Gerbe scored his first two goals of the season as the Sabres edged the host Panthers, 4-3, in a shootout. ... The Avalanche scored three times in the third to rally past the visiting Flames, 5-4. ... Dany Heatley's two goals helped the Wild defeat the Coyotes, 4-3, on the road.AVALANCHE KEEP O'REILLY The Colorado Avalanche matched the Calgary Flames' offer sheet to the restricted free agent Ryan O'Reilly, a 22-year-old forward. O'Reilly, Colorado's top scorer last season with 55 points, has not played this year while trying to work out a contract. (AP)
Photographs of Dennis Rodman laughing while watching a basketball exhibition in Pyongyang, North Korea, with Kim Jong-un , the leader of one of the world's most repressive countries, may be some of the strangest sights in the history of accidental American diplomacy.Not only did Kim attend the game Thursday and watch alongside Rodman, but he also invited Rodman, three Harlem Globetrotters and the Vice Media crew filming the trip for a documentary to his palace for a party, said Shane Smith, the founder of Vice Media, who dreamed up and organized the trip.The group landed in Pyongyang on Tuesday with approval from North Korean authorities to conduct the exhibitions and film the documentary, but it was not promised that Kim would meet with the group."Apparently, he had a blast at the game," Smith said, after speaking by phone with Ryan Duffy, a Vice Media correspondent who was on the trip. "So he invited them back to his home for a party, and they had a grand old time. Speeches were made — Dennis made a very nice one — and they were met with rounds of applause."The scene was particularly bizarre because of the tense relations between the United States and North Korea, which made that relationship more difficult recently by declaring it had conducted a nuclear test. Google's executive chairman, Eric Schmidt, went in January to try to persuade the leadership to allow Internet access for more than a fraction of its people, but he did not report meeting with Kim.Basketball, though, apparently has the power to thaw most anything because Kim, like his father, Kim Jong-il, is said to be a devoted fan. Rodman and Kim Jong-un talked without a translator assisting them courtside. Duffy said that the two spoke in English but that Kim spoke only limited English and that a translator was used at the dinner.Smith said communication with his crew had been difficult, but he spoke with Duffy by phone for a bit and via Skype. He said his crew was allowed to film the party, as well as Kim's appearance at the exhibition game. The video will be used on the HBO series "Vice," which will make its debut on April 5.The exhibition game featured 12 North Korean players on mixed teams with the American contingent, led by the three Globetrotters: Anthony Blakes, Alex Weekes and Will Bullard. Duffy also played.Rodman spent the game watching from a courtside table with Kim. Rodman also gave a speech to the crowd, in which he told Kim, "You have a friend for life."The game was said to end in a 110-110 tie.Kim expressed to Rodman that he hoped this would improve North Korean-American relations, Smith said Duffy told him. Duffy said he invited Kim to the United States."We just couldn't have asked for anything more," Smith said. "It was a long shot, no pun intended. We knew he loves the Chicago Bulls and he was a huge basketball fan, and we hoped he would want to meet a five-time N.B.A. champion" and a Chicago Bull."But we had no guarantees," he said.
Joe Flacco, who turned down a contract offer last summer because he believed he was worth more than the Baltimore Ravens were offering — and then led them to a Super Bowl championship — cashed in Friday when he agreed to terms on a new long-term deal, the team said.Terms were not immediately available, but Flacco's contract was expected to be in the range of the one given to the Saints' Drew Brees last year, with an average of about $20 million per year.The deal, first reported by Fox Sports, came with a Monday afternoon deadline looming for the Ravens to put a franchise tag on Flacco to keep him off the free-agent market.There had been little doubt that, without a long-term deal in place, the Ravens would tag Flacco, the Super Bowl's most valuable player. But there was a question about whether the Ravens would use the exclusive tag — paying Flacco more for one year but prohibiting him from negotiating with other teams. If the Ravens had gambled and given Flacco the nonexclusive tag, it would have paid him $14.896 million for one year but would have allowed another team to try to structure a contract that the Ravens could not match.Flacco's rookie contract expired at the end of the season, but before that, he went on a near-perfect postseason run. He threw for 11 touchdowns with no interceptions in the Ravens' four games.This is the second time in two years that the Ravens have locked up a franchise cornerstone with a deadline deal. Running back Ray Rice received a new deal last year.With the N.F.L. salary cap finally set at $123 million, teams began Friday to make some of their most critical off-season moves. At least five teams used the franchise tag — Buffalo on safety Jairus Byrd, Cincinnati on defensive end Michael Johnson, Indianapolis on punter Pat McAfee, Denver on left tackle Ryan Clady and Chicago on defensive tackle Henry Melton — essentially halting those players' opportunities to test the free-agent market, which opens March 12. More players are sure to receive the tag, but the total is unlikely to match the 21 who got the tag last season.Franchise players will receive one-year tenders of varying values: Byrd, $6.9 million; Johnson, $11.17 million; McAfee, $2.97 million; Clady, $9.83 million; Melton, $8.45 million. They and their teams can work toward long-term deals, but if the players sign the one-year tender, they will play the 2013 season for the tag amount, guaranteed, and will be eligible for free agency again after the season.Byrd, Johnson, McAfee and Clady, at least, received the nonexclusive tag, so other teams could still sign them to offer sheets. A player's current team has the right to match such an offer, or to let the player go, getting two first-round draft picks as compensation.
LONDON — From the moment last Saturday's Premier League game between Arsenal and Aston Villa began, goalkeeper Brad Guzan was in constant motion.Left arm outstretched and gloved index finger pointed, he continually warned Villa's back line of potential danger. He shouted encouragement to one of his central defenders, told his right back where to position himself and applauded when pressure from his left back prompted an Arsenal cross to sail harmlessly over the crossbar.And that was just in the game's first three minutes.For Guzan, every moment on the field is golden. He was a backup for most of the past four seasons, a holding pattern that tested his persistence and cost him his place on the United States national team. This season he has finally established himself as Aston Villa's starter, but the journey has been long and hard and, at times, even a little embarrassing."It's been a bit up and down," Guzan said, preceding the sentence with a laugh. "There have been definitely some good and great times, but there have been some frustrating times as well."Like making a single appearance in a Premier League game in his first three years with Villa. Or waiting until his fourth season to get a start in one.Even Guzan's highest moments were accompanied by staggering lows, like the time he led Aston Villa to the League Cup final against Manchester United in 2010 only to be dropped for the final in favor of a fellow American, Brad Friedel.Villa's manager at the time, Martin O'Neill, had been instrumental in acquiring Guzan from Major League Soccer in 2008, but after buying him, he rarely used him. The League Cup matches had been Guzan's opening, and O'Neill had started him in each of Villa's previous games in the competition that season. He watched Guzan save four penalties — one in regulation and three more in a shootout — against Sunderland in the fourth round. "I think he's a great keeper in the making," O'Neill said after the game.Still, O'Neill opted to go with the more experienced Friedel in the final. Missing out on the rare chance to make a start at Wembley, Guzan admitted, left a "sour taste" that still has not gone away. But overtaking Friedel, who extended what became an eight-year streak of consecutive starts in the Premier League during his three years in the Midlands, was never realistic. Seeking, and needing, playing time after his inactivity cost him his place as Tim Howard's backup for the United States, Guzan went on loan to Hull City of the second-tier League Championship for three months early in 2011.Hull is not the most glamorous destination — it was once labeled the worst place to live in Britain by a television show — but it suited Guzan fine. He made 16 starts for Hull City, winning praise from the club's hierarchy and supporters before returning to his old spot on Villa's bench for the final month of the season. When Friedel left for Tottenham that July, Guzan must have thought a promotion was forthcoming.His dream, however, was quickly dashed when Alex McLeish — the third of four permanent managers Guzan has played under at Villa — signed the veteran Shay Given, who by then had been capped more than 100 times by Ireland.Guzan filled in capably when an injury sidelined Given for a month last season, but when Given was healthy, Guzan slid back into his backup role. Frustrated, Guzan and his agent at the time, Richard Motzkin, decided to end talks about extending his contract, which expired when the 2011-12 season ended."It had been multiple years that Brad didn't have the chance to play game in, game out, which obviously takes its toll," Motzkin said. "For a keeper it's particularly difficult because a field player might be able to get minutes here and there. As a keeper, typically it's a 90-minute position, so if you're not the first choice, you're sitting quite a bit."At the start of last summer, Guzan began preparing for a move — Motzkin said teams in England and Germany had expressed interest — but when McLeish was fired and replaced by Paul Lambert, Guzan began to consider a return."I felt Villa was extremely loyal to me in terms of giving me a chance to come from the U.S. to England and start my European career," he said.Crucial to the securing of a three-year contract in July, Motzkin said, was a whirlwind trip Guzan made to meet Lambert after an initial phone conversation."He took an overnight flight from Chicago, got to the airport, drove to Villa, met with Lambert and drove back that afternoon and flew home," Motzkin said. "For a manager to see a player take a trip across the pond for about 24 hours, it says a lot about how important it was to the player."The conversation had nothing to do with money. It was about football. The manager didn't guarantee Brad anything, but he told Brad it was going to be a fair competition."
CHICAGO — There was intensity and passion on the court right from the start of the Nets ' matchup with the Chicago Bulls on Saturday — although it was not exactly coming from the Nets' side.Eighty-five seconds after the opening tip, Chicago's Joakim Noah picked up a technical foul for arguing with the referees after a foul call, and it seemed like something of a fitting appetizer for the remaining 46 minutes.The Bulls pulsed with life in front of 22,414 fans at a packed United Center, while the Nets fizzled out and lost, 96-85.There may have been some tired legs after playing at home — and losing to Dallas — the night before. But the Nets are on the verge of a prolonged trip that will test their mettle for the postseason, and Saturday's performance was conspicuously devoid of the element also mostly missing from Friday's loss: energy.It is a topic Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo and players have continually addressed, knowing the team's inconsistent outputs have cost them winnable games."We shoot ourselves in the foot," guard Joe Johnson said. "We can talk about it until we're blue in the face, but it won't do anything about it."The Nets clearly did not rectify the issue overnight. After a hot start against the Bulls — the Nets hit six of their first eight field-goal attempts to grab an early 15-4 lead — they fell apart in the second quarter. The offense collapsed into dysfunction. Chicago used a 15-0 run to end the half ahead by 53-39.Brook Lopez and Deron Williams combined for 22 points in the first quarter, then faded in the second. As a team, the Nets were outscored, 26-12, and committed seven turnovers in the period."The ball was just sticking," Williams said. "There was no movement, no flow of the game, no rhythm. It's hard to get going. A lot of it is their defense, and a lot of it is us."The Bulls' scoring stretch extended into the third quarter: 19-0, 24-4, then 31-14. The Nets had few answers for the speedy guards Nate Robinson and Kirk Hinrich, or Noah, who scored 21 points with 10 rebounds, 5 assists and 4 blocked shots."Until we can play consistently over more than a three- or four-game stretch, this is what we're going to be," Carlesimo said. "We've definitely got to tighten up, we've got to play better, and we've got to do it soon."After the game, Carlesimo hinted at making changes to the Nets' rotations, including the possibility of stacking Lopez with the backup center Andray Blatche in the same lineup. It has not been used often, but Carlesimo indicated changes might be necessary to serve as a catalyst."We've got to look at a lot of things," Carlesimo said.The possibility of rotation changes was greeted with eagerness from Williams, who said he had felt the Nets' tempo dissipate too often after strong first quarters."Once we sub, it's like we start all over again," Williams said. "It's not the bench fault or one guy's fault — we don't just click right away. We've got to get going again, and that can't happen."On Saturday, the Nets were upstaged as Noah brought his size and athleticism — with a double espresso shot. With his usual blend of scoring and defending, energizing and instigating, he had 21 points, 10 rebounds, 5 assists, 4 blocks and 2 steals."He's so big for them, brings so much energy and does so many different things," Lopez said. "He scores the ball, passes the ball, rebounds the ball, blocks shots. He does everything for them."The Nets committed 21 turnovers, marking the second straight game they have crossed the 20-turnover threshold. The Bulls, with the third-best defense in the N.B.A., scored 24 points off the Nets' miscues.Johnson, in his second game back after missing the previous three with a left heel injury, attempted only four field goals in the first half and finished with 11 points, shooting 5 of 10.Lopez scored 22 points but attempted only six field goals after the first quarter. He disappeared from the Nets' offense. Then the Nets' offense just disappeared."I've said we need to find consistency if we want to be the best we can be," Lopez said. "I don't know if it's a matter of focus or intensity. But we really need to put it together for four quarters."Saturday's game was the first of a stretch in which the Nets play 12 of their next 15 games on the road. That includes a 7-game, 13-day West Coast trip at the end of March.
The Chicago Blackhawks set a franchise record with their 10th straight victory and extended their points streak to 29 games, dating to last season, by beating the Minnesota Wild , 5-3, on Tuesday night. The Wild had handed the Blackhawks one of their three shootout losses. Bryan Bickell scored twice for Chicago, now 20-0-3.ISLANDERS 6, CANADIENS 3 Radek Martinek broke a tie in the third period, and the Islanders handed visiting Montreal its first regulation loss in nearly a month. Martinek had not scored since Oct. 12, 2011.LIGHTNING 5, DEVILS 2 Nate Thompson scored twice as visiting Tampa Bay snapped a five-game losing streak. The Devils are winless in their past six with Johan Hedberg playing in place of the injured goaltender Martin Brodeur.CAPITALS 4, BRUINS 3 Eric Fehr scored 37 seconds into overtime, and host Washington rallied from a 3-0 deficit to beat Boston.HURRICANES 4, SABRES 3 Alexander Semin had a goal and two assists, and Eric Staal added three assists as host Carolina beat Buffalo.RED WINGS 2, AVALANCHE 1 Niklas Kronwall scored in the second period on a fluke bounce, and Detroit beat Colorado at home. Kronwall's shot went wide, caromed off the boards and went in off the right skate of goalie Jean-Sebastien Giguere.
Sidney Crosby tied a career high with five assists, and Chris Kunitz posted his second hat trick of the season in the Pittsburgh Penguins ' 6-1 rout of the Islanders on Sunday night.Crosby's big night boosted his point total to an N.H.L.-leading 45 and helped the host Penguins win their fifth straight.Brad Boyes scored the lone goal for the Islanders, whose five-game point streak was snapped.The Penguins scratched Evgeni Malkin, the reigning N.H.L. most valuable player, because of an upper-body injury.DEVILS 3, JETS 2 Patrik Elias scored in a shootout, and Johan Hedberg stopped all three Winnipeg attempts for the host Devils, who won for the second time in nine games since Martin Brodeur was sidelined with a sore back.OILERS 6, BLACKHAWKS 5 Sam Gagner scored two of Edmonton's four goals in the first period, and the visiting Oilers sent Chicago to its second consecutive loss after its record-breaking start.BLUE JACKETS 3, RED WINGS 2 Ryan Johansen and Matt Calvert scored in a shootout, and Columbus beat Detroit to complete a home-and-home sweep.DUCKS 4, BLUES 2 Corey Perry scored the go-ahead goal in the third period before adding an empty-netter, and Anaheim tied a franchise record with its 11th consecutive home victory.WILD 4, CANUCKS 2 Zach Parise had two goals and an assist, and Minnesota beat visiting Vancouver to move into a first-place tie with the Canucks in the division.AVALANCHE 3, SHARKS 2 Matt Duchene scored his second goal of the night as time was about to expire in overtime, as Colorado stretched its home winning streak to a season-high five games.FLYERS 3, SABRES 2 Claude Giroux, Simon Gagne and Max Talbot scored to help host Philadelphia snap a three-game losing streak.CANADIENS 5, PANTHERS 2 Michael Ryder scored two power-play goals for Montreal, which won for the fourth time on its five-game trip.PRUST'S STREAK ENDS Montreal announced that Brandon Prust would miss 10 days with a minor shoulder separation, ending his consecutive games streak at 223. He played through shoulder problems the last two seasons with the Rangers, often saying, "It's only pain." JEFF Z. KLEIN
Reggie Bush has watched film of the Detroit Lions , and he has seen the opposing safeties playing deep and paying extra attention to Calvin Johnson."It's a running back's dream," Bush said. "We have to be able to run the ball in that situation."Bush was introduced as a Lion on Wednesday, a big day for Detroit, which landed two other free agents, safety Glover Quin and defensive lineman Jason Jones, and retained cornerback Chris Houston.Detroit did not disclose financial terms of Bush's four-year contract.Bush, who rushed for 986 yards with Miami last season, certainly adds more speed to Detroit's backfield, which already includes the 233-pound running back Mikel Leshoure.Detroit's running game was inconsistent last season, and the Lions had only four runs of 20 or more yards, tied for the fewest in the league. Jahvid Best, a first-round draft pick in 2010, did not play at all, and his future is in doubt because of concussion problems."The thing that was important to us was not just the talent of Reggie Bush, but also the way those talents complemented the other players we have on offense," Coach Jim Schwartz said.GIANTS BRING IN NEW KICKER Lawrence Tynes's tenure as the Giants' kicker appears to be over, with the team announcing that it had signed the veteran Josh Brown. Tynes, a free agent, has spent six seasons with the Giants and helped them win two Super Bowls.COLTS' SPREE CONTINUES Indianapolis signed safety LaRon Landry, a Pro Bowl selection last season with the Jets, to a four-year contract, making him the Colts' sixth free-agent pickup in less than 48 hours.BUSY DAY FOR TITANS The Tennessee Titans announced they had agreed to terms with running back Shonn Greene, guard Andy Levitre and fullback Quinn Johnson. Just before a news conference, they also announced they had a deal with defensive tackle Sammie Lee Hill.Greene spent his first four seasons with the Jets. He is coming off the best season of his career, with 276 rushes for 1,063 yards and 8 touchdowns.That is two fewer than the Titans scored rushing as a team, and they see Greene as a perfect change of pace for Chris Johnson.FINDING PIECES FOR OFFENSE Arizona reached contract agreements with five free agents, including quarterback Drew Stanton, who followed the Cardinals' new coach, Bruce Arians, from Indianapolis, and running back Rashard Mendenhall, who had a difficult season with Pittsburgh after tearing a knee ligament in the 2011 season.Arizona also released free safety Kerry Rhodes, clearing cap space to help accommodate the signings.JAGUARS ADD AND SUBTRACT Jacksonville signed linebacker Geno Hayes, giving the team a potential replacement for the veteran Daryl Smith, and released receiver Laurent Robinson. Hayes played last year with Chicago. Robinson signed a five-year, $32.5 million contract last off-season before missing considerable time with concussions.RAVENS RELEASE POLLARD Strong safety Bernard Pollard was released by Baltimore, the latest move in the Ravens' salary purge. Pollard signed a three-year extension with Baltimore last year, but his release saves the Ravens an estimated $1 million against the salary cap. He is the fifth player to leave the Ravens over the last two weeks.CHIEFS STAY AGGRESSIVE The Kansas City Chiefs remained active in free agency, announcing a deal with cornerback Dunta Robinson. Robinson, who was cut by the Falcons three years into a six-year, $54 million deal, should provide depth across the defensive backfield.HISTORY LESSON AT SIGNING It was not until after linebacker Manny Lawson signed with Buffalo on Wednesday that he learned of the Bills' 13-season playoff drought."I did not know," Lawson said, shortly after signing a four-year, $12 million contract. "That's new knowledge to me."He added, "I look at myself as coming here to change things."LEWIS TO ESPN ESPN announced that Ray Lewis would be joining the network as a studio analyst.AROUND THE LEAGUE Cleveland continued a spending spree to upgrade its defense in free agency, signing the former Arizona linebacker Quentin Groves to a two-year, $2.8 million contract. ... Chicago released tight end Kellen Davis, one day after signing the versatile tight end Martellus Bennett away from the Giants. ... As safety Dashon Goldson landed a deal with Tampa Bay, the free-agent defensive back Charles Woodson had a meeting with San Francisco, Woodson's agent, Carl Poston, said. In addition, the former Kansas City defensive lineman Glenn Dorsey signed a two-year contract after meeting with the 49ers.
CHICAGO — The question should not have stumped Michigan Coach John Beilein, but it did.Standing inside the Wolverines' locker room at the United Center, Beilein finally relaxed Thursday after his team dispatched Penn State, 83-66, in the first round of the Big Ten Conference tournament. His suit jacket long abandoned, and the sleeves of his French blue shirt still pushed up to the elbows, Beilein tried to recall the last time the sixth-ranked Wolverines won without stressing out their coach or their fans."I think there have been two, maybe, unstressful second halves," he said finally. "I'd have to go all the way to December against a nonconference team. I don't recall one."Until Michigan, which fell behind, 14-3, pulled away in the last 10 minutes, this was another of those preposterously competitive games that characterized the Big Ten season. The Nittany Lions (10-21), the worst team in the 12-team conference, already played Michigan tougher than anyone could expect, losing, 79-71, in Ann Arbor before overcoming a 15-point second-half deficit to shock the Wolverines, 84-78, at home on Feb. 17.That Michigan (26-6), ranked No. 1 as late as Jan. 28, found itself playing on the first day of the tournament provided the strongest evidence of the Big Ten's quality and competitiveness.Four Big Ten teams were ranked in the top 10 this week — No. 3 Indiana, the No. 6 Wolverines, No. 8 Michigan State and No. 10 Ohio State. No other conference has as many. Then throw in No. 22 Wisconsin, which Michigan will play in Friday's quarterfinals.Minnesota and Illinois also spent multiple weeks as ranked teams, with Minnesota rising as high as No. 8 and knocking off Indiana, then No. 1, before dropping off. Illinois opened the tournament Thursday with a thriller, ousting Minnesota, 51-49, on Brandon Paul's buzzer-beating jumper. Illinois pulled its own stunner in December by winning, 85-74, at Gonzaga, the nation's No. 1 team.With so many ranked teams, Beilein noted it was nearly impossible to get through a week of conference play without facing one."Every year is pretty good, but I thought the depth of the conference, of the teams in the league, proved to be what everybody predicted — the best conference in the country, as it's been the last few years," said Minnesota Coach Tubby Smith, who formerly coached at Kentucky. "This year, we've been at a different level compared to other conferences. It's the best I've seen."So when Michigan lost two of its final four games, one to Penn State and the other a 72-71 heartbreaker to Indiana on Sunday, the Wolverines found themselves in an unfathomable place — sixth in the nation yet seeded fifth in the conference, missing a first-round bye by one place."That's what happens when you play in this conference," said the junior forward Jordan Morgan, whose potential game-winning put-back in the final seconds against Indiana rolled off the rim. "We lost some games we probably shouldn't have lost."Beilein said: "We had four games where the ball was in the air, the buzzer went off, and we win or lose. And we were 2-2. We could have gone 4-0, and we could have been 0-4. We're the exact same team. That's the thing that we have to balance through right now, the emotional thing."They still might. Michigan's trail here probably includes more rematches with teams it lost to — Wisconsin on Friday, with the possibility of Indiana in Saturday's semifinals and Michigan State or Ohio State in Sunday's final.An Indiana-Michigan return engagement would be juicy. After the last one, Indiana Coach Tom Crean yelled at the Wolverines assistant Jeff Meyer, accusing him of wrecking the Hoosiers' program. Meyer had been an Indiana assistant to Kelvin Sampson, who resigned in 2008 in the midst of a recruiting scandal that led to three years of N.C.A.A. probation and the loss of one scholarship. Crean apologized the next day.Teams that last until Saturday here will leave beat up and exhausted. Whether this week benefits the five or six teams expected to advance to the N.C.A.A. tournament remains to be seen.Devyn Marble scored 19 points to help Iowa (21-11) hold on for a 73-59 victory over Northwestern in the first round. The Hawkeyes continued their late-season push for a spot in the N.C.A.A. tournament with their eighth victory in 10 games. ... Shavon Shields scored 19 points, Brandon Ubel added 16 points and 8 rebounds, and Nebraska beat Purdue, 57-55. The Cornhuskers (15-17) hung on after Purdue's Terone Johnson missed two shots in the closing seconds. (AP)
CHICAGO (AP) — The Chicago Bears are parting ways with the veteran linebacker Brian Urlacher after 13 years.General Manager Phil Emery said Wednesday that the team could not agree on a contract with Urlacher, for years the face — and the heart — of the franchise. He is now a free agent after missing the last four games of the season with a hamstring injury.Urlacher, an eight-time Pro Bowler, started 180 games from 2000 through 2012, recording a team-record 1,779 tackles. The ninth overall selection in the 2000 draft, he had 41.5 sacks, 22 interceptions, 16 fumble recoveries and 11 forced fumbles. He was the Associated Press's defensive player of the year in 2005.The team chairman Brian McCaskey said the team wished its "humble superstar" the best."He embodies the same characteristics displayed by the Bears all-time greats who played before him," McCaskey said.The parting with Urlacher is just the latest change in what has been a busy off-season for Chicago.The Bears fired Coach Lovie Smith after a second straight late collapse left them out of the playoffs for the fifth time in six years, although they did finish with 10 wins. They replaced him with the offensive-minded Marc Trestman, hoping he could get the most out of quarterback Jay Cutler, and addressed two major issues in free agency by signing left tackle Jermon Bushrod from New Orleans and tight end Martellus Bennett from the Giants.
Mika Zibanejad scored the deciding goal in a shootout to carry the host Ottawa Senators past the Devils , 3-2, on Monday night.Chris Phillips and Colin Greening also scored for the Senators, and Ben Bishop made 32 saves.Andrei Loktionov and Marek Zidlicky scored for the Devils, who tied the score, 2-2, just over six minutes into the third period when Zidlicky beat Bishop with a wrist shot from the left circle.In the shootout, Daniel Alfredsson scored on Ottawa's second attempt. The Devils' Travis Zajac tied it 1-1, and then Zibanejad's goal and Bishop's save on Loktionov ended the game.The Senators also beat the Devils in a shootout Feb. 18.Goalie Martin Brodeur was frustrated after the loss."We worked really hard and deserved a lot better," said Brodeur, who faced 14 shots. "They won the skill competition again, two games in a row against us."KINGS 5, BLACKHAWKS 4 Dustin Brown converted his own rebound with 1 minute 27 seconds remaining, lifting Los Angeles over host Chicago.BRUINS 3, MAPLE LEAFS 2 Patrice Bergeron scored the tying goal with 9:24 left in regulation, then put host Boston ahead in a shootout win over Toronto.WILD 7, STARS 4 Kyle Brodziak's short-handed goal broke a third-period tie as Minnesota won in Dallas. Zach Parise had two goals and an assist for the Wild, who extended their winning streak to six games.PREDATORS 3, OILERS 2 Sergei Kostitsyn had a goal and an assist to lead host Nashville over Edmonton.LIGHTNING HIRE COACH Jon Cooper, who was coaching Syracuse of the American Hockey League, Tampa Bay's top minor league affiliate, has been named to replace the fired Guy Boucher as coach of the Lightning.
CHICAGO — Before Wednesday's tip-off at United Center, LeBron James lay on a towel in the Miami locker room as a team assistant helped him stretch. James rapped along to a song on his iPod as his thighs were kneaded and his long limbs were pushed and pulled. Nearly 20 reporters and cameramen watched his every movement.After the Chicago Bulls stunned the Heat, 101-97, to end their 27-game winning streak — the second-longest streak in N.B.A. history and six games short of the record set by the 1971-72 Los Angeles Lakers — James had another moment in the locker room, this one much more private."I had everyone come in and put a hand on each other," Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra said. "It was the first time I talked about the streak."James said: "We haven't had a moment to really know what we just did. We had a moment, just very fortunate and very humble and blessed to be a part of this team and be a part of a streak like this."The Bulls sprinted to an early lead, as many teams had done recently against the Heat. They led by double digits for much of the first half and held a 9-point edge at halftime. But a 13-3 third-quarter spurt gave the Heat their first lead of the game, 59-58, with 4 minutes 30 seconds left in the quarter.Rather than fold, the Bulls stiffened, something no other team had done during Miami's run. Boston led the Heat by 17 in the second quarter on March 18, and Cleveland held a 27-point second-half advantage two nights later. Neither cushion was enough.With the game tied at 69-69 early in the fourth quarter, Miami appeared poised to go on another run, and remind the league that they were good enough to spot opponents large leads and come back at will.Instead, it was Chicago that found an extra gear. As the minutes ticked away, the wait for the Heat to turn into that familiar squad of steel nerves and ruthless efficiency became cheer after cheer as the Bulls hit big shot after big shot.Luol Deng sank a 3-pointer to make the score 78-73 and another to make it 83-75. Jimmy Butler drilled a third long-range basket to put the Bulls ahead, 86-78.Suddenly, the crowd was chanting, "Beat the Heat." And with belief.The Heat never threatened again. Deng led the Bulls with 28 points, Carlos Boozer had 21 and Butler added 17.The last time the Heat had lost was Feb. 1 to Indiana. The streak spanned 53 days, beginning in Toronto on Super Bowl Sunday, and captivated the N.B.A., as James raised his already electric game to another level. He was terrific again Wednesday, scoring 32 points on 11-for-17 shooting from the field. Dwyane Wade returned after missing two games with a knee bruise and scored 18.It was not enough.Despite an 86-67 Miami victory over Chicago in late February, the gritty, defensive-minded Bulls posed a test for the Heat. Before Wednesday's game, Spoelstra spoke of the challenge rather starkly."We're preparing for an absolute cage-fight mentality game," he said.Chicago obliged. Indicative of Spoelstra's assessment was a first-quarter play in which James went one-on-one against Kirk Hinrich on a fast break. James lowered his shoulder and Hinrich took it in the chest, while also giving James a bear hug. Both players tumbled to the floor, Hinrich was whistled for a foul and the home crowd erupted.Chicago was short-handed, playing without Derrick Rose, who has yet to return after tearing an anterior cruciate ligament during last year's playoffs, and the All-Star center Joakim Noah, out with plantar fasciitis. It did not matter.A thunderous round of boos greeted James when he was announced, but it was nothing compared with the raucous scene as the fourth-quarter clock ticked down. Fans stood, and the arena seemed to shake.Despite the heightened media attention, and presence, as the Heat inched closer to history, James said the weight of the streak was not an issue."We weren't pressing every game saying we have to win so we can get the streak," he said.Soon, the Heat will turn their attention to a larger prize, in the playoffs."It has never been about the streak," Spoelstra said. "We have had a bigger goal in mind."
CHICAGO — Anaheim defenseman Sheldon Souray's screaming slap shot late in the third period Friday night came from the point, and it shattered the stick of Chicago's Niklas Hjalmarsson before it ricocheted past goaltender Ray Emery. The goal provided the difference in the Ducks' 2-1 victory over the Blackhawks , quieted a raucous United Center crowd and brought with it a small taste of something that had been missing from the Chicago locker room for the better part of this season: adversity.During January and February, the Blackhawks were the N.H.L.'s vogue team. They stormed out of the gate, earning at least a point in a league-record 24 consecutive games to begin the season. With an array of stars led by Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane and four dangerous lines, the high-flying Blackhawks were anointed the league's best team.On March 8, the streak was snapped in a 6-2 loss at Colorado. Since then, the N.H.L. landscape has changed noticeably. The Blackhawks are a pedestrian 5-5 since the run. They have also battled through injuries, while the Ducks have now beaten them three times this season and emerged as a credible threat in the Western Conference.In the Eastern Conference, Pittsburgh has stolen the thunder from the Blackhawks' streak and may be the N.H.L.'s top team. The Penguins have won 15 straight games, and also traded for the six-time All-Star Jarome Iginla, as well as the veterans Brenden Morrow and Douglas Murray.As the Blackhawks survey the league three weeks after they were the toast of hockey, one emotion stands out."It feels like the streak was forever ago," forward Patrick Sharp said.The Blackhawks have not exactly fallen on hard times so much as their blistering pace has slowed. With 55 points, they sit atop the conference standings, 4 points ahead of the Ducks after their victory Sunday in Detroit and Anaheim's overtime loss in Columbus.But the Blackhawks have lost three times to Anaheim in a month and a half, and upper-body injuries have sidelined two of their offensive weapons. Sharp has missed the last 10 games, and Marian Hossa has been out for the last 5. With the trade deadline this week, some have wondered if Chicago needs to add depth on defense and at center."It's been going pretty easy so far with our streak," Hjalmarsson said. "You need some ups and downs during the season, you have to learn from it."The Ducks, a potential roadblock on a Chicago run to the Stanley Cup, have swept the season series from the Blackhawks. In each of Anaheim's wins, the Ducks scored in the final minutes of tight games, with Souray's goal the latest example."It's crazy," Sharp said. "We're getting points every game to start the season for a long time, and you look at the standings and we're a game or two ahead of Anaheim. It shows you how well they've been playing."Even though their head start on the rest the league has shrunk, the Blackhawks are quick to point out that their early-season play will serve them well down the stretch and in the playoffs, particularly given the condensed season.The Blackhawks won the Stanley Cup in 2010 as a No. 2 seed, but had to scratch and claw their way into the postseason each of the next two seasons. Last season, they were a No. 6 seed, and in 2011, they sneaked in as an eighth seed on the final day of the regular season. Both seasons, they were bounced from the playoffs in the first round.This season, though, the Blackhawks are in a much more comfortable position."The last two years, it was basically life or death to get in," Coach Joel Quenneville said. He added: "Hopefully we can enhance the position we're in and maybe have a chance to rest guys along the way. I think being fresh is going to be important."To Quenneville's point, Sharp and Hossa have not been rushed back, although both practiced last week and appear on track to return soon.As for the Penguins, several Blackhawks complimented their streak and seemed content to let them bask in the spotlight."We're proud of what we accomplished," Toews said. "At the same time, it wasn't necessarily a relief that it was over, but at least we knew we could just go on with our lives and not talk about it anymore."On Sunday, the Blackhawks traveled to rival Detroit for an afternoon showdown. As if they needed to remind the rest of the league that they still represented the elite of the N.H.L., the Blackhawks scored three times in the game's first five minutes on their way to a 7-1 win.Left wing Bryan Bickell summed up the team's message when he said, "We knew we weren't going to win every game, but I think we're still the team to beat."
A day after Yu Darvish came within one out of a perfect game, Alexi Ogando and four Texas relievers shut out the Astros again, combining for a five-hitter in the Rangers ' 4-0 win over host Houston on Wednesday.Lance Berkman doubled in a run for the Rangers a day after they blanked Houston, 7-0, behind Darvish's gem.Ogando allowed four hits with a career-high 10 strikeouts in six and one-third innings. Robbie Ross, Tanner Scheppers and Michael Kirkman allowed one hit combined in the next one and two-third innings. Closer Joe Nathan struck out the side in the ninth.Houston starter Philip Humber yielded five hits and a run in five and two-third innings in his Astros debut.Nelson Cruz and A. J. Pierzynski had two hits apiece and drove in a run each for the Rangers.Ogando returned to the rotation this season after spending last year in the bullpen, where he had a career-high 58 relief appearances.He retired nine straight Astros before Carlos Pena singled with two outs in the sixth inning. Chris Carter lined out to end that inning, and Houston's next hit, a one-out single in the seventh by Justin Maxwell, chased Ogando.WHITE SOX 5, ROYALS 2 Adam Dunn homered and host Chicago went deep four times to back a solid start by Jake Peavy in a victory over Kansas City.Tyler Flowers, Dayan Viciedo and Alexei Ramirez also connected, and the White Sox made it two straight wins to start the season after dropping 12 of 18 to Kansas City last season.The Royals, full of optimism after posting the majors' best record in spring training, will try to avoid a season-opening sweep Thursday.Dunn had two hits and scored twice. He led off the second with his 407th career homer, and Flowers opened the third with his second shot.Peavy allowed one earned run and four hits in six innings, striking out six and walking none.TWINS 3, TIGERS 2 Eduardo Escobar's two-run double with one out in the ninth inning lifted Minnesota over visiting Detroit.After Joaquin Benoit issued a leadoff walk to Trevor Plouffe, reliever Phil Coke took over. Coke got the first out, but Brian Dozier's single advanced pinch-runner Jamey Carroll to third. Then Escobar drove the first pitch from Coke to the deepest part of the park in front of the bullpens in left-center field.Both runners scored easily as the rebuilding Twins enjoyed their first on-field celebration of the season.RAYS 8, ORIOLES 7 Matt Joyce led off the bottom of the ninth with a towering home run against Tommy Hunter, giving host Tampa Bay a victory over Baltimore.NATIONALS 3, MARLINS 0 Gio Gonzalez homered, backing his six scoreless innings as Washington won at home against Miami.BRAVES 9, PHILLIES 2 Freddie Freeman had three runs batted in and Justin Upton homered to back Paul Maholm's solid start, helping host Atlanta to a victory over Philadelphia.PIRATES 3, CUBS 0 Wandy Rodriguez allowed just two hits over six and two-thirds innings and host Pittsburgh edged Chicago for its first win of the season.ROCKIES 7, BREWERS 3 Juan Nicasio pitched six effective innings for his first victory in almost a year while Wilin Rosario, Michael Cuddyer and Dexter Fowler homered to lift Colorado over host Milwaukee.REDS 5, ANGELS 4 Brandon Phillips hit a three-run homer in his new role as Cincinnati's cleanup hitter, and Joey Votto drove in the winning run with a ninth-inning single, rallying host Cincinnati to a victory over Los Angeles.LUDWICK OUT THREE MONTHS Reds outfielder Ryan Ludwick is expected to miss at least three months after surgery on Wednesday to repair torn cartilage in his right shoulder. Ludwick dislocated his nonthrowing shoulder while sliding into third base in Cincinnati's opening 3-1, 13-inning loss to the Angels on Monday.
Jaromir Jagr scored off his skate in his Bruins debut, and Tuukka Rask stopped 40 shots to lead Boston to a 1-0 home victory over the Devils on Thursday night.Acquired from Dallas this week before the N.H.L.'s trading deadline, Jagr, 41, joined the Bruins for the pregame skate Thursday morning and quickly endeared himself to Boston fans.Brad Marchand's centering pass went off Jagr's left skate and past Martin Brodeur to give the Bruins a 1-0 lead with 80 seconds gone in the second period.Fans — some wearing mullet wigs — gave Jagr a standing ovation when he took the ice for his first shift in the first period and chanted his name after the goal.Jagr skipped the military salute he traditionally uses to celebrate a goal, saying he would save it for the playoffs."Or if I score a good goal," he said. "Not with my leg."Rask earned his third shutout of the season. Brodeur made 25 saves for the Devils.The Devils fell to ninth place, and out of playoff position, in the Eastern Conference when the Islanders went into overtime with Washington.CAPITALS 2, ISLANDERS 1 Mike Green scored his fifth goal in four games, and Washington's long, slow comeback toward a playoff spot took another big step with a shootout win at home.Braden Holtby, who made 35 saves, denied Frans Nielsen, Brad Boyes and John Tavares in the shootout for the Capitals, who moved into a tie on points with Winnipeg atop the Southeast Division.The Islanders tied the score on Kyle Okposo's one-timer with 4 minutes 59 seconds to play in regulation. But Washington's Alex Ovechkin was the only player from either team to find the net in the shootout.BLUE JACKETS 3, PREDATORS 1 Marian Gaborik, acquired from the Rangers this week, scored the go-ahead goal at 4:16 of the third period and added an assist in his debut with visiting Columbus.FLYERS 5, MAPLE LEAFS 3 The former Maple Leafs enforcer Jay Rosehill scored the winning goal, and Ilya Bryzgalov made 25 saves for surging Philadelphia, which won at Toronto for its fourth straight victory.Toronto lost left wing Joffrey Lupul in the first period to an upper-body injury after he took a hard hit.LIGHTNING 5, HURRICANES 0 Ben Bishop, acquired from Ottawa in exchange for the promising rookie Cory Conacher, earned a shutout in his debut with visiting Tampa Bay, stopping a career-high 45 shots.The Lightning welcomed back their captain, Vincent Lecavalier, who missed nine games with an unspecified lower-body injury.CANADIENS 4, JETS 1 Michael Ryder scored two goals and set up another, and host Montreal handed Winnipeg its fifth straight loss.BLUES 4, BLACKHAWKS 3 Defenseman Kevin Shattenkirk scored the deciding goal in the sixth round of a shootout, and St. Louis came back for a win at Chicago.The league-leading Blackhawks lost for only the third time this season when leading after 40 minutes.
Chris Davis extended his torrid start with a grand slam and five runs batted in, and the Baltimore Orioles used a five-run eighth inning to beat Minnesota, 9-5, on Friday in their home opener.Davis became the fourth player in major league history to homer in his first four games of the season, joining Willie Mays, Mark McGwire and Nelson Cruz. He is 9 for 15 (.600) with four homers and 16 R.B.I."I don't feel like I have anything magical," Davis said. "I feel comfortable, and I feel like I'm being patient. I'm taking what they give me."The Orioles trailed, 5-4, before loading the bases with one out in the eighth against Casey Fien (0-1). After Adam Jones tied it with a run-scoring single, Davis greeted Twins reliever Tyler Robertson with an opposite-field shot to left on the first pitch, setting off a wild celebration from the sellout crowd of 46,653.RANGERS 3, ANGELS 2 Ian Kinsler hit a go-ahead single with two outs in the eighth inning, and Texas gave its fans plenty of reasons to cheer in the home opener, beating Josh Hamilton and Los Angeles.Hamilton left Texas for the American League West-rival Angels with a five-year, $125 million contract over the winter. He finished 0 for 4. He was booed when he was introduced and then cheered when he struck out twice."I'd lie to you if I said it didn't bother me a little bit," Hamilton said of the reaction from the crowd. "But it didn't, like, overwhelm me. It's what I expected."RED SOX 6, BLUE JAYS 4 Mike Napoli hit a two-run homer and drove in the go-ahead run in the eighth as Boston beat host Toronto. A crowd of 45,328 let John Farrell have it all night. Farrell left the Blue Jays last fall to replace Bobby Valentine in Boston.Jose Reyes went 4 for 5 with a home run and two R.B.I. for the Blue Jays.RAYS 4, INDIANS 0 Matt Moore pitched six sharp innings, and Ben Zobrist drove in three runs to lead host Tampa Bay over Cleveland.MARINERS 8, WHITE SOX 7 Kendrys Morales hit a tiebreaking double in the 10th inning, and Jesus Montero tacked on a run-scoring single, leading Seattle past host Chicago.ATHLETICS 8, ASTROS 3 Coco Crisp hit a leadoff homer and added two doubles in Oakland's big fifth inning, and the visiting Athletics got a win over Houston.ROYALS 13, PHILLIES 4 Alex Gordon and Chris Getz each hit bases-loaded triples, and Kansas City rallied to spoil Philadelphia's home opener. The Hall of Famers Mike Schmidt and George Brett, rivals when the Phillies beat the Royals for their first title 33 years ago, threw out the first pitches.REDS 15, NATIONALS 0 Todd Frazier and Zack Cozart each homered twice, and Cincinnati hit six in all — including Xavier Paul's pinch-hit grand slam — while sending visiting Washington to its first loss of the season.DIAMONDBACKS 3, BREWERS 1 Wade Miley and Kyle Lohse were locked in a pitching duel through six innings before visiting Arizona spoiled Lohse's debut with Milwaukee by scoring two runs on a wild pitch off reliever Michael Gonzalez in the seventh.BRAVES 4, CUBS 1 Justin Upton hit his third homer in four games, and Mike Minor pitched into the eighth to help host Atlanta beat Chicago. Making his Cubs debut, Scott Feldman (0-1) threw two wild pitches, hit a batter and had a fielding error when he missed the bag trying to cover first.ROCKIES 5, PADRES 2 Wilin Rosario and Dexter Fowler homered, helping Jeff Francis and Colorado beat San Diego in a festive home opener at Coors Field.
ATLANTA — Passengers on the express bus from Throgs Neck in the Bronx to East 23rd Street in Manhattan last Monday morning might have wondered why their driver was wearing sunglasses on a cloudy day. Kevin Ware Sr., the father of Louisville's famously injured guard, said he had no choice."Man to man? I was boohooing," he said. "No lie. I didn't want everyone to see me crying. I had tears for days."On Saturday night, though, after Louisville's dramatic victory over Wichita State in the Final Four, the elder Ware had wet eyes for a different reason. He happened to be looking away from the television screen a week ago when his son Kevin sustained a compound fracture of his right leg in a regional final against Duke. He still has not watched the graphic video of the incident, in which his son was hurt so badly that a bone broke through the skin.Instead, he said, he hopes someone will offer to show him a video of what happened at the final buzzer Saturday, when Ware turned around and found his father, who had walked into the arena moments earlier, for a long embrace while his teammates celebrated on the Georgia Dome court."I just wanted to tell him how proud I was," the elder Ware said. "This has been so difficult for him, and he's handled it so well."Recalling his son's immediate reaction after the injury, when he called over his teammates and told them to go on and win without him, Ware added: "To see your leg hanging out and you say, 'Go win the game'? That kid is my hero."Ware has become an emotional catalyst for the Cardinals since his leg buckled grotesquely in the first half last weekend. There were No. 5s — Ware's uniform number — everywhere one looked at the Georgia Dome: on signs in the stands, on the cards in the cheerleaders' hands, on T-shirts worn by fans.Ware did not imagine it this way. He couldn't have. He was supposed to help lead his team, not inspire it. Supposed to play in the Final Four, not watch it.But there he was Saturday, his locker in the dressing room replaced by a parking spot for a wheelchair and his seat on the bench turned sideways to accommodate his damaged right leg, which rested for most of the game on several towels placed atop another chair.Ware was supposed to stay put. But early in the second half, he ignored the team trainer who kept telling him to keep his leg elevated and hobbled onto the court during a timeout. He joined the Louisville huddle in a sequence that prompted several Cardinals players to look at Ware with wide eyes."I just couldn't sit anymore," Ware said afterward. "They were kind of like, How did you get out here?"Forward Wayne Blackshear said Ware was "kind of upset at us.""He told us we had to pick it up and, obviously, we listened," Blackshear said.Guard Peyton Siva said, "I thought he was about to sub in for me, I'm so used to it."Once the timeout ended, Ware had to return to his seat. Watching instead of playing was difficult, he acknowledged, and in the game's final moments, he dropped his head in prayer, not wanting to watch as his teammate Luke Hancock took two critical free throws.It was right around that time that his father entered the arena, having been stuck in Chicago by a delayed connecting flight from New York. The elder Ware, who said he taught his son to play basketball in the Bronx River projects and used to take him to the famed street ball mecca at Rucker Park, asked a security guard to tell his son that he had arrived. He was allowed near Ware's seat for the game's final moments.Ware said he and his wife split up when Kevin was a teenager but remain in close touch, talking and texting often. With Kevin Ware living in Atlanta (and going to college in Louisville), though, they do not see each other much, and Saturday was the first time father and son had been together in about a year, Ware said.That was why, when the final buzzer sounded, Ware turned and wrapped his father in a bear hug."It meant so much to me to be here," the elder Ware said. "I had those tears again."This time, he did not mind.
Ian Desmond made two errors at shortstop that helped the Cincinnati Reds take the game to extra innings, but he led off the 11th with his first home run of the season, helping to rally the visiting Washington Nationals to a 7-6 victory Saturday.Wilson Ramos hit two home runs for the Nationals, including a solo homer off J. J. Hoover (0-2) in the 11th.Craig Stammen (1-0) pitched the last two innings. He gave up a two-out, run-scoring double to Brandon Phillips that closed the gap to one run. But Stammen struck out Jay Bruce to end it.PHILLIES 4, ROYALS 3 Pinch-hitter Kevin Frandsen had a three-run double with two outs in the ninth off Kansas City closer Greg Holland to lift host Philadelphia.The Phillies had two hits and trailed, 3-1, to start the inning.BRAVES 6, CUBS 5 B .J. Upton led off the ninth inning with a homer, and one out later his brother Justin followed with another to help host Atlanta rally past Chicago and its closer, Carlos Marmol.Marmol blew two of three save chances this week.CARDINALS 6, GIANTS 3 Carlos Beltran hit a go-ahead two-run single in the fifth against his former team, and Shelby Miller beat host San Francisco in his second career start.Pete Kozma had three hits, drove in a run and scored for St. Louis from the No. 8 spot in the order. ROCKIES 6, PADRES 3 Jon Garland threw six sharp innings in his first appearance in almost two years and Michael Cuddyer drove in four runs, helping host Colorado to a victory over San Diego.Garland (1-0), returning from surgery, gave up two runs and struck out two.DIAMONDBACKS 9, BREWERS 2 Jason Kubel, Paul Goldschmidt and Aaron Hill homered in visiting Arizona's victory over injury-depleted Milwaukee.BLUE JAYS 5, RED SOX 0 Boston's John Lackey left with a strained biceps in his first start since September 2011, grabbing his right arm in pain and coming out in the fifth inning of Boston's loss to host Toronto.Lackey (0-1) missed last season after elbow ligament-replacement surgery in November 2011. RAYS 6, INDIANS 0 Alex Cobb scattered four hits in seven and one third innings, Kelly Johnson homered and host Tampa Bay beat Cleveland.Cobb (1-0) struck out six and walked three as the Rays shut out the Indians for the second consecutive game.TWINS 6, ORIOLES 5 Justin Morneau singled in the tiebreaking run with two outs in the ninth inning after an error by Chris Davis, and visiting Minnesota topped Baltimore.Davis picked up his 17th run batted in.DODGERS 1, PIRATES 0 Clayton Kershaw pitched seven innings of two-hit ball and had nine strikeouts in a spirited duel with A. J. Burnett, and host Los Angeles beat Pittsburgh.Kershaw (2-0) walked one and retired 17 consecutive batters after giving up a leadoff single.ANGELS 8, RANGERS 4 At Texas, the Angels' Albert Pujols homered twice to offset another tough day for his teammate Josh Hamilton in his second game against his former team.Pujols watched Hamilton strike out twice and fly out behind him after taking three intentional walks.WHITE SOX 4, MARINERS 3 Alex Rios hit a tiebreaking, two-run homer off Felix Hernandez in the sixth inning, and Chicago beat visiting Seattle.Hernandez (1-1) allowed four runs and six hits over six and a third innings. ATHLETICS 6, ASTROS 3 Bartolo Colon had a solid performance in his return from a drug suspension, and visiting Oakland beat Houston.
Daniel Nava hit a three-run homer, Clay Buchholz pitched seven shutout innings and the surprising Boston Red Sox won their ninth straight home opener, 3-1 over the Baltimore Orioles on Monday.Nava ended a scoreless duel between Buchholz (2-0) and Wei-Yin Chen (0-1) in the seventh inning with his second home run in two days. He drove the ball over the Green Monster in left after Dustin Pedroia singled and took third on a double by Mike Napoli.The Red Sox are off to a 5-2 start under their new manager, John Farrell. "This team is growing in confidence by the day," Farrell said.Buchholz gave up three hits and three walks and struck out eight. Last Wednesday, he allowed one run in seven innings in a 7-4 victory over the Yankees.Andrew Bailey blanked the Orioles in the eighth before Joel Hanrahan allowed a solo home run by Adam Jones in the ninth, but Hanrahan got his third save.ROYALS 3, TWINS 1 Ervin Santana pitched eight strong innings, Alcides Escobar doubled home the go-ahead run and host Kansas City rallied to beat Minnesota.Santana (1-1) struck out seven, walked one and hit a batter. Santana allowed only four hits after the first inning, when the Twins scored their run.The Twins right-hander Kevin Correia (0-1) limited the Royals to five singles and no runs the first seven innings before Lorenzo Cain doubled to right-center to lead off the three-run eighth.BRAVES 2, MARLINS 0 Justin Upton went 4 for 4 and hit his sixth home run, and Paul Maholm allowed one hit in seven sharp innings in Atlanta's win in Miami's home opener.The Braves earned their fourth consecutive victory and improved to 6-1, their best start since 2007.The announced attendance was 34,439, with thousands of empty seats and many tickets sold at discounted prices. Some fans have pledged to stay away this season because they are angry that the owner Jeffrey Loria reverted to a frugal payroll only a year after the team opened a new ballpark built mostly with taxpayer money.REDS 13, CARDINALS 4 Brandon Phillips kick-started a nine-run ninth inning with a tiebreaking bloop double and Shin-Soo Choo made amends for two botched fly balls with a three-run double to help the Reds spoil the Cardinals' home opener.Mitchell Boggs (0-1), the stand-in closer for St. Louis, yielded six runs while getting only one out. The Cardinals needed four more pitchers to get out of the inning. The Cardinals had the largest regular-season crowd of 47,375 in the eight-year history of the new Busch Stadium, but only a few thousand remained by the bottom of the ninth.BREWERS 7, CUBS 4 Marco Estrada pitched seven effective innings and doubled home a run, helping visiting Milwaukee stop a five-game slide at Wrigley Field in Chicago.Ryan Braun had three hits after missing three games with neck spasms.
For 24 days and 13 games, across seven cities, two countries and three time zones, the Knicks have crushed every challenger, obliterated every obstacle, eradicated all doubts and left little to prove in the fleeting days of this revitalizing season.They have their Atlantic Division title, their 50 wins and the assurance of a lofty playoff seeding. They have defeated the Miami Heat and the Oklahoma City Thunder, the N.B.A.'s reigning royalty, convincingly. Through their late-season charge — 13 straight wins and counting — they have built a worthy case as title contenders.There is only one thing the Knicks have failed to accomplish this season: beat the Chicago Bulls. Indeed, they have hardly been able to keep their composure when standing within 10 feet of them.The teams played three times between Dec. 8 and Jan. 11, and the Bulls took them all, decisively — the only team to beat the Knicks three times this season. Chicago led wire to wire in two games, by as many as 25 points in each, flummoxing the Knicks with relentless defense and snarling aggression.There were ejections: Carmelo Anthony, Tyson Chandler and Coach Mike Woodson all getting tossed on Dec. 21. And there were boos: the Garden faithful vocalizing its disappointment on Jan. 11.No other foe this season has so consistently made the Knicks appear so emotionally fragile."It just seems like some teams have certain teams' numbers," Anthony said Tuesday. "And it seems like the Bulls this regular season have it."The Knicks get one last chance to prove otherwise, Thursday night at United Center, although under less-than-ideal circumstances. Chandler and Kenyon Martin were left in New York to rest their injuries — Chandler a bulging disk and Martin a sprained ankle. They will also miss Friday's game in Cleveland.The Bulls are in no better shape. Joakim Noah, their defensive backbone, is out because of plantar fasciitis. Luol Deng (hip) and Taj Gibson (knee) are listed as day to day but seem unlikely to play Thursday. And of course, Derrick Rose, their All-Star point guard, has been out all season.Neither team has much at stake, or a reason to risk the health of its stars, although both are jockeying for playoff position. The Knicks (51-26) are trying to hold off the Indiana Pacers (49-29) for the second seed in the Eastern Conference. Chicago (42-35) is wrestling the Atlanta Hawks for the fifth seed, although the Bulls do not seem overly motivated to win it. The sixth seed would get to avoid the Heat until the conference finals.Yet there should be no lack of tension or motivation on the court Thursday — for Anthony, in particular. He missed the first loss to the Bulls because of a lacerated finger and was stymied in the two games he played, going 24 for 57 from the field (.421)."They caught me at some bad times," Anthony said with a rueful grin.Anthony was ejected in the fourth quarter of the second game, for swinging his arm near Noah's head, after a long night of irritating defense from Noah, Deng and Jimmy Butler."They've got multiple guys that can cover Carmelo," the TNT analyst Steve Kerr said. "Deng does a fantastic job on him, and the way that Jimmy Butler has developed, you really have someone you can throw on Carmelo for 48 minutes. One of those two guys can stay with him and make everything difficult."In Noah, the Bulls also have a mobile center who can (when healthy) help contain Anthony and still recover to guard Chandler in the lane.With Noah and possibly Gibson out, the Bulls will lose some versatility and strength. With Chandler and Martin out, the complexion of the game could change. But the hallmark of Coach Tom Thibodeau's Bulls is that they play the same way every night, no matter who is on the court, which is why they never dropped out of playoff contention despite Rose's season-long absence.So this game, or rather this style of game, might still provide some insight into the Knicks' late-season evolution, and their readiness for the playoffs, where they may tangle with the similarly stingy defenses of the Boston Celtics, the Pacers and the Heat.The Knicks' resurgence, after three months of dreary mediocrity, has been fueled by a scorching offense, by Anthony's brilliant efficiency and J. R. Smith's newfound shooting conscience. If they revert to bad habits — forced shots, self-indulgent play, mindless domination of the ball — the Knicks will not last long in the postseason. A great defense can do that to a player."I do think when Carmelo gets in trouble it's with too much isolation and not enough ball movement by the team in general," Kerr said. "And Chicago has the ability to do that to anybody. They frustrate a lot of teams. They load up on you. They get you stagnant, and you lose the rhythm and the flow of your offense. I think that's definitely the case when they play the Knicks."The Bulls do something else well: end winning streaks. They doused the Heat's 27-game streak two weeks ago. On a smaller scale, they snuffed the Knicks' five-game streak on Dec. 8, the fifth loss in the Knicks' 18-5 start. Soon after, the Knicks began drifting into a three-month funk.So here they are once more: the Knicks streaking, and the Bulls scheming to spoil their happy vibe. This game may have little bearing on the postseason, but the Knicks still have tests to pass — and one more Eastern Conference foe to defeat."We've got one more shot at it," Anthony said, "one more shot out there to win the basketball game and keep the streak alive and do what we've got to do."
CHICAGO — If you laid the Knicks ' top six big men from end to end, you would get 41 feet and 4 inches of pain, and enough sore necks, feet, knees and ankles to fill a modest orthopedic ward.The Knicks stepped onto the United Center court Thursday night without any of them, having arrived without the services of Amar'e Stoudemire's right knee, Kenyon Martin's left ankle, Tyson Chandler's neck, Kurt Thomas's right foot and the two left feet belonging to Marcus Camby and Rasheed Wallace.They put nine players in uniform, started the 6-foot-8 Chris Copeland at center and put their 13-game winning streak on the line against the feisty, physical Chicago Bulls.After all the fretting over injured giants, the game was decided by the smallest player on the court.Nate Robinson, the Chicago Bulls' sprightly 5-9 guard, exploded for 35 points, including 8 in overtime, sending the Knicks to a 118-111 defeat, their first loss since March 17.The third longest winning streak in Knicks history is over. The Bulls — who two weeks ago snuffed out the Miami Heat's 27-game streak — reign as the N.B.A.'s premier streak stoppers. They also swept the season series with the Knicks."They can have it," Carmelo Anthony said, a bit of contempt in his voice. "They can have it. They can have these regular-season wins. They did a great job at beating us four times. We're not worrying about them at this point. We're concerned about ourselves."For the first time in 26 days, the Knicks have something to be concerned about. They blew a 15-point lead in the second half and never found a way to contain Robinson, who went 10 for 18 from the field and 10 for 10 from the foul line, eluding Raymond Felton, Iman Shumpert and everyone else in a Knicks jersey.Anthony led the Knicks with 36 points, his sixth straight game with at least 35, breaking Bernard King's franchise record. He also grabbed 19 rebounds, helping offset the absences of, well, everybody.But Anthony missed the biggest shot of the night, an open 19-footer at the regulation buzzer. When overtime arrived, the Knicks had nothing left. They made just 3 of 11 shots and were outscored by Robinson alone.J. R. Smith scored 28 points but went 1 for 6 in overtime.There was one more injury scare along the way. Raymond Felton sprained his right knee while chasing after the jump ball in overtime and crumpled to the court, wincing."I mean, the first thing you're thinking is, Is he going to get up and continue?" said Woodson, who rushed onto the court to check on Felton.Felton did get up and finished the game. Despite an obvious limp, he said he would play Friday night in Cleveland.The Knicks (51-27) still lead the Indiana Pacers (49-29) by two games in the race for the second seed in the East, with four games to play. The Pacers visit Madison Square Garden on Sunday. Chicago (43-35) moved a half-game ahead of the Atlanta Hawks for the fifth seed.The Bulls are the only team in the East to go undefeated against the Knicks this season — a fact the Knicks dismissed as trivial."We played them four times; we came up short four times," Jason Kidd said. "There's a bigger picture right now."Not as easily dismissed was that the Bulls again flustered the Knicks into technical fouls and tough shots. The Knicks converted just 40.4 percent of their field-goal attempts, with Anthony going 13 for 35 and Smith going 11 for 27.The Bulls surged ahead by 7 points in the fourth quarter, with Robinson providing a nifty reverse layup and two 3-pointers, celebrating the second one by co-opting Steve Novak's "discount double-check" belt gesture.The Knicks rallied in the final three minutes of regulation, and Anthony tied the game at 105-105 with 14.5 seconds left.The Knicks' revival has been built on brilliant shooting, so it is only appropriate that this season will be immortalized with the N.B.A. record for 3-pointers. The Knicks hit 10 more Thursday night, pushing their season total to 847, breaking the mark set by the 2009-10 Orlando Magic, who had 841.This season has also been defined by the Knicks' move to small-ball, a tact they took to new extremes Thursday, out of sheer necessity. With all of their big men sidelined, the Knicks installed Copeland as their center, making him the shortest player to start at the position since Buck Williams, also 6-8, on April 18, 1998.The Knicks could have listed the 6-8 Anthony at center, but Woodson dismissed the suggestion with a gentle laugh."Cope's the center," he said. "I can't call Carmelo the center. If I do, he'll jump on me for that."Copeland scored 14 points, and the Knicks battled the Bulls to a virtual draw in rebounds, never looking any worse off for their lack of big bodies.
Josh Johnson put his team in another tough spot with one of the worst outings of his career.Johnson was knocked out of the game in the second inning Thursday — the latest poor start from a Blue Jays pitcher — and the Detroit Tigers rolled to an 11-1 victory at Comerica Park.Miguel Cabrera tripled, scored twice and stole a base for the Tigers, and Doug Fister (2-0) allowed one run and eight hits in eight innings.Johnson (0-1) allowed six runs and seven hits in one and a third innings, the shortest start of his career."I haven't thrown a slider for a strike yet, and I need that pitch," Johnson said. "When I'm throwing it for strikes, it is something that the hitters have to think about, but this is two starts now, and it hasn't happened. I didn't have anything today. They were all over my curveball for some reason, and the fastball was just hanging over the plate."Detroit catcher Alex Avila described the weather as "miserable." It was 35 degrees at game time, and there was a bit of rain to play through as well. There were no home runs on this wet day, but Detroit didn't need any.Prince Fielder had four runs batted in, and Torii Hunter added three for the Tigers.The Blue Jays have not lived up to expectations early because of poor pitching. Their starters are now 1-4 with a 7.59 earned run average.Toronto, a chic pick to win the American League East after acquiring Johnson, Jose Reyes and R. A. Dickey in the off-season, has lost three straight series to start the year for the first time since 1978. The Blue Jays lost four straight series to start that season.ORIOLES 3, RED SOX 2 Chris Davis hit his sixth homer and Adam Jones drove in two runs, including a tiebreaking double, to lead visiting Baltimore past Boston.Davis and Jones extended their torrid starts for the Orioles, who took two of three games at Fenway Park. The pair has combined for 30 of Baltimore's 85 hits.Baltimore improved to 1-3 in one-run games after going 29-9 last season.NATIONALS 7, WHITE SOX 4 Ryan Zimmerman delivered a two-run double after Bryce Harper was intentionally walked in the fourth inning, and host Washington beat Chicago to cap a three-game sweep.Dan Haren (1-1) got the win despite allowing 10 hits in five innings.With the score tied, 3-3, in the fourth, Haren helped himself by doubling off Dylan Axelrod (0-1) and eventually scoring on a wild pitch with two outs. Chicago then walked Harper. Zimmerman, batting cleanup, lined a double to right on Axelrod's 103rd and final pitch of the night.GIANTS 7, CUBS 6 Pablo Sandoval hit a two-run double in a four-run fourth inning, and visiting San Francisco rallied from an early five-run deficit to beat Chicago.Giants starter Ryan Vogelsong walked with the bases loaded to tie it in the fifth, and Angel Pagan followed with a sacrifice fly, helping the World Series champion Giants win their fourth in a row.Vogelsong (1-1) yielded eight hits and five runs in the first three innings before retiring his final 10 batters on a foggy and damp 40-degree day. Giants closer Sergio Romo allowed a one-out double to David DeJesus in the ninth but finished for his sixth save.MARINERS GET HARANG The Seattle Mariners have acquired the right-handed pitcher Aaron Harang from the Colorado Rockies in exchange for the right-hander Steven Hensley and cash.
After finding out that his teammate Jose Reyes was most likely out for three months, R. A. Dickey allowed one run in six and a third innings for his first Toronto win as the Blue Jays beat the host Kansas City Royals , 3-2, on Saturday night."Sometimes a situation like that can really cause a team to jell," said Dickey, the 2012 Cy Young Award winner for the Mets. But he was 0-2 with an 8.44 earned run average for the Blue Jays, who traded for him during the off-season.That changed Saturday, when Dickey allowed five hits. "His knuckler was really dancing," Royals Manager Ned Yost said.Jose Bautista hit a two-run homer off James Shields (1-2), who pitched a two-hitter with six strikeouts for Kansas City."We're going to go as far as the rotation is going to bring us," said the Blue Jays' general manager, Alex Anthopoulos. "That's really what it comes down to. "BRAVES 3, NATIONALS 1 Tim Hudson pitched seven innings of four-hit ball, and Evan Gattis homered after a two-out throwing error in the third as visiting Atlanta won its eighth straight game, beating Washington and starter Stephen Strasburg.Hudson (2-0) allowed one run, walked none and struck out three in improving his record against Washington to 15-5. He also singled twice off Strasburg (1-2), who gave up two unearned runs and five hits in six innings.GIANTS 3, CUBS 2 Madison Bumgarner lifted his record to 3-0 and Marco Scutaro had three hits for San Francisco at Chicago.Pinch-hitter Dioner Navarro hit a two-out, two-run homer off Bumgarner in the seventh to pull the Cubs to 3-2. It was Navarro's second pinch homer in two days, from a different side of the plate. His tying homer in the ninth Friday was hit from the left side.CARDS 8, BREWERS 0 Adam Wainwright pitched a four-hitter and drove in two runs with three hits as host St. Louis shut out Milwaukee for the second straight game. Yovani Gallardo (0-1), the Brewers' ace, fell to 1-10 with a 6.83 ERA against the Cardinals. He was 0-2 with a 12.34 ERA in three starts against St. Louis last season.The Brewers have not scored in 25 straight innings and are 1-8 since a win on opening day.DODGERS 7, D'BACKS 5 Hyun-Jin Ryu struck out nine in six innings and got his first three major league hits in the process for visiting Los Angeles, which held off Arizona.PIRATES 3, REDS 1 Starter Jeff Locke of host Pittsburgh won the first game of his career after seven losses.MARLINS 2, PHILLIES 1 Chris Coghlan hit a game-ending single against a drawn-in infield with one out in the ninth inning for host Miami. The Marlins' Jose Fernandez, a 20-year-old phenom, pitched six scoreless innings and hit an R.B.I. single.ROCKIES 9, PADRES 5 Catcher Wil Rosario was 4 for 5 with a homer and three R.B.I. as visiting Colorado outslugged San Diego.INDIANS 9, WHITE SOX 4 A grand slam by Mark Reynolds and a two-run homer by Yan Gomes, his first hit of the season, gave Cleveland a six-run fifth inning and a 9-2 lead as Chicago fell to 0-5 on the road. In the first inning, Nick Swisher hit his first home run for the Indians.TIGERS 7, A'S 3 Prince Fielder hit a home run for the second straight game, and Jhonny Peralta and Torii Hunter added homers for Detroit to back Justin Verlander and snap host Oakland's nine-game winning streak.RED SOX 2, RAYS 1 Shane Victorino drove in the winning run for Boston with a single into a five-man infield in the bottom of the 10th inning.RANGERS 3, MARINERS 1 Elvis Andrus and Adrian Beltre singled home runs with two out in the eighth inning as visiting Texas rallied to beat Seattle.
CHICAGO — On a visit to Olympia Stadium in Detroit in the 1960s, the Hall of Famer Bobby Hull recalled, he was skating through warm-ups with the Blackhawks when three Red Wings fans in the front row began yelling obscenities at him. Their shouts grew louder and more disparaging, and soon the fans had climbed the glass and dangled their arms over it. Hull skated toward the glass, hooked the three fans with his stick and with a flick of his wrist sent them sprawling."I looked back, and they were picking themselves off the seats four or five rows deep," Hull said with a chuckle.That is the way the rivalry has gone between Chicago and Detroit, two of the N.H.L.'s Original Six franchises, since they first met Nov. 24, 1926. Good fun, with the chance of a fat lip.Next year, though, realignment will move the Red Wings to the Eastern Conference. Friday's meeting at United Center was their last regular-season game as conference rivals with the Blackhawks."It's two great sports cities," said Chris Chelios, who played parts of 9 seasons with the Blackhawks and 10 with the Red Wings. "The fans love it, lots of fights, lots of excitement. It's always special, and it will be missed."As usual, it did not take long for the home crowd to voice its feelings for the Red Wings on Friday. Within seconds of the last note of the national anthem, chants rang out across the stadium. They were not of the PG variety.It was the 725th regular-season game between Chicago and Detroit, the most among opponents in the N.H.L. Fittingly, it was a thriller, with the Blackhawks needing five shots in a shootout to win, 3-2. Even in enemy territory, there were plenty of cheers for the Red Wings goals."As far back as I can remember, the Detroit fans loved to go to Chicago, and the Chicago fans loved to go to Detroit," said the Hall of Famer Ted Lindsay, who played 13 seasons in the 1940s and '50s with Detroit, then three with Chicago. "And back then, our cars didn't go very fast."Those who made the 283-mile journey have enjoyed their share of memories. Detroit holds the regular-season edge with a 363-265-84-13 record, and Chicago has won 8 of the 15 playoff series between them, including Stanley Cup finals in 1934 and 1961.In Lindsay and Gordie Howe's day, the Red Wings, who won four Stanley Cups in the 1950s, reigned supreme."They were always in the basement, so we didn't think much of them," Lindsay said of the Blackhawks.But Detroit sent Lindsay to Chicago, along with the Hall of Fame goaltender Glenn Hall before the 1957 season. Hull and Stan Mikita joined the Blackhawks, and the tide turned. Chicago remained the dominant team through the '80s, and then Detroit gained the upper hand in the '90s with Steve Yzerman and Nicklas Lidstrom. The arrival of Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane has tipped the balance toward Chicago lately.In addition to the stars that have played for the teams, Hull has a soft spot for the fans in the two cities. He recalled another story from a game on Easter in which a Blackhawks fan, trying to match the Detroit tradition of throwing octopuses on the ice, let loose a live rabbit after a Chicago goal."Safe to say, that didn't catch on," Hull said.More recently, no one has felt the animosity between the two fan bases more than Chelios. A Chicago native, he was beloved there until he requested a trade to Detroit in 1999."They disowned me," said Chelios, who won two Stanley Cups in Detroit and is now a Red Wings adviser. "It was always hard for me to play at the United Center; I couldn't wait for the games to be over. Worse were the things people would yell at me on the street."With the Atlanta franchise relocating to Winnipeg, Manitoba, last season but remaining in the Southeast Division, the N.H.L. saw a need for realignment. The Red Wings, who play home games in the Eastern time zone, will welcome fewer trips to the West Coast next season. And Chicago and Detroit will still play a home-and-home series.Blackhawks forward Patrick Sharp had another take on the new arrangement."Sometimes, when you play a team six to eight times in a season, people think that builds rivalries," he said. "Sometimes, it kills them. Seeing these guys once or twice a year, the fans will get fired up for that game; the players will, too."Friday's win was the Blackhawks' fourth over the Red Wings this season, their first sweep of Detroit since 1976-77. With it came the intriguing possibility of a first-round playoff matchup; entering Saturday, Chicago was the West's top team and Detroit the eighth seed. Not that the Red Wings are especially looking forward to it.As defenseman Niklas Kronwall recounted the talent on the Blackhawks' roster, he said, "I don't think we'll miss playing them six times a year."
ANAHEIM, Calif. — Teemu Selanne was in a deep recess of Honda Center, talking about life as a 42-year-old N.H.L. star and as the chiseled, aging face of a franchise filled with hope and Stanley Cup aspirations.Down a hall, seven 20-something men from Helsinki, Finland, waited nervously. They were on a pilgrimage, their first trip to the United States, to watch Selanne play two games for the Anaheim Ducks. One anxiously held Selanne's No. 8 jersey from Jokerit, the top team in Helsinki, where Selanne starred before scoring the first of 674 N.H.L. goals more than 20 years ago.Selanne is the most popular player in two lands — Finland and the vast suburban one surrounding Disneyland, about three miles west of the Ducks' arena down Katella Avenue. He is used to the attention. And, as usual, he handled it with a deft touch and an easy smile."He loves life," said his former teammate Scott Niedermayer, now an Anaheim assistant, watching from a few feet away. "He loves it, like we all hope we could."Selanne is the oldest player in the league, though he does not look or play like it, his full head of hair flowing in the breeze generated by skating speed that still surprises defensemen. And while he no longer leads the Ducks in scoring — responsibility is shared among Ryan Getzlaf, Corey Perry and Bobby Ryan, all about 15 years younger — he still leads them in charisma and popularity.Selanne, perhaps weeks away from the end of his career, finds himself playing for what may be the best Ducks team in the franchise's 20 years. He would know, having been part of most of those teams. The Ducks are second only to the blistering Chicago Blackhawks in the Western Conference standings, and are 3-0 against Chicago this season. They, too, have noticed that few seem to be paying attention beyond Southern California."That has been good for us," Selanne said.Anaheim is loaded with depth at forward (the veteran Radek Dvorak scored both goals in a 2-1 victory over Edmonton last Monday and was a healthy scratch Wednesday against Colorado) and has a healthy goalie competition between Jonas Hiller and Viktor Fasth. Coach Bruce Boudreau, chased out of Washington last season and immediately hired in Anaheim, amicably steers a steady franchise that long ago shed its cartoonish mascot (and Disney ownership) for a more serious, championship-or-bust approach."If you don't want the whole enchilada, I don't want you on the team," Boudreau told reporters last week.Some of Selanne's teammates are young enough to be his children — a fact that hit home last season when one mentioned that Selanne was the same age as his mother. Forward Emerson Etem, from nearby Long Beach, was less than a year old when Selanne, as a 22-year-old, catapulted past Mike Bossy's record for goals by a rookie, with 76 in 1992-93.Since then, the N.H.L. has added six franchises, moved and replaced teams in Winnipeg and Minnesota, shifted a team to Colorado from Quebec and had three lockouts.Selanne, for a majority of his 20-year N.H.L. career, has mostly just watched the Ducks lose the Mighty in their nickname and the teal of their uniforms. In this area, for most of two decades, he has been as dependably routine and fruitful as a citrus tree."You have to be proud that you've been able to play all this time," Selanne said. "It is funny that some teammates could be my sons. But you know what? I have a young mind, and those guys help me stay young."The persistent question, as it has been for many years now, is how long Selanne will play. He leaned heavily toward retiring after the Stanley Cup season of 2006-7, then returned the next January, and he still adheres to the Brett Favre school of uncertainty. Subsequent indecision has sometimes kept the Ducks waiting until September.Teammates think he can play for years more. But Selanne does not want to put the Ducks in the uncomfortable position of not signing him (he has a one-year contract, paying him $4.5 million). He wants to leave on his own terms. Another title offers an enticing exit."Oh, for sure," Selanne said. "I had a chance to go out as a champion once. And I thought I did."
CHICAGO — The questions that Chicago Cubs starter Jeff Samardzija faces today are different from the ones he used to get. Two years ago, people wanted to know if Samardzija, a former all-American wide receiver at Notre Dame, was on his way out of baseball, if he had picked the wrong sport, whether, at 26, he was a has-been football player and a never-was baseball player.On Saturday, after a tough loss to the defending World Series champion, San Francisco, in which a gritty Samardzija allowed two runs in six innings and went toe to toe with Madison Bumgarner, he was asked if he was satisfied with his performance.Samardzija's answer was no. How things have changed.In 2011, when Samardzija first spoke with Theo Epstein, the Cubs' newly hired president for baseball operations, he said he wanted to be a starting pitcher. Samardzija promised he was so committed that he had dumped his girlfriend to focus more on baseball.He delivered the proclamation with a track record that included parts of four unremarkable seasons bouncing between the major leagues and the minors, and only five starts for the Cubs.Reminded of the story as he sat at his locker, his shoulder-length hair spewing out the sides of the cap he was wearing backward, Samardzija said: "I guess I could have said I sold all my investments or got rid of my car, but the point was my slate is free. I'm all in."Eighteen months later, he is the ace of the staff, his eye-popping fastball and disappearing splitter cornerstones of Epstein's rebuilding process. The opening day starter, Samardzija ushered in the season by striking out nine Pittsburgh Pirates and delivering a win. His last 16 starts, dating to July 2012, are Cy Young caliber: 107 innings, 122 strikeouts and a 2.61 earned run average."Looking at where his career was through 2011, anyone would be surprised now," Epstein said. "But this is who he is."If life is a series of key moments, Samardzija may be able to vouch for it. Before he went to Chicago, he had already stared into the abyss of loss and uncertainty. While he was in high school, a respiratory illness took the life of his mother, Debora. His brother, Sam, left a baseball scholarship at Indiana University to be with his family and look after Jeff.The Samardzija brothers would walk to a park across the street from their home in Valparaiso, Ind., tossing a football and running pass patterns for hours. They did not talk about their mother, but they healed.When Samardzija was a junior wide receiver at Notre Dame, the coach who recruited him, Tyrone Willingham, was fired and replaced by Charlie Weis, who had two Super Bowl rings. Samardzija had caught 24 passes his first two seasons. Under Weis, he was among the nation's leading receivers his junior and senior years with a total of 155 catches."I think there's a connection to bouncing back," Samardzija said. "Part of it is knowing in your head that there's always someone else there, that you can play for something more."He added: "When Theo came in, there were a lot of similarities with Charlie Weis at Notre Dame. It's a situation where you're not sure what to expect."In 2006, the Cubs made Samardzija their fifth-round draft pick when most assumed he would one day choose the N.F.L. The Irish baseball coach, Paul Mainieri, did his best to convince big league teams that his star pitcher was a baseball guy, but only his good friend Jim Hendry, the Cubs' general manager at the time, agreed.After a stellar senior football season, Samardzija signed a five-year, $10 million contract with the Cubs. By the summer of 2008, he was pitching out of Chicago's bullpen as the Cubs made a run to the playoffs.In 2009, though, Samardzija did not make the team out of spring training and posted a 7.53 E.R.A. in limited major league action. The next season was even worse. He appeared in just seven games, and his E.R.A. was 8.38. In three September starts, he allowed 11 runs in 16 innings.Sam Samardzija recalled a local headline in Indiana that has stayed with him: "Samardzija Family Unbowed by Jeff's Starting Flop.""If we're being honest, my contract pushed me through the minors," Jeff Samardzija said. "After that first season, it was like I looked around, realized where I was, and it was like, whoa."Samardzija spent the winter before the 2011 season in Arizona, righting his mechanics. He adjusted his leg kick, moved his hands down in his windup and worked out in what he called a "low-stress, low-anxiety environment."Mainieri said Samardzija had the most confidence he had ever seen in an athlete, and there was no surprise to the turnaround. Samardzija simply called it stubbornness."If I wasn't successful in baseball, all they'd ever say is, one, I made the wrong decision and, two, he was a heck of a football player," he said.Sam Samardzija said there might be another explanation."He walks his dog around the neighborhood, and he'll go grab a burger and a beer like it's no problem," he said. "Jeff had to find the balance between being a professional baseball player and being a regular guy."Samardzija is one of three Cubs (Alfonso Soriano and Carlos Marmol are the others) remaining from the 2008 playoff team. As quickly as Samardzija has risen, the team has embraced a full-on youth movement under Epstein. Last year's team lost 101 games.Still, Samardzija, who played on crisp autumn afternoons at Notre Dame Stadium with the nation watching, dreams of the same stage at Wrigley Field — and another key moment."I remember it vividly," he said of the 2008 playoffs. "The feel of the air, everything. That's what I want. I want to pitch here in October."
The Nets ' last postseason series began with a different roster and a different coach, with different uniforms in a different country, and all of that was just fine for a franchise that had regularly and happily dwelled beneath the radar.But when the lights go out in Barclays Center before Saturday's postseason opener, obscuring a black-clad curtain of fans fueled by six years of dysfunction, the stakes will have been raised.The Nets have confidence heading into their first-round matchup with the Chicago Bulls after finishing the regular season on a strong note, with a healthier roster than most other postseason teams have. They lost to Chicago three times during the regular season, but as guard Deron Williams put it, "That season's over."The Nets are passing into uncharted waters. In contrast with their last postseason appearance, which began in Toronto in 2007, they will command attention, they will be favored, and their toughest opponent might be the pressure they put on themselves."That's the trick of the playoffs," Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "You can't pretend it's not more important than what's preceded it, and you can't pretend that each game isn't important. You've got to walk that line."Carlesimo said he believed the team's first season in Brooklyn, which had its ups and downs on the court, was a rousing success off it. The Nets sold 94.9 percent of their available seats this season, finishing 16th in the N.B.A. in attendance, and the franchise rebranding has taken off in merchandise sales, television ratings and national perception."The whole Brooklyn phenomenon has just made this year very special," Carlesimo said. "This year, to me, has been 10 times more exciting, more well received, more everything than I could have ever thought."Although Carlesimo said there had been no sign that the weight of that expectation had burdened the team so far, the Nets have had deep postseason ambitions since the summer, when they re-signed Williams and Brook Lopez and traded for guard Joe Johnson.Around those three stars, the Nets rounded out the roster with veterans whom they could rely on for experience and perspective come the spring. The task of those role players now is keeping the team as loose as possible."We've got a lot of the veteran guys that's played in the playoffs, already know what it's going to be like," said guard Keith Bogans, a nine-year veteran. "We're all just ready to go."The brunt of the pre-series speculation has centered on Lopez, an All-Star center, the only member of the starting five who has never appeared in a postseason game, and the 7-foot pivot upon which the team's playoff success is likely to hinge. There has been plenty of whispering in his ear. Reggie Evans, who has appeared in 38 postseason games, said he had been priming Lopez with as much detail as possible, right down to the N.B.A. playoffs logo on the floor."It's just, man," Evans said, pausing. "Everything is different and intense. We all can feel the intensity — Brooklyn, first year, excitement. Everybody's going to be focused on him. Like, all right, what's Brook going to do?"Lopez led all centers in scoring (19.4 points per game) this season. In four games against the Bulls, he averaged 22 points and 2 blocks while shooting 52.9 percent from the field.The uncertainly surrounding Bulls center Joakim Noah, who is battling a right foot injury and said Friday that there was a possibility he might not play in Game 1, also eases some of the burden on Lopez."I'm not worried about Brook," Carlesimo said. "I'm more concerned with turnovers than Brook. Brook will play well."Williams said Lopez arrived at practice this week with a new mental focus, which was demonstrated by his clipped answers in interviews with members of the news media Thursday."I'm proud of how our team did, our team's success," Lopez said when asked about his season. Evans referred to Lopez as being "on a mission."Like Lopez, the Nets' marketing staff has been gearing up for the playoffs for nearly a month, generating a new social media campaign — "Hello Playoffs" — selling the presentation rights to American Express and introducing a sleek new all-black playoffs apparel line, with the hope to black out Barclays Center. Mikhail D. Prokhorov, the Nets' owner, will be in attendance Saturday to witness the atmosphere firsthand.The buildup is approaching a level above anything in the franchise's 36-year history, maybe even trumping the season opener in November, when Lopez won the opening tip and the newly relocated team was off and running. Eighty-two games later, one goal already achieved, the Nets are starting over again.
CHICAGO — Derrick Rose was the last player on the court after warm-ups an hour before Game 3 between the Bulls and the Nets at United Center on Thursday night. Bathed in a layer of sweat after going through a series of shooting and dribbling drills, Rose skied above the rim and dunked, eliciting a cheer from the handful of fans who had arrived early.He then walked to the locker room, only to return wearing a suit.Rose, a 24-year-old Chicago native, has not played at all this season after tearing his anterior cruciate ligament during the first round of last year's playoffs, and was scratched again Thursday. But not before he teased fans with a glimpse of the form that made him the league's most valuable player in 2010-11.Rose is a long shot to return at any point against the Nets. As the Nets' coach, P. J. Carlesimo, explained at the outset of the series, "it's hard to not have played for quite some time and come out and be effective."But Rose's stature, in addition to his public pregame practice sessions and the Bulls' refusal to rule him out for the series, have kept the intrigue surrounding him from dissipating. Come tipoff, he may be a shadow on the Bulls' bench, but Rose remains one of the top story lines. And his team seems more than willing to stoke the flames of a possible comeback and a dramatic return."If Derrick comes in this locker room and says he wants to play tomorrow, his uniform is ready," his teammate Luol Deng said after Game 2.On Thursday, Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau echoed that sentiment, saying, "We've said this all along — if he's ready to come back, he's coming back no matter when it is."Rose has remained mostly silent and out of uniform. He said before the playoffs that he would return when he felt ready, and he has not elaborated on that comment.It has become a familiar issue that has engulfed Chicago for the past two months. Rose was cleared to practice with the team in February, and his doctor reportedly approved his return to game action in early March. Since then, video footage of Rose shooting and dunking, including jumping off the left knee that was operated on, have fed the imagination of Chicagoans desperate for his return.The Bulls appear to want Rose back just as badly. Earlier in the series, Thibodeau brought up the example of the 1997-98 season, when he was an assistant coach with the Knicks and Patrick Ewing missed the last four months of the season because of a wrist injury. Ewing returned for a second-round playoff series against Indiana.Another Knick, Iman Shumpert, also offers some measure of hope — or frustration — for those wishing to see Rose in uniform. Shumpert tore his A.C.L. on the same day as Rose, but he returned to game action this January and has helped the Knicks to a 2-0 lead over the Boston Celtics in their first-round playoff series.As Rose continues to come under fire, his toughness questioned by the same fans who once adored him, his visibility on the bench can be seen through two different prisms. Thibodeau said Rose had taken well to his role as a cheerleader and coach. But as Rose jumped up and down on the sidelines during a run by the Bulls in Game 2, it also served as a reminder of what could be if he were in sneakers instead of loafers."We are only one thing," said guard Marco Belinelli, praising Rose's presence on the bench. "We are a group; we are all together."Then, as if anyone might have forgotten, Belinelli added, "He's still on the team."
CHICAGO — With one made basket, the Nets could have erased the 52 others they had already missed, wiped an ugly slate clean and started fresh in overtime, maybe tilting the momentum of this first-round series against the Chicago Bulls .Instead, C. J. Watson's last-second 3-point attempt fluttered across the rim as the buzzer sounded, another miss in a brutally long evening of misses. What was a forgettable game turned into a stinging loss, if only because the Nets had played so miserably and then fought back so late, only to be defeated, 79-76, at United Center.Now down two games to one, with Game 4 coming Saturday afternoon, the Nets have to figure out how to end the percussive beat rattling in their heads: clang, clang, clang. Brooklyn shot 34.6 percent on Thursday, and that was after the team hit 11 of 20 field-goal attempts in a fourth-quarter rally. The first three quarters were among the worst the team has played offensively all season."We are not shooting our 3 well at all," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "Not just the contested ones. The open ones."After Game 1, the Bulls adjusted their defense — or, rather, they challenged the Nets to adjust their offense, shove by shove. In Game 2 on Monday, the ultra-aggressive approach put the Nets back on their heels. On Thursday, Brooklyn's shooting legs were swiped from under them. "That's the style we like to play," said Luol Deng of the Bulls. "We love ugly games."The Nets fell behind by as much as 17 points. But the Bulls shot only 5 of 16 in the fourth quarter and Brooklyn managed to pull to within 78-76 with five seconds remaining.After a free throw by Joakim Noah, the Nets had time for one last heave, and the ball swung to Watson, who had a good look from the right wing. But, like almost everything else Thursday, it was not to be."We got a lot of good looks, looks that we've been getting," Watson said. "We just didn't make them tonight."The Nets had also blamed Monday's loss, in part, on their shooting struggles. Whatever malady befell their touch over the weekend was still kicking around in their system Thursday.For a prolonged stretch of the first half, Brooklyn's perimeter game was in utter paralysis. Nothing was happening offensively. After they began the game 5 of 8 from the field, jumping ahead by 17-5, the scorching start stopped like a light bulb bursting.The Nets missed 25 of 26 shots between 6 minutes 25 seconds of the first quarter and 3:38 of the second quarter. The Bulls went on a 28-4 run to take a 33-22 lead.There were airballs and blown layups, passes ricocheting off chests and hands, a shot-clock violation, a lot of puzzled looks.The silver lining for the Nets was that, somehow, they went into halftime trailing by only 7 after Gerald Wallace hit a 3-pointer at the buzzer to cut the Bulls' lead to 41-34. It was just the fourth Nets field goal of the second quarter, out of 18 tries."We were fighting an uphill battle all night," point guard Deron Williams said. "It's just tough to get it going."The Nets were distinctly more aggressive defensively to start the game, forcing six turnovers in the first eight minutes and preventing Chicago from scoring easily in the paint, two focuses of improvement during practice this week.With Williams leading the way offensively, Brooklyn jumped out to a 13-2 lead. Williams scored 8 of the team's first 17 points. The Nets did not seem daunted by the large and raucous crowd at United Center, playing like the team that won a franchise-record 23 games on the road this season.The Bulls began aggressively extending their defense, particularly on Williams, who began seeing double and even triple teams. The open man — often Wallace or Reggie Evans — was not hitting shots. The demise snowballed."We did not execute," Carlesimo said. "We have to understand to space the floor and take better care of the ball."Chicago ended the first quarter on a 14-0 run and with a 19-17 lead, momentum that carried into the second. Andray Blatche hit a layup a minute into the quarter and then the Nets did not make a field goal for more than seven minutes.Late in the fourth, a Nets lineup with MarShon Brooks and Blatche joining Williams, Johnson and Lopez staged the comeback with a 10-1 run. The Nets took some solace in the fact that their defense stayed tough, and they closed Chicago's gap despite playing about as poor offensively as they have all season.Joe Johnson scored 15 points on 6-of-14 shooting and appeared fine playing through plantar fasciitis in his left foot. He received a cortisone shot before the game.But their backs are getting pushed against the wall now. Falling behind by 3-1, Williams said, was likely to be insurmountable.
Usually after the first round of the N.F.L. draft, football fans in Michigan can proudly point to players selected who wore maize and blue or green and white during their high-profile Big Ten careers.When the Kansas City Chiefs took offensive tackle Eric Fisher with the first overall pick Thursday, the draft board was illuminated with unfamiliar hues: maroon and gold, the colors of the Central Michigan Chippewas.The 6-foot-7, 306-pound Fisher entered his senior season with little fanfare. He was a third-team all-Mid-American Conference selection as a junior. He was hardly a household name, even to those in the greater Mount Pleasant area. Now, after leading the Chippewas to a victory in the Little Caesars Pizza Bowl in December, Fisher will be counted on to protect the blind side of Chiefs quarterback Alex Smith, a former No. 1 overall pick himself.To have a player from my alma mater picked anywhere in the N.F.L. draft was worth a pat on the back from privileged friends who root for "major" football programs. But first over all? Central had a better chance of producing Mr. Irrelevant, the last player chosen."At the beginning of the year, N.F.L. scouts said they saw him as a potential first-round pick," Fisher's college coach, Dan Enos, told mlive.com. "And we were like, 'Cool!' Then at the end of the season they said he could be a top-10 pick, and after the Senior Bowl it was that he could be the top pick. It's been unreal."Before Thursday, the last Chippewas player selected by a professional league was a running back named Carl Volny, chosen by the Winnipeg Blue Bombers of the Canadian Football League in the fifth round in 2011. In the 2010 N.F.L. draft, quarterback Dan LeFevour (Chicago, 181st over all) and wide receiver Antonio Brown (Pittsburgh, 195th over all) were sixth-rounders — a coup by Central standards.Joe Staley, a Pro Bowl offensive tackle for the 49ers, is Central's only other first-round pick. The success of Staley, the 28th overall pick in 2007, may have lessened the Chiefs' anxiety about choosing a player from a non-Bowl Championship Series conference. Quarterback Byron Leftwich, drafted out of Marshall with the seventh pick in 2003, had been the highest choice from the MAC. Fisher was only the third player in the last 20 years from a non-B.C.S. program to be drafted No. 1 over all, joining Utah's Alex Smith (2005) and Fresno State's David Carr (2002).So it was no wonder that social media links were atwitter with "Fire Up Chips!" posts Thursday when the ESPN pundits Mel Kiper Jr. and Jon Gruden uttered "Central Michigan" more times in a 15-minute span before the draft than it had been uttered on the network in the previous 15 years.Fisher hopes to follow in the footsteps of the three other offensive tackles chosen first over all — the Hall of Famer Ron Yary (1968) and the perennial Pro Bowlers Orlando Pace (1997) and Jake Long (2008).At the end of Thursday night, fans of the Wolverines and the Spartans were still waiting for one of their players to be chosen. There's always the second round.
Kris Medlen and the Atlanta Braves were probably due for a rough stretch. It is happening now for a team that looked like the class of the National League less than two weeks ago.Medlen allowed a tiebreaking homer to Omar Infante in the fourth inning, and Atlanta lost at Detroit, 7-4, on Saturday. Medlen allowed five runs to the Tigers, matching a career worst.Atlanta has won only three of seven since starting 12-1.Rick Porcello (1-2) allowed three runs in six and a third innings.Atlanta's Justin Upton hit his major-league-leading 12th homer in the eighth, but Infante doubled home a run in the bottom half and scored to make it 7-4.ORIOLES 7, ATHLETICS 3 Nick Markakis and Adam Jones hit back-to-back home runs in the fourth inning, Chris Tillman pitched six innings for his first win of the season, and Baltimore won at Oakland.Tillman scattered seven hits with seven strikeouts and two walks. He also had to bat in the seventh inning after an injury to catcher Taylor Teagarden forced the Orioles to abandon their designated hitter. He struck out on three pitches.RAYS 10, WHITE SOX 4 Matt Moore won his fifth game as visiting Tampa Bay ended a two-game losing streak.Moore allowed three hits and one earned run in six innings, and he matched a season-high nine strikeouts.Kelly Johnson matched a career-high with four hits. He drove in two runs. Evan Longoria was 4 for 6 with two runs.ROYALS 3, INDIANS 2 Ervin Santana pitched seven scoreless innings, and Salvador Perez hit a two-run homer for host Kansas City.Santana (3-1) allowed six singles, struck out five and walked none. Scott Kazmir (0-1), making his second big league start in two years, took the loss.RED SOX 8, ASTROS 4 David Ortiz had two hits and drove in three runs, and Felix Doubront overcame a wild first inning to pitch into the seventh as Boston beat visiting Houston.Ortiz is hitting .519 (14 of 27) with two homers and nine runs batted in since returning to the lineup last Saturday.TWINS 7, RANGERS 2 Pedro Hernandez pitched five shutout innings for his first major league win, Josh Willingham homered, and host Minnesota ended a three-game slide.Derek Holland (1-2) pitched seven innings of five-hit ball for Texas, which lost for the second time in nine games.MARINERS 3, ANGELS 2 Kendrys Morales snapped a tie with a pinch-hit run-scoring single in the seventh inning for host Seattle.Felix Hernandez allowed one earned run and five hits over eight innings. PIRATES 5, CARDINALS 3 Russell Martin hit a two-run homer to highlight a four-run seventh inning, and visiting Pittsburgh rallied over St. Louis.The comeback gave A. J. Burnett (2-2) his second victory over the Cardinals in 10 days. He gave up two runs and five hits in six innings. His six strikeouts brought his league-leading total to 48.St. Louis starter Jake Westbrook left after six innings. He struck out six and scattered six hits to lower his earned run average to 0.98 in four starts.NATIONALS 6, REDS 3 Bryce Harper hit a two-run homer and scored twice, Dan Haren had his best start of the season, and host Washington beat Cincinnati.Denard Span and Jayson Werth each had two hits for Washington, which has won the first three games of a four-game set. Harper's two R.B.I. gave him 18, a Nationals record for April.DIAMONDBACKS 3, ROCKIES 2 Cody Ross's sacrifice fly to center field drove in A. J. Pollock in the bottom of the 10th inning to give host Arizona a victory. Ross hit a ball more than 400 feet to center, and the Rockies had no chance to throw out the speedy Pollock.CUBS 3, MARLINS 2 David DeJesus hit a tiebreaking single in the seventh inning to help lift Chicago at Miami.Travis Wood (2-1) pitched six innings, allowing two runs and striking out five for the Cubs, who has won four of five.
CHICAGO — Early in the fourth quarter Saturday, Gerald Wallace set a hard screen on Nate Robinson in the Nets ' backcourt. Robinson weighs 35 pounds less and is 10 inches shorter than the 6-foot-7, 215-pound Wallace, and the collision had the feel of a puppy running into a Mack truck.Robinson lay on the floor, facedown, for several moments. But he soon shook his head, steadied himself and rose. He then delivered a memorable, and improbable, playoff performance.The Bulls trailed by 109-95 with three minutes to play in regulation when Robinson took over. He scored 12 straight points and led the Bulls on a 16-2 run, to the delight of the United Center crowd.He sank a 3-pointer, then made a driving layup, a jumper and all three free throws after he was fouled on a 3-point attempt. He capped his stretch with an acrobatic floater. Robinson scored 23 points in the fourth quarter, his off-balance runners sometimes finding the basket as if by tracking device."Kind of like the old-school game NBA Jam," Robinson said, referring to a video game. "You make a couple, and the rim's on fire or the ball's on fire. I feel like that at times."When the Bulls had finally secured a 142-134 triple-overtime victory and a 3-1 series lead over the Nets, Robinson was on the bench, having fouled out in the second overtime. But as he and his exhausted teammates celebrated and the crowd rocked, there was no mistaking that the game belonged to Robinson, the unlikely hero of a memorable battle.Robinson arrived in Chicago last off-season as a stopgap backup point guard, with the superstar Derrick Rose recovering from a torn anterior cruciate ligament. Robinson's shoot-first style can be seen as refreshing or headache-inducing. Fans and reporters around Chicago have taken to describing him as Good Nate when the shots fall and Bad Nate when they do not."He's a character," said Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau, who also coached Robinson when both were members of the Boston Celtics. "You got to take the whole package. The good outweighs the bad."Robinson said: "I tease Coach a lot because it seems like every shot I shoot, he's mad regardless. You got to hope to make them, and then he really can't say too much."Robinson, 28, does not shy away from the spotlight or big moments and relishes his lightning-rod status. A Seattle native, he was a first-round draft pick of the Phoenix Suns out of Washington in 2005, but a draft-day trade sent him to the Knicks. He played four-plus seasons with the Knicks, and he bounced from Boston to Oklahoma City to Golden State before arriving in Chicago.Because he is only 5-9, he is by default the ultimate underdog and has been a fan favorite wherever he has played. His flair and colorful personality sometimes appear to overflow from his small frame.In the first half Saturday, Robinson revved up the home crowd when he became tangled with C. J. Watson after guarding him aggressively. Robinson kept fighting for the ball after the whistle and drove Watson into the scorer's table. A few shoves were exchanged. Robinson and Watson had to be separated. Each was given a technical foul."Those plays will get you fired up," Robinson said.The unbridled exuberance has always come with the potential for big-time offense. For his career, Robinson has averaged 11.5 points a game in only 23.4 minutes. This year, he scored 35 points against the Knicks in an April game, and 34 against Denver in March. Playing mostly off the bench, he surpassed 20 points 12 times during the season.In Game 4, his final line was 14 for 23 from the field, 3 for 7 on 3-point attempts, and 3 for 3 from the free-throw line. He scored 34 points."That's what Nate's capable of," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said. "Nate's one of those guys who can change a game. Whether you want to call him an X-factor or whatever, there's nights when he gets it going that he's very, very difficult to defend."As Robinson heated up in the fourth quarter, he asked Thibodeau, a noted disciplinarian, not to run any plays. He said he preferred the spontaneity of a free-flowing game."Just let the ball find me," he said he told his coach. "It worked."
CHICAGO — The locker-room floor was strewn with towels, torn bandages and ice. Eyes were red and gaits were stilted. After two games and two losses, after 63 minutes in a triple-overtime thriller on Saturday, this is how the Nets left Chicago.There was little to say, and words could scarcely describe the emotional swings in a Game 4 matinee that pushed into the early dusk, drama building with each successive overtime, a sold-out crowd at United Center left hoarse and delirious. The grim reality for the Nets was enough.After the 142-134 loss to the Chicago Bulls, the Nets are down by 3-1 in this first-round series, with Game 5 at Barclays Center on Monday. But there is a price to pay for blowing a 14-point lead with less than four minutes remaining in regulation. There is a sting that will not be relieved easily.The Nets were inches from salting away an easy victory, ahead by 14 points with 3 minutes 19 seconds remaining, when C. J. Watson stole the ball from Nate Robinson, dribbled alone down court and missed an open, two-handed dunk.At the time, it was an embarrassing moment in what had been an altogether pleasant game for the Nets, who woke up from their offensive slump in the previous two losses to shoot 57.1 percent from the field in regulation. Watson smiled and shook his head. Some fans at United Center began trickling toward the exit."I was just a little tired," Watson said. "I shouldn't have missed it."The Bulls seized on the missed opportunity, particularly Robinson, the 5-foot-9 point guard. Robinson reeled off 12 straight points to bring the Bulls back within 2. With 55 seconds left, Robinson passed to Carlos Boozer, who tied the score.The game went into overtime after Deron Williams missed a fallaway jumper at the buzzer."They just took it to us," Williams said. "Nate got hot and he didn't miss a shot. We couldn't find an answer for him."In overtime, Robinson again led the Bulls. With time ticking down, Robinson waved a screening Joakim Noah away at the top of the key and drove past Williams to deliver a running bank shot with 1.7 seconds left. He hopped into Boozer's arms.That celebration proved premature. The Nets called timeout and managed to get Joe Johnson open for a game-tying runner in the lane, and he delivered, silencing the crowd and giving the Nets another chance."It was like a reset, a new start," Johnson said. "But we just didn't make the big plays defensively."The Nets were never able to build momentum in the second or third overtimes. Johnson missed a potential game-winning pull-up jumper with 5.5 seconds left in the second overtime, and the Bulls wore down the Nets in the third, outscoring them by 15-7 as the Nets missed 6 of 8 shots."I thought our team showed a lot of toughness," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Nate made big plays and shots. We had a very hard time getting stops and were fortunate to get a win."After the game, the Nets struggled to comprehend how they let such a crucial game slip through their grasp, offering a few basic answers. They did not trap Robinson. They shot 29 of 45 from the free-throw line. The Bulls ended regulation on a 16-2 run."When it is all said and done, we did not do enough things to win," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said.Unlike the 79-76 loss in Game 3, in which the Nets took some solace from the way they battled back in the fourth quarter, there was little saving grace from Saturday's performance. Their offensive showing in the third quarter — when they shot 12 of 17 to turn a 58-55 deficit into an 84-76 lead heading into the fourth — was largely forgotten.Before the game, there were signs that the emotional strain of consecutive losses was starting to fray the locker room. On Friday, forward Gerald Wallace told reporters in the team hotel that he had apparently lost his way in the offense, saying, "I've got no clue what my role is."The sound bite was an added distraction for Carlesimo, who described his team as "agitated" before Game 4. It might have worked positively, though, as Wallace responded with 17 points, 9 rebounds and 4 assists before fouling out in the first overtime.Evans also played a key role offensively, scoring 15 points with 13 rebounds. For the first time in a week, the offense was not the issue. It was the defense."It was a shootout," Carlesimo said. "Neither of us did a good job at stopping each other."The Bulls finished shooting 53.2 percent from the field, with 17 second-chance points and 28 points off 19 Nets turnovers. Boozer continued his solid interior presence, finishing with 21 points, and Noah added 15 points and 13 rebounds.The catalyst, though, was Robinson. Earlier in the game, midway through the second quarter, Robinson scuffled with Watson, hurling him into the scorer's table after Watson appeared to extend an elbow. The incident incited both benches, but nothing more came of it.For a while, Watson appeared to have the upper hand in the confrontation. The Nets were winning, things looked good for them, but then he missed that dunk.The rest was history: a series potentially pivoting on a dunk that missed, a game that unraveled."It's a heartbreaker," Johnson said. "It was a game we let get away."
CHICAGO — Jonathan Toews celebrated his 25th birthday on Monday by sitting at his locker after Blackhawks practice, a bank of cameras trained on him, a host of microphones in his face and a cacophony of questions hurled at him. He spoke in his familiar Western Canadian accent and with the same measured tones as always."We know what we're up against," he said on the eve of Chicago's first playoff game. "This is our real season."Toews's words, accompanied by an unflinching stare into a sea of inquisitive faces, seemed to hang in the air for a split second."That's Jonathan," said Denis Savard, who coached Toews when he entered the league with the Blackhawks in 2007. "He's young, but he has a presence. When he talks, you listen."The Blackhawks enter the postseason with the league's best record, having completed a splendid but condensed 36-7-5 season. When the puck drops Tuesday night at United Center for Game 1 against the Minnesota Wild, Chicago will begin its quest to become the first Presidents' Trophy winner to capture the Stanley Cup since the Detroit Red Wings in 2008.A roster loaded with talent takes its cues from Toews, its steely-eyed captain.Toews sounds like an elder statesman even if he does not look the part. The beginning of his playoff beard is little more than a bit of stubble on his sideburns. His smooth cheeks lack the roughness of a grizzled veteran. They give off more of a Justin Bieber-esque teenager vibe.But this is Toews's fifth year wearing the "C" on his No. 19 jersey. Most athletes mature as they grow up. Toews, who earned the nickname Captain Serious, has done the opposite: he has grown into his maturity. After Toews's rookie season, Blackhawks management met with him during the team's annual off-season fan convention.At a downtown hotel, Toews was told he would be the team's captain at the ripe age of 20, the third youngest in league history."To be honest, we had talked about it his rookie year, but we decided to wait," Blackhawks General Manager Stan Bowman said. "He responded in typical Jonathan Toews fashion. He said, 'I'm honored, and I'll make us proud.' "The Blackhawks advanced to the Western Conference finals that season, their first trip to the playoffs in six years. The next season, Chicago won the Stanley Cup, its first since 1961, led by Toews and his fellow young standouts Patrick Kane, Patrick Sharp and Duncan Keith.The last two years have been a bit turbulent for Toews and his team. Twice the Blackhawks squeaked into the playoffs and lost in the first round.Last season, Toews battled concussion-related symptoms and missed much of the second half of the season. Attempting to drive to United Center one day, he crashed his car into a steel support beam for Chicago's elevated train.His burning competitive streak and intensity, the very qualities that had made him a leader, did not mesh well with rest and recovery."When you're younger, you try to control every little detail," Toews said. "You're trying to score the winning goal every night, but that's not going to happen. It takes time to learn that."Toews said he hoped he had mellowed enough to lose his nickname. Despite the central casting look and demeanor of a straight man in a comedy routine, he insisted Captain Serious was an incomplete portrayal."I don't like it at all," he said. "Guys have known for a few years that's how they can push my buttons."Ryan Duncan, a teammate and roommate of Toews at the University of North Dakota, can vouch for him."I've seen him watch 'Family Guy' and laugh his face off," Duncan said. "With age, he's loosened up, and that's a good thing."As Toews has found perspective off the ice, his play on it has reached another level.He is a Hart Trophy contender this season, among the N.H.L.'s leaders in a litany of statistics. He is tied for the most even-strength goals (19), tied for second in face-offs won (559) and third in plus/minus rating (28).Toews has always shone brightest on the biggest stages. At the World Junior championships, he scored three straight goals in a shootout to propel his team to victory. He scored Team Canada's first goal against Team USA in the 2010 Olympic final. Perhaps his most memorable moment in a Blackhawks uniform was an incredible short-handed goal to force overtime in Game 7 of a 2011 first-round playoff series against Vancouver.On Tuesday night, Toews will attempt to create a new slate of magic moments. He fully expects to because, as he said, that is what captains do."It's the type of responsibility you want," he said. "You take pride in that."
The Nets did not give the impression they were a team playing its last game of the season on Monday. They prepared as if Game 6 in Chicago was inevitable. There was no fire-and-brimstone pregame speech by a veteran teammate to rouse emotions."The vibe around the room, you didn't have to," guard Joe Johnson said.Forward Reggie Evans said, "There was no sense of panic."This was surprising, given the way Game 4 had ended, with the Nets drifting ghostlike around the visitors' locker room on Saturday at United Center, having blown a double-digit lead in the fourth quarter and lost in three overtimes.The postgame mood was much lighter Monday, after a 110-91 victory over the Bulls in Game 5 at Barclays Center kept the Nets' season alive for at least three more days.Before the Nets could even think about coming back from a three-games-to-one deficit, they had to prove they could beat the Bulls just once to get the warm blood flowing again. It had been more than a week since the Nets won Game 1. In the subsequent three games, they had played poorly and lost, played really poorly and lost and played really well and lost.That last performance, squandering a 14-point lead with less than four minutes to go, was particularly damaging. Coach P. J. Carlesimo said Sunday that obviously it would test the Nets' resolve. The team decided not to practice, preferring to treat sore limbs and egos. By Monday's shootaround, the Nets said they had moved past it. They had no choice.And late Monday night, fighting back and forth until the final three minutes, when they pulled away, the Nets could celebrate a win."I would've been surprised if our guys didn't respond the way they did tonight," Carlesimo said. "It would've been out of character for them."Brook Lopez scored 28 points with 10 rebounds, continuing his impressive postseason stretch. He is averaging 23.6 points and 8 rebounds in the series, and he put in a complete effort Monday, shooting 11 of 20 from the field and 6 of 7 from the free-throw line."He had that look in his eye," point guard Deron Williams said. "He was rebounding the ball, scoring the ball. He's been great defensively for us all series. He was just a monster tonight."The Nets dominated the backboards, finishing with 54 points inside, 24 off offensive rebounds, and outrebounding the Bulls, 44-33. They finally seemed to get a handle on Carlos Boozer and Joakim Noah, who combined for only 21 points and 14 rebounds."That was the difference in the game, the rebounding," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "The rebounding was a big problem, and defensively, we've got to get it together."Chicago was also without its point guard, Kirk Hinrich, who was in a walking boot Monday after bruising his left calf in Game 4.Without Hinrich, who scored 18 points with 14 assists on Saturday, the Bulls started Nate Robinson, their sparkplug off the bench, a 5-foot-9 dervish who will undoubtedly be a haunting vision for the Nets if they lose the series. Robinson scored 23 points in the fourth quarter Saturday, and he was a pest again Monday, playing 44 minutes, scoring 20 points and adding 8 assists. But he did not lead his team back as he had Saturday.The Nets missed their first seven from beyond the arc before Joe Johnson and Gerald Wallace knocked down consecutive 3-pointers toward the end of the first half. Wallace pushed their lead to 8 points, and they took a 52-44 margin into halftime.Williams scored 13 points in the third quarter, increasing the lead to 77-73 entering the fourth. But the Bulls did not go quietly. Chicago shot 57.6 percent from the field in the second half, including 47.1 percent in the fourth, keeping pace with the Nets shot for shot."I told the team we had played 82 games to earn Game 5 and Game 7 in this building," Carlesimo said.The Nets' lead was 98-90 with less than three minutes remaining when Wallace drilled a 3-pointer from the corner. Moments later, he stole a pass from Luol Deng and brought it down court for a rousing one-handed slam dunk.The bench jumped to life. The Bulls called a timeout, but after logging so many minutes Saturday and fighting valiantly Monday, they seemed content to let the series head back to Chicago.The Nets will meet them there, the distaste from Saturday's loss washed clean."We didn't hold our heads down," Evans said. "We still got light at the end of the tunnel."
Bryan Bickell scored in overtime on a two-on-one rush, and the Chicago Blackhawks opened the playoffs on a winning note after dominating the regular season, beating the Minnesota Wild , 2-1, on Tuesday night.Marian Hossa also scored for host Chicago, and goalie Corey Crawford settled down after allowing a soft goal in the opening minutes. Game 2 is Friday at United Center.In a game tied since early in the second period, the Blackhawks won after Johnny Oduya chipped the puck off the boards to Viktor Stalberg on the right side. Stalberg then dished it to Bickell on the two-on-one rush, and he scored from in front 16 minutes 35 seconds into overtime.Big things are expected in Chicago after a spectacular regular season that included a record start and the team's first Presidents' Trophy since 1991.The Blackhawks are eyeing a run to the Stanley Cup for the second time in four years. They have been eliminated in the first round the past two seasons after beating Philadelphia for the championship in 2010.They seemingly caught a break before the game when Minnesota goalie Niklas Backstrom was scratched because of a leg injury sustained while reaching for a puck in the pregame warm-ups.But Josh Harding replaced him and held his own after being limited to five games following a multiple sclerosis diagnosis last summer. Harding made 35 saves.The Wild took the lead a little less than five minutes into the game when Cal Clutterbuck fooled Crawford with a soft shot from the left circle.Hossa tied it just over two minutes into the second period, streaking down the left side, getting behind Minnesota's Jonas Brodin and firing the puck between Harding's pads.BLUES 2, KINGS 1 Alex Steen stole the puck from goalie Jonathan Quick behind the net and scored a short-handed goal as St. Louis beat the defending Stanley Cup champion Los Angeles in Game 1 of their series. Steen scored unassisted on a backhander at 13:26 of overtime, less than a minute after Blues defenseman Kevin Shattenkirk was whistled for a double-minor high-sticking penalty when he cut Dustin Penner.Steen also scored on a rebound during a first-period power play, but Justin Williams got the tying goal for the Kings with 31.6 seconds left in regulation.DUCKS 3, RED WINGS 1 The 42-year-old Teemu Selanne, the N.H.L's oldest player, scored the tiebreaking power-play goal early in the third period, and Anaheim rolled to a Game 1 victory over visiting Detroit. Nick Bonino also scored a power-play goal, and Francois Beauchemin added an empty-netter as the second-seeded Ducks hung on in the final minutes of the opener.ROLSTON RETIRES Brian Rolston retired after a 17-year career in which he played for five teams and helped the Devils win their first Stanley Cup. Rolston, a 40-year-old forward, did not play this season after splitting time with the Islanders and the Boston Bruins in 2011-12.As a rookie, he helped the Devils win the Cup in the 1994-95 season. He also played for Colorado and Minnesota and completed his career with 342 goals and 419 assists.
ST. PAUL — It happened too fast. Josh Harding, the backup goalie for the Minnesota Wild , never saw starter Niklas Backstrom crumple to the ice during warm-ups Tuesday night. The Wild's captain, Mikko Koivu, yelled for Harding to take over as trainers helped Backstrom to the dressing room at the United Center in Chicago with an apparent left leg injury.There was no time for Harding to consider the moment: that he would become the first goaltender known to have multiple sclerosis to start an N.H.L. playoff game. Left wing Zach Parise skated up to Harding before the opening face-off to offer encouragement. Then Harding nearly stole Game 1 for the eighth-seeded Wild, stopping 35 of 37 shots against the top-seeded Blackhawks in a 2-1 overtime loss."He's had a hard year," Parise said. "We all know that. He's gone through a lot. I was just telling him it's his time now. I can imagine what's going through his mind at that time in that circumstance. But I thought he rose to the occasion and played great. He gave us a lot of chances to win."Harding, 28, announced in October that he had M.S. and spent more than two months on injured reserve while adjusting to medication used to manage his condition. Fatigue can be troublesome for those with M.S., but Harding reported no problems after playing all 76 minutes 35 seconds Tuesday in his first start since Jan. 30."I felt great last night and felt good today," Harding said Wednesday at the Xcel Energy Center, where the Wild will practice Thursday before returning to Chicago for Friday's Game 2. "I've got no worries about that."Wild Coach Mike Yeo was noncommittal about Backstrom's availability for Game 2, but said Harding could start multiple games if needed."I don't know what Backie's status is, but if it's Josh moving forward, we have a lot of confidence in him, too," Parise said.Harding played in five games this season, posting a 1-1 record and a 3.24 goals against average. His return to the active roster last week inspired a nervous group of players who nearly squandered a playoff berth before securing the last seed in their final game of the seasonHarding has been nominated for the Bill Masterton Memorial Trophy, awarded by the Professional Hockey Writers Association for perseverance, sportsmanship and dedication to hockey. Masterton also played in Minnesota, for the North Stars in 1968."He's been through an awful lot," Yeo said. "Not many people can understand what he's been through."Multiple sclerosis is a chronic, unpredictable and incurable disease that attacks the central nervous system. Symptoms and severity vary from person to person, said Dr. Adam Carpenter of the University of Minnesota's Department of Neurology and one of the state's leading M.S. specialists. (Carpenter has not treated Harding.) Among adults in their 20s and 30s who contract M.S., Carpenter said that women outnumber men by three to one.Harding, who signed a three-year, $5.7 million contract last summer, has revealed few details about his symptoms and treatment. He declined to be interviewed about M.S., and a Wild spokesman declared the subject off limits to the news media during the playoffs. Wild General Manager Chuck Fletcher also declined an interview request.A sore neck, dizziness, vision problems and numbness in his right leg drove Harding to seek medical attention last September, according to The Minneapolis Star Tribune. (Numbness that begins in a hand or foot and quickly spreads is a classic first symptom, Carpenter said.) A magnetic resonance imaging test revealed lesions on Harding's brain, a sign of M.S. Harding told the newspaper that it took him about a month before he informed teammates and Wild officials of his condition.Harding is believed to be the second goaltender to play in the N.H.L. after an M.S. diagnosis, following Jordan Sigalet, a career minor leaguer who made one 43-second appearance for the Boston Bruins in 2006. Sigalet said he texted Harding after learning he had M.S., and they stay in touch. Recently, Sigalet said they discussed medications and lifestyle tips.
CHICAGO — When the Nets shuffled off the United Center court Saturday, after a triple-overtime loss in Game 4 of their series with the Chicago Bulls , a return here seemed doubtful. A win here seemed improbable. A series win seemed like a laughable pipe dream.They flew back "feeling sorry for ourselves," point guard Deron Williams said. They were ridiculed in an interview by a Chicago newspaper columnist, who reported that the Bulls considered them "heartless." They had one foot out the door to summertime.But in part because of injury and illness, this first-round series has taken an abrupt turn. And after Thursday's 95-92 win over the Bulls, the Nets will head back to Brooklyn for Game 7, set for Saturday."We did," Williams said, "exactly what we wanted to do."The Nets forged back from a three-games-to-one series deficit to force a Game 7, the 29th time in N.B.A. history that a team has done so, according to the Elias Sports Bureau.They will try to become just the ninth of those teams to win the series.In truth, the Nets have not beaten the Bulls in this first-round series so much as outlasted them, forcing them into a battle on two fronts, basketball and bodily harm. Without Kirk Hinrich (who missed his second game with a calf injury) and Luol Deng (who was a late scratch because of an illness), the Bulls were significantly disadvantaged.Still, they battled with the Nets for 48 minutes, never giving an inch. The Nets grabbed a double-digit lead only once. The game could have gone either way in the fourth quarter."There is not a team in the league that plays harder than them," Nets Coach P. J. Carlesimo said.The Nets did not exactly make it easy on themselves. They missed 11 free throws and shot just 27.8 percent from the floor in the second half. They were outrebounded, 46-41, even though Chicago's big men were in foul trouble for most of the second half.But unlike in Game 4, when they coughed up a 14-point lead in the final three minutes, the Nets made just enough plays to hang on for a win.The Bulls trailed, 92-90, with 32 seconds left when Nate Robinson, who starred for Chicago in Game 4, missed a layup that would have tied the game. Then, with the Bulls trailing by 3 with 6.3 seconds remaining, Marco Belinelli missed an open 3-pointer.The Nets gave Chicago one last glimmer of hope as Joakim Noah forced a jump ball with Williams with three seconds left. But Joe Johnson managed to corral the tip and dribbled out the clock.The Nets exhaled — it was their first win over the Bulls in five tries at United Center this season — and salvaged some pride by evening up the hard-fought series.As low as the Nets were Sunday, after the Game 4 disappointment, they have maintained confidence in their ability to respond."I felt that we should," forward Gerald Wallace said. "We feel like we're the better team and we shouldn't have gone down, 3-1. They won three games in a row, and we can win three games in a row."It helped that the Bulls' injuries had continued piling up — before the game, Carlesimo described Chicago as a "medevac" unit — even before an illness ran through the locker room, affecting Deng, Robinson and Taj Gibson.Robinson and Gibson played Thursday — although Robinson was seen vomiting on the sideline — but Deng could not. Just before tipoff, Deng staggered out of the locker room, water bottle in hand, making his way to the arena exit.On Thursday, there were 15 lead changes in the first quarter, more than in the entire triple-overtime Game 4. The Nets exploited the luxury that they unequivocally hold over the Bulls at this point in the series: depth. The Nets' bench outscored the Bulls' reserves, 27-7, in the game.But Belinelli, who started for Deng, scored 22 points, stretching the Nets' defense, and Noah had 14 points and 15 rebounds. The Nets went into the fourth quarter clinging to a 75-71 lead.A 3-pointer by C. J. Watson pushed the lead to 81-73 with just under nine minutes remaining, but again the Bulls charged back. A jumper by Robinson cut it to 85-83 with about four minutes left.For the Nets, the scene seemed all-too-familiar: they were facing elimination because they could not contain Robinson in the final four minutes of regulation in Game 4, in which they had a double-digit lead. They sulked back to Brooklyn mentally extinguished, trailing by three games to one and seeming out of the series.But now the Nets have flipped the pressure back onto the Bulls, who will stagger into Barclays Center on Saturday to face a team that is soaring."We have a lot of heart," Carlesimo said. "We are a very resilient team. That is also true for the Bulls."The Nets have never won a playoff series (0-3) when trailing by three games to two, and the Bulls had won 13 consecutive Game 6s of series they were leading, dating to 1975.
Dan Haren had been waiting to prove he belonged in Washington's vaunted starting rotation.After winning his last two starts, Haren is feeling a little better, and that is mostly because he is not overthrowing his fastball."I'm not going to care about velocity anymore," he said. "I'm sick of that. It just gives me problems. I'm just going to be myself out there."Haren pitched eight sharp innings, Denard Span hit a two-run double, and the Washington Nationals beat the Braves, 3-1, in Atlanta on Thursday.Only three Braves runners have reached scoring position over two nights.Haren (3-3) gave up four hits and one run with one walk and four strikeouts.Haren shook off his 7.31 earned run average in three career starts at Turner Field to win consecutive starts for the first time since signing as a free agent with the Nationals last winter.Haren had the Braves guessing all night until Dan Uggla's fifth homer cut the lead to 3-1 with two out in the seventh.CARDINALS 6, BREWERS 5 Jake Westbrook allowed one run over six innings for his 100th career win as visiting St. Louis held off Milwaukee.Westbrook (2-1), came in with an 0.98 E.R.A., best in the majors. It increased to 1.10.Westbrook left with a 6-1 lead, but the Brewers scored two runs in the seventh, one in the eighth and one in the ninth.PHILLIES 7, MARLINS 2 Ryan Howard and Domonic Brown hit solo homers to back Kyle Kendrick in host Philadelphia's victory.Kendrick (3-1) allowed two runs and seven hits in seven innings to earn his ninth straight win against the Marlins, dating to May 28, 2010.Kendrick followed up a three-hitter against the Mets with his fifth consecutive solid start. He has outpitched Philadelphia's three aces — Cole Hamels, Roy Halladay and Cliff Lee — so far this season.PADRES 4, CUBS 2 Yonder Alonso's two-out fly ball to right field dropped in front of Julio Borbon for a run-scoring single that led to a four-run eighth inning in visiting San Diego's victory.Borbon entered at the start of the inning as a defensive replacement for Scott Hairston, who had put the Cubs ahead with a two-run homer in the seventh off Eric Stults. Borbon was making his third big-league appearance in right, all since joining the Cubs on April 19.Stults allowed two runs and seven hits in six and two-thirds innings. He had been 0-3 with a 7.24 E.R.A. at Wrigley Field.RED SOX 3, BLUE JAYS 1 Ryan Dempster won his second straight start, and Boston took advantage of a season-high 10 walks to beat host Toronto.Dempster (2-2) allowed one run and four hits in six innings. He walked three and struck out four, and he retired 10 of the final 11 batters he faced.Winless in his first four starts this season, Dempster posted his first victory by beating Houston a week ago.Boston improved its major league-best road record to 9-3 and won its seventh series in nine tries this season. The Red Sox have won eight of 10 and are 20-8 overall, their best start since opening 20-7 in 2002.WHITE SOX 3, RANGERS 1 Tyler Flowers hit a three-run homer, and visiting Chicago handed Texas its first series loss of the season.Flowers's drive just inside the foul pole in left field was the third straight hit after the Texas right-hander Justin Grimm (2-1) retired 10 in a row on the day he was named the American League rookie of the month.Hector Santiago allowed two hits in five and one-third innings for Chicago as he filled in for Jake Peavy, who was scratched because of back spasms.RAYS AND ROYALS POSTPONED The Tampa Bay Rays' game against the Royals in Kansas City, Mo., was postponed on Thursday after heavy rain turned to sleet and snow during the middle of the fourth inning.No makeup date has been set. The Rays were not scheduled to return to Kansas City this season.
ATLANTA — The Mets roughed up the National League's best bullpen. They handled the league's best hitter in a key situation, and they beat the best team in the East. So it took Manager Terry Collins no time at all when asked if this was the Mets' best win of the season."I think it is," Collins said.The Mets (12-15) beat the Braves, 7-5, at Turner Field on Friday with improbable late-game heroics, especially considering the way the Mets blew two games in Miami this week.Marlon Byrd homered off the left-hander Eric O'Flaherty, perhaps the best eighth-inning pitcher in the league, in the eighth to tie it, 4-4. In the ninth, with one out, David Wright belted a home run off one of baseball's best closers, Craig Kimbrel, to tie the game again, 5-5.In the 10th, the electric reserve outfielder Jordany Valdespin drew a two-out walk and stole second base. He hopped around as if he was going to steal third, but he did not have to. Ruben Tejada lashed a single to center to give the Mets a 6-5 lead. Daniel Murphy followed with another single, and it was 7-5.Jeurys Familia pitched a 1-2-3 inning in the 10th, and the Mets had a signature win."To be a good team you've got to win close games and you've got to win a majority of those extra inning games, so yeah, it felt good especially with what we went through in Miami," Wright said.The hitters delivered, and so did the Mets' bullpen. In the ninth, the Braves had the winning run on third in a 5-5 game with one out when the closer Bobby Parnell got Jordan Schafer to hit a weak fly ball to center field for the second out. Justin Upton, the Braves' No. 3 hitter and the April Player of the Month, grounded out to third to end the threat."I think speeding him up with the inside fastball on the previous pitch really helped me with him," Parnell said. "Then I threw him a get-me-over curveball that was down, and I think the speed difference was in my favor."The wind whipped the flag on top of the scoreboard as if Turner Field were Wrigley Field. Hot dog wrappers flew around the ballpark and fly balls were blown off course. The Mets had some fun right away with the gusts.Tejada, the game's lead off hitter, reached on a bloop double down the right-field line that carried away from second baseman Dan Uggla. After Daniel Murphy and David Wright made outs, John Buck clubbed his 10th home run of the season off Atlanta starter Mike Minor.In the second, Lucas Duda homered into the seats in left-center, and it was 3-0. Minor set down 18 straight before he left the game.Atlanta's relievers were 6-1 with a 1.94 earned run average before Byrd and Wright delivered their big blows."He's as dominant as anybody in the game, you just hope he makes a minor mistake or you don't have a chance," Wright said of Kimbrel."That's Captain America," Byrd said of Wright. "We just jump on his back offensively."
CHARLOTTE, N.C. — The surprise is not that Phil Mickelson is part-owner of a Kentucky-bred thoroughbred that once was considered a potential entrant in the Kentucky Derby . Mickelson, who enjoys placing wagers on major sporting events like the Super Bowl, grew up in San Diego, not far from the Del Mar racetrack. The surprise is that the horses never grabbed hold of Mickelson's imagination or wallet.The real horseman in the family is Mickelson's younger brother, Tim, the men's golf coach at Arizona State."I would be surprised if he knows the name of our horse," Mickelson's brother wrote in an e-mail.Under Review is the name of the colt, and the verdict is in on Mickelson's horse racing acumen: he has none."I'm trying to get into it," Mickelson said Friday after taking a two-stroke lead at the Wells Fargo Championship at Quail Hollow. "He and I are fractional owners in a horse, but I couldn't tell you the name of it."The horse, a gray son of Even the Score, won his first race, a $50,000 maiden claimer, last August in Arlington Park and finished second its next time out. Under Review has not raced since being injured in February, but all is not lost. Mickelson carded a five-under 67 for a 36-hole total of nine-under 135, two strokes ahead of Scott Gardiner (67), Nick Watney (70) and George McNeill (68)."If he had done that," Mickelson said, referring to Under Review's racing Saturday in Louisville, "I probably would be there, because I've never been to the Derby. I hear what a great environment it is, but I'm kind of happy it didn't work out because I like being right here."Gardiner, a 37-year-old tour rookie from Australia, made three cuts in his first 12 starts, so he seemed surprised as anybody to be two strokes off the lead after a second-round 67."Have you seen my résumé this year?" Gardiner joked.Asked what his expectations were coming into the tournament, Gardiner, who lives in Arkansas, his wife's home state, laughed and said, "Agony."Gardiner, the first player of Aboriginal descent to have full status on the PGA Tour, has not had a three-putt in two rounds, which is more than Rory McIlroy, the world No. 2, can say. McIlroy, the 2010 champion and the only top-10 player in the field, three-putted from 15 feet on his first hole Friday en route to a 71, which left him in a five-way tie for fifth at six under.Nobody's game has been more scrutinized than McIlroy's, since he changed equipment at the start of the year. Asked about his switch from Titleist to Nike again on Friday, he said, "I'm comfortable with my game."Mickelson, a winner in Phoenix, struggled toward the end of Thursday's round, his first competitive appearance since the Masters. He drained a 19-foot putt on the final hole to avoid a bogey-bogey finish. "I got just a little bit tired, I think," he said.Mickelson's game Friday was at its sharpest down the stretch."I know that I've been hitting it well, even though I haven't shown you the first 28 holes," he said. "And everything else feels pretty good. Short game, chipping putting, irons feel pretty good."Mickelson is the only player who has not missed a putt from inside 10 feet."I have to drive it better to be more aggressive to shoot lower this weekend," Mickelson said, "because I'm getting as much out of the round as I can."After Sergio García finished his round of 68 but before he signed his scorecard, he was accompanied by tour rules officials to the television compound. They reviewed how he marked his ball on the 17th green after someone watching the Golf Channel telecast called and questioned it.The rules officials accepted García's explanation that he marked his ball to the side to avoid stepping on the line of his playing partner, Bill Haas, but placed the ball as close as possible to the original spot. García, who is at four under for the tournament, said he would have accepted a penalty without complaint if it turned out he had gained any advantage."The way my dad brought me up in golf and everything, he showed me that the game is the biggest thing," García said.
Jimmy Connors showed signs of obsessive compulsive disorder and ocular motor sensory deficit as a child, long before he realized they were serious problems. He tried Gamblers Anonymous to curb a "fix" that still itches and took his grandmother's advice as a mantra: "Keep a little mystery about yourself in life."Connors has finally decided to let the real world into the sanctuary he created on and off a tennis court. "The Outsider," an autobiography to be published by HarperCollins on May 14, is an engrossing five-setter on clay, with intense exchanges and no tiebreakers.Connors, 60, makes few apologies for his aggressive style and behavior, although he does acknowledge several indiscretions, personal and professional. Not surprising, he also lines up friends and foes — some based on loyalties and others on perceptions that only someone with his East St. Louis/Belleville, Ill., background and take it-or-leave-it mentality could justify."The way I played tennis was very frequently selfish," he writes.He also borrows liberally from his overly protective mother, Gloria Connors, and a loving grandmother, Brenda Thompson, whom he called Two-Mom and who repeatedly told him, "You can get away with anything if you win." These strong, determined women, along with his wife, Patti, emerge as the foundations in Connors's often turbulent life. How many wives would stand for their husbands' squandering $70,000 in tennis winnings on one hand of blackjack?The Connors voice in this 401-page account can be brash and defiant, far different in tone and temperament from most traditional sports memoirs. But Connors is not Andre Agassi trying to chronicle a transformation; Connors even rifles a few crisp crosscourt passing shots at Agassi, whose 2009 confessional was No. 1 on the New York Times best-seller list. Agassi, Connors writes, "was never my kind of guy," labeling his substance-over-style turnabout "nothing but an act."Connors thrilled fans during his Hall of Fame career, which included 8 Grand Slam singles crowns, 109 tournament titles, 160 consecutive weeks as the No. 1 men's player in the world and countless comebacks against players like Bjorn Borg and John McEnroe, and Mikael Pernfors and Aaron Krickstein. Those fans will feel rewarded with his I-did-it-my-way theme. The unconditional love for his two children and six dogs (whom he calls "in-house shrinks"), and the ability to rebound from assorted injuries and family travails, may even surprise and touch readers.Cynics who tired of his vocal and physical confrontations, crotch grabs, antiestablishment rationale ("I guess I can't do things like everyone else," he writes) and profane indifference will simply say, "I told you so."That Connors now feels secure enough to tell us why he bounced balls so obsessively at the service line, repeatedly locked and unlocks doors and could not manage his mother's difficulties accepting his wife until well into their marriage is worthy background. Whether he would have ventured down such a personal memory lane if his mother were alive is a more sensitive question.Tennis prodigies often share the benefits and burdens of parents who push and prod them, sometimes to excess, in pursuit of greatness. Gloria Connors, who died in 2007, went beyond teaching her son the importance of preparation and footwork. She was involved in every aspect of his life, "and she paid the price for treading into that traditionally male-dominated territory by having some pretty aggressive criticism thrown at her by the tennis establishment and media," Connors writes.Acknowledging that he would sometimes yell at his mother to "get out of my life" for interfering in his "extracurricular" affairs, Connors still defends her, a sentimental thread that enlivens his mundane recitations of tournaments, his lawsuits and his recurring rejection of other authority figures.Professional tennis today bears little resemblance to what was essentially a wild west show during the Connors years. The emergence of the Open era in 1968 united amateurs and pros and brought fresh money, lively personalities, cultural diversity and a lawlessness that left the governing bodies playing catch-up to rein in under-the-table payments, drugs, gambling and outrageous court conduct. Connors and his band of brothers (Ilie Nastase, Vitas Gerulaitis, Guillermo Vilas, Yannick Noah, McEnroe and Borg, among others) delivered unscripted excitement and color to a staid, all-white upper-class domain.Connors captures this public fascination, recalling a one-minute phone conversation with the actress Marlene Dietrich, who spotted him at her hotel in Paris and then had a framed photograph with a racy six-word inscription delivered to his room.Nastase, for all his much-publicized histrionics on the court, emerges as one of Connors's closest confidants. Connors devotes a chapter to Gerulaitis and even blames himself for letting Gerulaitis leave a senior tour event in Seattle in 1994 for a charity appearance on Long Island, where he died of accidental carbon monoxide poisoning at 40.He also recalls the ballyhooed 1974 Wimbledon "love double," in which he and his fiancée at the time, Chris Evert, won the singles titles. He also discusses issues in the relationship that may have contributed to their breakup."Can two No. 1s exist in the same family?" Connors writes. "It wouldn't have worked for us, and it was better that we figured it out early on."Is Connors among the top 10 men's players in tennis history? With the quality and longevity of his game, consistently strong performances in Grand Slam events, a record number of singles titles and an .817 winning percentage in the Open era, he belongs in the conversation.Like the individualists Humphrey Bogart, Frank Sinatra, Pete Rose and Chuck Berry, Connors was authentic. The book reflects that swagger, as do the lyrics to a classic Berry tune, "Johnny B. Goode."His mother told him, "Someday you will be a man,And you will be the leader of a big old band."
TORONTO — George W. Bush was in his first term as president. Twitter was two years from appearing. The last time the Maple Leafs hosted a Stanley Cup playoff game was May 4, 2004.That drought ended Monday when the Leafs met the Boston Bruins in Game 3 of their Eastern Conference quarterfinal series.The first "Go Leafs Go" chant began before the teams' pregame skate. The usually late-arriving fans filled their seats well before the first puck was dropped.But they went home disappointed after the Bruins broke away with three second-period goals in a 5-2 victory that put Boston ahead in the series, two games to one. Bruins goaltender Tuukka Rask, whom Toronto traded to Boston, led the way with 45 saves, and David Krejci had a goal and two assists in front of a crowd announced at 19,746.Jaromir Jagr assisted on Boston's second goal, by Rich Peverley, tying Brett Hull for sixth in career playoff points with 190."There was a lot of energy in the building; our fans were unbelievable," Toronto defenseman Dion Phaneuf said. "We obviously made some mistakes that were costly, but we've got to move forward now. It's a long series, and this is one game that we move on from."Playoff tickets, a hot commodity in a city that has not won a Stanley Cup since 1967, went on sale April 25 and were all sold in 45 minutes.RED WINGS 3, DUCKS 2 Damien Brunner scored with 4 minutes 50 seconds left in overtime as host Detroit evened its series against Anaheim at two games apiece.Defenseman Jakub Kindl started the winning sequence, passing the puck from behind Detroit's net up the ice to Joakim Andersson. He tried to connect with his teammate Gustav Nyquist, but Anaheim goalie Jonas Hiller away the puck away. Brunner, in his first N.H.L. season, was in perfect position in front of the net and swatted the puck in.The Red Wings' Pavel Datsyuk tied the score, 2-2, with 6:33 left in regulation.Hiller, who shut out Detroit in Game 3, had 46 saves. (AP)KINGS 4, BLUES 3 At Los Angeles, Anze Kopitar tied it with 12:46 to play, Justin Williams tipped home the go-ahead goal 76 seconds later, and the  Kings evened their first-round series with St. Louis at 2-2.Jeff Carter and Dustin Penner also scored for the defending Stanley Cup champions. They erased an early two-goal deficit and a third-period deficit to earn their ninth consecutive home victory since March 23. Jonathan Quick made 19 saves.T.J. Oshie scored his first two playoff goals for the Blues, who had the Kings on the brink of serious trouble before Kopitar and Williams beat Brian Elliott, who stopped 25 shots.Game 5 is Wednesday in St. Louis, with Game 6 back at Staples Center on Friday. (AP)GAME AT DODGER STADIUM The N.H.L. said the Los Angeles Kings would host the Anaheim Ducks on Jan. 25 at Dodger Stadium. The league has not played an outdoor game so far south or in California, but it was confident that the ice-making technology could meet N.H.L. standards.The league is planning several outdoor games for next season, seeking to capitalize on the popularity of the annual Winter Classic on New Year's Day. The Pittsburgh Penguins and the Chicago Blackhawks will meet at Soldier Field on March 1, while Toronto and Detroit will meet in the Winter Classic at Michigan Stadium in Ann Arbor. (AP)CALDER FINALISTS Montreal Canadiens right wing Brendan Gallagher, Florida Panthers center Jonathan Huberdeau and Chicago Blackhawks left wing Brandon Saad are the three finalists for the Calder Trophy, given to the league's top rookie. (AP)
No one had to interpret the situation for Chris Kluwe, the opinionated Minnesota Vikings punter. Kluwe, who gained national attention last fall for his support of same-sex marriage , figured his time in Minnesota was coming to an end when the Vikings chose Jeff Locke, a U.C.L.A. punter/kicker, in the fifth round of the N.F.L. draft.It did Monday, when the Vikings placed Kluwe, 31, on no-recall waivers. Kluwe asked General Manager Rick Spielman last week to release him quickly if the team preferred Locke."You generally don't take a punter in the fifth round unless that's the guy you want to go with," Kluwe said Monday in telephone interview after meeting separately with Spielman and Coach Leslie Frazier. "My perspective is, if that's the direction the team wants to go, fine. Just give me the courtesy of letting me try to find a job somewhere else."Kluwe said Spielman told him the team chose Locke strictly for football reasons. Spielman said the same thing to reporters after drafting Locke."I have no issues if Chris Kluwe wants to express his opinion; that's his right, that's his freedom of speech," Spielman said.Asked whether he believed Spielman, Kluwe said: "I'm not in those meetings. I don't know what's said. That's coaches and management. All I can do is go out and punt to the best in my ability and trust in the body of work I compiled over the years."Locke was an all-Pacific-12 pick last season and a semifinalist for the Ray Guy Award, given to the country's top punter. Though Kluwe's career 44.4-yard gross average and 198 punts inside the 20-yard line are Vikings records, his salary and uneven performance last season (he was ranked 17th in the league) left him vulnerable. He finished 22nd in gross average (45.0) and 31st in punts inside the 20 (18).Kluwe, who had off-season knee surgery last January, was due to make $1.45 million in the final year of a seven-year, $8.735 million deal. Choosing Locke saves the Vikings about $1 million.An iconoclastic Californian, Kluwe developed a modest local following as a video-game enthusiast, a Twitter savant and the bass player in a grunge-rock band, Tripping Icarus.His profile changed drastically last fall when Baltimore Ravens linebacker Brendon Ayanbadejo publicly supported a proposed Maryland state constitutional amendment legalizing same-sex marriage. When Kluwe learned that a Maryland state delegate, Emmett C. Burns Jr., wrote the Ravens owner Steve Bisciotti asking him to silence Ayanbadejo, Kluwe criticized Burns in a letter sprinkled with profanity that was published on the Web site Deadspin.Kluwe campaigned against a proposed Minnesota state amendment that would have prohibited same-sex marriage. The amendment was voted down last November. Coincidently, both Kluwe and Ayanbadejo, 36, are out of work; the Ravens released Ayanbadejo two months ago. Kluwe wonders whether that might discourage other N.F.L. players from speaking out on issues."It's really going to depend on whether we are able to find work," he said. "If we're not, then people are probably going to draw the logical conclusion. That will happen. I would hope the N.F.L. isn't an organization that will allow something like that to happen."Eventually, Kluwe's outspokenness irritated the Vikings special teams coach Mike Priefer, who rebuked Kluwe after the league fined Kluwe $5,250 for wearing a note supporting Guy, a former Oakland Raiders punter, for the Hall of Fame during a Dec. 9 game against Chicago.Kluwe, who plans to return to Minnesota to be the grand marshal in the annual Twin Cities Gay Pride parade next month, says he does not regret his public support for same-sex marriage and political issues."To me, while I love being able to play football, there are things in life that matter more than a child's game," he said. "When you have an opportunity to make an impact and help people's lives, then I think that's something you should do, because it makes the world a better place."In a statement, Spielman said: "Chris has meant a great deal to the Vikings both on and off the field in his eight seasons here. He contributed to many victories, and we wish Chris and his family the best and thank him for his contributions to the Vikings organization."
In a little more than a month, he has gained the confidence of Coach John Tortorella, whose confidence is not won easily. In Game 2 of the Rangers' playoff series against the Washington Capitals, Moore was given the responsibility of helping to shut down the Capitals' second line, and he succeeded. In Monday's vital 4-3 victory in Game 3, he was anointed a power-play quarterback, and the power play awoke.Not bad for a second-year N.H.L. player considered an afterthought in the April 3 trade that also brought Derick Brassard and Derek Dorsett from the Columbus Blue Jackets for Marian Gaborik."I'm not trying to look back too much, but I think I've come a long way, and I think confidence is a big thing, especially for such a young player," Moore, 22, said after practice Tuesday. "Every day, I'm getting more and more comfortable. I've been fortunate with the opportunities I've gotten."Moore did not score on Monday, but he played the point on the first power-play unit and contributed three of the Rangers' 11 power-play shots on goal. Of the 10 minutes 8 seconds the Rangers spent on the power play, Moore played 5:37. He said he had never been given that responsibility at the N.H.L. level."To get a chance like that is huge for me," Moore saidAt even strength, he helped create Arron Asham's goal that gave the Rangers a 3-2 lead early in the third period. He stepped up about 15 feet from the blue line, beat the Capitals' Joel Ward to a 50-50 puck along the sideboards and kept play in the Washington end, leading to Asham's goal. It was an instinctive play that carried some risk."If I miss, it's trouble the other way — but again, it's playing with your instincts and just playing the game you've been playing your whole life," said Moore, who grew up in Winnetka, Ill. "I'm certainly not trying to take chances or gambling out there. I just made a read where I felt I could get there, and fortunately enough, I was able to keep it in."Moore is starting to look like a second coming of Ryan McDonagh, a throw-in in the 2009 Scott Gomez trade who has turned out to be a Rangers gem.Columbus made Moore a first-round pick in 2009 after he excelled for two seasons at the junior level with the Chicago Steel of the United States Hockey League. He moved on to a year with the Kitchener Rangers in the Ontario Hockey League, where he learned to run the power play, but struggled with poor plus-minus marks in one season with Columbus's American Hockey League farm club in Springfield, Mass., and last season with the Blue Jackets.This season with Springfield and Columbus, he improved but was still used sparingly. Then he was traded to the Rangers."In Columbus, there was a situation where I was working as hard as I could, but for one reason or another, I wasn't getting the opportunities," he said. "Here, I just came in with an open mind and I felt like I've gotten better every day. They've given me opportunities, and I've really tried to run with them."Brassard, who had a goal and two assists Monday, referred to Moore as "a super player.""When he got here, I was hoping they'd give him his chance," Brassard said, "because I know he's a really good kid and he works really hard. I was seeing all this talent in Columbus, but he was not playing a lot."Tortorella said Tuesday he was especially impressed with Moore's "quick thoughts, quick reads" on defense.For Moore, it is all new and exciting."I never played playoff hockey in the N.H.L.," he said, adding that the scene at Madison Square Garden on Monday with the fans "going bananas and waving those T-shirts" gave him goose bumps."Every day, I'm more and more comfortable," Moore said. "As a young guy, I have to make sure I'm taking a deep breath and relaxing and taking it all in."Rick Nash did not participate in Tuesday's optional practice, taking what the Rangers called a maintenance day. Nash limped to the dressing room Monday after trying to hit Capitals defenseman Mike Green into the end boards with a couple of seconds left in the second period. Nash missed Green and crashed into the boards, leading with his right knee. But Nash played a regular shift in the third period. ... Darroll Powe also did not practice. He left Monday's game in the first period with an undisclosed injury, believed to be his second concussion of the season. Powe's place could be taken in Game 4 by Ryane Clowe, also recovering from an apparent concussion. On Tuesday, Clowe participated in his first full-contact practice since he was injured April 25.
Mets starter Jeremy Hefner has one of the most difficult tasks on his team: following Matt Harvey in the rotation. When Hefner takes the mound, often in front of much smaller crowds, the focus is still usually on the younger, more accomplished Harvey.Hefner is almost always in his teammate's shadow. In the moments leading to Hefner's start Wednesday — an eventual 6-3 loss to the Chicago White Sox at Citi Field — reporters crammed near Hefner's locker to speak to his neighbor Harvey about the one-hit gem on Tuesday night. Any hopes that Hefner could quietly study his scouting report were dashed.There are times when reporters who wait to speak with Harvey envelop the entire area around Hefner's locker, and he has to wait until Harvey finishes his interviews so he can pass through. The crowd is never quite as big when Hefner speaks, although he is friendly, articulate and analytical. He can describe why he did or did not succeed in a much better and more honest way than most major leaguers. But he will not get points for being camera friendly.No, Hefner is not Harvey, and can only be himself. It is yet to be determined whether that is good enough to be in a major league rotation.Every outing for Hefner is seemingly another opportunity to prove he belongs in the majors. Hefner's six-inning, four-run performance Wednesday — which raised his earned run average to 4.63 — will again provide ammunition to those asking the Mets to promote the top prospect Zack Wheeler from Class AAA Las Vegas."Bottom line, though, I'm tired of losing," Hefner said. "It's frustrating. I need to get better, and I need to make better pitches."Realistically, Hefner's hold on the rotation spot is tenuous, especially with Wheeler starting to pitch well. But after struggling in the early part of the year (nine runs in 13 innings over his first three starts), Hefner had strung together strong consecutive starts, against the Los Angeles Dodgers and the Miami Marlins. In his past three outings, Hefner has allowed seven earned runs in 21 innings."If Hef continues to pitch the way he has the last three starts, we're going to be O.K.," Collins said. "I thought he pitched fine. He didn't let the game get out of control. That's all you can ask of a starting pitcher."Hefner's three-run third inning Wednesday could reflect poorly on him, although he did not pitch poorly. Neither of the first two batters to reach base in that inning hit the ball out of the infield. The hardest-hit ball was Alex Rios's double to right-center field, which scored Alejandro De Aza to give the White Sox a 2-1 lead. Third baseman Conor Gillaspie followed with a bloop double to center field, which scored two more runs. Without having struggled too badly, Hefner found himself trailing by 4-1.But that will be of little consolation for Hefner because the results are what will ultimately matter for him. He will not get points for moral victories."Those cheap hits can be averted sometimes," Hefner said. "Sometimes they're going to happen. But I needed to sequence my pitches better tonight and avoid those hits. I didn't pitch inside effectively enough today. That enabled them to lean out over the plate a little bit."Regardless of how Hefner pitched, the Mets' offense, one night removed from being unable to provide Harvey with even one run for a win, was once again tamed by a Chicago starter. This time, the former Cy Young Award winner Jake Peavy, who allowed one run in six and two-thirds innings, proved almost untouchable.Peavy is no longer the hard-throwing ace who racked up strikeouts with the San Diego Padres. Instead, Peavy, who had shoulder surgery two years ago, relies on guile. His fastball goes only a tick faster than 90 miles per hour. When he misses with location, he is susceptible to the home run. Peavy's lone major mistake in the early part of the game was sent into the right-field upper deck by Mets left fielder Lucas Duda. That tied the score at 1-1.But, in the end, the Mets scored only one run in 132/3 innings against White Sox starters. In that sense, Hefner was like Harvey. Neither had much run support.
The Philadelphia Phillies ' Roy Halladay will have arthroscopic surgery to repair a bone spur in his right shoulder.On the 15-day disabled list because of inflammation in his throwing shoulder, Halladay, a two-time Cy Young Award winner, met with Dr. Lewis Yocum in Los Angeles on Tuesday."They're going to go in and clean up the bone spur, clean up the rotator cuff and the labrum, try and keep that as uninvasive as possible," Halladay said Wednesday.A 35-year-old right-hander, Halladay is 2-4 with an 8.65 earned run average this season. He missed nearly two months last year because of a strained back muscle. Even if he returns this year, Halladay figures to miss much of the season.GIANTS 4, PHILLIES 3 Andres Torres lined a game-ending single to right field with two outs in the 10th inning, lifting host San Francisco to a victory against Philadelphia to avoid a sweep. Javier Lopez (1-0) pitched the 10th for the win after Sergio Romo blew his second save in 14 opportunities.CARDINALS 5, CUBS 4 Carlos Beltran and Jon Jay drove in two runs apiece, and St. Louis capped an impressive trip with a victory at Wrigley Field.BRAVES 7, REDS 2 Dan Uggla hit a pair of solo homers and Juan Francisco added his first career grand slam as Atlanta won in Cincinnati.PADRES 1, MARLINS 0 Jason Marquis outpitched Ricky Nolasco, Yonder Alonso had a sacrifice fly in the sixth inning, and host San Diego beat Miami to complete a three-game sweep.RANGERS 4, BREWERS 1 Derek Holland allowed one run over seven shaky innings, and Texas benefited from two Milwaukee base-running blunders to secure a road victory. Holland yielded 10 hits, but he escaped with the help of some sloppy base running by the Brewers, who had a runner thrown out at the plate to end the third and another thrown out at third base in the sixth.NATIONALS 3 TIGERS 1 Bryce Harper hit a solo homer and drove in another run with a sacrifice fly, Jordan Zimmermann won his National League-leading sixth game, and host Washington beat Detroit. Denard Span added a triple and a single for Washington, which has won five of six.MARINERS 2, PIRATES 1 Felix Hernandez scattered six hits and Jesus Montero broke a tie with a solo home run in the seventh inning off A. J. Burnett to help Seattle win in Pittsburgh.INDIANS 4, ATHLETICS 3 What appeared to be a game-tying homer by Oakland's Adam Rosales was ruled a double by umpires in the ninth inning, and Cleveland held on to win at home.Rosales sent a drive off Indians closer Chris Perez that looked as if it cleared the left-field wall. The second-base umpire Angel Hernandez called it a double, and the crew concurred after leaving the field to review the videotape. When the umpires returned and told Rosales to stay at second, A's Manager Bob Melvin sprinted onto the field and was immediately ejected.Television replays appeared to show the ball clearing the yellow stripe and hitting a metal railing above the 19-foot high wall.Perez wound up loading the bases before getting the final out as the Indians won for the ninth time in 10 games.TWINS 15, RED SOX 8 Pedro Florimon had a solo homer and a two-run double in Minnesota's seven-run second inning, which carried the Twins to a lopsided victory in Boston. David Ortiz went 0 for 5 with two strikeouts and three groundouts to snap his 27-game hitting streak, dating to last season.ORIOLES 5, ROYALS 3 J. J. Hardy homered, Chris Tillman won his third straight start and host Baltimore took advantage of three errors by Kansas City. Manny Machado scored a run and hit a run-scoring single for the Orioles, who won their fourth consecutive game.ASTROS 3, ANGELS 1 Bud Norris pitched into the ninth inning and Chris Carter homered for the second straight game to help lift host Houston. The Angels dropped to 4-13 on the road.RAYS 10, BLUE JAYS 4 Matt Moore won his sixth straight decision to start the season, Evan Longoria drove in three runs, and host Tampa Bay defeated Toronto.OAKLAND'S CROWDED D.L. The Oakland Athletics placed outfielder Josh Reddick on the 15-day disabled list with a sprained right wrist. He joined center fielders Coco Crisp (hamstring) and Chris Young (quadriceps). The A's have seven players on the disabled list and have used the D.L. nine times in just over a month."We never expected to have three of our outfielders on the D.L. at the same time," Manager Bob Melvin said.HUMBER OUT OF ROTATION The Houston Astros have moved the struggling starter Philip Humber out of the rotation and into the bullpen. Just a year removed from pitching the 21st perfect game in major league history, Humber is 0-7 with an 8.82 E.R.A. Erik Bedard, who was moved into the bullpen after his last start on May 1, will return to the rotation to start on Saturday.SURGERY FOR ORIOLE Orioles second baseman Brian Roberts will have surgery on his right hamstring, a procedure that will add an extra six weeks to his time on the disabled list. Roberts was placed on the D.L. with a strained right hamstring on April 5. Unsatisfied with his recovery, Roberts saw Dr. Daniel Cooper in Dallas for a second opinion. After the consultation, Roberts agreed to have surgery.
Tomas Vokoun stopped 31 shots in his first playoff start in six years, and the host Pittsburgh Penguins routed the Islanders , 4-0, on Thursday night in Game 5 of their first-round playoff series.Sidney Crosby, Tyler Kennedy and Douglas Murray scored during a seven-minute stretch in the second period, and Kris Letang added a power-play goal in the third as Pittsburgh moved a step closer to advancing. The Penguins lead the series, three games to two. Game 6 is Saturday at Nassau Coliseum.Evgeni Nabokov made 23 saves for the Islanders, but he also gave up breakaway goals to Crosby and Kennedy and botched a lazy wrist shot from Murray that gave the Penguins all the offense they needed."They played harder than us," Islanders Coach Jack Capuano said. "The better team won tonight. They deserved the hockey game."Vokoun was thrust into the lineup after Pittsburgh Coach Dan Bylsma benched Marc-Andre Fleury, who had started 79 straight postseason games but struggled in a 6-4 loss in Game 4. Vokoun, 36, did not look intimidated as the Penguins restored a little order to a wide-open series."I was a little bit nervous the whole day; you wouldn't be human if you weren't," Vokoun said.The Islanders looked like the better team through much of the first four games, using their speed to keep the talented but somewhat plodding top-seeded Penguins on their heels.Bylsma's biggest change was inserting Vokoun in place of Fleury, but he also scratched defenseman Mark Eaton and forwards Jussi Jokinen and Tanner Glass in favor of the younger, quicker skaters Simon Despres, Joe Vitale and Kennedy.The Islanders controlled play for most of a scoreless first period before Kennedy — squeezed out of the rotation by the influx of veterans brought in at the trade deadline — broke through 7 minutes 25 seconds into the second.The play began in Pittsburgh's end before Letang hit Kennedy with a 80-foot stretch pass up the middle of the ice. Kennedy accepted the puck at the Islanders' blue line, then flipped a wrist shot over Nabokov's glove to give the Penguins the lead.The score seemed to rattle Nabokov. Murray loped in a wrist shot from the point that Nabokov tried to glove, only to have the puck slip out of his left hand, over his back and into the net.There was nothing fluky about Crosby's third goal of the series, which ranks among the more dazzling plays of his career. He took a pass from Jarome Iginla at center ice, then split Islanders defenders Lubomir Visnovsky and Thomas Hickey. Crosby crossed the blue line and poked the puck ahead as the defensemen closed in, lifting his stick before stepping through a pair of flailing poke checks.SENATORS 6, CANADIENS 1 Cory Conacher had two goals and Craig Anderson had 33 saves as visiting Ottawa won the first-round series, four games to one. The Senators are moving on for the first time since 2007, when they lost in the Stanley Cup finals to the Anaheim Ducks.Montreal was without its goaltender, Carey Price, who was out with a lower-body injury. Peter Budaj had 23 saves.BLACKHAWKS 5, WILD 1 Marian Hossa scored twice and Corey Crawford had 21 saves as host Chicago won the series, four games to one. The Blackhawks are moving on for the first time since their title run in 2010.
CHICAGO — The best player in the N.B.A. brought the ball across halfcourt. He was fouled. And then he was shoved — not lightly, but with two-handed force from a 6-foot-10-inch, 275-pound opponent.LeBron James went sprawling to the floor, sliding across the court after his second-quarter run-in with the Bulls' backup center, Nazr Mohammed. James sat on the United Center floor. He surveyed the scene, all eyes in the building waiting for his next move."I mean way too much to my teammates to retaliate," he said Friday night, sitting at his locker after the Heat's 104-94 win over the Chicago Bulls, which put them ahead in the Eastern Conference semifinal series, two games to one. He scratched his beard thoughtfully, looking every bit as cool as he did after the incident.He continued, "If Nazr Mohammed gets kicked out and I kicked out, they win."James was issued a technical foul for an elbow he looked to have delivered to Mohammed after the two came together, but Mohammed was the player ejected."I haven't been in a situation like that before," said James, who enjoyed the last laugh when the final buzzer sounded.It was not easy for the Heat, the East's top seed and winners of 66 games in the regular season. Nor was it clean. The short-handed Bulls posed a formidable and physical test. They battered the Heat two days after a Game 2 that featured 51 personal fouls — 9 of them technicals — as well as two ejections. That game was a blowout Heat win; this was a nip-and-tuck affair into the fourth quarter.But despite Chicago's best efforts to bully Miami, the Heat emerged triumphant from what felt as much like a 15-round prize fight as a basketball game.From the start, James was booed every time he touched the ball — never with more gusto than after Mohammed's push. Yet he delivered what turned out to be the game's biggest shot. After a Marco Belinelli 3-pointer closed the Heat's lead to 90-86 with two and a half minutes to play, James answered with a 3 from the top of the key. On Miami's next possession, Norris Cole nailed a 3 of his own. The Heat led by 96-88, and the exhausted Bulls were finished.James scored 25 points to go with seven assists and eight rebounds. He had just one turnover. Chris Bosh added 20 points and 19 rebounds, and Cole delivered off the bench, scoring 18 points and going 3 for 3 from 3-point range."Toughness isn't just built on throwing elbows after plays or something like that," Miami's Shane Battier said. "It's about making tough basketball plays. We have a bunch of guys who make those plays."Both teams played down any carry-over from the rough-and-tumble Game 2 in Miami, and this game began innocently enough. The Bulls scored the first 7 points and earned an early standing ovation from their home crowd. But before the first quarter was over, the placid start was a distant memory.Near the end of the quarter, after Chris Andersen fouled a driving Nate Robinson and the two lay sprawled on the floor, Joakim Noah shoved Andersen. Players from both teams rushed to the scene, and Noah was issued a technical. Still, it was an improvement from Game 2, when the first technical came 21 seconds into the game.A quarter later came Mohammed's push, when he appeared to track James from across the court and run right at him before he delivered the hard foul."From my angle, I just saw a guy basically flop," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau told reporters. "And I'm going to leave it at that."Mohammed said: "Sometimes you have to fight your instincts and do what's right. I'm disappointed that I didn't fight my instincts well enough tonight because I probably could have helped the team."Still, the Bulls hung with the Heat. The game was tied, 70-70, after three quarters.Chicago was again without its starting point guard, Kirk Hinrich, out with a left calf injury, and the All-Star forward Luol Deng, who is still recovering from complications stemming from a spinal tap. Derrick Rose watched the action in a suit from his customary seat on the bench.It was a rugged test for the Heat. They passed."We're focusing on playing our identity and being able to do that on the road in a tough environment," Coach Erik Spoelstra said before the game.Although he may not have predicted how tough the environment, his team did exactly that.
Adam Wainwright carried a no-hitter into the eighth inning and was one out from the St. Louis Cardinals ' second straight one-hitter over the suddenly punchless Colorado Rockies in a 3-0 victory Saturday.The visiting Rockies were hitless in 49 consecutive at-bats before Nolan Arenado lined a clean hit to center field with one out in the eighth. Eric Young led off Friday night's game with a broken-bat single off the rookie Shelby Miller, but the Rockies failed to put a runner on until Todd Helton walked with one out in the fifth inning a day later."I thought for sure he was going to throw a no-hitter," the 22-year-old Miller said of Wainwright's performance. "He was locked in. We both threw well, and his was exciting to watch, especially."PHILLIES 3, DIAMONDBACKS 1 Cliff Lee pitched seven scoreless innings and Jimmy Rollins drove in a pair of runs as visiting Philadelphia beat Arizona.Domonic Brown added a run-scoring single in the seventh for the Phillies.CUBS 8, NATIONALS 2 Dominant early, Washington starter Stephen Strasburg fell apart after one of Ryan Zimmerman's two errors against visiting Chicago and wound up dropping his fifth consecutive decision.GIANTS 10, BRAVES 1 Madison Bumgarner struck out a season-high 11 in seven innings, and host San Francisco routed Atlanta.DODGERS 7, MARLINS 1 Andre Ethier had four hits, and host Los Angeles snapped an eight-game overall losing streak with a victory over Miami.REDS 13, BREWERS 7 Jay Bruce homered and doubled twice as Cincinnati battered visiting Milwaukee. Six Reds drove in two runs each, including the starting pitcher Mat Latos (4-0).RAYS 8, PADRES 7 Evan Longoria hit a two-run homer with two outs in the bottom of the ninth inning off Padres closer Huston Street, rallying host Tampa Bay.BLUE JAYS 3, RED SOX 2 Adam Lind hit a tiebreaking homer off Boston closer Junichi Tazawa in the ninth to lift visiting Toronto. ANGELS 3, WHITE SOX 2 Mike Trout hit a two-run homer and Jerome Williams pitched into the seventh inning to help visiting Los Angeles beat Chicago.RANGERS 8, ASTROS 7 Adrian Beltre, Nelson Cruz and Lance Berkman all homered to back up a solid outing by Yu Darvish, and visiting Texas held on against Houston.TWINS 8, ORIOLES 5 Ryan Doumit homered, Joe Mauer and Justin Morneau each had three hits, and host Minnesota beat Baltimore.
That was his first mistake.Only after Mohammed, a 6-foot-10 reserve center for the Chicago Bulls, returned to the locker room at United Center and saw a video replay did he realize that the referee Joe Crawford had called a technical foul on the Miami Heat's LeBron James for shoving him to the court, and there was no need to jump up and shove James back — a move that got Mohammed ejected from Game 3 of the Eastern Conference semifinals."If I saw the tech, maybe that would have stopped me," Mohammed said. "I don't know. It just kind of happened."His second mistake was thinking he would walk away from the encounter with only a technical foul for retaliating against a four-time N.B.A. most valuable player."I don't think it warranted an ejection," Mohammed said. "It warranted a tech. It was just a foul so a guy don't start a break."The ejection, with 9 minutes 29 seconds to go in the first half, left the already undermanned Chicago Bulls with seven players. With the defending N.B.A. champion Heat determined to take back the home-court advantage they lost in Game 1, the night played out predictably. The Bulls tired down the stretch, and a tie score going to the fourth quarter went Miami's way, 104-94, giving the Heat a 2-1 series lead.Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra called the altercation inconsequential. Not for the Bulls. The reaction of Mohammed, a 14-year veteran from Kentucky playing for his eighth N.B.A. team (the Knicks were his third), epitomized Chicago's mind-set in its surprising postseason run.Without Derrick Rose (left knee), Luol Deng (illness) and Kirk Hinrich (left calf), the Bulls were supposed to lose to the Nets in Game 7 of their Eastern Conference quarterfinal series at Barclays Center. But Chicago won, 99-93, then bounced up and stunned the Heat in Game 1 in Miami, 93-86.The havoc of Game 2 — nine technical fouls, two ejections and one flagrant foul — showed that although the Bulls lack Miami's scoring, firepower and depth, they will not be pushed around."We have guys who are fighters now," Chicago forward Taj Gibson said. "We're undermanned. Emotions are going to fly."The shoving match finished a series of physical altercations that seemed a natural continuation of Game 2. Miami's Chris Andersen fouled Bulls guard Nate Robinson hard late in the first quarter and landed on him. As Andersen rolled off Robinson, Chicago center Joakim Noah — one of those ejected from Game 2 — shoved Andersen. The referee David Guthrie spun Andersen away from the scrum.A few minutes later, Chicago forward Carlos Boozer had finished complaining about a noncall inside when James dribbled into the Miami forecourt. Mohammed tried to grab James to prevent a transition basket. James extended an arm to create space and sent Mohammed tumbling to the floor."I seen him hawking me down for a long time, and I seen him come with one of those club fouls, which was unnecessary," James said. "I basically just tried to protect myself, stand my ground."James reacted to the technical with disbelief, pointing his index fingers at his chest as if to say, who, me? That is when Mohammed went after him. James said that no opponent had ever shoved him as hard or as far."It definitely surprised me that he pushed me like that," James said.Was it a push, or an embellishment? "From my angle, I just saw a guy flop," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Leave it at that."Mohammed, 35, would not talk about it. "I'm on my way out of this league, and it's his league," he said of James. "You guys make the decision."Crawford assessed personal and technical fouls on Mohammed before ejecting him."I look at some of the plays that happened in the series already," Mohammed said. "Guys jumping on Nate's face. Guy tackling Marco Belinelli out of bounds. Guy takes out Nate, first play of the game. There's been a lot of plays that didn't get an ejection. A push shouldn't get an ejection."But it did. James had no interest in further escalation."If I get kicked out and Nazr Mohammed gets kicked out, they win," James said. "It's that simple."If it would have happened on the playground, it would have been a different story because I had a bunch of friends and a bunch of buddies that wouldn't have allowed that. I haven't been in a situation like that before. But I'm too cool. My mind is in another place right now."Without Mohammed to spell him, Noah (15 points and 11 rebounds) played 42 minutes before fouling out. Small forward Jimmy Butler (17 points) went the full 48 minutes for the fourth time in five games. Guards Belinelli and Robinson also logged 40-plus minutes for a team that had nothing left at the end."I'm disappointed in myself because I let my teammates down because I could have been out there to help," Mohammed said. "I'm disappointed in myself also because my son probably was watching the game. I don't want him to see that type of behavior on the court. I'm also disappointed that it warranted an ejection for something like a push when I got pushed down first."
CHICAGO — The Chicago Bulls want to play rough, and they have made no secret of it. They have turned their second-round Eastern Conference playoff series against the Miami Heat into a black-and-blue affair, defined by bumps, bruises, elbows and shoves.But if the series is to become a war of attrition, as the Bulls seem to hope it will, there is a key tactical advantage enjoyed by the Heat: reinforcements.The Heat have a roster chock-full of All-Stars and a rotation that goes nine deep. The Bulls, depleted by injury and illness, are surviving with their bench players from the regular season playing the roles of starters and reserves.The Bulls swingman Jimmy Butler understands what his team is up against, and he is the most extreme example of the task facing Chicago: trying to stave off the Heat, as well as exhaustion.Butler, who started only 20 games during the regular season, is the only player to have played an entire game this postseason. He has done it four times, including the Bulls' final two games against the Nets in the first round and Game 1 against the Heat. After getting to rest in Game 2, he was back on the court for 48 minutes in Friday's Game 3, a Heat victory that gave them a 2-1 series lead.The Bulls appear to have little choice, with Coach Tom Thibodeau being forced to lean heavily on whatever healthy bodies he has. He did not expect to have more options for Monday night's Game 4 at United Center."It makes it a lot easier to do it whenever you know you got guys that are supporting you," said Butler, who is averaging 12.9 points during the playoffs. "Like, 'It's O.K. that you're tired; we know you're going to fight through it.' "Luol Deng, recovering from complications from a spinal tap, has missed the last five games, and Kirk Hinrich, sidelined with a left calf injury, has missed the last six. Before going down, they were leading the Bulls in playoff minutes; Deng, at 44.8 per game, remains the league leader in the playoffs.In the five games without Deng and Hinrich, center Joakim Noah has posted minutes totals of 43, 41, 39, 32 and 42. Marco Belinelli, who averaged 25.8 minutes during the regular season, is up to 43 against Miami. Nate Robinson has made a similar jump, to 38.3 from 25.4.By contrast, the Heat's stars are carrying playoff workloads consistent with their minutes in the regular season. LeBron James (38.3 minutes per game in the playoffs), Dwyane Wade (33.0) and Chris Bosh (31.7) are each within two minutes of their regular-season averages. Wade and Bosh are even playing slightly fewer minutes in the playoffs.The situation was never more dire for the Bulls than in Game 3, when four of their starters eclipsed 40 minutes after Nazr Mohammed was ejected for shoving James. The bench was essentially reduced to one player, Taj Gibson, who played 22 minutes; the rest of the reserves played a total of 14 (3 minutes for Mohammed and 11 for Marquis Teague). The Heat outscored the Bulls by 10 points in the fourth quarter in their 104-94 win.Thibodeau put the heavy workloads in the context of the quest for a championship."That's normally what happens in the playoffs," he said. "Guys play extended minutes. Most rotations are short."To his point, 11 players are averaging more than 40 minutes in the postseason while none eclipsed that mark during the regular season. Still, the Bulls' case is different because Thibodeau was already predisposed to riding his top contributors. Deng led the league in minutes per game in each of the past two seasons. Noah was averaging around 40 minutes per game before he was told he had plantar fasciitis earlier this season.Against the Heat, the big minutes and the big defensive assignments have fallen to Butler. He has guarded James, making Butler's playing time that much more grueling."He does so much, and he has the ball in his hands a lot," Butler said. "He plays every position on the floor, to tell you the truth. Back to the basket, dribbling the ball up the floor. It's tough; it's fun."James, who scored 12 points in the fourth quarter of Game 3, said: "We're a deep team, and everyone is healthy. Whether they're playing 10 guys or 6, we feel like we continue to wear on teams."On Sunday afternoon, reports from the league office said Mohammed would not be suspended for his shove. But the league did fine Thibodeau $35,000 for his comments after Friday's game, in which he said he felt James flopped on the play.It was a rare moment this postseason when Chicago received good news on the availability of a player. With or without Mohammed, though, the Bulls' message remains the same."We have more than enough," Thibodeau said.
CHICAGO — A placard was laid on each seat at United Center before Game 4 on Monday night between the Chicago Bulls and the Miami Heat . In capital white letters on a red background, the words encapsulated these playoffs for the Bulls, an injury-riddled team that has made its way into the second round on grit and guile.Fans waved them during warm-ups and when the teams were introduced. They held them in their laps, ready to raise them again for much of the game. There were few chances. By the end of the Heat's 88-65 win that gave them a 3-1 series lead, the placards littered the arena's floor as Bulls fans trudged home after what could be the team's final home game.Game 5 will be Wednesday in Miami.The previous two games of the series featured eight Bulls technical fouls and three ejections, but Monday's contest was a much more staid affair. There were no elbows after the whistle nor highlight-worthy skirmishes. The only technical called on Chicago was for a three-second violation.After being bothered by the Bulls' hard-nosed attitude for much of the series, Miami was the aggressor from the outset in Game 4. The Bulls scored the first basket of the game but never led again after the Heat responded with an 11-0 run."They've been able to come out and jump on us," said LeBron James, who led the way for the Heat with 27 points, 8 assists and 7 rebounds. "It was good to see us reverse that."The Bulls looked little like the team that has repeatedly shaken off adversity and overcome long odds during this postseason. Chicago set playoff-record lows for points in a game, in a quarter (9 in the third), fewest field goals made (19) and lowest field-goal percentage (.257)."We didn't execute," center Joakim Noah said. "We didn't play well tonight. Our energy wasn't good. Mentally, we were a little drained because we weren't hitting shots."Luol Deng was active for the first time since having complications from a spinal tap after Game 5 against the Nets, but he did not play. Derrick Rose (knee) and Kirk Hinrich (calf) watched in street clothes from the bench.Without reinforcements, the catalysts from the Bulls' surprising run struggled.Nate Robinson, the 5-foot-9 point guard who electrified the league with several memorable playoff performances, shot 0 for 12 from the field and did not score."I just didn't make no shots tonight," Robinson said. "That's all."Jimmy Butler shot just 4 for 10 and scored 12 points. Noah, Chicago's energetic leader who played through plantar fasciitis for much of the second half of the season, scored 6 points and was 1 of 6 shooting."They're in a tough situation because of injuries and illnesses and whatever's going on," James said. "But that's not for us to worry about."Indeed, the Heat systematically built on their early lead. It was 21-15 after the first quarter and 44-33 by halftime. The Bulls hung tough for the first half with 10 offensive rebounds, but an inability to handle the Heat's pressure defense took its toll.Miami put the game out of reach in the third quarter. Leading by 46-39, the Heat reeled off a 15-3 run that separated them from the lethargic Bulls. Dwyane Wade scored his only 6 points of the game during the run, which also included two baskets from Udonis Haslem and a James layup. Norris Cole beat the buzzer with a running 3-pointer to push the lead to 19 points.Wade left the game briefly in the second quarter after a turnaround jumper that appeared to aggravate a bone bruise on his right knee. The injury has bothered him in the regular season and during the playoffs. He returned to play 29 minutes."Just a shooting pain," Wade said. "It hurt, but eventually I was able to come back, retape my knee and try to finish."Heat Coach Erik Spoelstra had spoken repeatedly about the need for his team to impose its identity in a series that before Game 4 had the Bulls' fingerprints all over it. Whether Monday night was the result of the Heat's presence, the Bulls' exhaustion or a bit of both does not matter. Chicago is on the brink of elimination.
Marco Estrada allowed three hits over seven innings, and visiting Milwaukee beat Pittsburgh, 5-1, Monday.Norichika Aoki went 3 for 5 with three runs batted in and two stolen bases for the Brewers. Jean Segura added three hits and three stolen bases as Milwaukee ran wild against the Pirates backup catcher Mike McKenry. The Brewers stole six bases in all and took advantage of three Pittsburgh errors.Estrada (3-2) bounced back from a rough start against St. Louis by striking out five and issuing one walk to remain unbeaten against the Pirates.CUBS 9, ROCKIES 1 Travis Wood pitched seven scoreless innings and host Chicago came within two outs of its first shutout since last August against Colorado.Alfonso Soriano homered for Chicago, which has won three straight for the second time this season.Wood (4-2) allowed two hits while striking out two in his major-league-leading eighth quality start.TIGERS 7, ASTROS 2 Andy Dirks hit his first career grand slam, part of a six-run fourth inning for host Detroit.Victor Martinez also homered for the Tigers. Anibal Sanchez (4-3) allowed two runs and six hits in seven innings for the Tigers. He struck out eight with one walk.
R. A. Dickey snapped a four-start winless streak, Melky Cabrera had four hits against his former team and the host Toronto Blue Jays beat the San Francisco Giants , 10-6, on Tuesday night.The Blue Jays, who have won three straight games for just the second time this season, had a season-high 18 hits.Dickey (3-5) struck out a season-high 10 in six innings, allowing 2 runs and 6 hits, to win for the first time since April 18."We did a lot of good things tonight," Dickey said. "That's what we've seen more and more of over the course of the last week and a half to two weeks. I certainly think it can be a jumping-off point for us."The Giants, who lead the National League West, came in having won 3 straight and 10 of 13.RAYS 5, RED SOX 3 Tampa Bay's Matt Moore pitched six strong innings and beat visiting Boston to remain unbeaten and claim a share of the major league lead in victories. Moore (7-0) yielded a double to Dustin Pedroia and a three-run homer to David Ortiz in the first, then limited the struggling Red Sox to one hit over the next five innings.TIGERS 6, ASTROS 2 Miguel Cabrera homered, Doug Fister pitched seven impressive innings and Andy Dirks hit a tiebreaking double to give the Tigers a lift for a second straight night in Detroit's home victory.WHITE SOX 4, TWINS 2 Adam Dunn and Dayan Viciedo homered to back another strong start from Jake Peavy and lead Chicago to a victory at Minnesota.PIRATES 4, BREWERS 3 Andrew McCutchen homered leading off the bottom of the 12th inning to lift Pittsburgh over Milwaukee.REDS 6, MARLINS 2 Homer Bailey pitched a six-hitter to earn his first victory since April 5, and Cincinnati extended its winning streak to four games with a win at Miami.ROCKIES 9, CUBS 4 Carlos Gonzalez homered twice and finished with a career-high five hits to lead the struggling Rockies to a victory in Chicago. PADRES 3, ORIOLES 2 Chris Denorfia and Everth Cabrera hit two-out R.B.I. singles off Jim Johnson in the ninth inning, and San Diego got a home run from Carlos Quentin in a victory at Baltimore.PHILLIES 6, INDIANS 2 Jonathan Pettibone pitched neatly into the seventh, Kevin Frandsen and Domonic Brown hit solo homers and Philadelphia won at home.DIVERSITY IMPROVEMENT While Major League Baseball teams improved racial diversity in hiring senior administrators, the employment of women is still lagging, according to the annual report by Richard Lapchick's Institute for Diversity and Ethics in Sports at the University of Central Florida.Racial diversity among senior team administrators improved to 19.9 percent from 17 percent."The most notable trends are that at a team level there was substantial improvement, and that hasn't been the case over the years," Lapchick said. "It's still significantly behind the major league offices in terms of percentage of people of color, but that we thought that was a really positive trend."M.L.B.'s central offices are 30.8 percent members of minority groups. Baseball's overall score of 92.5 points equaled its top mark in 2010, and racial hiring received an A for the fifth straight year. Gender hiring remained a C+.
Islanders forward Matt Moulson, Blackhawks forward Patrick Kane and Lightning forward Martin St. Louis are the three finalists for the NHL's Lady Byng Trophy, the league's sportsmanship award.St. Louis has already won the award twice (2010 and '11), and was a finalist two other times. The 37-year-old ranked second among NHL forwards in total time on ice, but was assessed just 14 penalty minutes.Moulson is a finalist for the second straight season. He had four penalty minutes in 47 games, tied with San Jose's Logan Couture for the fewest among the NHL's top 50 scorers.Kane is a Lady Byng finalist for the first time, after helping Chicago to a Presidents' Trophy. He played 47 games and averaged 20:03 of ice time, but had just eight penalty minutes.
CHICAGO — Two role players each came up with a big goal. The stars had a handful of key plays. The goalie made all the stops.Even gruff coach Joel Quenneville had to like this one.Johnny Oduya and Marcus Kruger scored in the third period, Corey Crawford made 20 saves and the Chicago Blackhawks beat the Detroit Red Wings 4-1 in the opener of their second-round playoff series Wednesday night."Much better from our prior series," Quenneville said. "I thought what we're talking about in our team game was in place. Had some pace, had some speed, zone time, and I thought everybody contributed."In the wake of Chicago's five-game victory over Minnesota in the first round, Quenneville talked about a higher level of intensity, and each of his biggest stars echoed his comments. The response was a dominant final two periods in the Blackhawks' first game in the Western Conference semifinals since they won the Stanley Cup in 2010.Marian Hossa had the opening goal in the first, and Patrick Sharp finished with an empty-netter and two assists to give him nine points in the postseason."I thought it was our best game of the playoffs, no question," Sharp said.Jimmy Howard had 38 stops in a terrific performance, but Detroit still lost to rival Chicago for the eighth straight time dating to last season."I think in the first it was pretty even, but then I think in the second and third they looked like they had a little more energy than we did," Red Wings captain Henrik Zetterberg said. "It's going to be nice to have a day off tomorrow and practice and then looking forward to Game 2."The series resumes on Saturday afternoon at the United Center.The 75th all-time playoff game between the Blackhawks and Red Wings was tied at 1 after two periods, and Howard made a great stop on a breakaway by Dave Bolland 4½ minutes into the third.Chicago kept working and went in front to stay on a heady play by Oduya. He drifted in from the point and sent Sharp's pass past Howard on the glove side with 12 minutes left."He sneaks in there, and it was a great play by Johnny," Sharp said. "I saw him pinching in, I felt like he was wide open, and he called for the puck."Kruger then jumped on a loose puck and sent a backhander into the upper right corner to make it 3-1. That was more than enough for Crawford, who caught a break when Damien Brunner's rebound attempt went off the crossbar and straight down before Brent Seabrook swept it away with about three minutes left."Sometimes you got to get some breaks," Crawford said. "Seabs came in there and he made a great play to clear it out."The opener of the 16th playoff series between the two Original Six teams was the first game for Chicago since it eliminated Minnesota last Thursday. Detroit closed out Anaheim with a 3-2 win in Game 7 on Sunday night, taking the final two games of the series against the second-seeded Ducks.Despite the long break, there was no sign of rust for the Blackhawks. The Red Wings skated right with Chicago at the start, but they couldn't keep up at the end of the game and coach Mike Babcock said they were looking forward to a day off."We're not trying to take anything away from them," he said. "They were better than us. The score tonight was more than fair as far as I'm concerned. They were better."The Blackhawks struck first in the first playoff game between the teams since Detroit won the 2009 Western Conference final. With Gustav Nyquist in the box for hooking, Sharp forced a turnover along the boards and Jonathan Toews sent the puck to Hossa, who one-timed it past Howard at 9:03.Detroit needed less than two minutes to respond, tying it when Brunner poked in a rebound for his third career playoff goal. The rookie center also contributed three assists in the first round against the Ducks.The Blackhawks killed off two power plays created by penalties on Andrew Shaw. They killed off another one when Nick Leddy was sent off for delay of game in the second period, making them a perfect 20 for 20 on the penalty kill in the postseason and sinking Detroit to 1 for 18 on power plays against Chicago, including the regular season."We know that we're a much better team than this," Red Wings defenseman Niklas Kronwall said. "The second and third period were not nearly good enough. We know we're better than this, so we have to find to get better here for Game 2."NOTES: It was the 800th game between the teams. ... Detroit F Justin Abdelkader was shaken up after he collided with Blackhawks D Michal Rozsival in the first period. He was helped to the bench after a few moments down on the ice, but eventually returned to the game. ... Blackhawks F Viktor Stalberg was a healthy scratch. Quenneville said it was a "coach's decision" and Stalberg could get back on the ice at any point. ... Toews and Pavel Datsyuk of the Red Wings joined Patrice Bergeron of the Boston Bruins as finalists for the Frank J. Selke Trophy as the NHL's best defensive forward. ... Chicago won eight of the previous 15 playoff series against Detroit.
CHICAGO — Matt Harvey won his fifth straight decision, allowing five hits in 7 1-3 innings and singling in the go-ahead run in the seventh to lead the New York Mets over the Chicago Cubs 3-2 Friday.Daniel Murphy and David Wright homered for the Mets, and right fielder Marlon Byrd preserved the lead by throwing out a runner at the plate in the eighth inning. The Mets won consecutive games for the first time since May 1 and 3.Harvey (5-0) won his first four starts of the year, then failed to get a decision in his next four starts.Chicago took a 2-1 lead in the first with three hits off Harvey, who had allowed just three first-inning hits this year.Startlin Castro singled, Anthony Rizzo doubled and Alfonso Soriano hit an RBI single to shortstop Ruben Tejada, who ranged behind second and bounced a catchable one-hop throw past first baseman Ike Davis for a throwing error as Rizzo came home.Nate Schierholtz lined to center, starting a streak in which Harvey retired 20 of 21 batters around Castro's one-out single in the third.Harvey gave both runs, struck out six and walked none as his ERA rose from 1.45 to 1.55. Scott Rice, Gregg Burke and Bobby Parnell combined for one-hit relief, with Parnell pitching a perfect ninth for his fifth save in seven chances.Edwin Jackson (1-6), coming off a victory at Washington on May 11, gave up three runs and seven hits in 6 2-3 innings.Wright's sixth homer of the season, on a 1-2 pitch, put the Mets ahead in the first. Murphy's opposite-field home run to left leading off the fourth tied the score at 2.Rick Ankiel doubled to right just over Schierholtz's glove with one out in the seventh. Harvey, at that point 2 for 18 at the plate this year, singled to left.Byrd preserved the lead in the eighth. Darwin Barney singled leading off and was sacrificed to second, and Rice relieved Harvey.David DeJesus singled sharply to right, and third-base coach David Bell sent Barney home. Byrd threw on the fly to catcher John Buck, and the ball beat Barney by about 15 feet. Barney didn't even bother to slide and slowed down as Buck applied the tag.NOTES: Cubs manager Dale Sveum would not put a date on the return of RHP Matt Garza to the starting rotation. Garza threw 75 pitches in six innings Thursday for Triple-A Iowa. Garza suffered a training camp lat muscle strain and has not pitched for the Cubs this season. "He did what we asked him to do," Sveum said. ... Davis ended an 0-for-24 slide with a sixth-inning single.
CHICAGO — For most of Wednesday's game against the Detroit Red Wings , Chicago Blackhawks goaltender Corey Crawford stood in his crease, watching the action on the other end of the ice. He tapped his stick against his blocker, then against a goal post. He shifted his weight from leg to leg. He skated in circles and took sips from his water bottle.Crawford faced only 12 shots through the first two periods and 21 over all. After the Blackhawks' 4-1 victory in Game 1 of their second-round playoff series, Crawford said of his night, "There wasn't much going on there."If the Blackhawks, winners of the Presidents' Trophy for the N.H.L.'s best regular-season record, make a run to the Stanley Cup, Crawford will almost certainly play a larger role than he did Wednesday, possibly beginning in Game 2 at United Center on Saturday afternoon.Crawford, in fact, may be the wild card for Chicago's championship aspirations. The Blackhawks are loaded with stars and playoff experience. But before the postseason, one of the few lingering questions about the team was Crawford, who had never won a playoff series until the Blackhawks' first-round defeat of the Minnesota Wild.During last year's first round, Crawford's play against the Phoenix Coyotes was roundly criticized after he allowed overtime goals in Games 3 and 4. Some perceived the goals as soft, and Crawford was blamed as the Blackhawks exited in the first round for the second consecutive season."Maybe he caught a couple unlucky breaks," right wing Patrick Kane said. "But he's been great all year for us. He's a big goaltender, takes up a lot of net, and it seems like they're tough to get by him when he's in there."During the regular season, Crawford was part of a highly effective tandem with Ray Emery. They combined to win the Jennings Trophy, given to the team that allowed the fewest goals. Crawford (19-5-5) and Emery (17-1-0) each posted a 1.94 goals against average.Emery sustained a groin injury in late April, eliminating any potential controversy over who would be in net for the playoffs. But Coach Joel Quenneville said the season-long competition had made Crawford better."It's been a real healthy situation for us this year," Quenneville said. "They complement one another. They both want to play. They both want to keep the net."Crawford earned the starting job with Chicago in 2010-11, his first full N.H.L. season, when he took over for the struggling Marty Turco. Crawford, then 25, was instrumental in the Blackhawks' push for the playoffs and made the All-Rookie team. After clinching the Western Conference's eighth seed on the final day of the season, Chicago nearly upset Vancouver in a seven-game first-round series, in large part because of Crawford's play.But last season, Crawford regressed and lost his job for long stretches to Emery. He allowed an average of 2.72 goals per game, up from 2.30 the previous season, and was shaky in the playoffs. Before this year, his postseason record was 5-8.Through six games in this year's playoffs, however, Crawford has backed up his stellar regular season. As of Thursday, he ranked second with a 1.27 goals against average in the postseason."The first year, I didn't know really what to expect going into the playoffs," Crawford said. "Not really sure what the pace would be like or how much faster it would be. Last year, I was able to settle in and had a little bit of experience. I feel even better this year."Now that he has earned a series victory, Crawford can move beyond the question that dogged him this season and in the run-up to the playoffs."Obviously you want to win that first one," he said.Although the Blackhawks have plenty of talent, the N.H.L. playoffs have been known to swing on the hot streak of one goaltender. Last year, Jonathan Quick was the star of the Los Angeles Kings' surprise run to the Stanley Cup. The year before that, Tim Thomas carried the Boston Bruins to a title.Crawford played down any additional pressure, saying, "You don't want to get trapped and think you have to go out there and have to be the hero."Regardless of his role, as a Game 1 stage prop or as a potential leading man, Crawford has earned the Blackhawks' faith."He's grown up and he's battled hard to get where he's at now," the captain Jonathan Toews said. "I think he's in a good place."
CHICAGO — The figurative spotlight that has trailed Matt Harvey from mound to mound this season followed him into the batter's box Friday at Wrigley Field.Harvey's Mets and the Chicago Cubs were tied, 2-2, in the top of the seventh inning. There were two outs and a man on second base, with the No. 9 spot, Harvey's spot, due up. Although Harvey threw his 92nd pitch of the game during the previous half-inning, it seemed obvious that Manager Terry Collins would let him hit. The outcome, considering Harvey's up-to-now charmed season, felt natural, too.Harvey sent a hard grounder between third base and shortstop that sent Rick Ankiel scampering home and propelled the Mets to a 3-2 victory. The win, their second straight, felt disproportionately important, considering they arrived in Chicago having lost 7 of their previous 10 games."It was easy," Collins said of the decision to bat Harvey. And it paid off."I think these are two big wins for us," Collins said, "especially the way we've played the last week."But around the Mets, there is always the fear that good things — like Thursday's victory — may not last. As good as Harvey has been this season, a question has loomed before each start: could this be the day he has a rough game?For a moment, it seemed this would. The Cubs came out swinging, tagging Harvey for three straight hits in the first inning and scoring two early runs. Harvey had given up more than a run in only two starts this season before Friday.Taking instruction from John Buck, his catcher, and Dan Warthen, his pitching coach, Harvey quickly returned to form, tearing through the Cubs' lineup. He retired 14 hitters in a row at one point, focusing on his off-speed pitches to turn the Cubs' aggression against them."It's minor adjustments you have to make, whether it's pitching them backwards a little bit or busting them off the plate a little bit," Harvey said. "Buck and Dan did a great job noticing that and letting me know so I could go out and keep switching things up."Harvey did not stockpile strikeouts, as he has done on other occasions, but he was efficient. He pitched seven and a third innings, allowing two runs, five hits and no walks, while getting six strikeouts."He's not your run-of-the-mill young pitcher," Collins said. "This guy has got some savvy, he's got great confidence and he knows how to pitch."And yet, all along, it remained unclear whether he would get the support to earn his first victory since April 19. In a stretch of four no-decisions, Harvey recorded a 1.98 earned run average as the Mets' offense slumbered.On Friday, the Mets — with Harvey's help — had just enough offense to win. David Wright gave Harvey an early lead when he hit a 93-mile-per-hour fastball from Edwin Jackson over the left-center-field wall in the first. And Daniel Murphy's swing retained its sparkling form, as evidenced when he lifted a low fastball from Jackson into the left-center-field stands to open the fourth inning and tie the score at 2-2.But, ultimately, it came down to Harvey. Ankiel started things when he drove a one-out double to the right-field wall in the seventh. One out later, Harvey took his turn against Jackson, and on a 1-1 count, he turned on a 92-m.p.h. fastball and skipped it into left field. With that, the digits in his batting average, .158, ascended above those in his E.R.A., 1.55."I just wanted to put it in play," said Harvey, who had struck out his previous at-bat.After carrying the Mets into the eighth, Harvey allowed a leadoff single and a sacrifice bunt and was pulled. He watched the game's last tense moments from the bench.Inheriting the man on second, reliever Scott Rice let David DeJesus smack a ball into right field that brought the runner, Darwin Barney, racing to the plate. But right fielder Marlon Byrd fired a missilelike throw home that beat Barney by several steps and preserved the Mets' lead."I got to it hard, fielded it cleanly, got both laces under my fingers and just let it go, right on line," Byrd said. Harvey joked that he owed Byrd a drink.Since DeJesus reached second on the throw, the threat did not dissolve until Greg Burke induced a soft grounder from Starlin Castro to end the inning. Bobby Parnell then pitched a clean ninth for the save, allowing the Mets to rave once more about Harvey, now the team's undisputed ace."You can't say it enough: this is a different animal," Collins said. "This guy is different."
CHICAGO — In case they weren't aware already, the Chicago Blackhawks now know they're going to have to earn it if they want to get past Detroit.The Red Wings hammered home that message on Saturday.Damien Brunner and Brendan Smith scored in the second period and Detroit beat the Blackhawks 4-1 in Game 2 to even their Western Conference semifinal series.It was a strong response by the Red Wings after Chicago handled them easily in the series opener, 4-1."We've got a real good club now," Detroit coach Mike Babcock said. "And we haven't been good all year. We've just gotten better."Their confidence got a big jolt after they knocked off the Presidents' Trophy winners and avoided falling into a deep hole. It was another big win by a team that finished seventh in the conference, only to knock off second-seeded Anaheim in the first round.Now, they're even with a team that's been rolling along all season and is eyeing its second Stanley Cup in four years."Both teams would be stupid if they thought they were going to come in here and either team win four straight," Chicago's Brent Seabrook said.Just as the Blackhawks did in Game 1, Detroit took control in the second period and put the game away in the third. Now, the Red Wings have a chance to take the lead when this series between Original Six rivals shifts to Detroit for Game 3 on Monday."Overall, I think we had more energy," the Red Wings' Henrik Zetterberg said. "We did a lot of the little things better than we did in Game 1 and when we got our chances we were able to put the puck in the net."Patrick Kane gave Chicago a 1-0 lead late in the first, but did things ever change after that.Brunner tied it when he deflected a wrist shot by Jakub Kindl early in the second, and Smith gave the Red Wings the lead when he scored off a feed from Zetterberg on a 3-on-1 late in the second.Johan Franzen made it 3-1 in the third when he fired a rising shot past Corey Crawford after a perfect pass from Jonathan Ericsson in the Detroit zone. And Valtteri Filppula closed out the scoring with 7:57 left in the game.That was enough for Jimmy Howard, who stopped 19 shots.Crawford made 26 saves for Chicago and played well at times even though things got out of hand down the stretch. When it was over, coach Joel Quenneville insisted his faith in his goalie hasn't wavered."Not at all," he said. "Across the board, we should all assume responsibility."The Red Wings were simply a step faster and were more physical in this one after the Blackhawks ran away from them in the opener."I think just by taking care of our own end first, making good plays, you end up playing a faster game that way," Smith said. "By taking away their speed, it helps out ours. You want to get a lot of contact on these types of teams, and it works out for us."The Blackhawks still struck first thanks to a lucky bounce after Detroit's Kyle Quincey sprawled out to block a pass across the slot by Patrick Sharp that was intended for Kane on a 2-on-1 rush. The puck bounced to a trailing Michal Handzus, who immediately fed it to a wide open Kane in the right slot. He fired it into the net at the 14:05 mark for a 1-0 lead and his first goal of the playoffs.About a minute later, with the Red Wings on a power play, Crawford made a nice save on Zetterberg before Pavel Datsyuk ripped a shot high off the right post.Detroit tied it early in the second when a wrist shot by Kindl from just inside the blue line deflected off Brunner and past a screened Crawford, who didn't even react as the puck went past him on the glove side.But Chicago's goalie had the fans chanting his name midway through the period with two great saves, stopping Zetterberg from the slot and sprawling out to foil Daniel Cleary on the rebound.The Red Wings took a 2-1 lead with 3:52 left in the second after Chicago's Niklas Hjalmarsson fell racing Zetterberg for a loose puck. Zetterberg then dished to Smith on a 2-on-1 rush for the go-ahead goal."He creates a lot of stuff, sometimes for both teams," Zetterberg said in a nod to Smith's struggles in Game 1.There weren't many mistakes by the Red Wings in this one. Other than Kane's goal, they contained the Blackhawks' stars and made it look easy over the final two periods."They kind of used our own style against us as far as holding onto the puck and keeping it away from us," Kane said.NOTES: LW Drew Miller was in the Red Wings' lineup for the first time since April 20. He had been sidelined by a broken bone in his right hand. ... F Viktor Stalberg was a healthy scratch for the Blackhawks, just as he was in Game 1. "I don't like changing too much, but we wanted to get (Dave Bolland) in our lineup," Quenneville said before the game. "It's comparable to what we've done during season. But we'll see. We can adapt and change at any moment." ... Quenneville on the early start: "I think the guys, once they get in, they don't mind playing in the afternoon."
ANAHEIM, Calif. — Jason Vargas scattered four hits through seven scoreless innings, Erick Aybar and Howie Kendrick each hit two-run doubles, and the Los Angeles Angels coaxed a pair of bases-loaded walks out of Jake Peavy in the fourth inning of a 6-2 victory over the Chicago White Sox on Sunday.Vargas (3-3) struck out six and walked three while helping the Angels gain a split of the four-game series. The middle of the Chicago lineup — Alex Rios, Adam Dunn and Paul Konerko — were a combined 0 for 8 with a walk against the left-hander, who posted his first victory in six career starts against the White Sox.Peavy (5-2) gave up four runs, four hits and five walks over six innings after going 4-0 with a 2.10 ERA in his previous five starts. The 2007 NL Cy Young winner is 0-4 with a 6.06 ERA in six career starts against the Angels.Rios drove in Chicago's first run with an eighth-inning double against Dane De La Rosa. It extended Rios' hitting streak to 14 games, eclipsing his previous best in 2006 with Toronto.Ernesto Frieri was called in to protect a 4-1 lead, trying to get his second four-out save in two days.The right-hander walked three batters in the ninth this time before notching his ninth save in 10 attempts overall. Frieri gave up a sacrifice fly by Alejandro De Aza before retiring Alexei Ramirez on a flyball to end it.Kendrick gave Frieri a couple of insurance runs in the eighth with his double inside third base against rookie Brian Omogrosso.Los Angeles opened the scoring in the third when Chris Iannetta drew a leadoff walk, J.B. Shuck followed with a single and Aybar drove both of them in with his double to right before he was erased in a rundown.Peavy, who threw 83 of his 117 pitches in the first four innings, walked four more batters in the fourth — including Iannetta and Aybar with the bases loaded — and the Angels increased the margin to 4-0. Two innings later, Peavy struck out the side on 18 pitches.Iannetta's second walk was his 14th in a span of 33 plate appearances, including four on Saturday. He has 27 overall, just two fewer than he had last season in 221 plate appearances. His career high is 70, with Colorado in 2011.NOTES: Peavy had issued eight walks in 45 2-3 innings over his seven previous starts this season. The three-time All-Star, who led the NL in strikeouts in 2005 and 2007 with San Diego, got the 1,800th of his career in the first inning when he caught Mike Trout looking. ... INF Chris Nelson was added to the Angels' 25-man roster, one day after he was claimed off waivers from the New York Yankees. They are the third team he's been with this season, including Colorado. ... The Angels optioned 3B Luis Jimenez to Triple-A Salt Lake, and sent outright RHP Barry Enright to Salt Lake after he cleared waivers. Enright had been designated for assignment on May 16, one day after giving up four runs in two-plus innings against Kansas City in a 9-5 loss. ... Dunn returned to the lineup as the designated hitter, after leaving Saturday's game in the fifth inning because of back spasms. He finished 0 for 3 with three strikeouts and a walk. ... The White Sox return home to start an eight-game homestand on Monday against Boston.
CHICAGO — A pattern has developed for the Mets in this young season: when Jeremy Hefner pitches, the Mets lose.Granted, the Mets have lost plenty of games this season, many when Hefner was not anywhere near the mound. But they have yet to win a game that Hefner has started, and that record of futility has become notable.The pattern held Saturday afternoon as the Mets, after piecing together two consecutive wins, returned to their losing ways. Their already struggling offense all but disappeared, and they could not keep the lowly Chicago Cubs off the basepaths during an 8-2 defeat at Wrigley Field, missing a chance to match their longest winning streak of the year."If wins don't come, you've got to keep pitching, you've got to grind it out, and he knows that," Manager Terry Collins said of Hefner (0-5). "It's what got him here. It's the kind of pitcher he is. He just works hard. He'll be O.K. We'll get him some wins when we start swinging better."The offense, once again, was the problem. Scoring chances emerged periodically for the Mets, but each time they were left unredeemed. The Mets stranded runners at second and third in each of the first two innings. They had another runner in scoring position in the fifth, but Daniel Murphy and David Wright, the team's most reliable hitters, struck out, ending the inning. Over all, they went 0 for 5 with runners in scoring position.Their only runs came in the top of the ninth, when Rick Ankiel belted a home run to right field.Scott Feldman contributed to the Mets' misery, pitching six and two-thirds shutout innings and helping his cause with a two-run double."He's having a pretty good year right now," Collins said of Feldman, who improved to 4-3. "He pitched very, very well, made big pitches when he needed to."No player has more symbolized the Mets' struggles at the plate than Ike Davis, who went 0 for 4, his batting average falling to .156. As questions bubbled about whether the Mets might decide to send Davis to the minor leagues, General Manager Sandy Alderson pulled Davis aside and assured him a demotion was not coming."I probably have a month or whatever to figure it out, and then they've got to do what they've got to do," Davis said, recounting the conversation. "But it's not a day-to-day thing. As long as I start having good at-bats and start performing better, it won't happen."The absence of offense — from Davis or anyone else — helped ensure Hefner would remain winless.Hefner has nevertheless carved out a role for himself in the rotation, taking the ball every fifth day and, through workmanlike means, giving the team a chance to win. At the same time, he has come to represent a bad-luck charm of sorts, the Mets having lost all eight games he has started this season.The fourth inning doomed Hefner on Saturday. The Cubs loaded the bases to start the inning and Hefner allowed runs on consecutive at-bats, giving up a sacrifice fly to Luis Valbuena and a single to Welington Castillo. Hefner retired the next batter, but any hope to minimize the damage disintegrated when he gave up a deep double to Feldman that scored two runs and increased the Cubs' lead to 4-0."I wouldn't say it's weighing on me, but I want to win, I want the team to win, and obviously we didn't do that today," said Hefner, who finished his afternoon having allowed five hits and two walks while striking out three in four innings. "I still need to make some adjustments and be better next week."The Cubs added to their total during the fifth inning, when Anthony Rizzo pulled a fastball from Robert Carson over the right-field scoreboard, his 10th home run. Besides sinking the Mets further into a hole, the homer continued a worrisome trend: Carson has allowed seven home runs in just 11 innings this season.In the eighth, Nate Schierholtz added a solo homer off Collin McHugh, who made his first appearance since being recalled from the minors earlier this month. Then, after McHugh let two more men reach base, he gave up a bloop single to David DeJesus that scored both.When it was over, there was plenty of blame to spread around for the loss. But it was not all that surprising, given Hefner's strange luck these days.Terry Collins said he would probably use Sunday's series finale to insert bench players in the lineup. He said the backup catcher Anthony Recker, infielder Justin Turner and outfielder Juan Lagares would probably play.
CHICAGO — About the time the first pitch was thrown at Wrigley Field in a game between the Cubs and the St. Louis Cardinals on a recent night, a local group, the East Lake View Neighbors , called a meeting to order two blocks away. The agenda was to discuss proposed Wrigley renovations that the Cubs had submitted to the City Council.The team's presentation included a slide show with facts, figures and renderings. As Mike Lufrano, the Cubs' vice president for community affairs, explained the concept of bringing street fairs to Sheffield Avenue, which borders Wrigley to the east, he was stopped."Can you go over that again?" a man asked. "I oppose it, but I want to make sure I know what I'm opposing."Just a week before, Tom Ricketts, the Cubs' chairman, broached the idea of moving the team, as unthinkable as that would seem.This has been the tenor of negotiations since the Ricketts family bought the Cubs and Wrigley Field for $845 million in 2009 and began pushing for a stadium renovation. A deal has yet to be completed and resentment is on the rise, even though there are obvious shared interests at play."Wrigleyville needs the Cubs, and the Cubs need Wrigleyville," said Representative Mike Quigley, a season-ticket holder whose district includes the stadium.The back and forth over Wrigley's fate is more complicated than the usual ultimatums issued by municipalities and sports franchises over stadium financing. The ballpark is wildly popular, and a protected city landmark in the heart of an affluent residential area. Navigating the sometimes byzantine world of Chicago politics can also require a steep learning curve. Another key sticking point involves the rooftop businesses across the street, which charge for seating and refreshments and have a contract with the Cubs to preserve their views of the playing field.The Ricketts family has struggled to navigate this landscape, including failed requests for public financing and public-relations flubs. Still, the goal for all involved appears to offer common ground: improve a ballpark that will turn 100 next season, and continue a symbiotic relationship that benefits Wrigleyville, the city and the team."Everyone is wrong," said the Illinois political insider Rich Miller, who publishes the Capitol Fax newsletter in Springfield. "But at the same time, everyone has a point."The Cubs submitted their latest plans to City Hall on May 1, setting the stage for public consideration of the $500 million project. The team wants to build a 175-room hotel across the street from Wrigley and a 6,000-square-foot video board in left field, and add more than 40,000 square feet of advertising signage in and around the stadium. The proposal also calls for street fairs around the park on game days, more night games and concerts, and an improvement of the baseball facilities.The Rickettses did not intend to foot the bill because Wrigley, the third-most-popular tourist attraction in Illinois, is as much economic driver as beautiful ballpark. But attempts for direct public subsidies stalled twice, including last year, when it became known that Joe Ricketts, the family patriarch, was planning to finance what were perceived as racially tinged attacks against President Obama during his re-election campaign. (Obama is a Chicagoan, and Mayor Rahm Emanuel is his former chief of staff.)In January, the Cubs changed course and offered to finance the construction as long as they could raise revenue through more advertising — which is restricted by Wrigley's landmark status, zoning laws and the rooftops — and more events and concessions.In a renewed effort to rally public support, the team has put the renovation in baseball terms. This season, Tom Ricketts said the improvements and increased team revenue would mean a World Series title for the franchise, which last won one in 1908.The reaction has been mixed, mostly because, according to Forbes, the team has baseball's top operating profit, $32.1 million, and is worth $1 billion, fourth highest in the major leagues, despite holding the majors' greatest debt, $580 million. Tom Ricketts disputed Forbes's numbers at a recent news conference but did not offer specifics."The Cubs are responding to the fact that as profitable as they are, they could still be more profitable," said Roger Noll, professor of economics emeritus at Stanford. "Put simply, they want to make more money."This is not the first time Wrigley has been caught between tradition and the lure of modern revenue streams. When the Tribune Company bought the Cubs in 1981 for $20.5 million, it tried to install lights at Wrigley, then the only major league stadium without them. Neighborhood groups opposed the lights, and the team lost its case in the Illinois Supreme Court before eventually reaching a deal for a limited number of night games during the 1988 season.
CHICAGO — Adam Dunn has been insisting all season he feels great, even while he was piling up strikeouts at the beginning of the year.It's not so hard to believe him right now.Dunn hit a three-run homer in the first inning and the Chicago White Sox handed Jon Lester his first loss with a 6-4 victory over the Boston Red Sox on Monday night."It was hard to sit here and keep saying over and over and over how good I felt, with no results," Dunn said. "Hopefully these results keep coming and people start believing me that I wasn't lying to them."Alejandro De Aza and Alexei Ramirez added consecutive RBI doubles in the second as Chicago took advantage of an ineffective Lester (6-1) to earn its fifth win in seven games in the opener of an eight-game homestand. The White Sox scored each of their runs with two outs."The first inning's good, but you know for me, that next inning when you get a couple doubles and you score like that, that's a good sign," manager Robin Ventura said.Jarrod Saltalamacchia hit a two-run homer for the Red Sox, who had won five in a row. Saltalamacchia made a bid for a second two-run shot, but Dayan Viciedo brought in his drive on the warning track in left-center with the White Sox clinging to a 6-4 lead in the seventh.Boston right fielder Shane Victorino was running the bases in the sixth when his left hamstring started to bother him, and he was replaced in the field in the bottom of the inning. He also missed games on Friday and Saturday with a back injury."He felt the left hamstring grab him, little bit of a spasm," manager John Farrell said. "Given what he's been dealing with, low back, I wasn't going to take any chances in that situation."Farrell said Victorino was day to day, and the team would proceed cautiously.Lester was trying to become the first left-handed starter to win his first seven decisions for Boston since Roger Moret in 1973. But he was shaky in the first couple of innings while falling to 4-5 in 10 career games against the White Sox to go along with a 5.43 ERA, his highest against any AL team."Chicago, for some reason, I don't feel like I've ever pitched well here for whatever reason," Lester said. "It is what it is, and it always goes back down to executing pitches at the right time, and I didn't execute the pitch in the first inning. That changed the whole momentum of the game."Lester retired his first two batters before running into trouble. Alex Rios singled to extend his hitting streak to 15 games and Paul Konerko walked before Dunn drove a 2-0 pitch to right for his fifth homer in seven games and No. 11 on the year.Dunn also walked before Viciedo singled home Ramirez to make it 6-2 in the fifth. The burly slugger is batting .360 with 13 RBIs in his last seven games, raising his average 39 points to .172 for the year."When he's right, he can do a lot of damage," Ventura said. "His pitch selection is good. I don't know mechanically exactly what it is but when a guy knows he's in the right position to hit and he's more confident, it comes down to pitch selection."Lester retired the side in order in the sixth, and that was it for him. He allowed five earned runs and seven hits, walked three and struck out two.While Lester struggled, Dylan Axelrod (2-3) pitched six effective innings to win his second straight start. The right-hander, who could lose his spot in the rotation when John Danks comes off the disabled list, gave up two runs and four hits."It's easy to have a lead and pitch to contact and just let the defense work," he said.Axelrod acknowledged that he thinks about his role with Danks almost back from August shoulder surgery, but Ventura said there's still a bit to go before a decision has to be made."John's going to throw next couple of days, and then we'll find out exactly, go from there," Ventura said. "But again, it's not going to be easy for anybody. We'll make that decision when we get there."Matt Thornton yielded Will Middlebrooks' two-run double in the seventh and Jesse Crain extended his scoreless streak to 17 innings before Addison Reed finished for his 15th save in 16 chances.With one out and a runner on first in the ninth, Middlebrooks hit a drive that De Aza caught at the wall in center field. Konerko then made a diving stop on Stephen Drew's grounder and flipped the ball to Reed covering first to end the game.The White Sox improved to 9-9 at home on the first night of a stretch of 17 of 23 games in Chicago that includes two against the Cubs at Wrigley Field. If the White Sox (20-23) can turn around their sluggish play at U.S. Cellular Field, it could be a chance to make up some ground in the bunched AL Central.NOTES: The Red Sox activated closer Andrew Bailey from the 15-day disabled list. He had been out since April 29 with right biceps inflammation. ... Chicago 2B Gordon Beckham, placed on the disabled list April 12 with a broken bone in his left wrist, played shortstop in a rehab game with Triple-A Charlotte on Monday night. Ventura said Beckham could return to the team by the end of the week. ... LHPs Felix Doubront (3-1, 6.03 ERA) of the Red Sox and Jose Quintana (2-1, 3.97) of the White Sox are slated to pitch Tuesday.
CHICAGO — For all the talk about how bright the Mets ' future could be, the organization has a weighty task ahead finding capable position players to eventually array around their vaunted young pitchers.It is premature to make any final evaluation on Juan Lagares, a 24-year-old center fielder who made his major league debut less than a month ago. Manager Terry Collins calls him a work in progress, a player whose inherent talents will require more care and refinement. His worth will be determined over time.But Lagares took an important step Sunday afternoon at Wrigley Field. On the last day of his team's seven-game trip, Lagares crushed a two-run, game-tying homer as the Mets came from behind and beat the Chicago Cubs, 4-3. The Mets finished 3-4 on the trip, which started last week against the St. Louis Cardinals."I'm really, really happy for him," Collins said of Lagares. "He's part of that future we keep talking about. It's about playing up here and learning how to play up here and seeing what you've got to do to make adjustments and what you've got to do to get ready to play."It was a milestone for Lagares, a brief sweetener after a rough first month in the majors. Since his April 23 debut, Lagares has batted .179. His home run, the first of his career, was his second extra-base hit of the year. It could not have been better timed.The Mets were trailing, 3-1, going into the seventh inning. The Cubs had built their lead from two home runs off Dillon Gee, who lasted five innings: a two-run shot in the fifth by Travis Wood, the Cubs' starting pitcher, and a solo blast an inning later by Ryan Sweeney. David Wright was responsible for the Mets' only production to that point, with a run-scoring single in the sixth.Lagares came to the plate in the seventh after Ruben Tejada hit a two-out single to right. On a 2-2 count, Wood left a changeup over the plate, and Lagares smashed it deep into the right-field stands, tying the game."I got two strikes, so I just thought, be aggressive and stay with my plan," Lagares said.Lagares said he did not consider the whereabouts of the ball as he sprinted around the bases. Daniel Murphy, who was waiting on deck, did, and he yelled toward a Cubs ball boy who did not seem aware that the ball, which was thrown back onto the field by a fan, might have some value to the Mets."He didn't make a whole lot of mistakes," Murphy said of Wood, who pitched seven solid innings, "and the one he did, Juan did a great job capitalizing on it. That's an awesome first home run."After retrieving Lagares's ball, Murphy made one more huge contribution. Leading off the eighth inning, he crushed a 2-1 fastball from Kyuji Fujikawa into the right-field bleachers to provide the Mets their pivotal run.Murphy was hitting in an unfamiliar spot: leadoff, where he has not batted since the 2009 season. As the Mets have stumbled along this season, Collins has been resigned to stirring around the bits and pieces that form his roster, a manager panning for gold. His lineup Sunday was the 33rd configuration of position players he has used this season.Before the game, he acknowledged his reorganizing was necessary given the team's problems."The ideal thing is to have a lineup you put up every day and it's the same," Collins said before seeing how his new lineup would fare. But, he added: "We're not hitting. We're not getting guys on. You've got to pick and choose. You've got to go with guys that are getting the job done."Murphy extended his hitting streak to eight games, during which he has hit .469. Collins said he would consider keeping Murphy at the top of the order.It may go this way the rest of the season: the manager tinkering here and there to see where he might extract an extra bit of production. Part of that will involve his continued evaluation of players like Lagares."What he's really working right now is shrinking the strike zone a little bit so he gets a little bit better balls to hit," Collins said of Lagares. "It's a work in progress, but he's put up numbers wherever he's been and hopefully he starts putting them up here."
CHICAGO — Jose Quintana took a no-hitter into the seventh before David Ortiz broke it up with a one-out broken-bat single, and the Chicago White Sox beat the Boston Red Sox 3-1 on Tuesday night.Jeff Keppinger hit a two-run homer off Felix Doubront (3-2) in the fifth. Alex Rios extended his career-high hitting streak to 16 with a single and RBI double, and the White Sox won for the sixth time in eight games. They'll try to complete the sweep against Clay Buchholz on Wednesday.The left-hander struck out five and walked two, and he had the fans thinking they just might be witnessing something special. The roars from the stands grew louder with each out as the game wore on, right until Ortiz's bat shattered on a bloop single to center with one out in the seventh.
URBANA, Ill. — With Kristie Ahn back in the lineup after missing parts of the last two seasons, 12th-seeded Stanford was a different team.The Cardinal completed a string of upsets by defeating No. 3 Texas A&M 4-3 for the NCAA women's tennis championship Tuesday night."For Kristie Ahn to clinch, it's poetic justice," Stanford coach Lele Forood said. "She's been the missing player for us the last two years. We weren't able to get it done without her."Ankle and foot injuries slowed Ahn, and hurt her neck in a bus accident.Yet Ahn was already pondering the night before about "how sick it would be if I clinched," she said.The thought kept crossing her mind during 7-5, 4-6, 6-2 win over Cristina Stancu to wrap up Stanford's 17th national championship and seventh under Forood."I was thinking about how absurd it was coming down to me," Ahn said. "It's a big moment, highlight of life."Stanford ended top-seeded Florida's run toward a third consecutive championship and knocked off fourth-seeded Georgia and fifth-seeded USC over the previous four days.The Cardinal were the lowest-seeded team to reach the championship match since 2007."It was an interesting and extremely rewarding ride for us," Forood said. "We had our ups and downs, but we came to play when it counted."The best part about the title wasn't dumping a bucket of cold water on Forood or holding the national championship trophy, Ahn said. It's the trip to the White House, just another part of the spoils."My team is a bunch of nerds," Ahn said. "We love politics. I can't tell you the dinner conversations we have. It's too much about substance."When Stanford's Nicole Gibbs rallied for a 0-6, 6-2, 6-0 win over Cristina Sanchez-Quintanar, the Cardinal gained some momentum. Gibbs won NCAA singles and doubles titles last season."I felt bad for her," Forood said. "I wanted her to find a way to get back in the match. Early in the second set, she said, 'I have to win this match. I have to do things differently.' "Anna Mamalat grabbed the first of three consecutive singles victories for the Aggies that tied the match at 3-3. Mamalat defeated Ellen Tsay 6-1, 7-5. Texas A&M's Nazari Urbina downed Krista Hardebeck 6-3, 7-6 and the Aggies' Stefania Hristov beat Natalie Dillon 6-2, 3-6, 6-1.Stanford earned the doubles point, despite an 8-3 loss by Ahn and Gibbs to Stancu and Hristov. Stacey Tan and Tsay defeated the Aggies' Wen Sun and Sanchez-Quintanar 8-4, and Stanford's Dillon and Hardebeck secured the doubles point with an 8-5 win over Deheza and Paula Deheza.In its second season under coach Howard Joffe, Texas A&M (26-4) made its first appearance in the championship match after reaching the quarterfinals and semifinals for the first time in school history."The trajectory and speed we've come from nowhere, so to speak, is somewhat startling," Joffe said.
PITTSBURGH — Travis Snider hit a pinch-hit grand slam during a five-run sixth and the Pittsburgh Pirates spoiled a strong return to the mound for Matt Garza with a 5-4 win over the Chicago Cubs on Tuesday night.Garza allowed one hit over five shutout innings in his first outing in 10 months, but the Pirates pounced on a Chicago bullpen that is 10th in the National League in ERA by sending 11 men to the plate in the sixth.Snider's first career home run with the bases loaded was the first Pirates pinch-hit grand slam in five years.Garza had been sidelined since July 21 because of a stress reaction in his right elbow and, later, a strained upper back..Wandy Rodriguez (5-2) allowed three runs on six hits over six innings for the Pirates, who have won nine of 11.The Cubs scored once in the ninthi, but Anthony Rizzo struck out swinging with two on to end the game and earn Jason Grilli his majors-leading 18th save.Darwin Barney went 4 for 4 for the Cubs, who have lost three of four.The lone inning in which Rodriguez allowed a runner to progress past first base was the second, when Darwin Barney had an RBI single and Garza hit a two-run double.Cubs pitchers have 13 RBIs in May -- the most for the franchise in any month since September 1971. They also have a major league leading six doubles.But after that, Rodriguez retired 13 of the final 15 he faced. Justin Wilson worked around two hits in the seventh and Mark Melancon pitched a scoreless eighth.Barney tripled with one out in the ninth, and Starlin Castro followed a Julio Borbon walk with an RBI single. But Rizzo fell to 0 for 5 with his second strikeout of the game to end it, allowing Grilli to surpass the New York Yankees' Mariano Rivera for the most saves in the majors.Snider's homer, his second, was the first pinch-hit grand slam by a Pirates player since Jason Michaels on June 2, 2008, at St. Louis. It came off of Shawn Camp after Hector Rondon and James Russell had combined to load the bases and immediately following a Pedro Alvarez walk to drive in a run.The Pirates did not have a hit against Garza until Clint Barmes singled to right with one out in the fifth. That followed a Gaby Sanchez walk and was followed by a Rodriguez sacrifice. But Jose Tabata grounded out to end the inning. Garza threw 82 pitches.After sitting out Pittsburgh's previous game Sunday due to knee soreness, Andrew McCutchen went 0 for 4. He made two of the Pirates' three outs during the sixth, leaving the bases loaded to end the inning.NOTES: To make room for Garza on the roster, the Cubs earlier Tuesday designated RHP Michael Bowden for assignment. Also Tuesday, Chicago claimed RHP Eduardo Sanchez off waivers from the St. Louis Cardinals and assigned him to the Triple-A Iowa Cubs. ... The Pirates reinstated RHP Jose Contreras from the bereavement list before the game and returned RHP Jared Hughes to Triple-A Indianapolis. ... LHP Francisco Liriano will make his third start for the Pirates when the series continues Wednesday. He has faced the Cubs once in his eight-year career. RHP Jeff Samardzija, who has a 0.92 ERA in 39 career innings vs. Pittsburgh, starts for the Cubs.
URBANA, Ill. — Virginia finally took that last step and won an NCAA men's tennis championship.After losing in the championship match the last two seasons, the second-seeded Cavaliers defeated top-seeded UCLA 4-3 Tuesday to win their first NCAA title after the Bruins let a potential match point slip away."Outside of having four children with a great wife, it's the next best feeling I've had in my life," Virginia coach Brian Boland said. "It's been a long journey."Virginia (30-0) advanced to the national semifinals three times in four seasons before the back-to-back runner-up finishes to USC the last two years."People kept telling me, colleagues and friends, that it's going to happen," Boland said. "All I ever told the guys is we have to give ourselves a chance. This time, it worked out for us."Mitchell Frank's come-from-behind 0-6, 6-4, 7-5 victory over Adrien Puget sealed it for Virginia. The UCLA junior was called for touching the net on match point. UCLA lost the point and eventually the match."We were right there - match point - and thought we won it," UCLA coach Billy Martin said.Frank hit a bad pass into the wind, Frank said, but Puget was called for touching the net. Had it not been for the call, the trophy might have been in someone else's hands."It would have been tough," Frank said, holding the championship trophy moments later. "I'm glad he touched the net. A couple inches can make the difference."Virginia's Jarmere Jenkins was named most outstanding player after winning No. 1 singles over Dennis Novikov 7-6, 6-3. Justin Shane scored Virginia's other singles win over Clay Thompson 6-2, 6-2.UCLA's Marcos Giron upset Alex Domijan, who was ranked No. 2 nationally, for a 6-4, 6-4 win. The Bruins kept up the pressure as Dennis Mkrtchian scored a 6-4, 6-3 win over Mac Styslinger and Karue Sell defeated Julen Uriguen 4-6, 6-3, 6-2.Shane and Uriguen teamed up to clinch the doubles point with an 8-5 win over Alex Brigham and Thompson. Jenkins and Stylinger combined for the Cavaliers' other doubles win, an 8-2 decision over Giron and Novikov.Frank trailed 5-3 in the third set."I've been trained that you can't worry about the result," Frank said. "I said a rhyme to myself. Eyes on the prize, and your mind tells you lies. I said that to myself on a changeover (at 5-4). I couldn't focus on whether I'd win that game."Boland's celebration included a phone call from his parents, who were unable to attend."It was a pretty emotional moment for me to talk to my parents," he said. "I've been at this game my whole life. This was a dream, to try to win a championship."UCLA ranks third all-time with 16 NCAA titles, and the Bruins came within one point of their first championship since 2005 before the net violation."We were starting to celebrate ourselves," Martin said. " I'm sure they didn't make the wrong call. It's just hard to imagine we were that close but didn't get it."
SAN FRANCISCO — Ryan Vogelsong felt the best he had in months, then it all ended on one painful swing.The right-hander broke his throwing hand chasing an inside fastball after pitching himself toward his first win in seven starts, and the San Francisco Giants returned from a terrible road trip to beat the Washington Nationals 8-0 on Monday night.Vogelsong was injured while fouling a ball off his hand in the fifth inning. He grimaced in pain while grabbing the hand — knowing immediately it was serious. He was quickly examined near the batter's box and left the game.Vogelsong broke two bones along the right pinkie and dislocated a knuckle the area that the medical staff couldn't get popped back into place. He was scheduled for surgery Tuesday morning at Stanford and said he likely would have pins inserted to stabilize the hand and help speed the healing process."We're not talking about Tommy John or anything here," Vogelsong said, his eyes misty. "Basically as fast as we can get it to heal so I can start throwing again."Nationals manager Davey Johnson announced after the game that reliever Ryan Mattheus broke his pitching hand punching a locker in frustration Sunday. The right-hander allowed five runs in one inning of Washington's 13-4 loss to the San Diego Padres, but didn't tell the team about the injury until just before Monday's game."Last night after the game he came in and was in the locker room and banged his glove against his locker with his hand in it," Johnson said. "His hand didn't swell up but when he went out to throw today his hand swelled up and he couldn't throw the ball."Vogelsong (2-4) snapped a six-start winless stretch with just his second victory of 2013 and first since April 11 against the Cubs at Wrigley Field and seemed back on track.He walked off to warm ovation as Nick Noonan pinch hit. Vogelsong allowed three hits in five scoreless innings and lowered his ERA from 8.06 to 7.19."It's really a shame because tonight was the Vogey that we know, the way he threw all of last year, good stuff," manager Bruce Bochy said. "It's a tough one. I feel bad for him. I know he felt really good tonight. You've got to deal with these things. He'll be back, hopefully, in a couple months."Brandon Belt hit a solo home run, matched his career best with four hits and scored three runs as San Francisco pounded a season-high 17 hits. Angel Pagan hit an RBI double and two-run single for San Francisco, also making a great leaping catch against the center-field wall.Andres Torres had three hits and drove in a run and Marco Scutaro added an RBI single among his two hits.Vogelsong got the defensive gem from Pagan when the center fielder slammed into the wall on Adam LaRoche's deep fly in the second.The 2011 All-Star ended a six-start winless stretch in which he had lost his last two outings and gone 0-3. He was tagged for eight runs — three earned — and six hits in two innings for his shortest outing of the year last Wednesday at Toronto."It was awesome," Belt said. "The special thing about this team is everybody roots for everybody. We were as happy for him as can be, and it's tough to see him go down like this. But we know he'll be back, and strong and ready to go."Javier Lopez took over for Vogelsong in the top of the sixth and received a little bit more warm up time. Three more relievers finished for the Giants' sixth shutout. San Francisco snapped a three-game skid after a 1-5 road trip through Toronto and Colorado.The Giants have until next Tuesday before they need a fifth starter.Bryce Harper went 0 for 4 in his return to the Nationals' lineup after last season's NL Rookie of the Year missed two games with a bruised left knee. He was hurt in a hard collision with the outfield wall a week earlier at Dodger Stadium that also caused him to need 11 stitches on his chin.Left-hander Zach Duke (0-1) lasted just 3 1-3 innings in a spot start for Ross Detwiler, who is sidelined with back spasms. Duke allowed four runs and seven hits in his first start of the year.Washington was shut out for the sixth time.Vogelsong retired the first eight Nationals hitters in order.The right-hander lasted only 2 2-3 innings in his first career start against Washington last year, allowing eight runs on nine hits with two walks."That's the best I've felt in a long time, from a mental aspect, physical aspect, everything felt good," he said. "It was nice to be able to get out there and have everything I've been working on for the last couple weeks kind of fall into place. From that standpoint it's a good place to start when I come back."Scutaro extended his hitting streak to 18 games with a third-inning single. The second baseman fielded Roger Bernadina's grounder in the fifth but dropped the ball in exchange from glove to hand, for the Giants' 15th error in their last eight games.Notes: Nationals OF Jayson Werth, on the 15-day disabled list with a strained right hamstring, is expected to need at least two more weeks to heal after a second MRI showed he "has some problems in there," Johnson said. "He's going to rest a bit." ... A moment of silence was held for the Oklahoma tornado victims before the national anthem. ... RHP Matt Cain (3-2) starts for the Giants in Tuesday night's middle game against righty Stephen Strasburg (2-5). ... San Francisco's Buster Posey has hit safely in 11 of his last 12. ... Belt's homer was the Giants' 21st at home. Last season through their first 23 games at AT&T Park, they had hit just six HRs.
There is hardly one single type of logic to how a manager scribbles out a lineup. Some make decisions based on hunches. Some use advanced statistics. And then there is Terry Collins, who has inherited a Mets offense so unreliable that his changes are often acts of desperation.Ideally, a lineup should be the easiest part of a manager's job, as long as he has the right players to fill each spot. Collins does not. For Collins, filling out a lineup is like facing a 110-mile-per-hour fastball.Collins's latest revamped lineup kept the Mets close against the Cincinnati Reds at Citi Field on Monday, but they still lost, 4-3. It was a night indicative of Collins's season-long attempt to find a strong lineup. The Mets have had 34 starting lineups in 42 games."I've told the other coaches," Collins said, "I'm not comfortable to keep looking up every day and we have guys moving all over the lineup. I think it makes it uneasy for major league players to come in each day and not knowing where you're hitting. We are trying to do something consistently."Collins is not usually one to rely heavily on statistics, but some numbers are difficult to ignore, even in a small sample size.Entering Monday, Rick Ankiel and Marlon Byrd had had success (a combined 13 for 28) against Johnny Cueto, who was making his first start since April 13 after being on the disabled list with a strained back. So Collins slid both into the lineup, Ankiel in the No. 2 spot and Byrd fifth, after Lucas Duda.In the first, Ankiel and Byrd both walked. Although the Mets did not score, Ankiel and Byrd helped force Cueto to throw 28 pitches in the inning. In the third, with the Mets trailing, 3-0, Ankiel reached on a single. After David Wright walked and Duda struck out, Byrd crushed an 86-m.p.h. slider over the left-field wall for a game-tying home run. Jay Bruce's solo homer to lead off the sixth against Mets starter Shaun Marcum proved the difference.The inclusion of Ankiel and Byrd was not the only quirk in the lineup, although none of the others worked out as well."Each and every day we put in a lot of thought to where they should go," Collins said. "Some days it works, some days it doesn't."A few days ago in Chicago, Mets coaches sought to solve the problem of the leadoff spot. The Mets had been unable to find someone to do what leadoff hitters are supposed to do: get on base. Entering Monday's game, their leadoff hitters had posted a .255 on-base percentage, second worst in the majors behind the Minnesota Twins. Mets leadoff hitters' .186 batting average was the worst in baseball.Collins had tried six batters at the top of the order, and none seemed to work. Bob Geren, the bench coach, made a simple suggestion: "Maybe we ought to lead Murphy off."So, on Monday, for the second consecutive game, Daniel Murphy led off. But he went 0 for 4.Also, Collins, a week after saying Ike Davis would be his cleanup hitter, slid him back to the sixth spot after he went 1 for 24 on the recent trip. It did not help. Davis was 0 for 3 with two strikeouts. He was taken out of the game in the seventh on a double switch. After the game, Collins said the Mets had considered sending Davis to the minors.Davis said: "This game is built on confidence. And I haven't had a lot of things go right for me to take off."Despite all the changes, the Mets continue to struggle offensively. For the 11th time in 13 games they failed to score more than three runs."You hope to have two or three guys going hot at the same time in a lineup," Byrd said. "It just hasn't happened."Less than an hour after the end of Monday's game, Collins was already thinking about Tuesday's lineup. He knew that outfielder Mike Baxter had relative success against the Reds scheduled starter Mike Leake (3 for 7). Collins just was not sure where he would put him in the lineup.Regardless of where Baxter ends up, Collins will most likely be filling out the Mets' 35th lineup in 43 games.
DETROIT — Gustav Nyquist and Drew Miller scored 31 seconds apart midway through the second period, and Pavel Datsyuk restored a two-goal lead in the third to help the Red Wings beat the Chicago Blackhawks , 3-1, on Monday night to take a 2-1 lead in the second-round series.Patrick Kane scored 4 minutes 35 seconds into the third period for Chicago to make it a 2-1 game. About a minute later, the Blackhawks celebrated as if they had tied the game.However, Andrew Shaw's goal was waved off because he was in the crease.Chicago Coach Joel Quenneville said he disagreed with the call that negated Shaw's score.The seventh-seeded Red Wings have a shot to put the top-seeded Blackhawks on the brink of elimination Thursday in Game 4.After a scoreless first period at a hot and steamy Joe Louis Arena, Detroit took a 2-0 lead on the goals by Nyquist and Miller. At that point the Red Wings had scored six straight goals to seize the momentum in the series.But as good as they have looked, their hard-driving coach, Mike Babcock, is not ready to celebrate."We haven't done anything yet," he said.The Blackhawks have lost consecutive games for the first time in nearly two months.Chicago began the lockout-shortened season by setting an N.H.L. record with at least a point in its first 24 games, ended it with a league-high 77 points and avoided having a three-game losing streak during the 48-game campaign."We know this is a long series," the Blackhawks' captain, Jonathan Toews, said, "and we're going to be fighting until the end."
CHICAGO — Clay Buchholz pitched five-hit ball over seven innings to improve to 7-0, and the Boston Red Sox beat the Chicago White Sox 6-2 Wednesday night to avoid a three-game sweep.David Ortiz delivered a two-run single in the first off Hector Santiago (1-3), and the Red Sox backed Buchholz with several neat defensive plays on the way to their sixth win in eight games.Jonny Gomes made a sliding catch on Paul Konerko's line drive to left with two on to end the first. Jacoby Ellsbury raced to the center-field warning track to snag Alexei Ramirez's liner with a runner on and two out in the fifth to preserve a 2-1 lead.Boston added to it in the eighth when Will Middlebrooks hit a sacrifice fly to right off Nate Jones after the Red Sox loaded the bases against Brian Omogrosso in the eighth, and Mike Napoli scored on a passed ball by Tyler Flowers to make it 4-1. The Red Sox scored two more in the ninth to put this one away.Buchholz allowed just one run while lowering his American League-leading ERA to 1.73. He also matched the best start by a Boston pitcher since Josh Beckett in 2007 and joined Tampa Bay's Matt Moore and Arizona's Patrick Corbin as the only unbeaten pitchers in the majors with seven or more wins.The only run he allowed came on an RBI groundout in the third by Alex Rios, who also extended his career-high hitting streak to 17 with a single in the sixth.The White Sox also got a solo homer from Paul Konerko off Andrew Bailey. Otherwise, the White Sox couldn't get the big hit. They were 0 for 5 with runners in scoring position after doing all their scoring with two outs while winning the previous two games 6-4 and 3-1.Santiago wasn't quite as dominant after Jose Quintana took a no-hitter into the seventh the previous night, but he gave the White Sox exactly what they needed.He settled down after the shaky start and threw six solid innings for the White Sox with Chris Sale scratched because of mild tendinitis in his left shoulder. The left-hander allowed two runs and three hits, struck out nine and walked four pitching on three days' rest in what might be his last start for a while.That's because he or Dylan Axelrod could be headed to the bullpen with John Danks expected to return from his shoulder injury.NOTES: The Red Sox held OF Shane Victorino out of the lineup for the second straight game because of tightness in his left hamstring. Manager John Farrell said there has been improvement and is hopeful he won't have to go on the disabled list. ... Farrell said backup C David Ross (concussion) will go on a rehab assignment Thursday at Double-A Portland. ... Chicago manager Robin Ventura said Sale wanted to start on Wednesday, but the White Sox decided to take a more cautious approach. He also said there was no MRI scheduled and that he expects the left-hander to be ready to start against the Cubs on Tuesday, although that isn't necessarily etched in stone.
PITTSBURGH — Francisco Liriano continued his torrid start, scattering two hits over seven innings and the Pittsburgh Pirates edged the Chicago Cubs 1-0 on Wednesday night.Liriano (3-0) struck out nine and walked just one to remain unbeaten since making his season debut against the New York Mets two weeks ago. Mark Melancon survived a bumpy ninth inning for his first save of the season.Andrew McCutchen doubled twice for the Pirates and scored the game's only run on an RBI single by Garrett Jones in the first. Pittsburgh has won 10 of 12 to move 10 games over .500 (28-18).Chicago's Jeff Samardzija (2-6) nearly matched Liriano pitch for pitch, giving up just three hits in seven innings, but received no help. The Cubs have dropped four of five.The Pirates agreed to terms with the former All-Star in December, but Liriano signed a more incentive-laden deal after breaking his right (non-throwing) arm in a freak accident on Christmas Day.It's certainly looking like a bargain now. The left-hander has spent most of the five seasons attempting to regain the form he showed as a 22-year-old phenom with the Minnesota Twins in 2006, when he went 12-3 with a 2.16 ERA and made the All-Star team on his way to finishing third in American League Rookie of the Year voting.His path to stardom was sidetracked by Tommy John surgery in 2007, though he appears to have found a home in Pittsburgh.Mixing his offspeed stuff with a rejuvenated fastball refined by a tweak to his delivery, Liriano has joined A.J. Burnett and Wandy Rodriguez in giving the Pirates a respectable top of the rotation.He was solid in his first two starts in wins over the Mets and Milwaukee. He was spectacular at times against the Cubs. He retired 14 of 15 batters at one point and managed to expertly wiggle out of the lone spot of trouble in the third when the Cubs loaded the bases with no outs following a Cody Ransom single, a walk and an error.In a way, Liriano had the Cubs right where he wanted them.Chicago began the night hitting just .218 with runners in scoring position, the second-lowest in the majors. The number dropped a bit more after Julio Borbon hit into a fielders' choice, Starlin Castro struck out and Anthony Rizzo flew out to right to end the threat.No Cub made it to third base over Liriano's final four innings and Pittsburgh's bullpen made it hold up even with closer Jason Grilli given the night off after laboring through a 34-pitch save on Tuesday.The Pirates improved to 26-0 when leading after eight innings while Samardzija's tough luck continued.The right-hander has been lights out against the Pirates during his career. He came in 4-0 against them, including a dazzling eight innings of work in a 3-1 Chicago win on opening day.Samardzija might have been even better this time around. His only miscue came in the first when McCutchen doubled with two outs and Jones followed with a single to right.It turned out to be all the cushion Liriano would need. Tony Watson worked the eighth and Melancon — typically the setup man — came in for the ninth looking for his first save since Aug. 26, 2012, while playing for the Boston Red Sox.The Cubs made him work for it. Soriano reached on strikeout-wild pitch and Wellington Castillo singled with one out. Nate Schierholtz and Darwin Barney both lofted weak fly balls to shallow right field that Pittsburgh second baseman Neil Walker corralled with ease.NOTES: Chicago's Darwin Barney, who went 4 for 4 in the series opener on Tuesday to raise his average from .192 to .223, went 0 for 3 ... Pittsburgh's left-handed starters are 8-1 at PNC Park this season ... The series wraps up on Thursday. Jeanmar Gomez (2-0, 2.78 ERA) will make his first start against the Cubs. Edwin Jackson (1-6 5.76) starts for Chicago. Jackson is 4-1 with a 3.09 ERA against the Pirates in his career.
Notice has officially arrived in Chicago that the N.H.L. playoffs have started. Perhaps part of the Blackhawks' problem is that they are actually playing games in Detroit at the moment. Maybe the hockey gods should start delivering such things by text message. Thus, the Blackhawks would have been warned that Detroit no longer looks much like that identity crisis team that barely sneaked into the playoffs and whom Chicago had little trouble with in the regular season.Somehow, the Detroit team that has dug its fingernails deep into this second-round series with Chicago not only found an identity, but made it a not-so-charming one. The franchise that used to pride itself on skating rings around opponents and scoring goals out of the how-to-create-a-highlight-reel textbook is now knocking Chicago around for a stunning 2-1 lead in their series.Yes, as Bob Wojnowski writes in The Detroit News, the Wings have gone gritty. This is out of sheer necessity, of course, because it's Chicago that now has the skill to outskate and outdazzle the field. So Detroit Coach Mike Babcock — whom you should never underestimate, writes Jeff Seidel in The Detroit Free Press — has them hounding the smooth Blackhawks completely off their game, as Allan Muir writes on SI. com. Somehow the franchise that has made 22 straight playoffs is the annoying underdog, complete with the snarl.The freak-out quotient would be entirely different for Chicago, mind you, had the referees not waved off the Blackhawks' tying goal in the third period on a mystifying goalie-interference call, but Detroit still deserves all the credit for crafting its 3-1 victory out of grit and its newfound nastiness. Johan Franzen even turned one of Chicago's bigger hits into motivation, Cam Cole writes for The National Post, and added his revenge. It turns out, if the N.H.L. wanted the Red Wings to go about their rebuilding year quietly, it should have kept them out of the playoffs altogether, Eric Duhatschek writes in The Globe and Mail, because now that they've reinvented themselves, they are not going away easily. And as Craig Custance writes on ESPN.com, it's up to Chicago to respond now that it knows this.There was no blood involved in soccer's big news of the day Monday — José Mourinho leaving as Real Madrid's coach and likely heading to Chelsea — but pretty much anything involving Mourinho gets a bit nasty. Barcelona's vice president greeted the news by declaring Mourinho a scourge on Spain. It is easiest to keep up with Mourinho's career moves by the people most hacked off at him at the moment, which is the one constant in his career, as Martin Rogers writes on Yahoo.com.Baseball has managers under fire, too, particularly in Los Angeles, where the civic debate revolves around whether the Dodgers should can Don Mattingly. Thanks to a Clayton Kershaw gem, he staved off doom for at least another day, David Schoenfield writes on ESPN.com, and the Dodgers looked like the highly paid Dodgers are supposed to look — for a change. Still, unless this happens when Kershaw isn't starting, people will wonder if the Dodgers are tough enough to save Mattingly's job, as Tim Brown writes on Yahoo.com. Maybe turning to basketball's king of Zen Phil Jackson isn't the right philosophical choice.Mike Babcock could definitely help them learn a little toughness. Unfortunately for the Dodgers, he's rather busy disrupting the Chicago Blackhawks' playoffs.
DETROIT — Jimmy Howard kept Jonathan Toews in his misery, making three saves against the struggling star to help the Detroit Red Wings beat the Chicago Blackhawks 2-0 on Thursday night in Game 4 of the second round series to put the NHL's best team during the regular season on the brink of elimination.When Howard wasn't using his glove or pads to deny Toews, Detroit's skaters were rattling him and his teammates with a physical presence that is clearly making them uncomfortable."They are getting frustrated," Howard said. "Our guys are doing a great job in front of the net."Chicago's Corey Crawford did a solid job in his net, but he couldn't kick his right leg out quick enough to stop Jakub Kindl's shot on a power play midway through the second period and he was on the bench in favor of an extra skater when Daniel Cleary sealed the victory in the final minute.After losing Game 1, seventh-seeded Detroit has surged into control by handing the Blackhawks their first three-game losing streak of the year."The pressure is on them," Detroit defenseman Jonathan Ericsson said.Yes, it is.And, no one in the Windy City will want to extend the series more than Toews."We've got to find a way to force a Game 6," he said.The Blackhawks desperately need their captain to score and lead after he extended his goal drought in a composure-crumbling performance.Toews was called for three penalties in the second — two for high-sticking — and could've gone to the box a fourth time in the period for slashing Red Wings captain Henrik Zetterberg while an official stood between them."Emotions run high in some of these games, and my stick got a little loose there," he said. "I was playing hard. Sometimes that happens."The Red Wings took advantage of the second power play Toews gave them when Kindl sent a low shot to the near corner from the top of the left circle."We'd like to keep him in the box," Ericsson said. "He's not as good for them in the box."Chicago had killed its first 30 penalties of the playoffs and matched the 2001 St. Louis Blues' feat of playing eight postseason games without giving up a power-play goal, the longest such streak since 1988.The Blackhawks had a power play with 4:45 left in the game when Kindl was called for hooking, but they couldn't tie the game.Crawford made 25 saves and allowed one goal, after giving up seven goals in the previous two games.Howard was just a little bit better, earning his first shutout of this postseason and the second of his career in the playoffs. He has helped the Red Wings win five of their last six games since trailing Anaheim 3-2 in the first round."He has kind of been in a groove for a while now," Detroit coach Mike Babcock said. "And, we need that to be successful."Kindl scored his first goal of his first postseason, keeping up a trend that has helped the rapidly improving Red Wings pull within a win of their first trip to the Western Conference finals since 2009 when they got past Chicago and went on to lose Game 7 in a Stanley Cup finals rematch against Pittsburgh.Detroit's young players — six playing in their first playoff season — have been contributing to help out stars Pavel Datsyuk and Zetterberg.Red Wings rookie Brendan Smith scored the winner in Game 2 at Chicago to even the series. First-year player Damien Brunner and Gustav Nyquist, who was pointless in his first four postseason games last year, had goals in overtimes against the second-seeded Ducks.Chicago's 25-year-old center, Toews, should seemingly be in the prime of his career, but he is in a slump against a team that appears to be getting to him physical and mentally. Toews was called for three penalties in the first 11 minutes of a period for the first time in his career, according to STATS.He has gone 10 postseason games without a goal — dating to last year's playoffs — in what is the longest scoring skid for a former Conn Smythe winner since Claude Lemieux went 20 games without a goal from 2000 through 2009, according to STATS.Toews, who has three goals in his last 30 playoff games, broke a tie for his second longest streak without a goal in the postseason and trails his 14-game skid that spanned 2010 and 2011.Chicago coach Joel Quenneville insisted Toews, who he put on a line with Patrick Kane, is doing a lot of things well."We don't measure just his contribution offensively," Quenneville said.NOTES: Detroit D Danny DeKeyser, who broke his right thumb in the first round and was ruled out for the playoffs, said he is holding out hope that he can come back if his teammates can advance. ... Since winning the Stanley Cup in 2010, Chicago has lost in the first round twice and is a loss away from a second-round exit. ...... Chicago hadn't given up a power-play goal since April 22.
DETROIT — Red Wings goaltender Jimmy Howard has maintained his composure despite the increased chippiness of Detroit's series against the Chicago Blackhawks in the Western Conference semifinals.Wave after wave of Blackhawks blazed a path toward Howard during Game 3 on Monday, but he stopped 39 shots in the Red Wings' 3-1 victory. The unflappable Howard is a primary reason Detroit holds a 2-1 series lead."I'm just trying to breathe and make sure I keep doing it back there," Howard said Wednesday on the eve of Game 4 in Detroit. "This is when it is fun to play. The crowd is going crazy; everybody's flying around; stuff is happening everywhere. You just want to be a part of it and do your job."He added: "I take two good, deep breaths during the national anthem, really get calm and focused, and then it's time to go."In Game 1, the top-seeded Blackhawks took advantage of the Red Wings' turnovers and poor defense to earn a 4-1 victory. But Howard was sharp in Games 2 and 3, limiting the high-powered Chicago offense to one goal in each game.Howard has a .923 save percentage and a 6-4 record during the playoffs. He helped the Red Wings prevail in a seven-game first-round series against the Anaheim Ducks, winning three of four overtime games.Detroit Coach Mike Babcock said Howard's play did not take star billing often enough. Howard was 21-13-7 with five shutouts during the lockout-shortened 48-game regular season."From the time I came here until now, we need good goaltending now more than we ever did," Babcock said. "And he's providing it for us; he's strong and competitive in there. You only talk about your goaltending when it's no good. Probably should talk about him more, because it is good."Howard, a 29-year-old native of Ogdensburg, N.Y., became the starter during the 2009-10 season, taking over for Chris Osgood. He considers his ascent a gradual one, with Jim Bedard, the goalie coach, and Osgood, a team consultant, serving as mentors."What I like about Jimmy is you know what you're going to get; he's consistent," Red Wings General Manager Ken Holland said. "It's not an accident. He's done his time, moving up from college at Maine, to the minors, to learning from Ozzie, to taking over the job himself.""He's always had confidence, but there's something different about it now," Holland added. "He's calmer, more assured. The play comes to him, and he knows what he needs to do."Bedard has known Howard for more than a decade, first as a scout who recommended that the Red Wings draft him. Howard was chosen 64th over all in 2003.Being steady and staying calm have helped Howard along."You can't go to the experience store and just buy some," Bedard said. "Jimmy's come through to this point because he's had to learn from everything. And those who can't get through that process get left behind."The Red Wings rewarded Howard in April, signing him to a six-year, $31.8 million contract extension.Handling the stress of playing goalie in Detroit is not easy. Photos of Howard's Stanley Cup-winning predecessors, Dominik Hasek, Osgood and Mike Vernon, are displayed in the hallway leading to the Red Wings' locker room from the Joe Louis Arena ice."I try to tune it all out, but sometimes you hear things anyways; we're human," Howard said. "The only things I can control are how I prepare and how I play. I've got a great team around me, and we're all working hard toward winning. That's all that matters."The captain Henrik Zetterberg gave a wry smile when asked about Howard's performance."I do hear some things at times about goalies in our city," Zetterberg said. "I don't know if it is a tradition here that you're not really believing in your goaltending, but I don't know what he needs to do to get people believing in him."We in here know he's a really good goalie; it's been shown."
Mike Krzyzewski will remain the head coach of the USA Basketball men's national team through the Summer Olympics in 2016. Since he took over in 2005, Krzyzewski helped to lead the program's resurgence, collecting Olympic gold medals in 2008 and 2012 and a world basketball title in 2010.At the London Games last summer, most signs pointed to Krzyzewski leaving the job, which he performed in addition to his regular work as head coach at powerhouse Duke.His decision was first reported by Sports Illustrated on Wednesday and confirmed by a person with knowledge of Krzyzewski's plans. That person was not authorized to speak publicly because USA Basketball had scheduled a media teleconference for Thursday morning.In an e-mail message, USA Basketball did not name Krzyzewski but said the coach it would name Thursday would conduct a 2013 mini-camp and work the 2014 F.I.B.A. World Cup and the next Olympics.Krzyzewski, 66, is the winningest coach in college basketball, his victory count now at 957. His record in international competition is 62-1.After the Summer Olympics in 2008, Jerry Colangelo, managing director of USA Basketball, met with Krzyzewski in Chicago and convinced him to return over deep dish pizza and red wine. No word on if similar methods were employed this time around.
PITTSBURGH — It was hard to tell whether the Pittsburgh Pirates were heading on a road trip or getting ready for a Stanley Cup playoff game after beating the Chicago Cubs 4-2 on Thursday for their fourth straight win.All of the Pirates' players and coaches wore Pittsburgh Penguins' replica jerseys as they got ready to embark on a road trip to Milwaukee and Detroit. The Penguins even sent a custom-made No. 13 sweater to manager Clint Hurdle.The Penguins lead the Ottawa Senators 3-1 in their best-of-seven Eastern Conference semifinal."There's nothing much like playoff hockey," Hurdle said. "We're just getting into the spirit."Utility infielder Brandon Inge took things one step farther before the game, arriving in the Pirates' clubhouse dressed in a full hockey uniform and rollerblades."It's something fun, something to change things up a little bit during a long season. Plus, we've got to support our boys," said Pirates second baseman Neil Walker, a Pittsburgh-area native.The Pirates won for the 11th time in 13 games as Andrew McCutchen had three hits and two RBIs.Leadoff hitter Starling Marte singled and scored in each of the first two innings as Pittsburgh built an early 4-0 lead. The Pirates moved a season-best 11 games over .500."We're playing good baseball and I don't think we've reached our ceiling yet," McCutchen said. "The pitching has been good all year but the hitting has kind of been up and down. The bats are eventually going to come around and we should be even better when that happens."The Cubs lost their fourth in a row.Edwin Jackson (1-7) gave up two runs in the first inning and two more in the second. He gave up six hits and struck out six in three innings and has a 6.11 ERA through 10 starts."I got beat with men on base with balls up in the zone," Jackson said. "I had some times when I got it down but in vital situations when I needed to keep the ball down I wasn't doing that, and that pretty much sums up the game."Jackson is in his first season with the Cubs after signing a four-year, $52 million contract over the winter as a free agent."I think at times he tries too hard to justify his contract and overthrows," Chicago manager Dale Sveum said. "I think he needs to relax and just be Edwin Jackson, the guy we liked enough to sign."Reliever Vin Mazzaro (3-0) pitched 2 1-3 scoreless innings. He replaced starter Jeanmar Gomez in the fourth inning following a rain delay of 1 hour, 47 minutes."I knew about a half-hour before the delay ended that I was going to come in to pitch, but you never know how the long the delay might last, so I tried to stay as prepared as possible," Mazzaro said. "I felt like I was ready to go."Gomez allowed one run and three hits in 3 2-3 innings."I thought I had really good stuff today and control of all my pitches," Gomez said. "Then it started raining hard and that was it. I think I could have pitched a lot longer but I'm frustrated about it. You can't do anything about the rain."Jason Grilli pitched a 1-2-3 ninth inning and is a perfect 19-for-19 in save opportunities.Marte led off the bottom of the first inning with a single, stole second with one out and scored on McCutchen's single. McCutchen stole second and scored on Michael McKenry's single.Marte singled in the second and scored on Travis Snider's triple that rolled to the 410-foot notch in left-center field. McCutchen added his second RBI single.The Cubs got a run in the fourth when David DeJesus led off with a double and scored on Anthony Rizzo's grounder. The Cubs had runners on the corners when two outs when play was halted, but Mazzaro got Welington Castillo to hit an inning-ending groundout after the delay.Chicago cut the deficit to 4-2 in the seventh with Darwin Barney singling in Castillo, who had walked.NOTES: Jackson was struck in the rear end by a line drive off the bat of Marte in the second inning. Castro jammed his right ankle while being thrown out trying to stretch a single into a double in the sixth inning by RF Travis Snider. Both Chicago players were able to stay in the game. ... The Cubs' road trip continues Friday night at Cincinnati with RHP Scott Feldman (4-3, 2.19) facing Reds RHP Bronson Arroyo (4-4, 3.28). ... RHP A.J. Burnett (3-4, 2.57) is scheduled to start for Pittsburgh at Milwaukee against RHP Marco Estrada (3-2, 5.44).
CHICAGO — Jeff Keppinger drove in the winning run on a single in the 11th and John Danks was solid in his season debut and the Chicago White Sox beat the Miami Marlins 4-3 on Friday night.Paul Konerko started the rally with a one-out single. Pinch runner Tyler Greene moved to third when Dayan Viciedo singled off the glove of second baseman Derek Dietrich.Nate Jones (1-4) pitched two-thirds of an inning for the win.Danks allowed three runs and four hits in six innings in his first start since undergoing shoulder surgery in August to repair a capsule tear and remove debris in his rotator cuff and biceps. He struck out five, walked none and hit a batter in the opener of the interleague series.Danks went 3-4 with a 5.70 ERA in nine starts last season as the team's opening day starter. He last pitched May 19, 2012, against the Cubs. The left-hander made four minor-league rehab starts before debuting Friday.Marlins starter Tom Koehler gave up three runs in six innings in his first career interleague start. He struck out three and walked one. Koehler remained in the game after a Keppinger line drive struck him on the back of his right shoulder in the third inning.The Marlins tied it 3-3 in the seventh. Marcell Ozuna led off with a double, forcing Danks from the game.Ozuna advanced on a Justin Ruggiano single off Matt Lindstrom and scored on a Miguel Olivo sacrifice fly. After a Nick Green single loaded the bases, Lindstrom got a double play to end the inning.Konerko hit a go-ahead, two-out single off Koehler for a 3-2 White Sox lead in the sixth. Alex Rios scored after extending his career-high and AL-leading hitting streak to 18 games with a one-out single.Dietrich hit a two-run homer off Danks for a 2-0 Marlins lead in the fourth. Placido Polanco scored after leading off with a single for the Marlins' first hit.The White Sox scored two runs to tie it 2-2 in the fifth. Keppinger's RBI groundout scored Viciedo, who reached on a force out and advanced on a Gillaspie double. Hector Gimenez hit a two-out single to tie it.The White Sox threatened in the 10th. Keppinger led off with a single before Chad Qualls hit Gimenez with a pitch. Both runners advanced on an Alejandro De Aza sacrifice bunt. After Qualls intentionally walked Alexei Ramirez, Rios hit into an inning-ending double play with a close call at first that brought out manager Robin Ventura to talk to umpire Angel Hernandez. Replays showed Rios' foot on the bag before the throw arrived.The Marlins put a runner on third in the eighth of the tie game after Adeiny Hechavarria singled, stole second and advanced on an error. He was stranded when Ozuna grounded out. The Marlins also put two on in the 10th before the White Sox got a double play.NOTES: The White Sox are hopeful LHP Chris Sale will make his scheduled start on Tuesday against the Cubs. He missed his start Wednesday against the Red Sox because of shoulder tendinitis. "In my mind, I'm going for sure, but I don't know what (the team has)," Sale said. "That's the target. That's what we're shooting for, but just like anything else, it's out of my hands." Sale said he felt good going through his shoulder program and he plans to play long toss Saturday. ... White Sox 2B Gordon Beckham won't play in his rehab assignment at Triple-A Charlotte until at least Wednesday because he is experiencing soreness in his left hand, general manager Rick Hahn said. The hamate bone in Beckham's left hand was removed April 16, and he began a rehab assignment May 18. "It's nothing to be alarmed about," Hahn said. ... Miami RHP Alex Sanabia said he didn't know it was illegal to spit on a baseball the way he did Monday against the Phillies, and that he did it just to get a better grip. Sanabia, who was caught on video spitting after allowing a home run to Philadelphia's Domonic Brown, said he hasn't been contacted by Major League Baseball. ... To make room for Danks, the White Sox optioned LHP Donnie Veal to Triple-A. ... Marlins RHP Kevin Slowey played long toss and threw off flat ground Friday and is expected to throw a bullpen session Saturday. Slowey left his start Wednesday against Philadelphia in the sixth inning with a strained left lat muscle, but said he anticipates making his start Tuesday against Tampa Bay.
CHICAGO — Miami Marlins pitcher Alex Sanabia said he didn't know it was illegal to spit directly onto a baseball.He knows now.Sanabia said Friday he spit on a baseball earlier in the week to get a better grip, not to get more movement on his pitches. He also repeated he didn't know it was illegal."I didn't know. I was in my zone and just grooving. It's something you live and learn from. I didn't mean anything bad by it or I didn't mean to do anything more," Sanabia said. "It's something that showed up that way and people all of a sudden just create their own perception of."Sanabia and Marlins manager Mike Redmond said they haven't been contacted by Major League Baseball about the incident, which happened during the second inning of Monday's game against the Philadelphia Phillies in Miami. Sanabia had given up a home run to the Phillies' Domonic Brown, and then cameras caught the 24-year-old pitcher spitting on the ball."I don't know what they expect from spitting on it," Sanabia said. "My intention wasn't to be like 'Let's get more movement.' My intention was I need more grip."Sanabia was asked if he had done this before and said he hadn't, instead licking his fingers. The reason he chose to spit directly on the ball was because it was "super slick.""I think he's going to be way more aware of that. I don't think he's going to do that again," Redmond said. "I don't think he even realized he did it."Sanabia (3-6) is scheduled to pitch Sunday for the Marlins in the finale of their three-game series against the White Sox. On Monday he ended a personal five-game losing streak, pitching 6 1-3 innings and allowing just the Brown home run in a 5-1 Miami win.
DETROIT — The Chicago Blackhawks began the year with a record-breaking start.The NHL's best team during the regular season will have to finish the season strong to avoid flopping out of the playoffs in the second round.Jakub Kindl scored on a power play in the second period, Daniel Cleary had an empty-net goal and Jimmy Howard made 28 saves to help the Detroit Red Wings earn a 2-0 win Thursday night that puts the Blackhawks on the brink of elimination.After losing Game 1, the seventh-seeded Red Wings have surged into control of the second round series by handing the Blackhawks their first three-game losing streak of the year.Is Detroit coach Mike Babcock surprised that his team that barely made the playoffs is a win away from the Western Conference finals."If you would ask me two months ago, I would be shocked," he acknowledged.Game 5 is Saturday night in Chicago, where goaltender Corey Crawford is confident the team can win the first of three straight games."We've gone on streaks before," Crawford said. "We just have to keep playing hard and it's going to have to turn our way."Chicago's chances will improve if captain Jonathan Toews can score and keep his cool.He couldn't do either in Game 4.When Howard wasn't using his glove or pads to deny Toews, Detroit's skaters were rattling him with a physical presence that made him uncomfortable."Eventually, something's got to give," Toews said. "We're too good a team. We've got too much talent."For as hard as we're working, something's got to go our way."Crawford did a solid job in his net, but he couldn't kick his right leg out quick enough to stop Kindl's shot on a power play midway through the second period and he was on the bench in favor of an extra skater when Cleary sealed the victory in the final minute."The pressure is on them," Detroit defenseman Jonathan Ericsson said.Yes, it is.And, no one in the Windy City will want to extend the series more than Toews."We've got to find a way to force a Game 6," he said.The Blackhawks desperately need Toews to score and lead after he extended his goal drought in a composure-crumbling performance.Toews was called for three penalties in the second — two for high-sticking — and could've gone to the box a fourth time in the period for slashing Red Wings captain Henrik Zetterberg while an official stood between them."Emotions run high in some of these games, and my stick got a little loose there," he said. "I was playing hard. Sometimes that happens."The Red Wings took advantage of the second power play Toews gave them when Kindl sent a low shot to the near corner from the top of the left circle."We'd like to keep him in the box," Ericsson said. "He's not as good for them in the box."Chicago had killed its first 30 penalties of the playoffs and matched the 2001 St. Louis Blues' feat of playing eight postseason games without giving up a power-play goal, the longest such streak since 1988.The Blackhawks had a power play with 4:45 left in the game when Kindl was called for hooking, but they couldn't tie the game.Crawford made 25 saves and allowed one goal, after giving up seven goals in the previous two games.Howard was just a little bit better, earning his first shutout of this postseason and the second of his career in the playoffs. He has helped the Red Wings win five of their last six games since trailing Anaheim 3-2 in the first round."He made a couple of big saves there," said Chicago's Patrick Sharp, who had five goals in five games against Minnesota and only one so far against Detroit. "We hit a few posts."Kindl scored his first goal of his first postseason to help the rapidly improving Red Wings pull within a win of their first trip to the Western Conference finals since 2009 when they got past Chicago and went on to lose Game 7 in a Stanley Cup finals rematch against Pittsburgh."Biggest goal of my life so far," Kindl said.Toews has gone 10 postseason games without a goal — dating to last year's playoffs — in what is the longest scoring skid for a former Conn Smythe winner since Claude Lemieux went 20 games without a goal from 2000 through 2009, according to STATS.Toews, who has three goals in his last 30 playoff games, broke a tie for his second longest streak without a goal in the postseason and trails his 14-game skid that spanned 2010 and 2011.Chicago coach Joel Quenneville insisted Toews, who he put on a line with Patrick Kane, is doing a lot of things and isn't the only one struggling to score."We just have to find a way to get more about of everybody," Quenneville said.NOTES: Since winning the Stanley Cup in 2010, Chicago has lost in the first round twice and is a loss away from a second-round exit. ...... Chicago hadn't given up a power-play goal since April 22. ... Detroit D Danny DeKeyser, who broke his right thumb in the first round and was ruled out for the playoffs, said he is holding out hope that he can come back if his teammates can advance.
CHICAGO — The power play returned in the second half of the second period. All it took was one brilliant tip by one of the youngest players on the ice and a well-placed shot by the captain of a team in trouble.All that tinkering paid off when the Chicago Blackhawks needed it the most.Jonathan Toews and Andrew Shaw each had a timely power-play goal, and the Blackhawks avoided elimination with a 4-1 victory over the Detroit Red Wings on Saturday night in Game 5 of the second-round playoff series."I've been saying it over and over the last couple of days: Stay positive and stick with it and things have to turn your away eventually, and they did tonight," Toews said.The 21-year-old Shaw added his third career playoff goal in the third as the Blackhawks stopped the Red Wings' three-game winning streak by creating chaos in front of Jimmy Howard, who had shut down Chicago's attack while moving Detroit to the brink of the Western Conference finals.With the sellout crowd chanting "Ho-ward! Ho-ward!" in an attempt to shake him, the standout goalie made 41 saves in another solid performance. But the Blackhawks created enough quality chances that he simply couldn't stop all of them."We knew it. We knew we were going to have to weather the storm early against them and I thought we did that," Howard said. "We got it going there, but they just kept coming and coming."Bryan Bickell scored the first goal of the game and Corey Crawford had 25 stops for Chicago, which managed only two goals during its first three-game losing streak of the season.Daniel Cleary scored for the second straight game for Detroit, which will have another chance to close out the top-seeded Blackhawks in Game 6 on Monday night. That will be at home, too, where the Red Wings are 4-1 in this postseason."We weren't good enough tonight as far as our plan we have to play to be successful," Red Wings coach Mike Babcock said. "There was too much space and they were just freewheeling around having fun. It just goes to show you how hard it is to win and you've got to compete and do things right in order to be successful."Detroit trailed 1-0 before Cleary completed a strong rush during a 4-on-4 stretch in the second period, beating Crawford from a tough angle on the left side for his fourth goal of the postseason. Henrik Zetterberg set up the score by throwing the puck across the crease while Brendan Smith was streaking toward the net.Back came Chicago, which responded with two of its best power plays in weeks. The Blackhawks had converted only three of their first 25 chances in the postseason, and coach Joel Quenneville tried all sorts of combinations in practice to no avail.He finally got what he wanted in Game 5.First, Shaw had a perfect tip on Duncan Keith's slap shot to make it 2-1 at 13:08. Then Justin Abdelkader received his second penalty, this one for cross checking, and Toews wristed a shot off Howard's facemask and into the upper right corner."Good things come from shooting the puck," Shaw said. "There's rebounds, there's loose pucks, and we had all guys converging to the net and we just kept picking them up and hemmed them in there and tired them out and we were rewarded."It was Toews' first playoff goal since April 21, 2012, at Phoenix, snapping a scoreless postseason drought of 10 games. It also came after he appeared frustrated while committing three penalties in the second period of Game 4.The captain was mobbed by his teammates after he skated to the boards, and the crowd of 22,014 roared its approval."It is a relief. It's a confidence builder," Toews said. "You know the way you're working is adding up to something. You want to keep that going now. If I keep shooting the puck there's a good chance it's going in. The goaltender has to make a stop."Chicago got off to a good start with a 4-1 victory in Game 1 of the series, but it had been all Detroit since that opening win. The Red Wings turned up the pressure on defense and Howard had an amazing 86 stops on 88 shots over three straight wins that pushed the Blackhawks to the edge of an early postseason exit.Back at home after managing just one goal in a pair of losses in Detroit, the Blackhawks came out with a spirited opening period. Brent Seabrook, who played only 12 minutes in Game 4, and Bickell each delivered a huge hit in the opening minutes.Bickell then plowed ahead to set up Chicago's first goal since the third period of Game 3. Howard turned away Bickell's first charge, but he skated around to the other side of the net and was right there to slam home on the rebound when Patrick Kane was denied.Bickell pumped both his arms after he gave the Blackhawks their first lead in a week. It was the fourth goal of the season for physical forward, but his first since Game 4 of the first-round series against Minnesota.The Red Wings then rushed down the ice, and Crawford turned away quality opportunities for Joakim Andersson and Gustav Nyquist. Crawford made 11 saves in the opening period."It's hard to match that when their backs were against the wall," Cleary said. "But we have to be ready to go like our backs are against the wall on Monday."NOTES: Chicago Blackhawks Charities donated their portion of the Split the Pot money from Game 5 to the OK Strong Disaster Relief Fund to benefit the victims of the deadly tornadoes in Oklahoma.
CHICAGO — Conor Gillaspie hit a run-scoring single in the ninth inning to score Dewayne Wise, lifting the Chicago White Sox to a 2-1 win over the Miami Marlins on Saturday night.Derek Dietrich homered in the top of the ninth to spoil Jake Peavy's shutout bid, but in the bottom half, Gillaspie drove in Wise — who had come in as a defensive replacement — to give the White Sox their eighth win in 11 games.Peavy (6-2) struck out five and allowed six hits in the complete-game effort, his longest outing of the season.Ryan Webb (1-3) gave up Gillaspie's single to take the loss for Miami, which dropped its fourth straight and 11th in the last 13 games.Alexei Ramirez gave Chicago a 1-0 lead with an RBI double in the third. Juan Pierre mishandled the ball in the left-field corner — but wasn't charged with an error — allowing Alejandro De Aza to score from first.Ricky Nolasco allowed one run and eight hits and struck out six in 7 2-3 innings for Miami but couldn't earn his second consecutive win after beating Arizona on May 19. The Marlins right-hander has allowed two runs over his last two starts.With his home run, Dietrich reached base for the 14th straight time to start his career, which is second in Marlins history behind Kevin Millar's 17 games in 1999.In the eighth, Peavy allowed a one-out double to Greg Dobbs and walked Adeiny Hechavarria but escaped the inning by getting Rob Brantly to pop out and Juan Pierre to fly out.Peavy, who lost his previous start at the Angels on May 19, giving up four runs in six innings, had no such problems Saturday until the ninth. Facing a Miami team that entered play hitting .221, Peavy was only threatened during the second and eighth before Dietrich's home run.Nolasco was also strong. After Gillaspie singled in the fourth, Nolasco retired nine straight until Jeff Keppinger's infield single with one out in the seventh.Keppinger went 2 for 3 and is hitting .434 (10 for 23) over his last seven games. Gillaspie also had three hits.Alex Rios went 0 for 4, snapping his 18-game hitting streak, which had been the longest in the American League this season.Miami, which hit into three double plays Friday, had its first scoring chance in the second when Justin Ruggiano grounded into one with no outs. Marcell Ozuna and Chris Coghlan had singled, but Miami didn't score after the double play and Greg Dobbs' strikeout.With the single, Ozuna extended his hitting streak to 10 games.Chicago loaded the bases in its half of the second but Hector Gimenez grounded out to end the inning. Gimenez got his second straight start with Tyler Flowers missing Saturday's game because of back spasms. White Sox manager Robin Ventura said Flowers felt "pretty much" the same as he did Friday.NOTES: White Sox LHP Chris Sale, who was scratched from his start Wednesday, played catch off flat ground Saturday. He's expected to throw a bullpen session Sunday and start Tuesday. . Marlins RHP Nathan Eovaldi pitched five innings and struck out five in a rehab start at Single-A Jupiter. Eovaldi hasn't pitched in the majors this season after going on the DL with right shoulder inflammation. . John Danks, who made his first start for the White Sox in over a year Friday night, said his left shoulder felt good one day after making 76 pitches. . Marlins manager Mike Redmond said 2B Donovan Solano, who was placed on the DL May 7 with a left intercostal strain, will be sent to extended spring training Monday. . INF Angel Sanchez was outrighted to Triple-A Charlotte after being reinstated from a rehab assignment for lower back spasms. The move clears a spot on Chicago's 40-man roster. . Sunday's pitching matchup is Miami's Alex Sanabia (3-6, 4.56 ERA) against Chicago's Dylan Axelrod (2-3, 4.13).
NEW YORK — Light-hitting pitcher Mike Minor homered for his first two RBIs in the majors and struck out 10 as the Atlanta Braves posted their second win in a matter of hours, beating the New York Mets 6-0 Saturday for their eighth straight victory.Earlier, Dan Uggla hit a go-ahead single in the 10th inning and the Braves won 7-5 in the resumption of a game suspended because of rain Friday night after eight innings with the score tied.Minor (6-2) then pitched 7 1-3 innings of three-hit ball, sending the Mets to their fifth loss in a row overall and eighth straight at Citi Field.Minor was hardly a force at the plate coming in — he was a paltry 8 for 108 (.074) in four seasons, striking out in exactly half of those at-bats. He perked up for his first two-hit game in the majors.In the third inning, Minor singled to become the Braves' first baserunner of the game, and a bat boy brought him a warmup jacket on a blustery, cool evening. The next time up in the fifth, with a light rain, the 25-year-old lefty never had time to get chilly.Minor hit a two-run drive inside the left field foul pole off Dillon Gee (2-6) that broke a scoreless tie and touched off a five-run burst. Minor homered after a two-out single by Chris Johnson, and they smiled the whole way from home plate back to the bench.Minor's teammates celebrated the shot, too, and big first baseman Freddie Freeman hugged the pitcher and playfully jumped up and down with him in the dugout.The Braves got six straight hits in their surge, including doubles by Justin Upton and Andrelton Simmons and singles by Jason Heyward and Freeman.There was a brief delay when Minor batted in the seventh because the wind whipped up the dirt and blew more than 150 hot dog wrappers and other pieces of debris all over the field. Stadium workers cleared the mess when the half-inning ended, shortly after Freeman's second RBI single.A fireworks show was scheduled for after the game. The seats were nearly empty, with few bundled-up fans sticking around.The Braves and Mets took 42 minutes to complete the resumption, and there was a 36-minute break between the games.The suspended game picked up right where it left off, at the start of the ninth inning. There was no national anthem, fans were scattered in the stands and it was cloudy and windy with temperatures in the low 50s.After Upton grounded into an inning-ending double play with runners at the corners in the Atlanta ninth, the Braves won it in the 10th.Freeman, who homered Friday night before the rain came, drew a leadoff walk from Brandon Lyon (1-2) and took third on a double by Brian McCann.Uggla, who hit a late home run the previous night at Citi Field, followed with his tiebreaking single. B.J. Upton later squeezed home pinch-runner Jordan Schafer.Anthony Varvaro (2-0) pitched a scoreless ninth. He worked the eighth a day earlier and gave up two runs that made it 5-all.Craig Kimbrel escaped a two-on, no-out jam in the 10th for his 15th save in 18 tries.The Braves' previous suspended game was April 5, 1997, against the Cubs — it was the second game ever played at Turner Field and was stopped because of rain in the seventh inning. Atlanta won the resumption the next day.The Mets lost in their first suspended game since Aug. 6, 1986, when the second game of a doubleheader against the Cubs was halted after the seventh for darkness — Wrigley Field didn't have lights then. The Mets won the completion the next day.NOTES: Ike Davis singled in the Mets 10th. He'd struck out in all four at-bats Friday night, leaving him in a 1-for-42 rut. He struck out as a pinch-hitter in the second game, and remains hitless in his last 26 tries with runners in scoring position. ... Justin Upton singled hard off reliever Robert Carson's leg in the seventh. Carson stayed in. ... Braves RHP Julio Teheran (3-1, 3.99) starts Sunday night vs. RHP Shaun Marcum (0-5, 6.59).
Robbie Rogers is expected to join the Los Angeles Galaxy and become the first openly gay player on a major men's professional team in North America.The Galaxy are expected to introduce Rogers, 26, as a member of the Major League Soccer team at a news conference Saturday. Rogers announced that he was gay in February, when he also announced his retirement from soccer.Jason Collins, the N.B.A. player who announced that he was gay in an article in Sports Illustrated this month, is not under contract with a team.Rogers's M.L.S. rights belonged to the Chicago Fire, who acquired them in a preseason trade two weeks before Rogers came out as gay. Various reports Friday night said the Galaxy would send striker Mike Magee, a Chicago native, to the Fire in exchange for the right to sign Rogers.Rogers played in M.L.S. with the Columbus Crew before moving in 2011 to England, where he played two injury-filled seasons with Leeds United and Stevenage, a third-division team. After Rogers returned to the United States, he began working out with the Galaxy, coached by Bruce Arena, who previously coached Rogers on the United States national team.The Fire had acquired the rights to Rogers in a Feb. 4 trade with the Crew, who won the 2008 M.L.S. Cup with Rogers's help. But Rogers, a speedy wing, had said he was determined to play close to home — he grew up in Huntington Beach, Calif. — if he decided to resume his career."I don't want to go to Chicago," Rogers told ESPN Radio in May. "I think if it comes down to you can only play in Chicago, then I probably won't go back. I need to do it somewhere where I'm totally 100 percent comfortable."The trade needs M.L.S. approval, and Rogers also needs to acquire an international transfer certificate because he last played in England. He has not played a competitive match since January.
Add another near miss in the 2013 baseball season. This time it was the Detroit right-hander Anibal Sanchez who fell just short of a no-hitter.Sanchez's bid was broken up with one out in the ninth inning Friday night when Minnesota's Joe Mauer hit a clean single up the middle. That was the only hit Sanchez allowed in the host Tigers' 6-0 victory over the Twins. It was the fourth one-hitter of his career, to go along with a no-hitter he threw as a rookie back in 2006."It's not that I go to the mound and want to do something special, it's just that I want to go nine innings, go deeper, get a good command, get a good game," Sanchez said.After seven no-hitters in 2012, baseball is without one so far this season. There have been plenty of close calls. Before Sanchez, four other pitchers had already thrown one-hitters in 2013, according to STATS.Mauer is making a habit of playing spoiler. It is the third time in his career he has broken up a no-hitter in the ninth inning, according to STATS.Sanchez (5-4), who struck out 17 batters in a game last month, struck out 12 on Friday and allowed three walks. Miguel Cabrera had a two-run single for Detroit to raise his major-league-leading total to 57 runs batted in.NATIONALS 5, PHILLIES 2 Jordan Zimmermann became the National League's first eight-game winner, and Washington produced a winning start to its homestand against Philadelphia.Zimmermann (8-2) allowed two runs and six hits with no walks in seven innings, actually raising his earned run average to 1.71.Nationals Manager Davey Johnson said before the game that he would not shave again until his lineup started hitting. As it turned out, the team scored the most runs it had in a week.REDS 7, CUBS 4 Joey Votto extended his hitting streak to 12 games with a homer, and Ryan Hanigan and Brandon Phillips also homered, powering host Cincinnati to its fourth straight win.The Reds have won 12 of 15 games, surging to a season-high 12 games over .500.ORIOLES 10, BLUE JAYS 6 Chris Davis hit his major-league-leading 16th home run, and Nick Markakis had three R.B.I. as Baltimore won at Toronto.J. J. Hardy, Danny Valencia and Adam Jones also had home runs for the Orioles, who lead the majors with 66 homers.RED SOX 8, INDIANS 1 John Lackey limited Cleveland to two hits in seven innings, and Mike Carp hit a three-run homer to power host Boston.Lackey (3-4) struck out eight and walked three. Only 2 of the 25 batters he faced hit the ball out of the infield.The Indians fell out of first place in the A.L. Central and a half-game behind Detroit. The Red Sox remained a game behind the A.L. East-leading Yankees.BREWERS 2, PIRATES 1 Marco Estrada gave up one run in seven innings, and Alex Gonzalez had a two-run double for host Milwaukee.Estrada (4-2) retired the first 14 Pittsburgh batters before a two-out bloop single in the fifth inning. He struck out eight Pirates and did not walk a batter.ANGELS 5, ROYALS 2 Mike Trout had his 21st multihit game, Jason Vargas pitched into the eighth inning and visiting Los Angeles extended its winning streak to six games.Trout had two hits, stole his 11th base and scored two runs, including one on a wild pitch. He is hitting .366 in May.WHITE SOX 4, MARLINS 3 Jeff Keppinger drove in the winning run with a single, and John Danks was solid in his season debut as host Chicago topped Miami in 11 innings.ATHLETICS 6, ASTROS 5 Chris Young connected on a three-run homer in the ninth inning to lift visiting Oakland over Houston.DODGERS SUPPORT MATTINGLY Don Mattingly is not in immediate danger of being fired as manager of the last-place Los Angeles Dodgers, with the team president Stan Kasten saying none of the players are asking for his dismissal, either."I do expect things to turn around," Kasten said before the Dodgers opened a three-game stand against St. Louis. "I expect Donnie to be here for a long time."
DETROIT — A drastic reversal of fortune in the Western Conference semifinals has left the Chicago Blackhawks discouraged and on the verge of elimination.The Blackhawks began the season on a record-setting tear, earning at least a point in 24 straight games, and went on to win the Presidents' Trophy for the league's best record. But the Detroit Red Wings, who slid into the playoffs as the West's No. 7 seed, lead the teams' second-round series, three games to one.The Blackhawks have lost three straight, their longest slide of the season. Game 5 is in Chicago on Saturday."We're all frustrated," Chicago forward Patrick Sharp said. "It's not about one guy. We're a whole team in here."Sharp added: "There's no use hanging our heads. Our backs are against the wall. We have to play our best game in Chicago. There's no other options. We can dig in here."The Red Wings' confidence has been growing in the playoffs, while the Blackhawks appear to be coming apart. Five Blackhawks shots have hit goal posts in the last two games, and nothing seems to be clicking.Still, the Red Wings are not taking anything for granted."They're going to play even more desperate on Saturday night," said Detroit goalie Jimmy Howard, who recorded his first shutout of the 2013 playoffs with a 2-0 win in Game 4 on Thursday. "We're going to have to match it. We can't rest on our laurels here."Sharp, the Blackhawks' top playoff scorer with six goals, has no goals and one assist during Chicago's three-game skid. Other key components of Chicago's offense, wing Marian Hossa and the captain Jonathan Toews, have no points during the streak.Howard's strong goaltending and the Red Wings' defense are among the main reasons for the Blackhawks' slump. Another sign of trouble for Chicago is that the usually calm Toews has had emotional outbursts.He displayed a critical lack of poise during the second period of Game 4, taking three consecutive penalties in 5 minutes 34 seconds. Toews strongly objected to the calls, screaming at the officials as he skated to the penalty box. He also sniped at the Red Wings between plays.In the second period, Toews spent 6:04 on the ice and 6 minutes stewing in the box. His second penalty, for high sticking, led to the game-winning goal by Jakub Kindl. It was the first power-play goal the Blackhawks had allowed in nearly a month, ending their postseason streak of killing 30 consecutive penalties.Toews, known as a smart and offensively gifted player, has no goals during the playoffs."I'm not going to say anything about the officiating," Toews said after Game 4. "Obviously, I disagree with the calls. It's in the heat of the moment; they see what they see."He added: "Eventually, something's got to give. We're too good a team. We've got too much talent. For as hard as we're working, something's got to go our way."The Red Wings, particularly the captain Henrik Zetterberg, have been agitating Toews with physical play."We'd like to keep him in the box," defenseman Jonathan Ericsson said of Toews's penalties. "He's not as good for them in the box."Howard added that Zetterberg's defense had caused much of Toews's frustration."He's all over him out there," Howard said. "He's really taking away his time and space out there and not really letting him generate much. When Z's out there and he's working as hard as he's working, it sends a message to the rest of the team that they have to do their part."Red Wings Coach Mike Babcock tried to put his team's playoff success in perspective, conceding that he had felt doubts about how Detroit would fare.Asked whether he was surprised to have a 3-1 series lead, Babcock said: "If you'd asked me two months ago, I would be shocked. We started playing better and better. Once we got through the Anaheim series, you go in thinking you have an opportunity."We're competing at a high, high level. There's a lot to be said for effort and battling."
CHICAGO — Jonathan Toews and Andrew Shaw each scored a power-play goal in the second period, and the Chicago Blackhawks avoided elimination with a 4-1 victory over the Detroit Red Wings on Saturday night in Game 5 of their second-round playoff series.Detroit leads the series, three games to two.Shaw added a goal in the third as the Blackhawks stopped the Red Wings' three-game winning streak by creating chaos in front of goalie Jimmy Howard, who had shut down Chicago's attack while moving Detroit to the brink of the Western Conference finals.Howard made 41 saves in another solid performance. But the Blackhawks created many quality chances, and he simply could not stop all of them.Bryan Bickell scored the first goal of the game, and Corey Crawford had 25 stops for Chicago, which had managed only two goals in the previous three games, its first three-game losing streak of the season.Daniel Cleary scored for the second straight game for Detroit, which will have another chance to close out the top-seeded Blackhawks in Game 6 on Monday night. That will be at home, where the Red Wings are 4-1 this postseason.
CHICAGO — Dayan Viciedo and Alex Rios each threw out a runner at the plate, and the Chicago White Sox beat Alex Sanabia and the Miami Marlins 5-3 on Sunday to sweep their weekend series.The White Sox have won five of six and nine of 12 to climb back to .500 for the first time since they were 4-4 on April 10. Dylan Axelrod (3-3) benefited from a two-run homer by Adam Dunn and a tiebreaking two-run double from Alejandro De Aza to pick up his third consecutive victory.Sanabia returned to the mound for the first time since cameras caught him spitting on the ball during a start against Philadelphia last Monday. He said he didn't know it was illegal, and it looks as if Major League Baseball has no plans to discipline the 24-year-old right-hander.Sanabia (3-7) pitched into the seventh inning against the Phillies to end a personal five-game losing streak. But he was unable to sustain that success against Chicago (24-24).Dunn drove the first pitch he saw in the first inning over the wall in left for an opposite-field shot that snapped an 0-for-17 rut. The big slugger, who is playing through a back issue, has six homers in his last 12 games and 12 overall on the season.De Aza drove in two more with a two-out drive into the gap in left-center in the second, lifting the White Sox to a 4-2 lead.Marcell Ozuna, Justin Ruggiano and Nick Green each had two hits and an RBI for Miami, which has dropped five straight and 12 of 14. Sanabia allowed four runs and six hits in four innings.Ozuna, Chris Coghlan and Ruggiano started the second with consecutive singles to bring home one run, but Coghlan was easily cut down by Viciedo while trying to score on Ruggiano's base hit into left field. The throw beat Coghlan to the plate, and Hector Gimenez held on when the center fielder made an attempt to dislodge the ball.Rios bobbled Ruggiano's single to right in the sixth, then recovered in time to throw out Ozuna in a close play at home. Marlins manager Mike Redmond came out for a brief argument before returning to the dugout.Rios tacked on an RBI single in the eighth to extend Chicago's lead to 5-3, giving the White Sox some momentum going into four straight games against the crosstown Cubs beginning Monday night.Axelrod was charged with three runs and six hits in 5 1-3 innings. Matt Lindstrom, Matt Thornton and Jesse Crain then combined to get the ball to Addison Reed, who worked the ninth for his 17th save in 18 chances.Crain pitched a perfect eighth to run his scoreless streak to 20 consecutive outings covering 18 1-3 innings. Reed has converted his last seven save opportunities.NOTES: Marlins reliever Wade LeBlanc pitched three perfect innings. ... The White Sox traded minor league INF Drew Garcia to the Colorado Rockies for a player to be named. The 27-year-old Garcia hit .222 with 12 RBIs in 24 games for Triple-A Charlotte this season. ... White Sox manager Robin Ventura said C Tyler Flowers (back spasms) was available, but he wanted to hold him out as a precaution. Flowers has missed three consecutive games. ... White Sox LHP Chris Sale, who was scratched from his start on Wednesday due to mild shoulder tendinitis, remains in line to start Tuesday against the Cubs. ... Miami faces Tampa Bay on Monday afternoon, with Marlins RHP Jose Fernandez (2-2, 3.31 ERA) opposing RHP Jake Odorizzi (0-0, 5.40 ERA). ... White Sox LHP Jose Quintana (3-1, 3.48 ERA) faces Cubs RHP Jeff Samardzija (2-6, 3.25 ERA) on Monday night in the first of four consecutive games between the crosstown rivals.
CHICAGO — The Chicago Cubs placed reliever Kyuji Fujikawa on the 15-day disabled list Monday with a right forearm injury.The right-hander will undergo an MRI on Tuesday to see if this is related to a muscle strain from April.Fujikawa pitched 1 2-3 scoreless innings in a victory over Cincinnati on Sunday before leaving with the injury.The Cubs replaced Fujikawa on the roster by claiming reliever Alex Burnett off waivers from Baltimore.The 32-year-old Fujikawa is 1-1 with a 5.25 ERA this season, although he has 14 strikeouts in 12 innings. The Japanese reliever signed a two-year contract for $9.5 million with the Cubs in the offseason.
URBANA, Ill. — Blaz Rola of Ohio State and Nicole Gibbs of Stanford won NCAA singles titles Monday.Gibbs repeated as women's champion after routing a hobbled Mary Weatherholt of Nebraska 6-2, 6-4. Rola, who is from Slovenia, became the first men's tennis champion for the Buckeyes, beating Jarmere Jenkins of Virginia 7-6 (8), 6-4."Unbelievable," Rola said. "It was tough. The conditions were not easy; very hot, humid and windy. But I kept my mind relaxed and fought for every point."Rola's parents watched the match live-streamed on the Internet from their home in Slovenia.Rola won on a disputed match point. His forehand landed near the line and was called in. Jenkins jumped up and down and pointed at a scuff mark where he said the ball landed. After the match, Rola conceded the ball appeared to have been out."I saw the mark (Jenkins) was pointing at, and if that was the ball mark, then unfortunately it was out of bounds," Rola said. "But, you know, that's tennis."Gibbs, a junior who plans to turn pro, had never played Weatherholt before. She was eventually able to dominate with a strong forehand after falling behind 3-2 early in the first set."I'm still a little bit in shock," Gibbs said. "We had never played each before, and coming into a match like this against a dark horse was a little unsettling. And then she hurt her knee and I was concerned that she had really hurt herself. It took a while to get back on track after that."Weatherholt hyperextended her right knee late in the second set returning a hard backhand and was able to continue only after it had been heavily taped.Her knee has been operated on three times, most recently in September. Weatherholt won the next game 40-15 before the knee stiffened and forced her to limp badly the remainder of the match."I have a history with this knee," she said. "I fought through it as best I could. But she is good, very good. I did the best I could, and it is what it is."
LOS ANGELES — Justin Williams figures he gets his knack for Game 7 heroics from the same source as the Los Angeles Kings' resilience throughout their grinding seven-game victory over the San Jose Sharks.Williams thinks the Kings all drew their inspiration from that Stanley Cup championship banner hanging over the Staples Center ice, and it carried them through to the Western Conference finals."It comes from the hunger of winning one and having that drive for another one," Williams said. "You don't want anyone else to raise the Cup but you."Williams scored two goals in the second period, and the Kings advanced with a 2-1 victory over San Jose on Tuesday night.Jonathan Quick made 25 saves as the defending champs finished off this agonizingly even series with their 14th consecutive home victory over the past two months, including seven straight in the postseason.Not much separated the teams in this thrilling all-California series, but the Kings cited last season's trophy for their poise and persistence in another nail-biting clincher."I certainly enjoy pressure situations," said Williams, whose goals were 2:57 apart. "I know everyone in this dressing room does. We pride ourselves on being a team that, push comes to shove, we're going to get it done. We've been through it before, and we know we can do it."Williams scored on a power-play tap-in and a one-timer, putting the Kings on top to stay. The veteran wing came in with an eight-game, goal-scoring drought, but the two-time Stanley Cup winner has scored nine points in his four career appearances in a Game 7.The Kings will face Chicago or Detroit when they attempt to reach the Stanley Cup finals for the third time. The Blackhawks will host the Red Wings in Game 7 on Wednesday night.The home team won all seven games in the series, as did the team that scored first. The fifth-seeded Kings barely rode their home-ice advantage to victory in their first potential elimination game in the last two years."They were as good as us," Los Angeles coach Darryl Sutter said. "We just scored."Quick and his teammates barely held off the Sharks in a frantic third period. Quick showed off his Conn Smythe Trophy form yet again, finishing the seven-game series by allowing just 10 goals."We're going to play every game like this, no matter what," Quick said. "It doesn't matter how many games it takes, especially against that team. We're fortunate to move forward."Antti Niemi stopped 16 shots, and Dan Boyle scored early in the third period for the Sharks, who fell just short of their third trip to the conference finals in four years. Even during a year of roster turnover and change, sixth-seeded San Jose remained a serious contender in its ninth straight playoff appearance."We thought we could come in here and steal a game," Sharks captain Joe Thornton said. "We played our hearts out, and that's all you can ask of each other. We had to lay it on the line in the third, and I thought we did. Jonathan Quick is just a fantastic goalie. ... We were just having so much fun. It's disappointing that it has to end, because we were really enjoying this. It's a tough way to finish."Los Angeles has won eight straight home playoff games, dating to last season's Stanley Cup clincher, but this one might have been the toughest. San Jose pressed the action throughout the third period after Williams' back-to-back goals put the Sharks in a mid-game hole, but Quick and the Kings' defense hung on for a win in Los Angeles' first Game 7 at home since 1989."The way they banded together and the way they played for each other was exceptional," San Jose coach Todd McLellan said. "It's a great sign for our organization. I think we have something to build on moving forward."After a scoreless first period in Game 7, featuring plenty of near-miss chances but just eight combined shots, the Sharks again came out solidly in the second. San Jose held the Kings without a shot for nearly 19 consecutive minutes.But the Kings finally broke through after San Jose's Brent Burns took an interference penalty near Los Angeles' net. Williams got the puck to the post and hacked at it until it slid behind Niemi for his first goal since Game 4 of the first round.Williams has been candid about his line's offensive struggles during this postseason, saying the Kings' top scorers had to get better for Los Angeles to advance.He did it again 2:57 later, taking a cross-ice pass from Anze Kopitar and beating Niemi from short range with a one-timer. Williams had just two assists in the Kings' previous eight playoff games.Niemi kept the Sharks in it with two stunning saves, preventing a natural hat trick by Williams several minutes before stopping Brad Richardson's one-timer. But Quick matched every save, and the Kings preserved their two-goal lead into the third.Niemi made another enormous save during 4-on-4 play early in the third, stopping Jeff Carter on a breakaway. Boyle ended Quick's bid for his third shutout of the series with a long shot through traffic with 14:34 to play, giving the defenseman his third goal of the postseason.Quick kept making astonishing saves until the final seconds, robbing Joe Pavelski on an open chance with his glove extended along the ice with 5:04 to play."We probably made one more mistake than they did, and we couldn't find a way to get another puck by Quick," McLellan said. "We would love to go back and play Game 2 over again, the last four or five minutes. That's probably one that we needed and didn't get."This series was even from the start, with neither team able to take more than momentary control. The clubs were similarly equal in the regular season, when the Kings' 3-2 home victory over San Jose in the finale pushed fifth-seeded Los Angeles ahead of the Sharks.That eventually led to the Kings starting a playoff series at home for the first time since 1992, but the uncanny home-ice advantage held: The home team has won 16 of these Pacific Division rivals' 17 meetings in the past two seasons.Los Angeles opened the series with two home victories, stealing Game 2 with a pair of power-play goals in the final minutes for the only major comeback of the series. The Sharks responded with two solid 2-1 victories at home, keeping the Kings' offense punchless away from Staples Center.Quick posted his second shutout of the series in Game 5, but San Jose forced a seventh game with another 2-1 victory at the Shark Tank last Sunday.NOTES: San Jose kept its lineup from Game 6, while Los Angeles replaced fourth-liner Jordan Nolan with rookie Tyler Toffoli. Hobbling Sharks F Marty Havlat missed the final four games of the series and six of seven overall, playing only 4:52 in Game 3. ... Kings C Jarret Stoll missed his sixth straight game with an apparent concussion after an illegal hit in Game 1 by Sharks F Raffi Torres, who was suspended for the rest of the series. Stoll is Los Angeles' third-line center and a key contributor on penalty-killing and faceoffs. ... The Kings hadn't hosted a Game 7 since Wayne Gretzky had a hat trick to beat the Edmonton Oilers in 1989 at the Forum. ... David and Victoria Beckham attended the game with their children, sitting behind Tom Cruise. Beckham, who became a fervent Kings fan last season, wrapped up his soccer career just two days earlier in France, sitting out Paris Saint-Germain's final match.
CHICAGO — The White Sox got the most out of this rainout.They found out ace Chris Sale is just fine.The left-hander was back on the mound after missing his last start due to tendinitis in his left shoulder and consistently reached 95 mph on the radar in a game that was postponed Tuesday night after three innings."It felt good to get back out there," Sale said. "I wish it would have went a little bit longer, but you can't control those things. My arm felt strong, felt good."Sale gave up three hits, including Scott Hairston's double and a two-run homer by Wellington Castillo in the second. He walked none and had one strikeout.White Sox manager Robin Ventura liked what he saw from Sale."He said he felt fine," Ventura said. "We'll find out later to the extent."Sale's next scheduled start is Sunday at Oakland, but with Tuesday's brief outing, he could be moved up to Saturday's game."In a day or two, we'll see what we do," White Sox pitching coach Don Cooper said. "But right now, we haven't decided."When asked, Sale lobbied for sooner rather than later."I'm game for anything," he said. "I pretty much look at this as kind of an extended bullpen. I don't think I threw but 40 (37 to be exact) pitches. I should be able to bounce back pretty quick."Added Cooper: "He gave up a couple of runs, but he's still fine."Sale entered the game with 23 consecutive scoreless innings, which remains intact due to the rainout. It's the longest stint by a White Sox pitcher since 2010, when reliever J.J. Putz pitched 27 scoreless innings. As for White Sox starting pitchers, Mark Buehrle went 24 2-3 innings in 2001 without allowing a run.Sale, who is on a four-game winning streak, is 5-2 with a 2.53 ERA.Cubs manager Dale Sveum said his team had been looking forward to facing Sale Tuesday."You hate to waste any time when you get up 2-0 against a pitcher like Sale and hopefully you hang on," Sveum said. "If you score two and hopefully a couple more like that, then you've done your share off a guy like that. It's too bad the game had to be cancelled that quick, but we knew that rain was coming."The series shifts to Wrigley Field for a pair of afternoon games (1:20 pm) on Wednesday and Thursday.The scheduled pitchers remain the same for the White Sox, with John Danks (0-0, 4.50) facing the Cubs' Scott Feldman (4-4, 2.80) on Wednesday, and Jake Peavy (6-2, 2.97) against the Cubs' Travis Wood (4-3, 2.73) on Thursday.But Cooper added, "That may change tomorrow after we sleep on it."NOTES: It was the White Sox's third postponement at home this year. ... Asked whether the teams might do a day-night doubleheader at Wrigley Field and then U.S. Cellular, Ventura said, "If something happens the next couple of days (with another possible rainout). You never know what's going to happen. It could happen. It's happened at other places. It wouldn't be out of the question." . Cubs right-hander Edwin Jackson entered the game with a 1-7 record and an ERA of 6.11. He pitched 2 1-3 innings, allowing just one single, while striking out three. ... Prior to the rainout, the White Sox had gone 11 1-3 innings without scoring against the Cubs, while managing only three hits. . The White Sox have won eight of the last 12 meetings with the Cubs, and lead the overall series 49-42. . Coming into Tuesday's game, Cubs pitchers were leading the Major Leagues in a unique category: RBIs, with 15. . The game was called so quickly that an official attendance number was never announced.
LOS ANGELES — Justin Williams figures he gets his knack for Game 7 heroics from the same source as the Los Angeles Kings' resilience throughout their grinding seven-game victory over the San Jose Sharks.Williams thinks the Kings all drew their inspiration from that Stanley Cup championship banner hanging over the Staples Center ice, and it carried them through to the Western Conference finals."It comes from the hunger of winning one and having that drive for another one," Williams said. "You don't want anyone else to raise the Cup but you."Williams scored two goals in the second period, and the Kings advanced with a 2-1 victory over San Jose on Tuesday night.Jonathan Quick made 25 saves as the defending champs finished off this agonizingly even series with their 14th consecutive home victory over the past two months, including seven straight in the postseason.Not much separated the teams in this thrilling all-California series, but the Kings cited last season's trophy for their poise and persistence in another nail-biting clincher."I certainly enjoy pressure situations," said Williams, whose goals were 2:57 apart. "I know everyone in this dressing room does. We pride ourselves on being a team that, push comes to shove, we're going to get it done. We've been through it before, and we know we can do it."Williams scored on a power-play tap-in and a one-timer, putting the Kings on top to stay. The veteran wing came in with an eight-game, goal-scoring drought, but the two-time Stanley Cup winner has scored nine points in his four career appearances in a Game 7.The Kings will face Chicago or Detroit when they attempt to reach the Stanley Cup finals for the third time. The Blackhawks will host the Red Wings in Game 7 on Wednesday night.The home team won all seven games in the series, as did the team that scored first. The fifth-seeded Kings barely rode their home-ice advantage to victory in their first potential elimination game in the last two years."They were as good as us," Los Angeles coach Darryl Sutter said. "We just scored."Quick and his teammates barely held off the Sharks in a frantic third period. Quick showed off his Conn Smythe Trophy form yet again, finishing the seven-game series by allowing just 10 goals."We're going to play every game like this, no matter what," Quick said. "It doesn't matter how many games it takes, especially against that team. We're fortunate to move forward."Antti Niemi stopped 16 shots, and Dan Boyle scored early in the third period for the Sharks, who fell just short of their third trip to the conference finals in four years. Even during a year of roster turnover and change, sixth-seeded San Jose remained a serious contender in its ninth straight playoff appearance."We thought we could come in here and steal a game," Sharks captain Joe Thornton said. "We played our hearts out, and that's all you can ask of each other. We had to lay it on the line in the third, and I thought we did. Jonathan Quick is just a fantastic goalie. ... We were just having so much fun. It's disappointing that it has to end, because we were really enjoying this. It's a tough way to finish."Los Angeles has won eight straight home playoff games, dating to last season's Stanley Cup clincher, but this one might have been the toughest. San Jose pressed the action throughout the third period after Williams' back-to-back goals put the Sharks in a mid-game hole, but Quick and the Kings' defense hung on for a win in Los Angeles' first Game 7 at home since 1989."The way they banded together and the way they played for each other was exceptional," San Jose coach Todd McLellan said. "It's a great sign for our organization. I think we have something to build on moving forward."After a scoreless first period in Game 7, featuring plenty of near-miss chances but just eight combined shots, the Sharks again came out solidly in the second. San Jose held the Kings without a shot for nearly 19 consecutive minutes.But the Kings finally broke through after San Jose's Brent Burns took an interference penalty near Los Angeles' net. Williams got the puck to the post and hacked at it until it slid behind Niemi for his first goal since Game 4 of the first round.Williams has been candid about his line's offensive struggles during this postseason, saying the Kings' top scorers had to get better for Los Angeles to advance.He did it again 2:57 later, taking a cross-ice pass from Anze Kopitar and beating Niemi from short range with a one-timer. Williams had just two assists in the Kings' previous eight playoff games.Niemi kept the Sharks in it with two stunning saves, preventing a natural hat trick by Williams several minutes before stopping Brad Richardson's one-timer. But Quick matched every save, and the Kings preserved their two-goal lead into the third.Niemi made another enormous save during 4-on-4 play early in the third, stopping Jeff Carter on a breakaway. Boyle ended Quick's bid for his third shutout of the series with a long shot through traffic with 14:34 to play, giving the defenseman his third goal of the postseason.Quick kept making astonishing saves until the final seconds, robbing Joe Pavelski on an open chance with his glove extended along the ice with 5:04 to play."We probably made one more mistake than they did, and we couldn't find a way to get another puck by Quick," McLellan said. "We would love to go back and play Game 2 over again, the last four or five minutes. That's probably one that we needed and didn't get."This series was even from the start, with neither team able to take more than momentary control. The clubs were similarly equal in the regular season, when the Kings' 3-2 home victory over San Jose in the finale pushed fifth-seeded Los Angeles ahead of the Sharks.That eventually led to the Kings starting a playoff series at home for the first time since 1992, but the uncanny home-ice advantage held: The home team has won 16 of these Pacific Division rivals' 17 meetings in the past two seasons.Los Angeles opened the series with two home victories, stealing Game 2 with a pair of power-play goals in the final minutes for the only major comeback of the series. The Sharks responded with two solid 2-1 victories at home, keeping the Kings' offense punchless away from Staples Center.Quick posted his second shutout of the series in Game 5, but San Jose forced a seventh game with another 2-1 victory at the Shark Tank last Sunday.NOTES: San Jose kept its lineup from Game 6, while Los Angeles replaced fourth-liner Jordan Nolan with rookie Tyler Toffoli. Hobbling Sharks F Marty Havlat missed the final four games of the series and six of seven overall, playing only 4:52 in Game 3. ... Kings C Jarret Stoll missed his sixth straight game with an apparent concussion after an illegal hit in Game 1 by Sharks F Raffi Torres, who was suspended for the rest of the series. Stoll is Los Angeles' third-line center and a key contributor on penalty-killing and faceoffs. ... The Kings hadn't hosted a Game 7 since Wayne Gretzky had a hat trick to beat the Edmonton Oilers in 1989 at the Forum. ... David and Victoria Beckham attended the game with their children, sitting behind Tom Cruise. Beckham, who became a fervent Kings fan last season, wrapped up his soccer career just two days earlier in France, sitting out Paris Saint-Germain's final match.
The postmortems began a few days ago for the N.H.L.'s top team, the Chicago Blackhawks, who were down, 3-1, to the Detroit Red Wings. Pause the grim epitaphs, for now. The Blackhawks have made a sharp turnaround in the Western Conference semifinals, winning Game 5 in Chicago and Game 6 in Detroit to force a Game 7 at the United Center on Wednesday."We feel like we deserve to be where we are," Jonathan Toews, the Blackhawks' captain, said Tuesday. "Something about playing a Game 7, you want to go out there and feel like every shift, every chance you get, there might be an opportunity to change the game in favor of your team."I mean, to look at the attitude we've had over the last couple of games and where we were just a few days ago, it's a huge credit to the guys for keeping their heads up and staying loose and being positive."Game 7 is a fitting conclusion to the long-running Original Six rivalry. The Red Wings are moving to the Eastern Conference next season and Chicago will remain in the West, changing any future meetings to a Stanley Cup finals encounter.This is only the second time in Blackhawks history, which dates to the founding of the N.H.L. in 1926, that they have forced a Game 7 after trailing, 3-1. The first time was in 2011, when the Blackhawks recovered against the Vancouver Canucks, only to lose Game 7 in overtime, 2-1, at Vancouver. Wednesday's Game 7 is also the first between the Blackhawks and the Red Wings since 1965, which Chicago won, 4-2, in Detroit.According to the Elias Sports Bureau, 48 teams have recovered from 3-1 series deficits, and half went on to win Game 7.Red Wings Coach Mike Babcock put a positive spin on the game despite his team's deflating two-game slide."If I would've told Detroit and Michigan we would play in Chicago in Game 7, I think everybody would be excited about that," Babcock said. "I love Game 7's. We've got a chance to push them out of the playoffs. It should be a lot of fun."The Blackhawks' recovery reflects what made them the top team in the regular season. Stars such as Toews and Marian Hossa regained their scoring touches; Corey Crawford has been mostly steady in goal; and supporting players like Bryan Bickell, Michal Handzus and Michael Frolik have provided timely help.In a sweeping change of momentum, the Red Wings gave up three goals in the third period of Game 6. The period has been a weakness for the Red Wings, who have allowed 20 goals in 13 playoff games. And the Blackhawks had not shown an ability to win games in the third during this playoff run. Game 6 was their first win in four games when trailing entering the final period."They're a good team; let's get the facts straight," Red Wings goalie Jimmy Howard said. "They weren't going to go away quietly. But now it's down to one game. Game 7, you dream about winning these when you're a kid."Bickell, a left wing, has been a particularly potent force for the Blackhawks, providing a physical presence that agitates the Red Wings, as well as scoring. He has five goals in the playoffs and has been a tough presence for the Red Wings to deal with."He's strong and tough, and he is always working," said Handzus, who tied Game 6 at 2-2 early in the third period. "That's what we do when we are good. Everybody is doing that. We get help from everybody."Frolik supplied the game-winner off a third-period penalty shot, flicking a backhand over Howard's left shoulder for a 4-2 lead."I think the room still always believed in the big picture, and we knew it was possible for us to come back," Frolik said. "We still believe in each other, and I think we show good character now. We've tied up this series; now we have to prepare for a huge game at home."
CHICAGO — Dioner Navarro's first home run just cleared the basket at Wrigley Field and his second nearly hooked foul.But the third?There was no doubt about that one, and there's no doubt about this, either: This was an unforgettable performance.Navarro hit three home runs for the first time in his career, connecting from both sides of the plate Wednesday and leading the Chicago Cubs over the White Sox 9-3."It so surreal right now," he said. "I can't even speak right now."The last time he hit three home runs in a game?"I hit two one time in Little League," he said, smiling.Navarro had never homered more than once in a major league game, but he sure got his swing going while driving in a career-high six runs and scoring four times. He became the first Cubs player to hit three homers in a game since Aramis Ramirez against Houston on July 20, 2010, at Wrigley and their first catcher to do it since George Mitterwald on April 17, 1974, against Pittsburgh.The last Cubs switch-hitter to homer from the left and right sides in a game was Mark Bellhorn against Milwaukee on Aug. 29, 2002."It's a pretty special day, something he'll never forget," manager Dale Sveum said.Navarro began the day with three homers in 55 at-bats this season, and wound up doubling his homer total. He raised his batting average from .200 to .241 filling in for Welington Castillo as the Cubs won their third straight.Despite all that, Sveum made one thing clear: He's not changing catchers. He said Castillo will start on Thursday.Navarro hit a solo homer just over the basket at the wall in left-center in the second to break a 1-all tie and added a two-run shot down the left-field line off John Danks (0-1) in the fourth, with both drives coming from the right side. He walked and scored in the sixth after his bat landed several rows beyond the Cubs dugout.He got the bat back and delivered another big blow in the seventh, driving a towering shot to the street beyond the right-field bleachers for a three-run homer off Brian Omogrosso."That was awesome to watch," Cubs starter Scott Feldman said. "Really just happy for him because he works so hard on all the other things — calling games, receiving, going over the scouting reports. It's nice to see him rewarded with a day like that."By the time Navarro hit his third homer, Feldman was back in the trainer's room getting his shoulder worked on. That didn't stop him from "jumping around" on the table as the ball shot toward the street.Clearly, he was thrilled for his teammate even if Navarro stole the spotlight from him.Feldman (5-4) went six innings, allowing two runs and six hits. He struck out seven without a walk and improved to 5-1 in his past seven outings.The strong performance by Feldman came after Jeff Samardzija threw a two-hitter in Monday's 7-0 win at U.S. Cellular Field. The struggling Edwin Jackson was also sailing along on Tuesday before the game on the South Side was postponed because of rain with the Cubs up 2-0 in the third.In his second start back from a season-ending shoulder injury, Danks lasted just four innings and allowed four runs and five hits. His most recent win was at Wrigley Field on May 19, 2012, which turned out to be his final start of the year. He had surgery in August to repair a capsule tear and remove debris in his rotator cuff and biceps."It's still a process in getting back," he said. "Like I said from the very beginning when I'm taking the mound out there it's because I feel like I give us a chance to win. I'm not a guy that's going to make any excuses, and today's certainly not a day I'm going to make an excuse. I felt fine going into the game, just didn't pitch well."The bullpen didn't exactly bail him out. The offense struggled, too. Adam Dunn is now 1 for 25 in his last seven games after going 0 for 3, although he did have a sacrifice fly."(Danks) wasn't the only one," manager Robin Ventura said. "It was just one of those we've got to keep their catchers from hitting home runs. Not a good day, but it's just one of those you've got to stick with it. Find a way to keep them in the yard."NOTES: Cubs reliever Kyuji Fujikawa will have Tommy John surgery to repair a torn ligament in his right elbow and miss the rest of the season. No date has been set for the procedure. He said through a translator that he "felt something" on a pitch to Joey Votto during Sunday's game against Cincinnati and was placed on the disabled list on Monday. ... The White Sox will keep Chris Sale on his usual schedule and have him start Sunday rather than move him up a day. Sale pitched two innings on Tuesday before the game was called. ... Ventura said 2B Gordon Beckham would play Thursday for Triple-A Charlotte and that he didn't expect him to come back to Chicago until next Thursday. Beckham, who had surgery April 16 to repair a broken left hand, hasn't played on his rehab assignment since last Thursday because of soreness. ... Jake Peavy (6-2, 2.97 ERA) starts for the White Sox on Thursday, with Travis Wood (4-3, 2.73 ERA) pitching for the Cubs.
CHICAGO — In case there were any doubts, the Chicago Blackhawks are showing they can be resilient as well as dominant.They made it look easy in the regular season. But they had to dig deep in the playoffs.The Blackhawks dug their way out of a 3-1 deficit to Detroit in the Western Conference semifinals to take the series in seven games, beating the rival Red Wings 2-1 on Brent Seabrook's overtime goal Wednesday night.They will now face the defending champion Los Angeles Kings in what could be another difficult series for a team eyeing its second Stanley Cup in four seasons. Game 1 of the conference finals is in Chicago on Saturday.This is hardly a time to breathe easy, but the Blackhawks can at least exhale a little after surviving a grueling series against another Original Six team."It's not the way you want to win a series, going down 3 games to 1," captain Jonathan Toews said. "But to come out on top given the situation we were in three games ago, it shows the character that we have on top of the ability and the potential this team has. We need to use the ability and the confidence this gives us."No team made it look easier in the regular season than the Blackhawks, who got off to a record start and captured the Presidents' Trophy for finishing with the most points. But it's been a different story in the playoffs.They came in looking for more after back-to-back first-round exits following their championship run in 2010. They took out Minnesota in five games and were looking good after a 4-1 win over Detroit in Game 1, but the series turned in a big way after that. The Blackhawks managed just two goals in Games 2 through 4 and found themselves facing elimination.It didn't help that Toews lost his composure in Game 4 after being targeted by the Red Wings and wound up being sent to the penalty box three times in the second period. The Blackhawks were looking like an unglued team at that point, but they stuck together, instead. They held a meeting and began mounting an improbable comeback.Chicago had to regroup again late in Game 7 after the potential go-ahead goal by Niklas Hjalmarsson got waved off in the closing minutes of regulation. The crowd was in a frenzy after he fired a shot past Jimmy Howard with 1:47 remaining, except it didn't count. The Blackhawks' Brandon Saad and Red Wings' Kyle Quincey got tangled by the Detroit bench, and referee Stephen Walkom called roughing penalties as Chicago went in for the goal.Seabrook wound up winning it in overtime with a wrist shot that deflected off Detroit defenseman Niklas Kronwall's leg and sailed past Howard's glove into the left side of the net.The Blackhawks outscored the Red Wings 10-5 over the final three games and became the 25th team to win a series after falling behind 3-1. It was the first time a Chicago team had done it."You know what, we did have some learning curves in this round definitely," Seabrook said afterward. "Detroit played a great series. We really had to find ourselves after the fourth game being down 3-1. I thought the boys responded well. We played a very good Game 5. I thought we played a very good Game 6. I thought we played very well tonight. Detroit gave us all they had. It was just nice to come out on the winning end of this."Now, they're looking at another big obstacle.No goalie has been hotter in the playoffs than Los Angeles' Jonathan Quick with a .948 save percentage, although Chicago's Corey Crawford (.938) has been almost as good.Quick dropped two of three games against the Blackhawks during the regular season. His save percentage was .857 and he allowed 12 goals."We've had progressively much tougher series and they keep getting tougher," Chicago coach Joel Quenneville said. "LA's got the Cup and they've played two tough rounds in a row. They know how to win. We've got to be well-prepared and excited about the opportunity."
CHICAGO — The Chicago Blackhawks could have folded when they dropped three of the first four games of their series against the Detroit Red Wings. They could have packed it in when a potential go-ahead goal was waved off late in the third period.They never did. They just kept coming.Brent Seabrook sent a wrist shot over Jimmy Howard's glove 3:35 into overtime, and Chicago completed an improbable comeback with a 2-1 victory over Detroit in Game 7 of its second-round playoff series on Wednesday night."We dug really deep," captain Jonathan Toews said. "We came in here and asked ourselves a question: How bad we wanted it. You got your answer right there. That's a heck of a way to pull out four wins in seven games."The Blackhawks, who had the best record in the NHL regular season, rallied from a 3-1 series deficit to reach the Western Conference finals against the defending Stanley Cup champion Los Angeles Kings.For just the second time in NHL history, the final four teams remaining in the playoffs are the four most recent Stanley Cup winners. Chicago captured the Cup in 2010.Seabrook picked up a loose puck and skated in on Howard through the middle of the ice, with Detroit defenseman Niklas Kronwall in front of him. Seabrook's shot deflected off Kronwall's leg before it sailed into the left side of the net for the defenseman's first goal of the postseason."I don't know if I saw it go in to be honest," Seabrook said. "I just heard the horn going and the boys jumping out. It was a pretty exhausting game, but I think I was more tired during the celebration with guys jumping and pushing me in the face and dragging me down."It's exciting. You don't get to do that too many times."The sellout crowd of 22,103 roared as Seabrook skated over to the boards and was mobbed by his delirious teammates.Howard put his arm around Kronwall, who was down on one knee, and tried to console him while the Blackhawks celebrated."It's tough. How do you get upset at someone who's sacrificing their body out there to block shots?" Howard said. "Kroner has been huge for us all year and you know, he doesn't deserve that luck."It was quite a change from the end of the third period, when the Blackhawks thought they had a go-ahead score. But it was waved off with less than 2 minutes remaining by referee Stephen Walkom, who called a pair of penalties behind the play.Patrick Sharp put Chicago in front in the second period, and Henrik Zetterberg tied it in the third for No. 7 Detroit, which beat second-seeded Anaheim in seven games in the first round. Howard finished with 33 saves."They're a very talented group," Detroit coach Mike Babcock said. "I think we pushed them very hard in the series and had a lot of fun doing it."Chicago made it to the conference finals for the first time since it won the title three years ago and will host Los Angeles in Game 1 on Saturday. The Kings advanced with a 2-1 victory over San Jose in Game 7 on Tuesday night.Pittsburgh will host Boston in the opener of the Eastern finals on Saturday.Chicago was one of the favorites to win the Stanley Cup when the playoffs began, storming to the Presidents' Trophy during the lockout-shortened season. The Blackhawks then boosted their credentials with a five-game win over Minnesota in the first round and a convincing 4-1 victory against the Red Wings in the series opener.But Howard and Detroit responded with three straight victories, pushing Chicago to the brink of elimination. The frustrated Blackhawks held a team meeting the day after Game 4, where the seeds were planted for their improbable comeback.Three victories later — a stretch in which the Blackhawks outscored the Red Wings 10-5 after managing just two goals in Games 2-4 — they became the 25th team to win a series after trailing 3-1. It was the first time in franchise history Chicago has made such a comeback."You go back to after Game 4," coach Joel Quenneville said. "Their approach and the belief in the room, and each other, was there. It was a strong season and we had to find a way. I think winning here in Game 5 got us excited again and got the momentum back."The last two games were tightly fought and amazing games."Crawford finished with 26 saves, continuing his strong performance after allowing a soft goal that nearly proved costly in Game 6. He was especially tough after Detroit turned up the pressure early in the third.The Blackhawks celebrated wildly when Niklas Hjalmarsson blasted a slap shot by Howard with 1:47 left in regulation, prompting cheers from the raucous crowd.But Chicago forward Brandon Saad and Detroit defenseman Kyle Quincey got tangled up in front of the Red Wings bench. Walkom stopped play to give roughing penalties to both players as the Blackhawks went in for what appeared to be the go-ahead goal."It was getting to the point where he had to call the penalty, I guess. We were going back and forth," Quincey said. "I guess it worked in our favor there."After a seesaw series with all sorts of twists and turns, Chicago and Detroit faced off one more time in a Western Conference playoff game. The Red Wings will move to the East after this season as part of NHL realignment while the Blackhawks remain in the West.Playing on soft ice due in part to The Rolling Stones concert on Tuesday night, the Original Six teams provided a fitting conclusion to a compelling series."You have to give the Red Wings credit," Sharp said. "They're a well-coached team, they keep coming at you. Each game could have gone the other way. But we have to be proud of ourselves in this locker room for being able to battle back."The Blackhawks got an opening at the start of the second period when Sharp got Kronwall to turn the puck over while the Red Wings changed lines. Sharp then skated in with Michal Handzus and Marian Hossa and finished a pretty passing sequence with his seventh goal of the playoffs at 1:08.The Red Wings tied it at the beginning of the third. Gustav Nyquist made a nice move to get open along the boards and found a streaking Zetterberg on the left side for the captain's first goal since the Red Wings' 3-2 victory at Anaheim in Game 7 of the first round."To go all the way, you need a lot of luck," Detroit forward Daniel Cleary said. "You need to be healthy to win. The last five teams that won Cups were still alive. There's probably a reason for that. They're a good team. I mean, tip your hat to them. They played well."NOTES: Detroit C Valtteri Filppula didn't return after leaving in the first period with an undisclosed lower body injury. ... It was the third Game 7 between the Red Wings and Blackhawks. Detroit won 4-2 in 1964, and Chicago returned the favor by the same score a year later.
CHICAGO — Blackhawks defenseman Brent Seabrook picked up the puck in the neutral zone and carried it across the Detroit blue line. He measured his shot for a moment and fired.It was wrister that knuckled after a deflection, dipping and twisting and eventually finding its way past the glove of goaltender Jimmy Howard. It lit the lamp 3 minutes 35 seconds into overtime of Game 7 and gave Chicago a 2-1 victory Wednesday at United Center.The crowd erupted, littering the ice with red towels. The Blackhawks met at center ice and raised their sticks to salute the crowd. It was party time in Chicago."I don't even know if I saw it go in," Seabrook said. "To be honest, I just heard the horn going and the boys jumping out."The victory capped quite a comeback for the Blackhawks, who once trailed the series, three games to one. They will face the defending champion Los Angeles Kings in the Western Conference finals, beginning here Saturday.The Blackhawks began the season with an N.H.L.-record 24-game points streak. They finished the regular season with a league best 36-7-5 record, winning the Presidents' Trophy. They were called young, gifted, balanced and deep. And four days ago, they were on the brink of elimination.Chicago, though, won Game 5 at home and Game 6 in Detroit to force a winner-take-all showdown between two of the league's original six teams. And it was a classic in every sense, filled with drama and intrigue — and needing extra time to crown a winner.The Blackhawks scored first early in the second period, using a series of exquisite passes to take advantage of a Detroit line change. Niklas Hjalmarsson passed to Patrick Sharp, who led an odd-man rush with a head of steam. Two more quick passes set up Sharp, who beat Howard with a one-timer from point-blank range.A raucous crowd of 22,103 quickly went into celebration mode, but the Red Wings answered in the third. Outshot by 24-17 through the first 40 minutes, Detroit struck 26 seconds into the final period when Daniel Cleary held the puck in the Blackhawks' zone, poking it free to Gustav Nyquist. Nyquist flipped the puck over a sliding Seabrook to Henrik Zetterberg, who sneaked a shot past goaltender Corey Crawford.As the minutes of the third period ticked away, the crowd "oohed" and "aahed" at each shot that sailed wide or was gloved by a goaltender.The mounting tension appeared to be released at 18:11 of the third when Hjalmarsson stung a shot from the point that beat Howard, who had 33 saves, high to the glove side. Blackhawks players celebrated as if they had taken the lead, but referees called a double penalty and the whistle was blown before the shot."We thought we should have been game over and series over," Seabrook said. "But the boys just forgot about it, regrouped and went out there to try and have a good start to the overtime."Detroit, which scratched its way into the postseason as the seventh seed, had already won a road Game 7 in the first round of the playoffs, a 3-2 squeaker over the Anaheim Ducks. Valtteri Filppula scored the game-winner that night, but he was forced from Wednesday's contest in the first period with a leg injury."We had three chances to close them out," Cleary said. "We just didn't get it done."Chicago won the 806th meeting and 81st in the playoffs between the two teams. Next season, Detroit will move to the Eastern Conference, ending a chapter in the storied rivalry. But the send-off was fitting."It was fun when it was over," said Crawford, who made 26 saves. "Right now I feel pretty tired."The Blackhawks were 0 for 4 on the power play; the Red Wings were 0 for 2.
Chris Davis went 4 for 4 with two home runs, and the Baltimore Orioles overcame three homers by Ryan Zimmerman to beat the Washington Nationals, 9-6, on Wednesday night.In a wild game before 39,129 fans in Baltimore, each team slugged four home runs and the Orioles rallied from a four-run deficit.Zimmerman hit solo homers in the first and fourth innings before adding a two-run drive in the fifth, all off Chris Tillman. With a chance to tie the major league record of four homers in a game, Zimmerman came to the plate in the seventh against Steve Johnson and looked at a third strike.Davis hit a solo drive in the fourth and capped a six-run seventh with his major-league-leading 19th homer, a two-run shot off Tyler Clippard.CUBS 9, WHITE SOX 3 Dioner Navarro hit three home runs, connecting from both sides of the plate and leading the Cubs over the White Sox at Wrigley Field. Navarro drove in a career-high six runs.CARDINALS 5, ROYALS 3 The pinch-hitter Daniel Descalso hit a two-run single with the bases loaded to snap an eighth-inning tie as St. Louis rallied past visiting Kansas City, which has lost a season-worst eight in a row. Matt Holliday and Carlos Beltran homered for the Cardinals, who have won seven of eight.PIRATES 5, TIGERS 3 Pedro Alvarez's two-run double sparked a seventh-inning rally for host Pittsburgh. Miguel Cabrera hit his 15th homer for Detroit.PHILLIES 4, RED SOX 3 Domonic Brown hit a pair of homers, Erik Kratz and Ryan Howard also had solo shots to back Kyle Kendrick, and Philadelphia defeated visiting Boston.INDIANS 5, REDS 2 Justin Masterson pitched six solid innings, Jason Giambi and Mark Reynolds homered, and host Cleveland broke a five-game losing streak. RAYS 3, MARLINS 1 Roberto Hernandez bounced back from two rough outings and pitched eight and two-thirds innings, as Tampa Bay sent Miami to its season-worst eighth straight loss.TWINS 4, BREWERS 1 For the second straight night, Aaron Hicks homered and made a run-saving catch for host Minnesota, helping Samuel Deduno beat Milwaukee.BLUE JAYS 3, BRAVES 0 Melky Cabrera had three hits, including a two-run single, and four Toronto pitchers combined on a four-hitter to lead the Blue Jays in Atlanta.
CHICAGO — Travis Wood and the rest of the Chicago Cubs pitchers are starting to turn the ninth spot in the batting order into a productive part of the lineup.Wood hit a fourth-inning grand slam off Jake Peavy and allowed two runs in six innings to lead the way in an 8-3 victory over the Chicago White Sox at Wrigley Field on Thursday."Our whole staff has been hitting," Wood said, after his grand slam gave Cubs pitchers 19 RBIs for May, a National League record for one month according to the team."We take pride in our hitting, being able to help ourselves out, just being able to handle the bat."That way we're not just a dead out."Wood wasn't the only Cubs player hitting home runs against the White Sox on a day with the wind blowing out 24 mph.Nate Schierholtz and Luis Valbuena each hit their sixth home runs of the year in an 11-hit effort by the Cubs offense, keying a fourth straight win overall and third consecutive convincing victory over their crosstown rivals.However, it was Wood (5-3) who broke open the game with his fifth career home run and second this year in the fourth inning with the Cubs leading 2-1."Woody can flat-out hit," Cubs manager Dale Sveum said. "He hits any fastball. They've (pitchers hitting) all been a big key to these wins."They're not just getting a single and driving a run in. They're getting two-run doubles and home runs, and we're able to put games away."Welington Castillo and Valbuena started the fourth inning with singles and Jake Peavy hit Darwin Barney before Wood's grand slam on a 2-1 pitch. It was the first grand slam by a Cubs pitcher since Jason Marquis hit one Sept. 22, 2008, in New York against the Mets and first by a Cubs pitcher in Wrigley Field since Burt Hooton hit one Sept. 16, 1972, against the New York Mets."I don't like it," Cubs first baseman Anthony Rizzo joking about Cubs pitchers driving in 19 runs in May. "It's embarrassing all of us (position players)."The last time any team's pitching staff had more than the Cubs' total of 19 runs batted in for a month was 1940 when the Detroit Tigers had a month with 20.Peavy (6-3) allowed six earned runs and eight hits in four innings. He also gave up four straight hits in the second inning for two runs that put the Cubs ahead for good as they went on to clinch this year's Crosstown Cup — the first time they've won the series since 2007.It was Peavy's worst start since giving up six runs April 9 at Washington in 5 1-3 innings."I think man for man everybody in here will tell you we got outplayed," Peavy said. "We didn't play with the intensity we need to play with. We didn't make plays. We didn't make pitches. We didn't get hits."We played, just not good ball baseball."With two outs in the second, Valbuena doubled, Barney singled him home, Wood singled and David DeJesus singled in Barney for a 2-0 Cubs lead.Schierholtz homered leading off the fifth against reliever Nate Jones for a 7-1 lead and Valbuena hit a leadoff homer off Brian Omogrosso in the eighth."We came out this series, we struck the ball well, played great defense and the pitching has been outstanding," Wood said. "We played just great all-around baseball."Paul Konerko drove in the first two White Sox runs, one with a third-inning, two-out single and the other on a double in the sixth after Alex Rios had doubled. Alejandro De Aza drove in the final run with a ninth-inning single.The White Sox came into the series at .500 (24-24) for the first time since April 8 after winning five of six games."Anytime you have three games like this at any point it's discouraging," White Sox manager Robin Ventura said. "You know, again, you've got to regroup and go."We've show that we can play a lot better than this and we're going to have to prove it again."NOTES: The Cubs called up right-hander Zach Putnam from Triple-A Iowa and sent down right-hander Alex Burnett, a former Baltimore pitcher whom they signed off waivers Monday. Putnam had one inning of scoreless relief. ... A day after hitting three home runs in one game, Cubs catcher Dioner Navarro was back on the bench with starting catcher Welington Castillo in the lineup. ... The Cubs came into the game with the third-most errors in the NL (39) and the White Sox with the most in the AL (35), and both teams committed errors in the first inning.
CHICAGO — For all the difficulties they endured along the way, the Chicago Blackhawks and Los Angeles Kings are still standing.They might want to buckle up, though. The ride could get even wilder.The Blackhawks and Kings are poised for what could be a tight and lengthy Western Conference finals, with Game 1 at the United Center on Saturday.The Kings already have more playoff losses than they did a year ago when they went on a 16-4 run through the postseason to capture the Stanley Cup as an eighth seed."I cited critical moments last year," Kings general manager Dean Lombardi said. "There were several of them this year where they were severely tested. They keep finding a way to fight through, as they've done at times during the playoffs. "All they did was rally from a 3-1 deficit to beat Detroit in the conference semifinals, taking Game 7 by 2-1 on Brent Seabrook's overtime goal to remain in the hunt for their second title in four years."You don't draw it up, you don't plan to win a seven-game series coming back from 3-1," Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews said. "Looking back, I think it is a good thing for our team to have gone through what we just went through, to kind of be pushed to the end, for a moment (to) feel like that was it. You have certain negative thoughts that kind of creep in. You try not to think about them, that you're up against a tough team and the odds are against you."But we stayed positive. We stuck with it. We just had that attitude that you take it one shift at the same time, you win one game at a time, anything can happen."The next challenge is a big one, too. No goalie is more on his game at the moment than the Kings' Jonathan Quick. All the 2012 Conn Smythe Trophy winner has done is allow just 20 goals in 13 postseason games while carrying Los Angeles to its second straight conference final.He leads the playoffs in goals-against average (1.50), save percentage (.948) and shutouts (three), and the Kings have needed it with their offense generating little.They're averaging just two goals per game in the postseason, and they realize they need to rediscover their scoring touch. That wasn't an issue during the regular season, when they were 10th in the NHL and boasted the Western Conference's top goal scorer in Jeff Carter.Getting center Jarret Stoll back would help. He suffered an apparent concussion on an illegal hit to the head in the series opener against San Jose and has been sidelined since. He skated with the team this week, but coach Darryl Sutter had no update Friday."He's been our best faceoff guy all year, so that's one of our strengths, and on the (penalty kill), even on the (power play) if he does play," center Anze Kopitar said. "It gives us a right-handed faceoff man that we didn't have."Despite their difficulties putting the puck in the net, the Kings have gotten by. They dropped the first two games at St. Louis and needed seven to take out San Jose in the semifinals, with all four wins coming at home. It was a physical series that probably didn't earn many style points. And to that, the Kings basically say so what."Well, I don't really care what you think, if that has anything to do with it," Sutter said. "Is that what they're saying in Boston, too?"Dustin Brown added: "We could bore you all to death. If we keep on winning, I could care less what people think of our game. We found something that's successful for us as a group, and sometimes people don't think it's exciting. It depends on your opinion."Now, it's the Blackhawks with the home-ice advantage and games on back-to-back days in their arena. Clearly, they see an opportunity there.But they also had their difficulties with a physical Detroit team, and here come the hard-hitting Kings."Yeah. They're big, and they do a good job protecting the net," Patrick Sharp said. "They're physical, as well, so we've got to be aware of that. Hopefully we can use our speed and our skill to kind of neutralize that, but this is all just talk. We'll see what happens this series."
Chicago Cubs pitcher Travis Wood hit a fourth-inning grand slam off Jake Peavy and allowed two runs in six innings to lead the way in an 8-3 victory over the Chicago White Sox at Wrigley Field on Thursday.With the Cubs leading by 2-1 in the fourth inning, Wood (5-3) hit his fifth career home run and second this year."Our whole staff has been hitting," Wood said. "We take pride in our hitting, being able to help ourselves out, just being able to handle the bat."Cubs pitchers have 19 runs batted in during May, a National League record for pitchers in one month, according to the team.PIRATES 1, TIGERS 0 Russell Martin hit a bases-loaded single off the left-center wall in the bottom of the 11th inning to give host Pittsburgh a victory over Detroit.The Tigers left 11 runners on base as they lost their third straight.ORIOLES 2, NATIONALS 0 Freddy Garcia pitched eight innings of three-hit ball to get the best of Dan Haren in a duel of veteran right-handers, and host Baltimore beat Washington.BRAVES 11, BLUE JAYS 3 Ramiro Pena drove in four runs with three hits, including a run-scoring single in the sixth that gave host Atlanta the lead in its victory over Toronto.RED SOX 9, PHILLIES 2 David Ortiz and Jonny Gomes homered and Jacoby Ellsbury set a club record with five stolen bases as visiting Boston routed Philadelphia.RAYS 5, MARLINS 2 Matt Joyce and James Loney homered to support pitcher Alex Colome in his major league debut and help visiting Tampa Bay to a victory over Miami.GIANTS 5, ATHLETICS 2 Pablo Sandoval hit a go-ahead two-run single in the sixth to help Barry Zito end a six-start winless stretch, and host San Francisco beat Oakland to avoid a season sweep.Brandon Belt doubled in two runs in the Giants' four-run sixth.MARINERS 7, PADRES 1 Nick Franklin hit his first two major league home runs to help give visiting Seattle a victory over San Diego.INDIANS 7, REDS 1 Scott Kazmir allowed one run in seven innings, and Cleveland scored seven runs with two outs in the fourth to defeat visiting Cincinnati.ASTROS 7, ROCKIES 5 Chris Carter and Matt Dominguez hit consecutive homers during a six-run sixth, and visiting Houston beat Colorado.TWINS 8, BREWERS 6 Joe Mauer had two hits, two R.B.I. and one of host Minnesota's four home runs in a victory over Milwaukee.RANGERS 9, DIAMONDBACKS 5 The rookie right-hander Justin Grimm took a shutout into the sixth inning, and host Texas defeated Arizona.
In sports, there are always unexplainable things — crazy bounces, boneheaded decisions, referees — and then there are things that make you stare at your television with your head tipped sideways, waiting for someone to tell you this is one of those "Saturday Night Live" spoofs and not something real, even though it's not Saturday night.Had the Blackhawks not won Game 7 against the Red Wings twice Wednesday night, they would still be awaiting the explanation for what happened with 1 minute 47 seconds left in the third period, why their dramatic game-winning goal was not a game-winning goal because a referee saw players getting pushy half a rink away and blew a whistle destined for the referee gaffe hall of fame until Chicago scored the game-winning goal again a few minutes into overtime.Yes, Chicago did not have to win Game 7 once. It had to win it twice. This is no easy feat, especially when you're doing it with one referee tied behind your back. Stephen Walkom's call — coincidental minors on players tussling by the bench nowhere near Niklas Hjalmarsson blasting a puck past Detroit goalie Jimmy Howard as the United Center erupted in delirium — was akin to an umpire at Citi Field calling time in the middle of a home run swing because the line at Shake Shack was getting unruly. The level of disbelief registered on the Richter scale.To the great relief of Walkom and his security detail, Brent Seabrook clipped a shot off Detroit defenseman Niklas Kronwall and into the corner of the net in overtime, lifting the entire N.H.L. off the hook for its continuing adventures in refereeing. There was new delirium, a rightful winner, a Blackhawks comeback crafted out of grit and stubbornness, Jon Greenberg writes on ESPN.com. This was the team that had barely been tested on its way to the league's best regular-season record, Nicholas Cotsonika writes on Yahoo.com, having to bounce back from a 3-1 series deficit, brain cramps by some of its best players and then the game winner that wasn't, Jesse Rogers writes on ESPN.com.The Red Wings, meanwhile, played the role of proud competitors to the end, writes Bob Wojnowski in The Detroit News, the team that wasn't supposed to be there doing all it could to teach the Blackhawks a lesson in playoff hockey. That lesson: nothing comes easy and don't count on the referees to get anything right. Sometimes you have to win games twice.Seabrook's winner means the N.H.L.'s off-ice attention can circle around the postseason circus in New York, where the Rangers had mercy on their players and axed Coach John Tortorella, who, given a little more time in the job would have blamed them for global warming, the Postal Service's financial woes and perhaps cicadas. As Larry Brooks writes in The New York Post, it was the players who prompted this move, led by the exasperated franchise goalie Henrik Lundqvist, without whom this team is the Florida Panthers. It was Tortorella's special talent that absolutely no one is sorry to see him go, and, as Brian Cazeneuve writes on SI.com, the highlights of his tenure read like Edgar Allan Poe. The mystery left is how Glen Sather's personnel roulette game does not get him fired, as Filip Bondy writes in The Daily News.But if you want something that truly defies explanation, you really need to watch the coming HBO show "Vice Goes to North Korea" to experience the once-in-a-lifetime intersection of a true sports lunatic and his friend the brutal dictator. Dennis Rodman's visit to North Korea with three Harlem Globetrotters and a Vice Media Group crew is the kind of thing that makes you wonder what planet you just woke up on. The trip was in February and the show — screened Wednesday for the news media — will be broadcast June 14, when you get to see Rodman at the strangest basketball you've ever seen, sitting next to Kim Jong-un. They arrived as the country was celebrating — yes, parade and all — a successful nuclear test and putting on its best fake-prosperity face for the Vice cameras. As the Vice correspondent Ryan Duffy said, it was like being in a real-life "Truman Show," starring the strangest basketball player anyone ever met.
(Reuters) - The Chicago Blackhawks held off the Los Angeles Kings 2-1 on Saturday to win the opening game of their National Hockey League's Western Conference final.Back on the ice just three days after their heart-stopping Game Seven overtime win over the Detroit Red Wings, the Blackhawks had to come from behind to beat the Kings, last year's Stanley Cup champions.The Kings, who were also taken to seven games in their semi-final with San Jose, snatched the lead in the first period despite being heavily outplayed.Justin Williams scored against the run of play, grabbing a loose puck and sending it past Chicago goalie Corey Crawford.The Blackhawks, who won the Presidents' Trophy for having the best record in the regular season, tied the game early in the second period.Patrick Sharp, who has scored a league best eight goals during the playoffs, reacted quickly to score from a shot by Chicago's Johnny Oduya that rebounded off the pads of Jonathan Quick.The LA netminder made 34 saves but gave up two goals in four minutes in the second period, the first by Sharp then the second by defenseman Marian Hossa.Crawford turned away 21 shots for the Blackhawks, who host Game Two of the best-of-seven series on Sunday.The Western Conference winner will play either Boston or Pittsburgh for the Stanley Cup.
CHICAGO — Marian Hossa winked when the television camera focused on him during the national anthem, a signal to his friends watching the game back home in Slovakia. Then he gave them something to cheer about.Hossa tipped in the tiebreaking goal in the second period, helping the Chicago Blackhawks beat the Los Angeles Kings 2-1 on Saturday in the opener of the Western Conference finals.Patrick Sharp also scored and Corey Crawford made 21 saves for the Blackhawks, who generated just enough offense to improve to 7-1 at home in the playoffs. They also have won four in a row heading into Game 2 on Sunday."It's always great when you win the first game, especially back to back, give you a little momentum," Hossa said. "I felt like we did lots of good things today. We know we have to be better (Sunday) and keep doing those things."Jonathan Quick stopped 34 shots, and Justin Williams scored for Los Angeles, which has won just one of seven road games in the playoffs. The defending Stanley Cup champions got center Jarret Stoll back from a suspected concussion, but their offensive funk continued."I think the two guys that scored for them are going to score goals," Kings coach Darryl Sutter said. "We have guys that have to score goals. That's how close it will be."Los Angeles has scored 27 times in 14 playoff games. The last three have gone to Williams, who was responsible for the Kings' offense in a 2-1 victory over the San Jose Sharks in Game 7 of the second-round series on Tuesday."Scoring doesn't simply come from the offensive zone," Williams said. "It comes from being good in your own zone, breaking out together and scoring off the rush. We didn't have enough of that."The Blackhawks and Kings returned to the ice after surviving strenuous second-round tests.Top-seeded Chicago stormed back to beat Detroit after trailing 3-1 in the series, winning Game 7 on Brent Seabrook's overtime goal Wednesday night. Fifth-seeded Los Angeles was pushed to the brink of elimination by the Sharks in a series in which the home team won every game.For the first period and much of the second of the conference finals opener, Chicago looked hopeless against Quick and Los Angeles' talented defensemen. Drew Doughty, Robyn Regehr and Co. kept the Blackhawks' fleet forwards in check, and Quick made it look as if there was a white wall moving from side to side in net.As they did against Detroit, the Blackhawks began to create more quality chances when they put more traffic in front.With 7½ minutes left in the second, Sharp skated into the zone, left the puck for Johnny Oduya and kept moving forward. When Quick kicked away Oduya's slap shot, the puck went right to Sharp, who scored into the lower right corner to tie it 1-1 with his eighth playoff goal."That first shot against him is tough," Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville said. "You need traffic. You need a deflection. He finds a way to find pucks. I think the volume and traffic of shots is the only way to get to this guy."Sharp created another strong opportunity a few minutes later, but Brandon Saad shot wide right on a potential tip-in.The Blackhawks kept up the pressure and went ahead when Hossa redirected Keith's long slap shot out of the air at 16:22 of the second. The puck landed in the lower right corner again before Quick could find it in the maze of bodies near the net.It was the sixth goal of this postseason for Hossa and the 42nd of his playoff career. The 34-year-old forward has at least one point in four straight games."If Quick's going to see it, he's going to stop it. If we can get a slight tip on it, I think it changes his view," said Bryan Bickell, who earned an assist on the goal. "It was a nice tip by Hoss."Quick wasn't made available to the media while the locker room was open after the game.Los Angeles turned up the pressure at the beginning of the third, but Chicago killed off a power play. Crawford was solid after an early gaffe played a role in the Kings' goal. He stopped Dustin Penner's tip attempt with a little more than five minutes left, preserving Chicago's lead.Crawford has allowed just one goal in four of five games, playing a huge role as Chicago rallied to eliminate Detroit."We've got to forget about this one right now, for sure," Kings center Anze Kopitar said. "There's some stuff that's going to be addressed, what we have to do better in preparation."Chicago controlled most of the first period, using its speed and skill to keep the puck away from Los Angeles. The Blackhawks had nine shots on goal before Crawford was tested for the first time, grabbing Penner's attempt with 8:11 remaining.Quick turned away every charge at the other side, and Los Angeles made the most of its second shot after a couple of costly Blackhawks misplays.After the puck was dumped into the Blackhawks' zone, Crawford went behind the net to try to clear it away, but Brad Richardson jumped and knocked it in front. Dave Bolland tried to break up the play, but the puck went right to Williams, who beat Crawford to make it 1-0 at 14:23.Most of Chicago's shots in the first period came from the outside, and Quick had a clear lane for most stops. The 2012 Conn Smythe Trophy winner as playoff MVP made 17 saves in the first 20 minutes."All in all we can be happy with the 60 minutes we played, but we know it's going to be tougher as the series goes on," Sharp said. "Every series we've been a part of gets more physical and more difficult as it goes on."NOTES: Stoll had been sidelined since he was struck with an illegal hit to the head by San Jose's Raffi Torres in Game 1 of Los Angeles' second-round series. ... This is the second playoff series between the Kings and the Blackhawks. Chicago advanced in five games in the 1974 quarterfinals. ... There was no shoot the puck competition after the second period, part of an NHL mandate designed to preserve ideal ice conditions.
CHICAGO — Sweat still dripped from the Chicago Blackhawks ' playoff beards after their Game 7 overtime win over the Detroit Red Wings on Wednesday as they described the thrill of overcoming a three-games-to-one deficit.But while the victory was exhilarating, the Blackhawks soon turned their attention to their next daunting challenge: a Western Conference finals matchup against the defending champion Los Angeles Kings, led by goaltender Jonathan Quick, last season's Conn Smythe Trophy winner as the most valuable player of the playoffs.During the Kings' run to the Stanley Cup in 2012, Quick allowed 1.41 goals per game and posted a .946 save percentage. This postseason, he has been just as good and maybe better, with a 1.50 goals against average, a .948 save percentage and 3 shutouts. Quick is the fulcrum of a defense that has allowed more than two goals only twice in 13 playoff games and never more than three.In Game 7 of Los Angeles's second-round series against San Jose, Quick stopped 25 shots to preserve a 2-1 win, including a remarkable sprawling glove save against Joe Pavelski late in the third period on what looked to be a sure goal."That's what he does," Blackhawks wing Viktor Stalberg said. "Sometimes guys think they have an empty net, and somehow he finds his way back there."After practicing Friday, the Blackhawks were full of praise for Quick. Marian Hossa spoke of Quick's aggressiveness in coming out of his crease to cut down shooting angles. Patrick Kane noted his low positioning, allowing him to see through tangles of bodies in front of the net. Coach Joel Quenneville called Quick a special player."We have our work cut out," Kane said.The Blackhawks' attempt to disrupt Quick will begin Saturday at United Center. The key to almost every tactic, they said, is sending bodies to the front of the net."You say it against every goalie, but you want to get traffic," Kane said.Quenneville added, "A lot of our talk looking at the series and tomorrow's game is we have to find a way to make sure he doesn't see pucks."Hossa suggested that one-timers could be effective in getting Quick to move from side to side in his crease. Kane said that elevating the puck could be an answer to Quick's crouch.The Sharks made a concerted effort to get physical with Quick. They bumped, poked and jostled him frequently. The contact appeared to frustrate Quick during Games 3 and 4, both Sharks wins in San Jose. Chicago had similar success against Detroit's Jimmy Howard."The way he played, you see that if you don't get bodies, if you don't get traffic going towards the goalie, he's going to make saves," Stalberg said of Howard. "Same deal with Quick."Chicago averaged 3.1 goals per game in the regular season, leading the Western Conference. The Blackhawks were 2-1 against the Kings, scoring five, four and three goals.But no one in Chicago's locker room wanted to put much stock in those results. Los Angeles is a different team, and so is Chicago, the Blackhawks said."A lot of people still want to talk about our accomplishments during the regular season," the captain Jonathan Toews said. "But teams that we're up against would love to knock us out of the playoffs and show us it really doesn't matter."Despite film study sessions and meticulous preparation, many players acknowledged that to score consistently on Quick, they would also need a bit of luck: a bounce off a skate or a deflection off a stick would be just as important as any X's and O's."I don't think many pucks are going to beat him cleanly," Stalberg said. "We got to have guts to fight through that traffic in front of the net. But if we want to win the series, we have to commit to it."
CHICAGO — It was a wrist shot for Andrew Shaw, who leaned back and yelled after his first-period score. Brent Seabrook got in on the action, and Bryan Bickell and Michal Handzus added two more goals on consecutive shots in the second.And just like that, Jonathan Quick was gone.The Chicago Blackhawks chased the Los Angeles Kings' standout goalie during an impressive display in the opening two periods of a 4-2 victory Sunday night in Game 2 of the Western Conference finals."It's a high-speed game. If we use our speed, we'll be all right," Shaw said. "We played our game. That's the difference. The guys played good. We all competed for each other. We did everything we needed to do, keeping it deep in the zone."Patrick Sharp and Brandon Saad added two assists apiece as the Blackhawks grabbed a 2-0 lead in the best-of-seven series with their fifth consecutive victory. Corey Crawford made 29 saves in another solid performance, drawing chants of "Co-rey! Co-rey!" from the capacity crowd at the United Center."We went through a little spurt there in the last series where we were doing the right things but the pucks weren't going in," Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews said. "So now we're getting the results we want. We can do what we're doing more often. We can do it better as well in the next few games."Game 3 is Tuesday night at Los Angeles, where the Kings have won 14 consecutive games, dating to the regular season. The Kings also lost their first two games of the playoffs at St. Louis before winning four straight to eliminate the Blues in the first round.Jeff Carter and Tyler Toffoli scored for Los Angeles, but the Kings struggled to score without Mike Richards, who was scratched because of an undisclosed upper body injury. The defending Stanley Cup champions have 29 goals in 15 postseason games."You've got to find a way," Quick said. "They did their job at home. We've got to go home and do our job now."Richards, who leads the Kings with 10 playoff points, was sidelined after taking a big hit from Dave Bolland in the final minutes of the Blackhawks' 2-1 victory on Saturday.Kings coach Darryl Sutter said Richards was "fine" a couple of hours before the game, but the center was scratched from the lineup after participating in the pregame warmups."He was fine today, then I think just once his blood got pumping tonight, the adrenaline got going, there were symptoms," Sutter said. "I went in right after warmup, he was sitting there and I said, 'Unless you're 100 percent, you're not playing.'"Los Angeles forward Brad Richardson and defenseman Drew Doughty gingerly skated off at separate points of the first period, but both returned to the ice.The series took on a more physical tone in the second game in two days — a rarity in the playoffs brought on by The Rolling Stones' tour.The top-seeded Blackhawks also won the series opener in each of the first two rounds, but they dropped three in a row following their Game 1 victory against Detroit in the conference semifinals.There was no such letdown this time."It was frustrating early on, that series against Detroit, but I think we learned a lot there," defenseman Duncan Keith said.Shaw got Chicago off to a fast start, taking a nifty pass from Viktor Stalberg and beating Quick on the glove side just 1:56 into the game. Marian Hossa set up Seabrook in the final minute for a low liner into the left corner of the net. The defenseman put the Blackhawks into this round with an overtime goal in Game 7 against Detroit on Wednesday.The Blackhawks added two more in the second, separated by just 2:09. Bickell scored a power-play goal on a rebound in front, and Handzus skated in and beat Quick to make it 4-0 at 9:20."We gave them too many Grade-A scoring chances, and they capitalized," Kings defenseman Rob Scuderi said. "You can't give up those opportunities and expect your goalie to bail you out every single time."The crowd of 21,824 roared after Handzus' second goal of the postseason, and cheered even louder when Quick skated off and was replaced by Jonathan Bernier. Quick, last year's playoff MVP who had played every minute of this year's playoffs, finished with 13 saves."We had some nice shots. We had some high-quality stuff off the rush, as well, in that period," Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville said. "I still think that's going to be an ongoing challenge with him."Carter converted a one-timer at 18:57 of the second, and Toffoli netted a power-play goal with 1:02 left in the game, but that was it for the Kings.The Blackhawks killed three other power plays and have allowed just two goals in 47 attempts in the playoffs.Crawford was saluted by the crowd after he stopped Dustin Penner on a quality opportunity late in the second, and the chants resumed when he pulled Kings forward Kyle Clifford off Toews during a scrum with 8:45 left."The guy grabbed him, got a couple free shots. I figured it was enough," Crawford said. "I just decided to go in there and grab his head."Crawford was one of the top goalies in the NHL during the lockout-shortened regular season, and he has carried that into the playoffs. He has allowed just one goal in four of his last six games."He's the guy we want in net back there," Sharp said. "He's proven it in the past. It's nice to see him finally get the credit that he deserves."NOTES: Kings rookie D Jake Muzzin was scratched after playing in the first 14 postseason games. ... Crawford was 1-1 with a 3.54 goals-against average against Los Angeles during the regular season.
CHICAGO — The Blackhawks shot high, and they shot low. They shot glove-side and stick-side, from close range and long range. They tried one-timers and wristers. They screened, and they chipped. And finally they cracked Jonathan Quick.For a period and a half on Saturday, the Blackhawks peppered the Los Angeles Kings' net with nothing to show for it. They outshot the Kings by 17-2 in the first period, yet trailed by a goal. Patience, though, trumped frustration. The Blackhawks found their offense and grabbed Game 1 of the Western Conference finals, 2-1.The series set up as a contrast in styles: the up-tempo offense of the Blackhawks against the size of the Kings' defense and Quick, the most valuable player in last year's Stanley Cup playoffs. Game 1 fit the billing. The Kings did not register a shot for the first eight minutes, while the Blackhawks dominated the puck, the pace and the possession."He does some things in the net that you try to overcome," Blackhawks Coach Joel Quenneville said. "Volume and traffic on shots is the only way to get this guy."At 12 minutes 29 seconds of the second period, the Blackhawks' relentless pressure paid off. Johnny Oduya fired a shot from the point that Quick saved with a blocker. But the rebound bounced to the stick of Patrick Sharp as he streaked toward the net. Sharp beat Quick with a put-back for his team-high eighth goal of the playoffs."He's going to make those saves from the outside," Sharp said. "It's about getting to the inside. It's about outworking their defensemen to get those second and third opportunities."Four minutes after Sharp's goal, Duncan Keith took a pass from Bryan Bickell at the point and fired a shot at Quick. Marian Hossa, posted in front of the goal, held out his stick and deflected the puck past the screened Quick.The Blackhawks had the lead, and what had been a subdued crowd came alive. Chicago killed a penalty midway through the third period, and Corey Crawford, who had 21 saves, made the lead hold up. The Blackhawks even flexed a little muscle with a big hit from Dave Bolland on Mike Richards in the final minutes that brought the home fans to their feet.Before the series, the Blackhawks talked about the bounces that would be needed to beat Quick, who entered Game 1 leading the playoffs with a .948 save percentage and a 1.5 goals against average. Those breaks eventually went Chicago's way Saturday, but only after the Kings were the recipients of the puck's first critical hop late in the first period.After a failed clearing attempt, Crawford tried to sweep the puck away from his crease, and Bolland also got a stick on it in an attempt to clear the zone. But the puck ricocheted off the stick of Justin Williams and skipped past Crawford into the net.It was Williams's third goal in two games; he scored both goals for the Kings in Game 7 against the San Jose Sharks in the second round. Saturday's goal, though, did little to change the game's flow, as the Blackhawks tested Quick from the opening face-off.In the early part of the game, Quick was equal to Chicago's many challenges. In the first period, he stuffed Patrick Kane during a four on four, as Kane skated alone through the goal mouth after a pass from Jonathan Toews in the corner. Kane measured a shot, but Quick turned it away with his stick hand.Later in the first, Quick stopped a one-timer from Sharp and then a good chance on the rebound from Brandon Saad. In the second period, Quick gloved a laserlike wrist shot from Keith."Shift after shift, the waves of pressure, we didn't have them at all it seemed," Kings center Jarret Stoll said. "We didn't have that consistent push we wanted to, so therefore we didn't get a lot of scoring opportunities."Both teams entered the series battle-tested, having won two of the past three Stanley Cups. The Blackhawks won it in 2010 and had a league-high 77 points in this lockout-shortened regular season. The Kings are the defending champions and peaking again in the postseason. Each team also survived a seven-game series in the second round, the Kings taking out the Sharks, and the Blackhawks needing overtime to eliminate the Detroit Red Wings.The Kings welcomed the return of Stoll, who missed the final six games of the series against the Sharks after a hit to the head from Raffi Torres in Game 1. But the Blackhawks left the arena knowing they were the team that imposed its style and speed on the Kings and on Quick, their seemingly invincible goaltender."Quick's a good goalie," Sharp said. "We try not to talk about him too much and go out there and control what we can control."
The season that almost wasn't has turned out better than anyone dared expect.The NHL still ranks fourth among North America's five major professional sports leagues, but don't look now — hockey is gaining ground again.TV ratings for the playoffs are through the roof, relatively speaking, thanks to scintillating games and a final four — Chicago, Los Angeles, Boston and Pittsburgh — that any league would love to have.Last weekend's Bruins-Penguins matchup handily beat baseball's time-tested game of the week, Red Sox-Yankees, in a head-to-head matchup — nearly 2-to-1 in the desirable 18-49 age demographic, and that was after a lockout-shortened NHL regular season that already saw ratings climb by 18 percent. Telecasts in a few towns are setting records and even approaching NFL levels.What were the odds of that happening last winter, when the league's owners and players squared off across a bargaining table, hell-bent on driving off fans and sacrificing the schedule to labor strife for the second time in less than 10 years — and the third during commissioner Gary Bettman's 20 years in charge?Just as improbable, perhaps, is how they got from there to here."After the 2004-05 lockout, hockey changed in lots of important ways," Sam Flood, executive producer for NBC Sports and the man most responsible for the improved TV product, said Tuesday. "It got faster. There was less clutching and grabbing. The stars became stars again. Our job was figuring out how to showcase those skills, to make them accessible to even the most casual fan."Fifteen years ago, Bill Clinton became the first sitting U.S. president to make it down to the rink by taking in a playoff game between the Buffalo Sabres and his hometown Washington Capitals. During a quick interview, Clinton said he was struck by how much faster, rougher and dramatic the game seemed sitting in the stands than looking in on TV."I explained that's no surprise," NHL commissioner Gary Bettman said then, "since time after time, our research tells us we've got the best in-person experience in sports."For the longest time, that was hockey's greatest strength and its greatest weakness. The NHL played its games in arenas filled to more than 90 percent of capacity, on average, but almost nobody watched it on TV.There was a perception that despite its national footprint, hockey was a regional game; strong where it's played and barely a blip on the radar screen everywhere else. Even more troubling was research suggesting that among the NHL's target audience of 70 million fans in the United States and Canada, more than two-thirds quit watching once their favorite team was eliminated.Compounding the problem was Bettman's sometimes-haphazard search for a TV partner. ESPN and FOX both took turns, without much success, and hockey appeared doomed to remain a niche sport. Things were so bad when the league threw in with NBC in 2004 that it received no money up-front and instead agreed to only a revenue-sharing deal.In hindsight that may turn out to be the smartest deal Bettman made. Last year, the NHL renewed with NBC through 2021, this time for a reported $2 billion in rights fees. Based on early returns, both sides have plenty to like about the deal.NBC needed live sports programming and it's given the NHL top-shelf treatment in return, borrowing ideas from other sports and coming up with a few innovations of its own.This year's best launch was a weekly Wednesday night regular-season game between teams — as Flood put it — "that really hated each other."For the second year in a row, every playoff game is available nationally — what he calls the "March Madness effect" — building momentum and retaining more of the "avid" NHL fans that used to depart once their teams did.Wider screens, high-definition broadcasts, improved audio and slow-motion replays seem tailor-made for hockey, if only because they've made the game easier to follow, even for the most casual fans.For all that, the innovation Flood considers his best is the in-game segment called "Inside the Glass," which features analyst Pierre McGuire in a section between the benches, updating viewers in real time with information he's picked up from that unique vantage point."It changed the way the game was perceived at home, offering things we'd never get from an announcer two decks above the ice," Flood said. "Coaches barking orders at players, players challenging each other — that kind of access is critical."It's one more piece of the puzzle, like what NASCAR was doing with reporters in the pit, giving fans access to a place they weren't previously allowed. The feedback's been great," Flood chuckled. "People tell us it's like being part of a secret club."It's been one step forward, two steps back for much of Bettman's reign.The Winter Classic outdoor games have been a rousing success and the U.S.-Canada rivalry at the Vancouver Olympics in 2010 pulled in fans the sport didn't know it had. On the flip side, the labor stoppages, ambitious expansion into non-traditional hockey towns and shortage of Canadian teams has handicapped growth.But for the first time in a while, the sport looks up and sees nothing but clear ice ahead."We can't control who reaches the finals," said Flood, the son of a hockey coach and a fair college player himself, "but nobody's complaining about the way this one worked out."Jim Litke is a national sports columnist for The Associated Press. Write to him at jlitke(at)ap.org and follow him at Twitter.com/JimLitke.
SEATTLE — The Chicago White Sox needed 17 hits, eight pitchers and more than 5½ hours to end their eight-game losing streak. So while they were happy to put the slide behind them, it was all about some rest after this one was over.Alejandro De Aza and Alex Rios each had an RBI single in the 16th inning, and the White Sox held on for a 7-5 victory over the Seattle Mariners on Wednesday."We're all too exhausted right now to relish it," Chicago second baseman Gordon Beckham said. "But when you're down, you've got an eight-game losing streak, and you're battling and what happens in the 14th happened it's like, 'How can it get any worse?' ... We battled and hopefully it does enough for us to get going back in the right direction."De Aza's tiebreaking hit came after the teams combined to make baseball history when Chicago scored five times in the top of the 14th, only to have Seattle complete an improbable rally on Kyle Seager's tying grand slam off Addison Reed (2-0) with two out.According to the Mariners, with information from Elias Sports Bureau, Seager was the first player to hit a tying grand slam in extra innings and no team had ever scored five or more runs in the 14th inning or later to tie a game. It also was the first game in major league history when each team scored five or more runs in the game when it was scoreless through the ninth.After 13 innings of offensive futility, the two sides combined for 10 runs and 10 hits in the 14th inning alone. Clocking in at 5 hours, 42 minutes, the game was too long for Chicago manager Robin Ventura, who had to leave early to catch a flight for his daughter's high school graduation."We had a lot of big hits in the 14th," said Chicago bench coach Mark Parent, who took over when Ventura left. "The whole pitching staff and the team really rallied around each other. It was really good to see."The events of the 14th all became a footnote when the White Sox scored twice in the 16th against Hector Noesi (0-1), who gave up three runs and seven hits in three innings. De Aza drove in Beckham and eventually came around on an infield hit by Rios, who also singled home the first run of the game.The two-run cushion proved to be enough for Reed this time. He struck out Brendan Ryan on three pitches, and then got Endy Chavez and Jason Bay swinging.Reed was charged with five runs and five hits over three innings, but got the victory. Reed had never thrown more than 1 2-3 innings and 40 pitches. He threw 55 pitches and was at the end of his stint when he recorded the final out. Parent's plan should the game go to the 17th was to have outfielder Casper Wells take the mound."It was a crazy game and I've never been a part of anything like that," Reed said. "It was just amazing how our guys stayed focused and stayed in the ballgame for me."The White Sox avoided the first winless road trip of seven or more games in franchise history. They seemed to have the game won in the 14th, but the lead evaporated in a remarkable inning.De Aza had a leadoff walk and advanced to third on a perfectly executed hit-and-run single through the right side of the infield by Alexei Ramirez. Rios then singled in De Aza, and Chicago added another run on Wells' infield single. Jeff Keppinger had a two-run single and Hector Gimenez doubled home a run as the White Sox sent 10 batters to the plate.And that seemed to be more than enough, especially with Reed taking over.But the closer was shaky from the outset, giving up four straight hits after Franklin popped out. The last of the four hits came from Chavez and scored Michael Saunders to make it 5-1. Reed struck out Bay on a slider and had a 1-2 count on Seager when he left a fastball over the plate and third baseman drove it over the wall in right-center for his first career grand slam.The Mariners' dugout erupted and Seager wore a grin on his face as he rounded the bases. It was the first home run allowed this year by Reed."I don't think you can necessarily try to hit a home run off him. He's got pretty good stuff. He's their closer for a reason," Seager said. "Just try to put a good swing on the ball and not strike out."NOTES: Chicago announced RHP Jake Peavy has a non-displaced rib fracture on the left side of his chest and will be sidelined for approximately four to six weeks. The fracture was revealed in an MRI exam on Wednesday morning in Seattle. ... Seattle plans on having Michael Morse (quad) back in the lineup on Thursday, although manager Eric Wedge has not decided if Morse will play first base or DH. ... Wednesday was the 13th game in Mariners history to be scoreless through nine innings.
WASHINGTON — On Tuesday night, for the 24th time since his April 24 promotion to the major leagues, Juan Lagares was not penciled into the Mets ' lineup.Lagares, a 24-year-old center fielder, has played at times this season against left-handed starters and has been inserted into games here and there as a pinch-hitter or as a defensive replacement. Mostly, though, he has languished on the bench.Certainly, Lagares has not produced numbers that scream for more playing time. Before the Mets' 3-2 loss to the Nationals on Tuesday in the opener of a three-game series, he had a .146 batting average, a .180 on-base percentage and a .250 slugging percentage. While Manager Terry Collins has invoked Lagares's name when discussing the team's future, the question is: What benefit is it for a still-developing player to grow stale sitting in the dugout?Collins has acknowledged as much. The Mets faced three right-handed starters during their weekend series against the Miami Marlins and will face two more against the Nationals. Collins said Saturday night that he would simply need to start using Lagares against right-handers.But after center fielder Rick Ankiel — a left-handed hitter who was batting .203 since being claimed on May 13 — was given another start Tuesday, Collins was asked at what point it would become counterproductive for Lagares to remain in the majors while playing so sparingly."We've already probably reached it and passed the point," Collins said. "We brought this guy up here to make sure we don't overexpose Juan, to bring him along slowly. But certainly, in a perfect world, Juan Lagares would be in the lineup somewhere — if it's not here, then certainly in Triple-A."The fear of overexposure has perhaps created a situation in which Lagares has not been exposed at all. Since arriving in the big leagues, he has sat out 12 games and has 48 at-bats.While he watched, the Mets slunk to a fourth straight loss. The Mets were leading, 2-1, entering the ninth after the right-hander Jeremy Hefner gave up one run in seven innings and shortstop Omar Quintanilla provided a two-run triple with two outs in the fifth. But Bobby Parnell blew the save, allowing a run-scoring single to Adam LaRoche and a bases-loaded sacrifice fly to Steve Lombardozzi."I struggled a little bit," said Parnell, who had converted his previous seven chances. "It's not my first one. It's not my last one. I'll have to get them tomorrow."It was a tough blow for Hefner, whose rotation place may be jeopardized as the prospect Zack Wheeler readies for the big leagues this month. Hefner struck out seven and walked one, and gave up a second-inning home run to Ian Desmond.When Lagares has played, he has struggled, except for a few bright moments. He made a pair of acrobatic catches against the Pittsburgh Pirates early last month, and he hit a two-run, game-tying home run against the Chicago Cubs at Wrigley Field to spark one of the Mets' best victories of the season.Lagares said he needed to improve. As one would expect, he said he did not mind sitting at the major league level, as opposed to playing every day in the minors."It's every player's dream to make it to the big leagues and to try to stay there," said Lagares, who batted .346 through 17 Class AAA games this year. "I only have like 45 at-bats. I know I can do better."The predicament around Lagares speaks to larger problems the Mets face. While slumping to another losing season, they have relied heavily upon veterans like Ankiel, 33, and right fielder Marlon Byrd, 35, though neither seems to factor into the club's future. And since Ankiel has not produced — he was 0 for 3 Tuesday — some may wonder how much worse the Mets would be if they played their youngsters every day.At the same time, the Mets have not had many other options. Everyone the club has tried in the outfield has struggled to some degree. "We certainly didn't anticipate the amount of guys that are having a tough go of it at the moment," Collins said.The situation could be changing. Kirk Nieuwenhuis, who was demoted April 23, has hit eight home runs in his last 14 games for the Mets' Class AAA team in Las Vegas, and Collins said he was a candidate to rejoin the major league team.That could allow Lagares to return to the minors and continue to develop while playing every day. Regardless, the Mets will face similar issues — whom to play and how much — if their season continues to lose its competitive meaning.The right-hander Jeurys Familia, 23, will have surgery Wednesday to remove bone spurs from his elbow. Familia last appeared for the Mets on May 8. In eight games, he compiled a 3.48 earned run average and one save. ... The left-hander Jon Niese, who missed his last outing because of shoulder tendinitis, will throw a bullpen session Wednesday to determine whether he can make his next scheduled start Saturday. ... Terry Collins played down the anticipated promotion of Zack Wheeler later this month. "I hope everybody understands, if and when this guy comes, he's not going to be the savior," Collins said, adding later: "There's been so much made of this poor kid. He hasn't pitched a game in the big leagues yet. It looks like he's going to be a finalist for the Cy Young, and he isn't even here."
LOS ANGELES — When Bryan Bickell's shot slipped out of Jonathan Quick's usually inescapable glove and trickled into the Los Angeles net early, the Chicago Blackhawks figured Game 4 might be their chance to snap the Kings' daunting streak of home dominance.When Marian Hossa's shot eluded Quick for the go-ahead goal two periods later, the Blackhawks knew they had cracked their foe's star goalie and the formula for winning at Staples Center.The Kings are teetering in the Western Conference finals — and Chicago needs just one more win to topple the defending Stanley Cup champions.Hossa scored the tiebreaking goal early in the third period, and the Blackhawks moved to the brink of the Stanley Cup finals with a 3-2 victory Thursday night, ending Los Angeles' 15-game winning streak at home."They were playing so well at home, and to finally break that streak, we're happy about it," Hossa said. "We knew about it. We talked about it before the game. We were hoping to break it, and we got it."Corey Crawford made 19 saves, and Patrick Kane tapped in the tying goal as Chicago rallied from a second-period deficit to beat the Kings. Los Angeles hadn't lost in its rink since March 23, including eight playoff games. Bickell had a goal and an assist for the top-seeded Blackhawks, who took a 3-1 series lead even without suspended defenseman Duncan Keith.After losing Game 3 in listless fashion, the Blackhawks had a solution to every dilemma, from the Kings' two early leads to the absence of Chicago's ice-time leader and top defenseman."We knew our defense was going to step up, and they did," Bickell said. "We had a good feeling coming in. We had a bitter taste from the last game. They had a big start, but we stuck with it and eventually got it back."Slava Voynov and Dustin Penner scored for the Kings, who had the NHL's longest home postseason winning run since 2009. The champs know they are in trouble after failing to hold on to a late lead in front of their Conn Smythe Trophy-winning goalie."It's an incredibly skilled team," Kings defenseman Rob Scuderi said of Chicago. "We're not getting into something we didn't know. When you turn the puck over like that at the blue lines, with the skill they have, it's only a matter of time before they put one on the scoreboard. Hopefully we learned our lesson, and we've got to win the next one."The Blackhawks thrived without Keith, who served a one-game suspension for high-sticking Jeff Carter in the face during the second period of Game 3. Sheldon Brookbank filled in while Chicago played strong team defense in front of Crawford, allowing just two shots by the desperate Kings in the third period."Right from the first couple shifts, we were moving our feet, playing with speed," said defenseman Brent Seabrook, who led Chicago with 26:20 of ice time. "We were getting in on the forecheck and making good plays. It was big for our group to come back with a good effort."Los Angeles hadn't lost a playoff game at home since Game 4 of the Stanley Cup finals last season, winning nine straight overall. The Kings also had been outstanding when playing with a lead in front of Quick, who stopped 25 shots, but Los Angeles uncharacteristically surrendered that 2-1 lead late in the second period.The high-scoring Kane ending his seven-game goal drought in a quiet postseason by charging into the crease to tap home the tying goal on a rebound of Niklas Hjalmarsson's shot and Bickell's deflection late in the second period. Hjalmarsson finished with two assists.After Los Angeles killed a penalty to open the third period, Michal Handzus caught the Kings napping and set up a break with the speedy Hossa, who ripped a precise shot for his seventh goal of the postseason."That's one thing that (coach) Darryl (Sutter) has been hard on us for right now," Kings defenseman Drew Doughty said. "We're making too many turnovers, in the neutral zone especially. That was a cause of two of the goals. We made turnovers and they came back down on odd-man rushes and scored. If we want to win, it's something we can't be doing."The Kings played their third straight game without center Mike Richards, who has an apparent concussion after a big hit from Chicago's Dave Bolland in the series opener. Richards was the Kings' leading postseason scorer with 10 points when he got hurt.Los Angeles' unbeaten stretch at home ended in unusual fashion with the blown lead, and the low-scoring Kings' title defense could be over in two days. The NHL hasn't had a repeat champion since the Detroit Red Wings in 1998, and Los Angeles has managed just eight goals in four games against the powerful Blackhawks."They didn't have many great scoring chances," Crawford said. "We mostly kept them to the outside. It was great for us to shut them down."Chicago needs one win in three games to advance to its second Stanley Cup finals appearance since 1992. The Blackhawks have been mostly rolling since their 5-2 victory in the season opener at Los Angeles in January, ruining the Kings' banner-raising ceremony.The Blackhawks hadn't won a playoff round in the past two seasons since their Stanley Cup triumph, replenishing their roster on the fly around their talented young core.Just nine players remain from the championship team, but it's safe to say the rebuild is complete for a team that won its second Presidents' Trophy with a 36-7-5 regular season, followed by a gutsy rally from a 1-3 series deficit against Detroit to escape the second round.The Kings opened Game 4 with the same urgency they showed two days earlier, forcing their way into Chicago's zone and preventing the Blackhawks' usual slick passing. Los Angeles' fourth line created the first goal just 3:28 in when Kyle Clifford passed from behind Chicago's net to Voynov, who skated in alone for a slap shot past Crawford.The goal was Voynov's sixth of the postseason, extending his single-season playoff record for Kings defensemen.Chicago responded, easily killing a penalty while holding Los Angeles without a shot for about 11 minutes. The Blackhawks evened it on an innocent-looking play by Bickell, whose wobbly shot somehow got out of Quick's glove for his eighth goal of the postseason.Bickell is on a remarkable playoff run before unrestricted free agency this summer, scoring a goal in each of the past three games and five of seven overall.The Kings went back ahead early in the second period on another strong shift by their newly assembled big line featuring Carter, Penner and rookie Tyler Toffoli, who has taken Richards' place in the lineup. They also victimized the Blackhawks' third defensive pairing: Carter drove the net while Chicago's Nick Leddy failed to knock him off the puck, and Penner swept home the rebound of Carter's backhand when Brookbank couldn't move him out of the crease.Chicago tied it late in the period when Hjalmarsson launched a long shot through Bickell's screen and past Quick. Kane tapped it home for a much-needed boost for the prolific scorer who had managed just two goals in the playoffs after getting 23 in the regular season.After Hossa scored his second goal of the series, Quick made an exceptional glove save on Kane later in the third period. But Quick and the Kings have yielded 10 goals in the series — the same number they gave up in six first-round games and seven second-round games."It's a loss. They're all the same," Quick said. "We've just got to win one game. That's all we've got to do."NOTES: The Kings lost at home in regulation just four times in the regular season. ... Brookbank played only 6:50 and was a minus-2, but coach Joel Quenneville praised his work. ... Los Angeles captain Dustin Brown has one goal in the last nine games, none in the conference finals. Top scorer Anze Kopitar has one goal in 13 games, also none in this series. Brown and Kopitar tied for the NHL playoff scoring lead last season with 20 points apiece.
LOS ANGELES — Marian Hossa scored the tiebreaking goal early in the third period, and the Chicago Blackhawks moved to the doorstep of the Stanley Cup finals with a 3-2 victory over the Los Angeles Kings on Thursday night in Game 4 of the Western Conference finals.Patrick Kane tapped home the tying goal as Chicago rallied from a second-period deficit to snap the Kings' 15-game home winning streak, which dated to March. Bryan Bickell had a goal and an assist for top-seeded Chicago, which took a 3-1 lead in the best-of-seven series. Slava Voynov and Dustin Penner scored for the Kings, the defending champions.The Blackhawks won without the top defenseman Duncan Keith, who served a one-game suspension for high-sticking Jeff Carter in the face during the second period of Game 3.
CHICAGO — Francisco Liriano wasn't quite sure where his pitches were going. The one thing he did control was his emotions.Liriano pitched two-hit ball over seven innings and the Pirates beat the Chicago Cubs 2-0 Friday for their major league-leading 10th shutout, matching Pittsburgh's total for all of last season.It is, as manager Clint Hurdle said, a "remarkable number." And it stands out even more because the Pirates don't have a complete game.Liriano (4-2) walked five, his most since Sept. 1 last year, but struck out eight to help Pittsburgh stop a three-game losing streak."I didn't feel, location-wise, I was that good," he said. "I was missing my spots a lot, and I walked too many guys. You know, just keep fighting 'til the end."Liriano walked two in the second and two in the fourth. But rather than get rattled, he worked his way out of trouble both times and came away with the win after a two-start losing streak.Mark Melancon pitched the eighth, and Jason Grilli finished the five-hitter for his major league-leading 23rd save in as many chances. After two-out singles by Ryan Sweeney and pinch-hitter Dioner Navarro, Grilli struck out Darwin Barney to preserve another shutout."We had 10 (shutouts) all last year and actually we pitched a lot better last year than we did the first year I was here," Hurdle said. "It just speaks to the job the pitchers are doing here, No. 1 throwing strikes, keeping the ball down. We've been able to get a little better at it every year, and this year, obviously, we've taken it to another level at this point in the season."Russell Martin had two hits, including an RBI double off Travis Wood (5-4) in the sixth, as the Pirates won for the second time in seven games. Jordy Mercer doubled twice.Pittsburgh continued to struggle at the plate after managing just one hit off Julio Teheran in a 5-0 loss at Atlanta on Wednesday. This time, the Pirates finished with seven hits.Wood gave up one run and four hits in six innings with two walks and six strikeouts, but couldn't quite match Liriano on the mound."He kept us off balance, kept the ball down all day," Wood said. "He really worked us. Even though he had several walks, he was able to battle around that and pitch a good ballgame."He had the Cubs' first hit, a one-out single in the fifth, after hitting his first career grand slam in a win over the Chicago White Sox last week."Travis has been the same all year," Barney said. "He's been consistent pounding the zone. He was a little bit more sporadic than he has been. But he still had good stuff. He keeps them off balance."Outscored 29-11 and shut out three times in their previous six games, the Pirates went ahead in the sixth.After escaping a bases-loaded jam in the second, Wood retired 11 straight before Mercer's one-out double. Mercer advanced on Andrew McCutchen's fly to right and scored on Martin's double."I just told myself I was going to be aggressive and not wait around," Martin said. "He's throwing lots of strikes, and I picked a side of the plate."Travis Snider added an RBI grounder in the ninth against Carlos Villanueva after Martin's walk and Pedro Alvarez's single.NOTES: Pirates LHP Wandy Rodriguez is to throw a bullpen session on Monday before the team decides whether he will go on the DL, although manager Clint Hurdle did say there was no "acute structural damage to the ligament" in Rodriguez's throwing arm. Rodriguez got only one out in Wednesday's loss at Atlanta before leaving with tightness in his left forearm. ... Sweeney, the Cubs' CF, made a neat catch in the eighth when he raced to his right and dove to snag Starling Marte's drive. ... Sveum said Rafael Dolis, on the 15-day DL with a mild strain in his right forearm, is "a lot better," and Shawn Camp (sprained right big toe) threw a bullpen session on Friday. Sveum also said no date has been set for Kyuji Fujikawa to have ligament-replacement surgery on his right elbow. ... A.J. Burnett (3-6, 3.22 ERA) starts Saturday for the Pirates, with Jeff Samardzija (3-6, 2.96 ERA) going for the Cubs.
CHICAGO — A.J. Burnett pitched into the ninth inning and Pedro Alvarez and Russell Martin homered to lead the Pittsburgh Pirates to a 6-2 win over the Chicago Cubs on Saturday.Burnett (4-6) gave up four hits and three walks with five strikeouts in 8 1-3 innings to improve to 5-0 in his career at Wrigley Field. He had a shutout until Alfonso Soriano's two-run home run to left with one out in the ninth ended a string of 18 straight scoreless innings by Pirates pitchers.Burnett held the Cubs hitless until Nate Schierholtz's double down the line in right leading off the fifth. He threw 112 pitches and left after Soriano's home run.Burnett threw a one-hitter in his last start at Wrigley Field last July 31. He lost the no-hitter in the eighth inning with two outs. Over his last 23 innings at Wrigley Field Burnett has allowed two runs and seven hitsSoriano's homer was the 379th of his career, tying him with Orlando Cepeda and Tony Perez for 64th on the all-time list.The Pirates tagged Cubs starter Jeff Samardzija (3-7) for eight hits, including Alvarez's two-run home run in the fourth, his team-high 13th of the year. The right-hander struck out seven and walked one in six innings.Martin's homer, a two-run shot in the eighth off reliever Hector Rondon, was the 100th of his career.The Pirates jumped on Samardzija for a run in the second on Garrett Jones' double and Alvarez's one-out RBI single. Pittsburgh added a run in the third when Starling Marte ended a streak of 14 hitless at-bats with a single, stole second and came in on Travis Snider's single.Alvarez homered to right field after Martin led off with a walk in the fourth to increase the Pirates' lead to 4-0.In the eighth, Martin sent a 3-2 pitch by Rondon into the seats in left for a two-out home run after Andrew McCutchen had drawn a walk.Pittsburgh beat Chicago for the fifth straight time and handed the Cubs their fifth loss in the last six games overall.NOTES: Pittsburgh RHP Jeff Karstens, on the disabled list since March 26 with a shoulder inflammation, had surgery Friday on his right rotator cuff and labrum in Los Angeles. He'll be able to begin a rehab process in 10 to 12 weeks. ... The Pirates placed RHP Jared Hughes on the 15-day disabled list with a throwing shoulder inflammation and recalled OF Alex Presley from Triple-A Indianapolis. Presley had been sent down Monday when Hughes was called up. Hughes has returned to Pittsburgh for more evaluation. ... Cubs pitcher Kyuji Fuikawa, who went on the 60-day DL May 27 with a muscular strain in his right forearm, is expected to have surgery Tuesday after an exam on Monday. ... Cubs SS Starlin Castro, dropped from second to seventh in the order on June 4, continued to struggle. He went 0 for 3 and is mired in a 3-for-34 slump. ... Sunday's pitchers: Pittsburgh left-hander Jeff Locke (5-1, 2.45) vs. Chicago right-hander Edwin Jackson (1-8, 6.29).
BOSTON — The way the game was going, with goals at an absolute premium, the first one, whenever it came, seemed destined to be the only one. And so it was.In the third period Friday night, the Boston Bruins delivered the coup de grâce to the scoring-challenged Pittsburgh Penguins in Game 4 of the Eastern Conference finals. It came off the stick of a most unlikely source, defenseman Adam McQuaid, a finalist for the Masterton trophy, which recognizes perseverance and sportsmanship.McQuaid's goal gave the Bruins a 1-0 victory and a sweep of a series in which the supposedly high-powered Penguins, who led the N.H.L. in scoring, managed two goals and never had a lead.For the second time in three years, the Bruins advanced to the Stanley Cup finals, where they will play Chicago or Los Angeles. Boston won the Cup in 2011, ending a 39-year drought.For the Penguins and their captain, Sidney Crosby, it was a humiliating end to a season they had hoped would result in a second Stanley Cup since 2009. Instead, Pittsburgh was swept in a series for the first time since 1979.McQuaid's goal, at 5 minutes 1 second of the third period, came on a blistering slap shot from the right point off an ideal pass by Brad Marchand, who had set up Patrice Bergeron for the winner in Game 3. Marchand, who had 4 points in the series, eluded several Penguins and found McQuaid alone. The shot sailed over the right shoulder of Penguins goalie Tomas Vokoun."I felt like I got good wood on it," McQuaid said. "Didn't necessarily think it was going to go in, but I'm glad it did. Marshy made a nice pass and just tried to get it on net. It feels good to be able to contribute that way when you don't normally."The goal continued a trend for the Bruins in the postseason. Defensemen have accounted for 30 percent of their 50 goals. For McQuaid, it was his second of the postseason; he also scored in Game 3 of Boston's first-round series against Toronto.The impenetrable Tuukka Rask made the goal stand up with his second shutout of the series, stopping 26 shots. He frustrated the Penguins time after time: neither Crosby nor Evgeni Malkin nor Kris Letang nor Jarome Iginla, who spurned Boston at the trading deadline, managed a single point in the series."You score two goals as a team in four games, and we go without any points," Crosby said. "That doesn't sit very well."Bruins Coach Claude Julien said, "Our guys did a good job of taking away time and space, and when they did get opportunities, our goaltender stood tall."Julien added that he did not feel as if the Bruins had swept the series. "I felt the breaks went our way," he said, calling the Penguins "snakebitten" for all their missed chances.The Penguins' offensive woes were epitomized by their lack of production on the power play. Pittsburgh finished 0 for 15 on the power play; on Friday, it had two two-minute advantages and another of 63 seconds.The Penguins pulled Vokoun in the final 90 seconds and still got nothing, even as Rask played several seconds without his stick as Penguins buzzed around his crease. Malkin appeared to miss an open-net opportunity in the closing seconds.Asked about the improbable lack of offense, Pittsburgh Coach Dan Bylsma said, "I share your disbelief that's a possible story line in this series."He added: "It certainly wasn't lack of opportunity or scoring chances or situations for our team. We did have them. And at the end, it felt like not only Tuukka Rask was keeping the puck out of the net, but there was a force around the net."The Penguins' two goals set a Bruins record for fewest allowed in a four-game series. The previous record, five, had been set in 1930. Rask has a .943 save percentage in the playoffs, leading the league.As the clock wound down, the fans in TD Garden, who included the Red Sox slugger David Ortiz and professional golfer Keegan Bradley, chanted, "We want the Cup."They will get their chance, a lot sooner than they, or the Penguins, expected.
CHICAGO — Three minutes into Saturday night's game, Duncan Keith found himself with room inside the Los Angeles Kings' blue line and fired a slap shot. When it slipped between the legs of Kings goaltender Jonathan Quick, Keith, who had been suspended for the previous game because of a high stick to the face of Jeff Carter, pumped his fists and let loose a scream so powerful that his mouth guard flew out like a projectile.Keith and his Blackhawks teammates would eventually celebrate a win, but only after the Kings mounted a stirring comeback and turned what had looked to be a sure Chicago win into a playoff classic.Patrick Kane scored his third goal of the night 11 minutes 40 seconds into the second overtime — a one-timer off a pass from Jonathan Toews on a two-on-one rush — to give Chicago a 4-3 victory and send the Blackhawks to the Stanley Cup finals.Chicago will host the Boston Bruins in Game 1 on Wednesday night at United Center."It's nice to win first and foremost, but to contribute the last couple games, I think any player would be lying to you if he said it isn't nice," Kane said.Saturday's game went to overtime after the Kings' Mike Richards deflected a shot from Anze Kopitar past goaltender Corey Crawford with less than 10 seconds to play in regulation. Richards, playing for the first time since having concussion symptoms after Game 1 of the series, saved the Kings' season just as it appeared to have surely slipped away. Kane had scored with 3:52 left in a frantic third period."I honestly don't think there's a worse feeling in hockey when you're nine seconds away," Toews said. "You know you have to get the puck out, and two little bounces go against you and next think you know it's in the net. Your heart sinks pretty quick."Before the puck dropped, Blackhawks players referred to Saturday's Game 5 as essentially a Game 7. Fuzzy math aside, the reasoning was that allowing the Kings, the defending champions, a spark — even in a series they trailed by three games to one — could produce a full-blown fire.True to that mind-set, the Blackhawks came out as the aggressors. Two minutes after Keith opened the scoring, Kane collected a rebound in front of the Kings' net and beat Quick top shelf to give Chicago a 2-0 lead and send the home crowd into a frenzy.The Kings did not record their first shot until 10:42 into the first period, by which point the Blackhawks already had seven. But the Blackhawks let their foot off the gas, and Los Angeles broke through to cut the lead in half with a short-handed goal by Dwight King at 9:28 of the second period.After Bryan Bickell went to the penalty box for boarding early in the third, Crawford could not smother a shot from Carter, and Kopitar stuffed the rebound home to tie the game at 2-2.The Blackhawks' advice to themselves would prove sage in the end. As the teams skated back and forth in overtime, the crowd hanging on every pass, every rush and every shot, the night did have the unmistakable feel of a Game 7 — even if only one team faced elimination.When the longest game in the Kings' history was finally over, Quick had stopped 31 of 35 shots. Crawford saved 33 of the 36 attempts he faced.Chicago was tested by the Detroit Red Wings in a grueling seven-game series in the conference semifinals, at one point trailing by three games to one. Despite their league-best 77 points during the regular season, the Blackhawks entered the series against the Kings considered underdogs by some, faced with the task of solving Quick, the reigning most valuable player of the playoffs.But the Blackhawks proved equal to the challenge, even chasing Quick during a 4-2 Game 2 win. The Kings had allowed more than two goals in just 2 of 13 playoff games entering the series. The Blackhawks scored three or more in three of the five games, eliminating the Kings in rather economical fashion."Coming back from that deficit against Detroit gives us a lot of confidence," Toews said. "We have a great chance to go back to where we want to be, and there's going to be some more tough moments and we'll have to battle through it."Now Chicago will turn its attention to Boston. The Bruins swept away the top-seeded Pittsburgh Penguins and their high-powered offense Friday. The showdown will feature two Original Six franchises and two teams firing on all cylinders.The Blackhawks have another distinction: they will attempt to become the first Presidents' Trophy winner to raise the Stanley Cup since Detroit in 2007-8.
Blue Jays outfielder Rajai Davis did not expect to put in a full day's work when he came on as a defensive replacement in the eighth inning.Three hours and 10 innings later, he sent his team home happy by delivering the winning hit.Davis drove in Emilio Bonifacio with a two-out single in the 18th inning, and Toronto beat the visiting Texas Rangers, 4-3, on Saturday.TWINS 4, NATIONALS 3 Ryan Doumit singled in the go-ahead run as visiting Minnesota won in 11 innings.ANGELS AND RED SOX SPLIT David Ortiz drove in three runs as Boston defeated Anaheim, 7-2, to split a doubleheader. In the early game, Mark Trumbo and Erick Aybar each drove in two runs in Anaheim's 9-5 win.TIGERS 6, INDIANS 4 Prince Fielder hit a bases-clearing double in the second inning, and host Detroit held on.WHITE SOX 4, ATHLETICS 1 John Danks pitched three-hit ball over eight innings for host Chicago and had his first victory in more than a year.REDS 4, CARDINALS 2 Mat Latos turned in seven solid innings, and host Cincinnati broke out of a slump.BREWERS 4, PHILLIES 3 Jonathan Lucroy hit a tiebreaking double in the sixth inning to lift host Milwaukee.PADRES 4, ROCKIES 2 Kyle Blanks hit a two-run homer, and Eric Stults tossed seven solid innings for visiting San Diego.PIRATES 6, CUBS 2 A. J. Burnett pitched into the ninth inning for Pittsburgh at Chicago.
CHICAGO — Cody Ransom hit a tiebreaking, three-run homer in the seventh inning and Edwin Jackson pitched the Chicago Cubs to a 4-1 victory over the Pittsburgh Pirates on Sunday.Ransom connected off reliever Justin Wilson (5-1) for his sixth home run of the season. Darwin Barney and Julio Borbon were on base after the Cubs were held hitless for 5 2-3 innings by Pirates starter Jeff Locke.Jackson (2-8) had his best and longest outing of the season, striking out eight in seven innings. He allowed four hits and a walk as the Cubs salvaged the finale of a three-game series.Kevin Gregg pitched the ninth for his seventh save in seven chances, completing a six-hitter.Chicago manufactured a game-tying run in the sixth before Dioner Navarro got the team's first hit on a two-out single to left.Ransom's alert baserunning led to the tying run. He went from first to third on an infield grounder and later scored on Scott Hairston's sacrifice fly.Locke issued a leadoff walk to Ransom in the sixth. Pirates second baseman Neil Walker fielded Anthony Rizzo's grounder in the hole and had to race to the bag to get the putout because first baseman Garrett Jones was out of position trying to field the ball. No one covered third on the play and Ransom took the extra base. After Alfonso Soriano walked, Hairston's sacrifice fly to center made it 1-all.Pittsburgh took a 1-0 lead in the fourth when Andrew McCutcheon doubled and Jones followed with an RBI single.Locke was wild all game, walking a season-high seven while striking out six. He left with a one-hitter and the game tied at 1 after 100 pitches in 5 2-3 innings.Wilson allowed Ryan Sweeney's single in the seventh, and pinch-hitter Borbon bunted into a force at second. Barney singled and Ransom followed with his three-run drive.The Pirates held the Cubs to two earned runs through the first 23 2-3 innings of the series.NOTES: Navarro reached base four times, walking twice and singling twice. ... The Cubs failed to get a hit in each of the series' three games until at least the fifth inning. ... Barney moved back into the leadoff spot. He had batted eighth from the season's second game until three games ago, hit leadoff twice and then returned to eighth Saturday. ... Pirates manager Clint Hurdle said pitcher Charlie Morton could soon be considered for a return to the team after throwing 96 pitches in 6 1-3 innings Saturday during a rehab assignment with Triple-A Indianapolis. Morton had elbow surgery and has been on the disabled list since March 22. Hurdle called it the right-hander's "best outing to date." ... Pittsburgh right-hander Gerrit Cole makes his major league debut when the Pirates return home for six games starting Tuesday. The first pick in the 2011 draft will square off against San Francisco's Tim Lincecum (4-5, 4.75 ERA). ... The Cubs host Cincinnati on Monday, with Scott Feldman (5-4, 2.84) opposing Reds RHP Homer Bailey (3-4, 3.84).
CHICAGO — Alex Rios and Tyler Flowers homered, Hector Santiago pitched into the seventh inning and the Chicago White Sox beat the Oakland Athletics 4-2 on Sunday to salvage a split of their four-game series.The White Sox appear to be waking up after dropping 10 of 11 and falling into last place in the AL Central. They've won two in a row behind strong starts from Santiago (2-4) and John Danks, and their bats are showing some life as well.Flowers tied it 1-all in the third after Coco Crisp homered in the top half. The White Sox grabbed a 3-1 lead in the fourth on a sacrifice fly by Conor Gillaspie and an RBI double by Gordon Beckham. Rios chased A.J. Griffin (5-5) with a solo homer in the eighth to make it 4-2.Santiago was simply superb after Danks and Addison Reed combined on a four-hitter Saturday, and the Athletics lost for the just their fifth time in 23 games.In and out of the rotation after opening the season in the bullpen, the left-hander got the call with Jake Peavy sidelined by a broken rib and delivered in a big way. Santiago allowed two runs — one earned — and four hits while striking out six and walking three.He left to loud cheers with a two-run lead after walking Josh Reddick with one out in the seventh. Matt Lindstrom came on and gave up a bloop single to a pinch-hitter John Jaso before Adam Rosales grounded into a force. Matt Thornton then threw wildly to first on a pickoff attempt, allowing Reddick to score and pull Oakland within one, before Crisp popped out.Jesse Crain retired the side in the eighth, giving him 24 straight scoreless innings and 25 appearances in a row without allowing a run. Reed worked the ninth for his 19th save in 20 chances and his second in two days.Griffin allowed seven hits and struck out five while walking one, but Oakland managed only five hits at the plate.NOTES: OF Chris Young was back in Oakland's lineup as the designated hitter after missing Saturday's game because of an illness. "DH-ing him would probably be an easier transition for him," manager Bob Melvin said. "I'm sure he lost some fluids yesterday, and he was having a tough time stomach-wise the night before. I'm not really sure (if it was food poisoning), but it wasn't a virus." ... The Athletics are finally off on Monday after playing 17 straight days. They had won 13 of 16 during that stretch entering Sunday's game. "We've had a long stretch of games here, National League teams, American League teams, different time zones," Melvin said. "We're a little bit tired right now. Usually, when you're playing well, you don't want the days off. But on this particular day, I think we're all looking forward to the off day tomorrow." ... Dylan Axelrod (3-4, 3.73 ERA) starts Monday for the White Sox against Toronto knuckleballer R.A. Dickey (5-7, 4.66).
Matt Holliday's grand slam capped a seven-run 10th inning that lifted the visiting St. Louis Cardinals past the Cincinnati Reds, 11-4, on Sunday night. The Cardinals, who took two of three games from the Reds , have won or split 13 straight series.Leading off the 10th, Allen Craig drew a walk from J. J. Hoover (0-5). One out later, David Freese singled, extending his career-best hitting streak to 19 games. Daniel Descalso followed with a run-scoring double off the left-field wall.After Matt Carpenter drove home two runs with a bases-loaded single, Holliday blasted a grand slam to left.BRAVES 8, DODGERS 1 Dan Uggla had two home runs and four runs batted in as visiting Atlanta routed Los Angeles.ROCKIES 8, PADRES 7 Dexter Fowler's single with two outs in the 10th inning drove home D. J. LeMahieu, giving Colorado a home win over San Diego.GIANTS 6, D'BACKS 2 Marco Scutaro and Brandon Belt homered as San Francisco won at Arizona.BREWERS 9, PHILLIES 1 Carlos Gomez hit a two-run homer and Kyle Lohse earned his first win in eight starts, leading host Milwaukee to a rout of Philadelphia.NATIONALS SWEEP TWINS Ian Desmond doubled home the go-ahead run in the seventh inning, helping host Washington rally to beat Minnesota, 5-4, and complete a doubleheader sweep. In the first game, Jordan Zimmermann pitched seven scoreless innings for his ninth win, tying him for the most in the majors, as the Nationals won, 7-0.TIGERS 4, INDIANS 1 Jose Alvarez pitched six strong innings in his major league debut as host Detroit beat Cleveland to complete a three-game sweep.ORIOLES 10, RAYS 7 J. J. Hardy, Adam Jones, Alexi Casilla and Nick Markakis each had two R.B.I., and Baltimore hammered Matt Moore to win at Tampa Bay.RED SOX 10, ANGELS 5 David Ortiz and Jarrod Saltalamacchia hit three-run homers, powering host Boston past Los Angeles. Saltalamacchia's home run was his second of the game.RANGERS 6, BLUE JAYS 4 Adrian Beltre hit a tiebreaking home run in the seventh, and Texas rallied to win at Toronto.WHITE SOX 4, ATHLETICS 2 Alex Rios and Tyler Flowers homered, and host Chicago beat Oakland for its second straight victory after a skid of 10 losses in 11 games.ROYALS 2, ASTROS 0 Alex Gordon and Eric Hosmer hit run-scoring singles in the eighth, leading Kansas City past visiting Houston for its fifth straight victory.
(Reuters) - A Stanley Cup classic 86 years in the making hits the ice as Boston Bruins and Chicago Blackhawks, two of the National Hockey League's charter clubs, faceoff in a best-of-seven final dripping with nostalgia and mystery.The first Original Six showdown for Lord Stanley's famous silver mug since 1979 may harken back to the days before expansion, but despite their rich histories when the series opens on Wednesday in Chicago it will mark the first time the two storied franchises have clashed in a Stanley Cup Final."The tradition of the Bruins and the Hawks is special," Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville told reporters. "I'm sure, the rivalry could return instantly come Game One."I think it's good for the league. It's good for hockey. Two great hockey markets."Two of America's great sporting cities, Boston and Chicago have rarely crossed paths at any championship.In fact, Beantown and the Windy City have only twice before met to decide a title, the Chicago Cubs and Boston Red Sox in the 1918 World Series and the Bears and New England Patriots at the 1986 Super Bowl.The Bruins and Blackhawks, however, are no strangers to Stanley Cup celebrations.Chicago last hoisted the Cup in 2010 while the Bruins, winners in 2011, would like nothing more than to parade the treasured trophy trough the streets of Boston that were left silent and empty following the Boston Marathon bombings on April 15 that left three people dead and 264 injured.The Final marks the finish line of a punishing two month playoff marathon and could provide a thrilling climax to a tumultuous season that nearly never was after a bitter labor dispute shortened the schedule to just 48 games.Memories of the lockout now appear all but forgotten washed away by an intriguing playoff race that has left standing two teams that have not played each other in almost two years.Both Boston and Chicago enter the Final on impressive rolls, the Blackhawks winners of seven of the last eight games and the Bruins winning nine-of-10, including a stunning sweep of the top seeded Pittsburgh Penguins in the Eastern Conference final.But the road to the Cup does not come without a few bumps with each team surviving a seven-game scare, Boston against the Toronto Maple Leafs in the opening round and Chicago against the Detroit Red Wings in the Western Conference semi-finals.Cornered by the Maple Leafs, down 4-2 with under 90 seconds to play in Game Seven, the Bruins showed their teeth in frightening fashion scoring two late goals and another in overtime to advance.The Bruins remained in a snarly mood crushing the New York Rangers in five games then mauling Sidney Crosby and the Penguins to get back to the Final for the second time in three years.Chicago spent the entire campaign atop the West standings setting a record by earning points in each of their first 24 games on way to claiming the Presidents' Trophy, as the NHL team with the best regular season record.But like the Bruins, Chicago also needed to pull off a miraculous escape to keep their Cup dreams alive, going down 3-1 to the Red Wings before sweeping the last three games and capping the comeback with a Game Seven overtime winner from defenseman Brent Seabrook.The Blackhawks then clinched a spot in the Final clinically dispatching the defending champion Los Angeles Kings in five games.The Final also will be a fascinating clash of styles, with the 'Big, Bad Bruins' punishing, hit-anything-that-moves approach against the speedy Blackhawks finesse and puck possession game.There is no lack of offensive creativity on the Chicago bench with snipers like captain Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane, who were among the top five in league scoring during the regular season with 23 goals apiece.Toews has been mired in a post-season slump with just one goal but Patrick Sharp and unheralded Bryan Bickell have picked up the slack with eight tallies apiece while Kane had a hat-trick in eliminating the Kings.A solid Chicago defense is anchored by Duncan Keith and Seabrook while netminder Corey Crawford has the best goals-against-average in the playoffs.For all their reputation as a surly team that relies on intimidation, the Bruins lineup also features the playoff's two leading scorers in David Krejci (nine goals, 21 points) and Nathan Horton (seven goals, 17 points).But stopping goals, not scoring them, has been the foundation of Boston's playoff success.The Bruins enter the Final with the post-season's top ranked defense led by the giant Slovak Zdeno Chara and Finnish netminder Tuukka Rask, who posted two shutouts against the Mighty Penguins.While the Blackhawks have the marquee names, the Bruins view themselves as a Band of Brothers, typified by fourth liner Gregory Campbell who broke his leg throwing himself in front of a slap shot in Game Three against the Penguins but stayed on the ice to finish his shift."That's the way I feel a team should be, nobody should be on a pedestal," said Bruins coach Claude Julien. "There's a lot of guys in there that you could easily put on a pedestal."Not only are they not put on a pedestal, they don't want to be put on a pedestal."
CHICAGO — The Campbell Bowl was wheeled onto the United Center ice Saturday night and presented to the Western Conference champion Blackhawks , the N.H.L.'s best team during the regular season, who had just earned a trip to the Stanley Cup finals with a thrilling 4-3 double-overtime victory against the Los Angeles Kings .The shimmering silver trophy, however, was not the only bounty on the ice. Caps of all shapes, sizes and colors littered the neutral zone during the presentation ceremony. They paid homage to a particular Chicago star, Patrick Kane.Kane scored the series-clinching goal at 11 minutes 40 seconds of the second overtime of Game 5, taking a pass from Jonathan Toews and firing a one-timer past the outstretched glove of Jonathan Quick. Kane's third goal of the game ended a long, wild night and set up a Stanley Cup finals matchup with the Boston Bruins. Chicago will host Game 1 on Wednesday."I think it's almost like I'm in a different zone, like in the twilight zone or something," Kane said after the game while wearing a gray suit and, quite appropriately, a cap of his own. "I'm kind of out of it. It's definitely a good feeling, though."For Kane, the hat trick was the latest memorable moment in a season that began for him in Switzerland during the lockout. He played for a team in Biel, a town on the Swiss-French border, and lived with his mother during his time abroad. He earned a reputation as something of a party boy in his early years in the league, but this has been called a season of growth for Kane, a Buffalo native and a former No. 1 overall draft pick. The culmination came Saturday.Kane, 24, returned from Europe and was a catalyst for the Blackhawks' N.H.L.-record 24-game point streak to begin the season. He was fifth in the league with 55 points and 23 goals this season and led the N.H.L. with six shootout goals. He was also named a finalist for the Lady Byng trophy, awarded for sportsmanship and "gentlemanly conduct" on the ice, in recognition of his maturation.Kane, though, started these playoffs slowly. He did not score his first goal until Game 2 of the second round against the Detroit Red Wings and had only two goals in Chicago's first 15 postseason games.That is when Coach Joel Quenneville, after a 3-1 loss to the Kings in Game 3, publicly said he needed more from Kane.Kane responded by hitting the score sheet in Game 4 when he got a stick on a puck just as it was crossing the goal line on a shot by Bryan Bickell. The joke was that the shot would have been a goal with or without Kane's help."Anything to get him going," Bickell, who has eight goals this postseason, said with a smile before Game 5.Kane added: "I expected more from myself. My teammates probably did, too. I tried to get back to the basics. Want the puck, get the puck, try and make plays."Then came Saturday, when Kane delivered one of the great individual performances in N.H.L. playoff history. He played 41 shifts and nearly 29 minutes, firing five shots on goal to produce his three scores."That was more than more," Quenneville said. "It was certainly an outstanding game by him."Kane put Chicago ahead by 2-0 early in the first period when he cleaned up a rebound in front of the Kings' net and patiently measured his shot before beating Quick with an elevated wrist shot. He then appeared to deliver the winner with less than four minutes to play in regulation when he cut from the blue line, took a nifty pass from Bickell and buried a shot from point-blank range. The Kings, though, tied the score with 10 seconds remaining in the third period."What a feeling, what a game for him," forward Patrick Sharp said. "I know he's been pressing, trying to put the puck in the net, and getting a goal in L.A. probably took a lot of weight off him."During the Blackhawks' run to the Stanley Cup in 2010, Kane was a wide-eyed 21-year-old in his third year in the league. He shunned the playoff beard tradition mostly because he could not muster much scruff on his cheeks. Still, he proved that the magnitude of the stage did not faze him, as he scored the Cup-clinching goal in overtime of Game 6 in Philadelphia.This year, his signature mullet is back, but Kane has a full beard, too. And there he was after Game 5, all grown up and all smiles, answering questions about his journey and his team's: from down by three games to one to Detroit just a round earlier to four games from a second championship.Asked to compare the night of his series-clinching hat trick with his Stanley Cup winner in 2010, Kane replied, "Right now, it feels like the best."
CHICAGO — Dusty Baker doesn't follow the records. He is keeping count as the Reds keep piling up wins at Wrigley Field.Xavier Paul hit a three-run home run, Joey Votto added a two-run shot and the Cincinnati Reds roughed up Matt Garza and the Chicago Cubs 12-2 on Tuesday night.Tony Cingrani (3-0), filling in for the injured Johnny Cueto, pitched seven strong innings as Cincinnati extended its franchise-best winning streak at Wrigley Field to 11 games.The former Cubs manager was surprised to hear that 11 games is the most consecutive wins by an opponent at Wrigley."Really? I'll tell you, I am not an accountant. But I do know how many. It's a nice count," Baker said with a sly smile.Cingrani, from Chicago's South Suburbs, allowed two runs and four hits, while striking out five and allowing one walk.Zack Cozart also added a three-run shot in the eighth and Todd Frazier hit a solo home run in the second inning for the Reds.Baker also passed Ralph Houk for 16th place on the all-time win list for a manager with 1,620 victories.The Reds have won 18 of its last 21 against the Cubs."It's pretty cool. We're comfortable here. Our pitching has been doing what they have always been doing and we feel really relax here and we know coming in we will have a really good shot," said Frazier. "For some reason, we do like playing here in Chicago, but we're happy go lucky. It's pretty fun, it gets us back on the winning track. We got two more to go, we're trying to get that sweep."Garza (1-1) was tagged for a career-high nine runs and nine hits in five-plus innings. He was lifted in the sixth after allowing six runs without retiring a batter."Its keeping the ball down and fastball command, I don't think he really had his slider today, he wasn't throwing much, but it's still keeping the ball down, keeping the ball down and away and obviously pitching in, but you've got to have fastball command down in the strike zone," said Cubs manager Dale Sveum.Garza dropped to 0-2 against the Reds this season, allowing 13 runs in nine innings. The three homers he gave up were the most since last July 5 at Atlanta.Cody Ransom hit a solo home run for the Cubs, who have lost seven of their last nine games. The third baseman committed three of Chicago's four errors as the Cubs suffered their worst defeat of the season.With two outs in the second, Frazier connected on a 1-2 pitch that wound up in the center-field basket for his seventh home run of the season. It was his first homer on the road this year and first one since April 24th."I'm trying to get hits, I'm trying to help the team. Do I want to hit home runs? Yes,. But at the same time I'm trying to get my average up, we're trying to win. Am I conscious (about it). Yeah, it's there, but I know at the end of the year I'm going to have the numbers I am going to have. I am trying to reach my goals and I still think I have a shot," said Frazier.An inning later, Votto tagged Garza for a two-run shot. It was Votto's 11th of the season. Votto is 16 for 30 with seven doubles, one home run and eight RBIs during a nine-game hitting streak at Wrigley.The Reds added six runs for Cingrani in the sixth. Jay Bruce lined a double down the left-field line to drive in two runs. After Garza hit Frazier with a pitch, Paul followed with a three-run homer to right. After chasing Garza, Cozart added an RBI single to give the Reds a 9-1 lead.Bruce was 3 for 5 with two RBIs as Cincinnati finished with 17 hits.Ransom scored on Alfonso Soriano's sacrifice fly in the fourth. Ransom hit his seventh homer of the season in the sixth.Cozart cleared the bases on a three-run homer in the eighth inning off Cubs reliever Zach Putnam. Putnam left with an apparent injury after giving up the home run."He's got a bone spur that he battled over a year now, he said it was just on fire, so I think well get an MRI on that tomorrow," said Sveum.NOTES: The Cubs suspended Triple-A infielder Ian Stewart on Tuesday without pay for an indefinite period following his critical comments about the organization. ... RHP Mike Leake is Wednesday's scheduled starter for the Reds. He is 3-1 in his last five starts with a 1.13 ERA. ... On Wednesday, Cubs starter Travis Wood will try for the fifth time to beat his former team. He is 0-2 with a 5.25 ERA against the Reds. ... After the game, the Cubs acquired RHP Henry Rodriguez from the Nationals for minor league RHP Ian Dickson.
(Reuters) - Four years ago when the Chicago Blackhawks won their last Stanley Cup it seemed the only thing their precocious young captain Jonathan Toews could not do was grow a proper playoff beard.Toews finished those playoffs scoring seven goals and 29 points in 22 games, claiming a Conn Smythe trophy as the post-season's most valuable player and adding his name on the Stanley Cup.Back in the finals and ready to faceoff against the Boston Bruins in Game One of the best-of-seven series on Wednesday, Toews is sporting a much more impressive beard this time around but his scoring has not been nearly as striking.With one goal through the first three playoff rounds, Toews' point production may be spotty but his confidence and maturity have grown to the point where he does not obsess over it like he might have earlier in his career."When pucks weren't really going in and I didn't seem to be contributing the way I know I could, people can say whatever they want to say," Toews told reporters during the Stanley Cup media day on Tuesday. "But I haven't let it bother me. I haven't let it hurt my confidence."I don't think anything in my game has digressed the last couple of years, I think I have only gotten better."The easy thing to notice is when you score points but I feel like there are still a lot of good things in my game."While Toews waits for his scoring touch to return, the 25-year-old Canadian has found other ways to contribute to the Chicago cause.He remains one of hockey's hardest workers, leads all Chicago forwards in ice time and is tops in faceoffs.The only goal that is on Toews' mind these days is not the one he hasn't scored but the team objective of winning another Stanley Cup."We (Toews and team mate Patrick Kane) have both gone through some moments in the playoffs where people are kind of looking at a lack of contribution, we're not really too worried about it," said Toews. "We know there are a lot of good things we can do out there."The big reason why we are here is that we play so well as a team...that's the way it's got to be and the way we are going to win this series as well."Since Chicago claimed Toews with the third overall pick in the 2006 draft the forward has gone from strength-to-strength.In his first season he was a finalist for rookie of the year and in his second campaign he was made captain.Nicknamed Captain Serious, Toews has always been viewed as mature beyond his years, providing him with the perspective needed to wait out a scoring slump."I think you just get that experience and you understand that, hey, not everything is going to go your way, not everything is going to be seen the same way from different people," said Chicago defenseman Duncan Keith."I think he's done a good job just keeping a level head. That's what makes him a great player."Just 25, Toews is already a member of the Triple Gold club limited to players with a Stanley Cup and Olympic and world championship titles on their resumes.He has twice played for Canada at the world championships winning gold and silver and was golden again at the Vancouver Winter Games, named to the Olympic all-star team.But it is the soft-spoken Toews' feisty determination and intensity that are seen as his greatest qualities, leading by example rather than words."In 2010 when we went all the way to Stanley Cup final we didn't really know how good our team was," recalled Toews. "We went out there and won games and the next thing you know we were winning the Stanley Cup."Coming back here we realize how tough it is, how rare this opportunity is because we worked so hard to get here."
(Reuters) - The last time the Chicago Blackhawks hoisted the Stanley Cup in 2010, Corey Crawford had a front row seat in the stands but this year he will have an even better view,- from the frontline.When the best-of-seven series against the Boston Bruins opens on Wednesday in Chicago, Crawford will be front-and-center, the Blackhawks number one netminder and number one reason they are back in the finals.Four years ago, Crawford was the third netminder on the Blackhawks depth chart behind Antti Niemi and Cristobal Huet and spent the finals as a member of the 'Black Aces', a practice squad helping the team prepare for the Philadelphia Flyers.Fast forward to 2013, Crawford has completed his apprenticeship, winning the starting assignment with the type of stellar netminding that is likely to earn the 28-year-old Canadian consideration for the Sochi Olympic team."I wasn't around the team too much; I practiced with the other guys, the 'Black Aces'," recalled Crawford during the Stanley Cup finals media day on Tuesday."I was excited for the guys who were able to win it but at the same time you weren't playing so it's not the same feeling as when you are out there and you're battling hard."I had to sit on the sidelines and watch. That definitely motivated me to push myself even harder to make the NHL and now make the finals."A hot goaltender is often the key to Stanley Cup glory and Crawford has sizzled this post-season with a record of 12-5 and a playoff best goals-against-average of 1.74.Of the last 11 names engraved on the Conn Smythe trophy, that goes to the Stanley Cup playoffs most valuable player, five have been netminders, including the last two.And if Crawford can continue his sparkling play and help the Blackhawks to a fifth championship, there could be another netminder's name added to the list.Taken in the second round of the 2003 draft by Blackhawks, Crawford has paid his dues.He has spent his entire professional career in the Chicago organization but the first five years were in the minor leagues riding the buses with Chicago farm teams the Norfolk Admirals and Rockford IceHogs."He's a guy we've had in our organization since we drafted him," said Chicago general manager Stan Bowman. "We've taken our time allowing him to improve year after year."He's finally made it to the NHL, established himself as the number one goaltender. "I think it's just nice to see now him getting the recognition that he deserves."In one of the quirky sub plots in these finals, Boston netminder Tuukka Rask also watched from the bench when the Bruins lifted their last Stanley Cup in 2011 as Tim Thomas turned in a Conn Smythe effort in the Boston goal.But like Crawford, Rask has stepped up to claim the number one job posting a playoff best save percentage of .943 along with a record of 12-4 that includes a pair of shutouts over the Pittsburgh Penguins in the Eastern Conference final.While a mouth-watering goaltending duel could prove to be the highlight of the 2013 Stanley Cup, Crawford and Rask dismissed any suggestion of a head-to-head battle."He (Rask) is a guy who is really athletic, he's quick on rebounds, he's a good goaltender but I'm thinking about what I have to do," said Crawford."I'm thinking about their shooters, their players, their tendencies. Really, it doesn't matter to compare us. I'm not shooting on him and he's not shooting on me."
The Bruins , founded in 1924, and the Blackhawks , founded in 1926, are two of the N.H.L.'s so-called Original Six teams. But until this year, they had never met in the Stanley Cup finals.Part of it was simply bad timing. Both teams were awful for long stretches in the 1940s and '50s, and also had droughts again in more recent decades. The Blackhawks' Stanley Cup in 2010 was their first since 1961. The Bruins' Cup in 2011 was their first since 1972.Another reason might have been, for lack of a better term, intercity sports karma. Major league teams from Chicago and Boston have met only twice in championship contests: in 1918, when the Red Sox beat the Cubs in the World Series, and in 1986, when the Bears beat the New England Patriots in the Super Bowl.Most of what little intertwining there has been between Chicago and Boston's sports histories has been their often long-suffering fans and some notable personnel moves. In baseball, Carlton Fisk left Boston after 11 years to play for the White Sox for 13, and the Red Sox traded Dennis Eckersley to the Cubs for Bill Buckner. More recently, Theo Epstein left the Red Sox' front office to join the Cubs'. In basketball, Bob Cousy was briefly a Chicago Stag before becoming a Celtic. In hockey, Bobby Orr made an end-of-career move to Chicago from Boston in 1976.But the most significant connection between the teams may be the 1967 trade in which the Blackhawks sent Phil Esposito, Ken Hodge and Fred Stanfield to the Bruins for Pit Martin, Jack Norris and Gilles Marotte. It is still widely considered the most one-sided trade in N.H.L. history."Milt Schmidt, the Boston manager, wanted us three younger players," Stanfield said Tuesday. "It worked out pretty well for us."With Esposito, Hodge and Stanfield joining Orr, a second-year defenseman, the Bruins made the playoffs for the first time in nine years and won the Cup in 1970 and '72They beat the Blackhawks twice in the playoffs with Esposito, Hodge and Stanfield in the lineup. But the Blackhawks gained some revenge by ousting Boston in 1975 — the only time in six playoff meetings between the two teams that Chicago has prevailed.Stanfield said he was looking forward to the first playoff rematch between two of his former teams since Boston's four-game quarterfinal sweep in 1978. Game 1 is Wednesday in Chicago."It's going to be a good series, a long series," Stanfield said. "My best years in hockey were with Boston, so I'd like to see the Bruins win again."Both teams have their origins in the early days of the modern food industry. The Bruins were founded and owned by Charles F. Adams, the treasurer of First National Stores, an early grocery chain later known as Finast. At the time, the chain used brown and yellow for its color scheme. Adams adopted those colors for his new team, and thy were a main reason the team was called the Bruins. The team switched to black and gold in the late 1930s.The Blackhawks' founder was Maj. Frederic McLaughlin, whose family owned Manor House Coffee, a popular brand in the first half of the 20th century. McLaughlin named the team after the Blackhawk division, a unit he helped lead as an officer in the Army. It was formed during World War I, but the war ended before the unit, or McLaughlin, saw action. The unit was named for a Sauk and Fox American Indian leader who fought against the United States government in the War of 1812 and in 1832.The last all-Original Six championship series was in 1979, when the Montreal Canadiens beat the Rangers in five games. Only one combination of Original Six teams has yet to meet in the Cup finals: the Blackhawks and the Rangers. But realignment next season could make Original Six Cup finals even rarer. Chicago will remain in the West, but Detroit will move to the East and join the other four Original Six clubs: Boston, Montreal, Toronto and the Rangers.
CHICAGO — Before Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday night at United Center, the visiting Boston Bruins will be treated to one of the loudest and most venerable traditions in hockey: the cheers during the national anthem before a Blackhawks game.The red carpet will be rolled out, the home patrons will stand, and Jim Cornelison will begin belting out "The Star-Spangled Banner" in his operatic tenor. But instead of respectful silence, the fans' accompaniment will be reverential noise: clapping and cheering for a good minute and a half until the anthem is done.This has become a familiar scene in the hockey world, but the origins are hazy. Wayne Messmer, who sang the anthem at Blackhawks games from 1980 to 1994, said he thought the seeds were planted during the Western Conference finals against the Vancouver Canucks in 1982, when fans started to cheer during the last eight bars or so of the anthem.But the tradition seems to have truly arrived on May 9, 1985, before Game 3 of the conference finals against Wayne Gretzky's Edmonton Oilers.The Oilers, a juggernaut on their way to a second consecutive Stanley Cup in a run that would include five championships in seven years, had beaten the overmatched Blackhawks by scores of 11-2 and 7-3 in Games 1 and 2 in Edmonton.The Oilers had future Hall of Famers up and down its roster — Gretzky, Mark Messier, Paul Coffey and Grant Fuhr among them. They entered Game 3 on a record 12-game winning streak in the playoffs."Coming back from Edmonton down, 0-2, we didn't want to throw in the towel," Messmer said. "It was like we're going to go nuts and do everything we can to make sure this season doesn't end."Former players and reporters who covered the series recalled that during the renditions of "The Star-Spangled Banner" at Edmonton, Oilers fans made enough noise that the American team noticed.Troy Murray, then a member of the Blackhawks and now a radio announcer for the team, called the commotion a "slight to the anthem."Coffey insisted that no malice had been intended, saying the fans "might have been inadvertently and prematurely getting into the game."Whether or not it was antagonistic, the series deficit, the long comeback odds and the perceived slight added to the buzz of an already notoriously raucous Chicago Stadium crowd. When the Blackhawks took the ice for Game 3, the fans were giddy.Eddie Olczyk, another member of the Blackhawks and now a commentator, said he sensed a palpable intensity when he skated during warm-ups. He looked into the stands and saw the legendary Bears running back Gale Sayers.Olczyk said he thought to himself, holy cow, this is a big game.A few minutes later, from his perch in the organ loft high above the ice, Messmer sang the opening words of the anthem, and then was shocked. A wall of sound was coming at him."I was like, what the heck?" he said.Coffey said, "There's five of us standing there on the blue line, and it's loud and getting louder, and we're looking at each other thinking this is pretty cool."The Blackhawks won Game 3, 5-2. When Messmer sang the anthem ahead of Game 4 three nights later, the fans were back at it. The Blackhawks won again, evening the series.Chicago went on to lose Games 5 and 6, but the next season, fans continued to cheer when Messmer sang the anthem, and the practice stuck."It was so emotionally stirring that people wanted to keep it going," Messmer said.The custom gained national fame several years later when the 1991 All-Star Game was played in Chicago on Jan. 19, three days after President George H. W. Bush announced the attacks that began the Persian Gulf war.When Messmer sang that day, cameras panned across the crowd capturing American and Canadian flags and inspirational messages to the troops. The noise was deafening.Frank Pellico, the organist who has accompanied the anthem since 1991, said, "I was playing the organ two feet from Wayne, but couldn't hear him."Gen. Norman Schwarzkopf Jr. was so taken with the show of patriotism that he had a copy of the tape shown to soldiers overseas during the war.The anthem tradition carried over when United Center replaced Chicago Stadium in 1994, even though a digital organ replaced the original, which was the largest of its kind in the world. Messmer was replaced as the anthem singer by a string of singers from Chicago's Lyric Opera, and now Cornelison has the nightly honor."It gives me goose bumps," Chicago forward Bryan Bickell said. "I can't imagine a better way to start a hockey game."
NEW YORK — The NFL is looking at options for where to hold the draft in 2015.Next year's draft, one of the most popular events on the league calendar, was moved from April to May 8-10 to keep it at Radio City Music Hall. The venue has created a spring entertainment show that will occupy the historic theater for April.If the league decides to move the draft back to April in future years, it will consider other venues. Already, Chicago Mayor Rahm Emanuel has contacted Commissioner Roger Goodell about his city hosting the draft.NFL internal study groups could consider moving the draft to different cities, similar to how the Super Bowl is rotated. Or they could find a bigger site in New York should Radio City remain unavailable when the league wants to stage the draft.
CHICAGO — The long-running Phoenix Coyotes saga could be coming to an end with National Hockey League commissioner Gary Bettman telling reporters "time is getting short".Since taking ownership of the franchise almost four years ago, the league has repeatedly been frustrated in its efforts to find an owner willing to keep the club in Arizona.The league has rejected all attempts to relocate the team but if a new ownership group is unable to negotiate a lease with the city of Glendale, moving the franchise may be the only solution.Quebec City and Seattle have both been suggested as possible."It's our hope that they are going to stay where they are but should the team be forced to relocate we will have to take a look at it and make a decision," admitted Bettman."There are a number of markets that have been expressing interest to us over the years and the phone keeps ringing the longer the Coyotes situation stays unresolved."Despite sitting at the bottom of the league in attendance, Bettman said he is convinced the Coyotes could be a success in the desert."We try to avoid franchise relocation, we try to do everything possible, we don't think it is fair to fans and we don't think it's fair unless you have to move to do it to communities that build you buildings," explained Bettman."We have now operated this club for about three years, we've had ownership of it, we've had great support from the people on the ground and we actually believe that if you gave the community an owner, who said I'm committed to being here this franchise could be successful from a business standpoint."Bettman said the league recovered nicely from a bitter labor dispute that almost ended in the cancellation of the entire season.Playing a shortened 48-game regular season revenues were better than projected bragged, the lockout doing no permanent damage to the NHL brand or seriously eroding its fan base."We've had a very, very strong season in terms of attendance, buildings 97 percent full during the regular season, 100 percent full in playoffs, ratings increases and records in some cases, locally, nationally Canada and the U.S. and we've had very exciting and compelling playoffs," said Bettman."But having the ability to now look forward to a decade of labor peace is the most important thing that we were able to accomplish."
CHICAGO — The top candidate for the Rangers' coaching vacancy, Alain Vigneault, met with General Manager Glen Sather and the club's management staff Monday in La Quinta, Calif.Vigneault coached the Vancouver Canucks for seven seasons until he was fired last month after the Canucks were eliminated in the first round by the San Jose Sharks. Vigneault led the team to six division titles and the 2011 Stanley Cup finals.The Rangers have also received permission to interview Lindy Ruff, who was fired as the Buffalo coach this season, his 15th behind the Sabres' bench.The Rangers' interest in Vigneault and Ruff was confirmed by a person close to the situation but not authorized to speak publicly.Mark Messier, the former Rangers captain and a special assistant to Sather since 2009, is also considered a candidate for the coaching job.Sather fired John Tortorella after the Rangers were eliminated by the Boston Bruins in the second round of the playoffs last month.Sather, 69, said he would continue as the Rangers' general manager next season, but he is expected to be succeeded as soon as the next season by one of his two assistant general managers: Jim Schoenfeld or Jeff Gorton.Gorton ran the Rangers while Sather was hospitalized after prostate surgery in March. As the interim general manager of the Bruins for four months in 2006, Gorton acquired Tuukka Rask, signed Zdeno Chara and drafted Milan Lucic and Brad Marchand, all key figures on Boston's team entering the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday."I thought they did a real good job," Bruins General Manager Peter Chiarelli said Tuesday of what Gorton and the Bruins' staff did in 2006.
CHICAGO — A short time can pass before a chance at redemption comes. For the Boston Bruins , it has been one year since they failed to repeat as Stanley Cup champions; for the Chicago Blackhawks , just two years.But for Jaromir Jagr, it has been 21 years since he last won the Cup."You guys still surprised I am alive?" said Jagr, still irrepressible at 41 as he greeted reporters on the eve of Game 1 of the finals at United Center. "Well, I am. I'm alive."Jagr won the Stanley Cup as a Pittsburgh Penguin in 1991 and '92, when he was a mullet-haired 19- and 20-year-old. In the following decades, he captured scoring titles and an Olympic gold medal and starred in New York, Russia and the Czech Republic. In 196 playoff games, he has scored 196 points, tied for fifth in league history. But he had not returned to the Cup finals."That's the goal for any hockey player, any hockey team," he said. "They all have one goal, to win the Cup, but obviously, only one can do it. Then the next season starts again, and everybody has the same goal again. And again, and then again." His voice trailed off and his eyes rolled, signaling the tedium of passing years.The Blackhawks have not had to wait as long. The core remains from the 2010 title team that defeated the Philadelphia Flyers in six games. Until this year's run, that stood as Chicago's last postseason series victory.Within days of celebrating that championship, General Manager Stan Bowman began dismantling the roster because of the salary cap. The playoff hero Dustin Byfuglien was sent to Atlanta. Defenseman Kris Versteeg was shipped to Toronto. Goaltender Antti Niemi was not re-signed."It seemed like a week after we were hoisting the Cup, half the team was off on different teams in the league," forward Patrick Sharp said.Although the nucleus of the captain, Jonathan Toews; Patrick Kane; Duncan Keith; Marian Hossa; and Sharp remained, duplicating the formula for playoff success proved elusive.In 2011, Chicago made the playoffs on the last day of the season, only to fall to the top-seeded Vancouver Canucks in the first round in seven games. The next year, the Blackhawks again did not get out of the first round, losing to the Phoenix Coyotes.Bowman, though, remained committed. "There's something to be said for consistency," he said. "We've had a lot of these guys for a long time."He was rewarded this year right from opening night, when Chicago beat the defending champion Los Angeles Kings — the start of an N.H.L.-record 24-game points streak. Now the Blackhawks are back on hockey's biggest stage, older and wiser."At that time, our team maybe was too young and stupid to even know what was really going on," Kane said, "and you kind of let it fly by without really soaking it in."Bruins General Manager Peter Chiarelli did not have to break up his 2011 Cup-winning roster because of the salary cap. Seventeen players from that team are still on the roster.Last season, the Bruins fell to the Washington Capitals in seven one-goal games in the first round. This season, they rallied from a 4-1 third-period deficit in Game 7 against Toronto by scoring two goals with less than two minutes remaining in regulation and then winning in overtime."When you have the right people making decisions and the players executing with character, it propels you to success," Chiarelli said.One of the new guys on the Bruins' roster is Jagr, who was acquired at the trade deadline and whom the Blackhawks respect. Toews said Jagr was one of his favorite players when he was growing up in Winnipeg, Manitoba."I wore No. 68 when I was playing summer hockey a couple of seasons, I guess," Toews said. "I had his Koho Jagr stick, so I really looked up to him. I was probably 9 or 10, and here I am getting a chance to play against him in the Stanley Cup final."Toews said he tried to model his game after Jagr."Well, you've got to tell him to slow down a little bit," Jagr said, laughing, when told that.Both are getting another chance at the Cup.
CHICAGO — Pinch-hitter Julio Borbon singled home the winning run with two outs in the 14th inning and the Chicago Cubs beat Cincinnati 6-5 on Thursday to end the Reds' record 12-game winning streak at Wrigley Field.The Cubs hadn't beaten Cincinnati at home since last Aug. 9. With the win, Chicago avoided a four-game sweep and improved to 3-10 against the Reds this season.Hector Rondon (1-0) pitched two innings for the win and Chicago's bullpen finished with eight scoreless innings.Davis DeJesus homered and Nate Schierholtz became the first player this season to hit two triples in a game for the Cubs, who had lost eight of 10 to fall a season-high 13 games below .500. They scored at least five runs for the first time since June 5.Jonathan Broxton (2-2) took the loss in the longest game for both teams this season.The previous record for consecutive victories by a visitor at Wrigley Field was 10, by the St. Louis Cardinals (1943-44) and matched by the New York Giants (1950-51) and Montreal Expos (1982-83), according to STATS.Starlin Castro led off the 14th with a single against Broxton and stole second when Anthony Rizzo struck out. Castro went to third on Alfonso Soriano's groundout to first base, and Schierholtz was intentionally walked before Borbon came through.Mat Latos was trying to win his seventh straight decision to start the season for Cincinnati. He allowed four runs and eight hits in six innings.Latos has won his last 10 regular-season decisions since losing to the Cardinals on Aug. 24, and the Cincinnati bullpen has blown saves in five of his games this season.Jeff Samardzija pitched six innings, allowing five runs and a season-high 10 hits in six innings. He walked four and struck out six.Since beating the White Sox with a two-hitter on May 27, Samardzija is winless in three starts.Chicago tied the score at 5 in the eighth Darwin Barney's two-out single off Sam LeCure.Cincinnati scored twice in the second on RBI singles by Devin Mesoraco and Shin-Soo Choo and added two in the fifth on run-scoring singles by Joey Votto and Brandon Phillips.Jay Bruce had four hits for the Reds. Choo reached base three times and scored twice.Castro went 3 for 7 after entering in a 4-for-48 slump. He was back in the second spot in the lineup after dropping to seventh last week and hitting sixth on Wednesday.Castro also made two errors at shortstop.Zack Cozart reached on Castro's second error leading off the 14th and advanced to third on Bruce's two-out single. Rondon struck out Derrick Robinson to end the threat, Cincinnati's first in extra innings.NOTES: Reds manager Dusty Baker and Cubs skipper Dale Sveum were both impressed by the pace of Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday night, won 4-3 in triple overtime by the Chicago Blackhawks. Baker went to United Center but left after regulation and said watching the game was an inspiration to return to the World Series. Sveum watched the entire game on TV. ... The Reds said it's possible RHP Johnny Cueto could start Sunday against the Brewers. Cueto has been on the disabled list since June 1 with a strained right shoulder. ... Cubs RHP Shawn Camp, on the DL since May 22 with sprained right big toe, is expected to work two innings in a rehab assignment Friday for Class-A Kane County. ... Bronson Arroyo (6-5, 3.35 ERA) starts Friday for the Reds against Milwaukee RHP Kyle Lohse (2-6, 4.03). ... RHP Edwin Jackson (2-8, 5.76) pitches for the Cubs when they open a series Friday night in New York against Mets RHP Shaun Marcum (0-7, 4.96).
CHICAGO — Long after the celebration was over, Marian Hossa finally made it home and managed to fall asleep around 3 a.m. The Chicago star woke up a few hours later, roused by a noisy neighbor."I think my neighbor decided he was going to drill in the morning. That was really unpleasant," Hossa said Thursday. "You know, hopefully, he is going to get the message for next time, he won't drill. Feel a little tired today."It's OK, Marian. Everyone was a little tired after a rousing start to the Stanley Cup finals.Chicago and Boston played three overtimes Wednesday night in the fifth-longest game in the history of the NHL's marquee series. It finally came to an end — at the stroke of midnight, no less — when Andrew Shaw deflected Dave Bolland's shot into the goal to give the Blackhawks the victory.It was a deflating outcome for the Bruins, who also lost important forward Nathan Horton to an injury during the first overtime, while the Blackhawks seemed relieved that they didn't have to sit on such a heartbreaking loss for two days before Game 2 on Saturday night."It's one of those games being down 3-1, you come back to tie it 3-3, you feel like something was left on the table if you didn't come back and win it," forward Patrick Kane said. "The game went a long time. It's definitely a good feeling winning in the third overtime when it does go that long."The winner of Game 1 has gone on to win the title in 56 of the 73 seasons since the NHL went to a best-of-seven format for the championship series in 1939. The Blackhawks won the first two games when they beat Philadelphia to win it all in 2010.Just don't expect to see much concern coming from the Boston camp. The Bruins dropped the first two games at Vancouver in the 2011 finals, and went on to take the series in seven games."I don't think much is going to rattle our team," Bruins coach Claude Julien said. "We're a pretty resilient group of guys. We live in the moment."Boston was on a power play during the first overtime when Horton tangled with Blackhawks defenseman Niklas Hjalmarsson in front of the Chicago net. Horton skated off with what appeared to be some sort of upper body injury."We're keeping our fingers crossed here," Julien said. "He's day to day, and he's back with us hopefully the next day."Horton plays with David Krejci and Milan Lucic on Boston's dangerous top line, and any sort of extended absence would be a major blow for the Bruins. Lucic had two goals and an assist in Game 1, Krejci had two assists and Horton also had an assist,The line has 21 goals and 36 assists in the playoffs."He's a guy that's been coming up big for us in the playoffs," defenseman Torey Krug said. "To not have him in the rest of that game definitely hurt us. But we have confidence in our guys."There were plenty of reasons for optimism for the Bruins, who led 3-1 in the third period and had numerous opportunities to win in the overtimes. Two shots went off posts. Kaspars Daugavins had a terrific opportunity in the third extra session, but was unable to knock it in.While the Bruins just missed on a couple of great scoring opportunities, Johnny Oduya's tying goal for Chicago in the third period was headed wide before it went off the left skate of Bruins defenseman Andrew Ference. Then there was the carom off Shaw's right leg for the winning score."I think what it shows everybody is it's going to be a great, tight series," Ference said. "There's going to be little plays that do make the difference and that's fine by us. I think both teams are comfortable in tight games and have dealt with that before. It's good."Besides, the couple of fortunate plays for Chicago were far from a happy accident. The Blackhawks' emphasis on traffic in front of the net and throwing pucks on the goal paid dividends when they ran into a pair of hot goaltenders in the previous two rounds, and it worked again when they pelted Tuukka Rask with 63 shots in Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals.Expect more of the same for the rest of the series. The Blackhawks think if Rask can see the puck coming, it will be next to impossible to score against the 6-foot-2 goalie."Sometimes you can maybe beat them with one-timers, but I think traffic is the key," Quenneville said. "Loose pucks, getting to the net is critical scoring goals against these top guys."The Blackhawks and Bruins had kept an eye on each other for weeks as both teams progressed through the playoffs, but the three-overtime thriller was their first game since Boston's 3-2 shootout victory on Oct. 15, 2011. There were no games against teams from the other conference during the lockout-shortened season.After all that video and scouting, Chicago coach Joel Quenneville said the Bruins are everything he thought they would be, and then some."I know you watch them, now you get to play against them, you see they're fast, maybe faster than you anticipated," he said. "Their top line was extremely dangerous. They've got some guys that can make plays. They got patience with the puck. Certainly got our attention."
CHICAGO — Andrew Shaw's goal in triple overtime sealed a marathon 4-3 victory for the Chicago Blackhawks over the Boston Bruins as the Stanley Cup Finals opened with a Game One thriller on Wednesday.The game was the first between the two Original Six franchises in a Stanley Cup Final and the teams dished up more than four hours of high drama before Shaw scored on a double-deflection off Michal Rozsival's blast from the blueline."He (Shaw) is a competitor," Chicago coach Joel Quenneville to reporters. "The bigger the stage, the bigger the challenge, he rises to the occasion."He knows where the front of net is. Doesn't have to be pretty."He's a warrior. He's one of those guys that you appreciate he's on your side and he's relentless."While the game could be considered a classic, Shaw's winner did not fall into the same category.Rozsival took control at the blueline, moved towards the center of the ice and fired a shot into a crowd in front of Tuukka Rask, the puck first richocetting off Dave Bolland then glancing off Shaw past the stranded Boston netminder."Luck," said Shaw, describing his goal. "The puck goes to the point. Rozsival gets a nice shot through. Bolland got his stick on it."I just happened to be going to the net wide. Kind of went off my leg into the net."An exciting moment. I think guys are just glad the game ended."Fans, however, could not get enough, many left breathless when the fifth longest game in Stanley Cup Finals history finally came to an end.With thundering checks echoing through the 'Madhouse on Madison' and lightning crackling outside the arena, Game One was played at a frantic pace right from the opening faceoff.The Bruins led 2-0 on a pair of Milan Lucic goals before Blackhawks rookie Brandon Saad brought the arena to life by whipping a shot into the top corner to end Rask's shutout streak at 149 minutes and 36 seconds.Boston, however, restored their two-goal cushion on a Patrice Bergeron powerplay tally six minutes into the third period.Trailing 3-1, the Blackhawks staged a third period rally when Dave Bolland cut the Boston advantage in half before Johnny Oduya's blast deflected off the skate of Bruins defenseman Andrew Ference past Rask to send the contest to overtime.With Game Two of the best-of-seven series set for Saturday at the United Center, both teams will have little time to catch their breath and recover from an opening night marathon."We got a couple of days in between here, we just basically played two hockey games in one night," Quenneville said. "So get some rest for tomorrow. Get excited about coming in here on Saturday night."We haven't seen that team all year but judging by the way the game went, we're going to have to be ready."
CHICAGO — Milan Lucic and the Boston Bruins were rolling along and in command.Then, in a flash, everything changed.In the end, the Boston Bruins went from two goals up to one game down, and now they'll have to pick themselves up after an epic 4-3 triple-overtime loss to the Chicago Blackhawks in the opener of the Stanley Cup finals.What choice do they have?"You have to," Lucic said. "You're in a position now where you have to. When you come on the road and start the series on the road, you obviously want to get that Game 1. When you're not able to accomplish that, you put all your effort into winning Game 2."It's not the first time the Bruins find themselves trying to peel themselves off the ground.They were all but knocked out in the first round against Toronto, only to come roaring back.For that matter, they dropped the first two games to Vancouver in the 2011 finals before rallying to win the championship in seven games. They'll try to avoid falling into a similar hole in this one when the best-of-seven series resumes Saturday at the United Center.The Bruins might be up 1-0 if not for some key mistakes and bad bounces that spoiled an otherwise solid performance by Tuukka Rask in goal.He did his part. His teammates didn't, and a wild sequence at the end finished off this thriller.Michael Rozsival's shot deflected off Dave Bolland and Andrew Shaw before slipping into the net for the winner at 12:08 of the third OT Wednesday night, bringing a wild game to an appropriate finish."You're not going to make any fancy backdoor plays," Rask said. "That's where it came down to. I thought, especially in the last overtime, we were forcing the play a little too much and they just shot the puck and it found its way in and it went in."It was a fitting conclusion to a game that saw the Bruins blow a two-goal lead late in regulation through little fault of Rask's. Had the puck not been deflected, Rask believes he would have stopped it. After all, it wasn't a hard shot by Roszival. He just threw it into traffic."Last time we won the Cup, we lost the first two games to Vancouver. It never stopped us from coming back. This certainly won't," coach Claude Julien said. "When you look at the game, it could have gone either way. I thought we had some real great looks in overtime. With a little bit of luck, we could have ended it before they did."Either way, this game more than lived up to the hype.In the first championship meeting in 34 years between Original Six franchises, the Bruins were sailing along with a 3-1 lead after Lucic scored twice and Patrice Bergeron added a power-play goal just over six minutes into the third period.What looked like a safe lead quickly evaporated thanks to one big turnover and one unfortunate bounce for the Bruins.The comeback started when Shaw picked off a clearing attempt by Torey Krug and fed Dave Bolland on a two-on-one rush to pull Chicago within one with 12 minutes left in regulation. Lucic then got stopped on a two-on-one by Corey Crawford midway through the third, and Johnny Oduya tied it for Chicago when his shot from the point deflected off Boston's Andrew Ference defending at the side of the crease and bounced past Rask.Just like that, the game was tied.Rask came in with a league playoff-high .943 save percentage, and he stopped 59 shots in this one. He went 149:36 without giving up a goal before rookie Brandon Saad scored off a feed from Marian Hossa to make it 2-1 and bring the crowd to its feet.They were really roaring in the end, and now, the Bruins will have to shake this one off after winning nine of the previous 10 games."We had the game," Rask said. "We're up 3-1 in the third and then a terrible turnover leads to a second goal and then a tough bounce leads to the tying goal, and we just gave it away."It wasn't just the turnover before Bolland's goal, the shot by Oduya that deflected off Ference or the winner. Jaromir Jagr nearly won it on a power play in the closing seconds of the second OT when the puck deflected off him, only to hit the post. And in the third OT, Kaspars Daugavins' backhand shot in the crease went wide after Oduya got a stick on him."I guess it will hurt for a little bit," Daugavins said. "Got to get a good night's sleep and analyze the things you did wrong and get back and working hard in practice and get ready for Game 2."Already in these playoffs the Bruins blew a 3-1 series lead and then rallied from three down in the third period of the seventh game against Toronto."It definitely gets tougher and tougher, but at the end of the day you're going to have to find a way to dig deep and try to win the game," Lucic said. "I think we played well in all three periods of overtime to give us a chance to win, but unfortunately we didn't get the result."
CHICAGO — As the sound of thunder echoed outside United Center, the Blackhawks and the Bruins , with a combined 175 years of history, faced off for the first time in the Stanley Cup finals.Game 1 proved to be a match for the ages. Beginning on Wednesday night, the contest did not end until 1 a.m. Eastern on Thursday, when a shot by the Blackhawks' Michal Rozsival was deflected first by the stick of Dave Bolland, then by the knee of Andrew Shaw, and sailed past Boston goalie Tuukka Rask at 12 minutes 8 seconds of the third overtime period. Shaw's goal gave Chicago a 4-3 victory.It was the longest game of the 2013 season, and the fifth-longest game in Stanley Cup finals history. The game's time of 112:08 fell just short of the 113:50 of Game 3 of the 1931 finals, when the Blackhawks beat the Montreal Canadiens, 2-1."I just got lucky, and it went in," Shaw said after the marathon ended, and the Blackhawks completed a comeback from a 3-1 third-period deficit. Shaw is best known for being a pest and an agitator. But in these playoffs he has 5 goals and 4 assists in 18 games.The Blackhawks and the Bruins will now recuperate before meeting again here on Saturday night.Joel Quenneville, the Chicago coach, pointed out that the teams played almost two full games, and the statistics showed it. Rask stopped 59 of 63 shots, and Blackhawks goalie Corey Crawford turned aside 51 of 54 shots. In all, the Blackhawks attempted 132 shots to Boston's 85.The Bruins blocked 40 Chicago shots, led by defenseman Dennis Seidenberg, with 9, and Andrew Ference, with 8. Ference had a game-high 10 hits, while three Blackhawks had nine apiece. Chicago defenseman Duncan Keith led all skaters with 48:40 of ice time, and Seidenberg was next at 48:36.Chicago forward Marian Hossa led all shooters with 10 shots on goal, followed by the Chicago rookie Brandon Saad, who had nine. The teams took 114 face-offs, with the Bruins winning 58 and the Blackhawks winning 56. The exhausted Blackhawks took two penalties during overtime for too many men on the ice."Obviously that kind of thing is going to set in — that's the reality," said the Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews, who had 52 shifts. "Both teams are just kicking, trying to survive. Every time you go back on the ice, you try and get that feeling that it's going to be that one chance that makes the difference."In the second extra period, each weary team took 10 shots. With 53 seconds left in the session, the Blackhawks took their second too-many-men-on-the-ice overtime penalty. The 6-foot-9 defenseman Zdeno Chara took a blast from inside the blue line with 10 seconds remaining, and the puck deflected off Jaromir Jagr and slammed inside the goal post behind Corey Crawford and skittered across the crease.The Bruins sustained a blow during the first overtime when wing Nathan Horton left the game with a shoulder injury, which many have speculated he has been playing with in the playoffs. Horton is the N.H.L.'s postseason plus-minus leader with a plus-22 mark.Bruins Coach Claude Julien said it was too soon to characterize the extent of Horton's injury. But he said he was not upset by the defeat."It could have gone either way," he said. "With a little bit of luck, we could have ended it before they did. But that's the name of the game."In the second overtime period, Bruins forward Kaspars Daugavins almost won the game, but his shot at an open net was thwarted by Blackhawks defenseman Johnny Oduya."I missed my shot," Daugavins said after the game, nearly distraught. "It hurts."Well into the third period, it looked as if the Bruins would run away with the game. Milan Lucic staked Boston to a 2-0 lead with goals in the first and second periods. Saad halved the Blackhawks' deficit soon after Lucic's second goal. But Patrice Bergeron made the score 3-1 with a power-play goal at 6:09 of the third period.Yet the Blackhawks kept pressing and rallied. They pulled to 3-2 when Bolland scored at the eight-minute mark, and Oduya tied the score at 12:14 when his long slap shot deflected off the skate of Ference and into the Boston net.With the third goal, the Blackhawks had beaten Rask one more time than the Pittsburgh Penguins had over the four games of the Eastern Conference finals.As the two Original Six teams met, memories of Bobby Hull, Stan Mikita, Bobby Orr and Phil and Tony Esposito filled the air. Outside, a heavy Midwestern storm produced a loud thunderclap that startled fans inside the building.The Bruins killed off three penalties, including a two-man advantage for 1:17 during the second period. They have now killed off 19 straight penalties, dating to Game 5 of the second round against the Rangers.
CHICAGO — Less than eight months before the Winter Olympics in Sochi, Russia, the N.H.L. has not reached agreement with Olympic officials to allow its players to participate in the Games, Commissioner Gary Bettman said Wednesday."We're still working on it," Bettman said in his annual news conference before Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals. He remains optimistic that an agreement will be reached. Bill Daly, the deputy commissioner, called the negotiations "a little more complicated" than previous Games.International hockey officials said last month that they hoped the issue would be resolved toward the end of May, so that national ice hockey federations could begin to prepare for the Games.The N.H.L. wants access to video rights normally reserved exclusively by the International Olympic Committee, among other issues. The league has sent its players to every Winter Olympics since 1998.Bettman and Daly also discussed the uncertainty surrounding the Phoenix Coyotes and the league's bounce-back from the lockout, which wiped out the first half of the season.Bettman said that "time is getting short" for the Glendale, Ariz., City Council to approve the sale of the Coyotes to a Canadian-based ownership group.Daly said that if nothing was resolved soon, "it certainly means that it's possible that the team won't play there next year." He added that it would take more time to release the 2013-14 schedule because it was unclear whether the Coyotes would remain in Arizona.Bettman declined to confirm or deny whether putting the franchise on hiatus for a year was an option. He said that the league was reluctant to move the franchise, and that he was worried that the city of Glendale would have to "board up" Jobing.com Arena if the Coyotes moved. The N.H.L. has operated the Coyotes since the franchise declared bankruptcy three seasons ago. The city council has a meeting scheduled for June 25, and the N.H.L. Board of Governors meets June 27.Bettman said the phone had been ringing from other cities eager to host a relocated Coyotes club, although he declined to confirm whether Quebec City and Seattle, believed to be the strongest candidates, were among them."No matter how this plays out, I don't think anybody can accuse us of a grass-is-greener approach," Daly said. "We've done everything humanly possible to make this franchise work in this market. Now's the time to find out whether it works."Bettman estimated that the league generated more than 58 percent of last season's revenue while playing 58 percent of the schedule. He pointed out that the league's arenas were filled to 97 percent capacity during the regular season and 100 percent in the playoffs, and that television ratings were high and, in some cases, set local records."There were, in an 18-month period, a good three labor issues in three different sports," he said. "The ultimate resolution of those is what determines how the fans come back. If they're comfortable that you've come to a place that makes the game healthy and stable going forward, they tend to be more forgiving than if they think you put a Band-Aid on it."
(Reuters) - Hockey fans were still catching their breath on Thursday after the Chicago Blackhawks beat the Boston Bruins in a Game One triple-overtime Stanley Cup thriller that has already been labeled a classic.Chicago's 4-3 comeback win will long be remembered by anyone who witnessed the pulsating four-hour drama unfold on television or inside a packed United Center.But the Bruins will be trying hard to forget as they look forward to Game Two on Saturday and leveling the best-of-seven series.The Blackhawks were forced to play what amounted to almost two complete games to get one victory, Andrew Shaw ending the fifth-longest game in Stanley Cup Final history with his goal 12:08 of the third overtime period.Exhausted players left the ice to a thundering ovation but some were back at the United Center on Thursday to fulfill media obligations, tired but no so weary they couldn't crack a joke."To tell you the truth, (I) fall asleep around 3:00. Woke up early," shrugged Blackhawks' Slovakian forward Marian Hossa. "I think my neighbor decided he (was) going to drill in the morning."You know, hopefully (he) is going to get his message for next time, he won't drill."We are lucky, we got extra day, you know, to recharge the batteries and get back on Game Two."For the Bruins, recovering physically from the draining contest may be easier than recovering mentally after watching a 3-1 lead with 12 minutes left in regulation disappear into a gut-wrenching loss.While admitting that losing in triple-overtime stings, Bruins coach Claude Julien was searching for some perspective after the crushing defeat."Last time we won the Cup, we lost the first two games to Vancouver," recalled Julien. "It never stopped us from coming back. This certainly won't."With a little bit of luck, we could have ended it before they did."Some nights you get the break going your way, some nights you don't."For the Bruins the challenge is straightforward; refocus and stop agonizing over missed opportunities and what might have been if they had capitalized on just one of their many chances in overtime.Just minutes before Shaw's decider, Bruins Kaspars Daugavins could have penned a very different result but with Chicago goaltender Corey Crawford sprawled across the ice the Latvian couldn't put the puck in the open net."There's no question that it's a tough loss," said Bruins Adam McQuaid. "At the same time, it was a game that could have gone either way."Take the positives from it. Today is a new day. We kind of start over and just have to get ready for Game Two."The real winners on Wednesday were the fans, who had been left bitter and disillusioned when a nasty labor dispute very nearly resulted in no season until a last minute deal was struck to salvage a 48-game season.Owners and players promised they would reward fans for their patience and loyalty and on Wednesday two Original Six rivals delivered a Stanley Cup Finals opener for the ages.The NHL reported that Game One received a 4.8 household rating, which is the best metered market rating for a Stanley Cup Final Game One since 1997 but there were other signs people had been captivated by the breathless marathon.As game went on the Twitter-verse was abuzz with everyone from the White House to the Rolling Stones drawn into the unfolding drama.U.S. president Barack Obama, a Chicago backer, offered: "Good luck to the @NHLBlackhawks tonight - hope to welcome you back to the White House again as #StanleyCup champs. -bo" while Rolling Stones frontman Mick Jagger showed his colors donning a Bruins jersey and posting it on Instagram."Both teams wanted to win that game and no one was going to give it up easy," said Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews. "We're obviously feeling pretty good about it."
CHICAGO — Marian Hossa has been here before; he knows the drill. He has faced the cameras, answered the questions and endured the dog and pony show of Stanley Cup media day."It's so much fun to be here with you guys," Hossa said with a chuckle Tuesday, answering questions in front of a sea of reporters.To be fair, Hossa also knows little of the alternative. A Blackhawks forward, he is making his fourth Cup finals appearance in the past six years. On a team with playoff experience across its roster, Hossa, 34, is the elder statesman, a player from Slovakia in his 15th season in the N.H.L.He helped the Blackhawks to a championship in 2010, after being on the losing end of back-to-back finals between the Pittsburgh Penguins and the Detroit Red Wings in 2008 and 2009. Hossa played for Pittsburgh in 2007-8 and Detroit in 2008-9."Somebody said I was choosing good teams when I was a free agent," he said sheepishly.While some good fortune is assuredly needed for such a stretch, Hossa is more than lucky. He is a gifted and physical two-way forward with a nose for the net. He is fourth among active players with 434 goals in 1,018 regular-season games and seventh with 43 goals in 147 playoff games.After a season in Detroit, Hossa signed a 12-year, $63 million contract with Chicago, the type of deal cited for necessitating a salary cap. But unlike Brad Richards of the Rangers (five years, $39 million) or Vancouver's Roberto Luongo (12 years, $64 million), Hossa has produced — and played a key role on Chicago's second march to the Cup finals in four seasons."Hossa is one of those guys known for scoring 40 goals a season and putting up big numbers, but he's such a solid player, such a good guy in the locker room," Blackhawks forward Patrick Sharp said. "When you have that body of work in his career, that's a lot of hockey being played. It means he's a good player, that good teams want him."This trip to the Stanley Cup finals has a different feel, though, Hossa said, after a tumultuous off-season in which he feared for his career. In a first-round playoff series last year, Hossa was on the receiving end of a cheap shot from Raffi Torres that knocked him out of the postseason with a concussion. All last summer Hossa battled the recurring symptoms from his head trauma, but the injury was so severe that each bit of progress was stalled by relapse."You have so much time off that you start thinking about different things," Hossa said. "I definitely appreciate that I am still healthy and can play at a high level. I was glad I could return and be myself and I'm here now."He was not cleared to return until December, but thanks to the lockout he was ready for the beginning of the season. He scored two goals in each of the Blackhawks' first two games.But in February he was again the victim of a vicious hit that left him splayed on the ice in need of medical attention — this time from the Vancouver Canucks' Jannik Hansen. The scene was eerily similar to the one that knocked him out of action for seven months, but Hossa needed just a few days to recover. He tallied 31 points in 40 games for the season, and reached the 1,000-game milestone for his career.Several Blackhawks teammates called him a player to emulate."He's been to four finals and I've been to one," Dave Bolland said. "For sure, you look at a guy like that and want to learn."The rookie Brandon Saad, 20, added: "He's done it all. To be around him, it's helped me a lot."As he readies for another Stanley Cup finals, Hossa prepares to face his longtime friend and compatriot Zdeno Chara, a 6-foot-9 defenseman who also happens to be his neighbor in Trencin, Slovakia.Chara recalled rooting for Hossa to get his first ring when the Blackhawks defeated the Philadelphia Flyers in 2010, but promised there would be no such warm feelings this time around."I try to joke with him because he likes to be serious all the time on the ice," Hossa said of facing Chara. "He doesn't like to talk. I try to throw some funny stories on a face-off and hopefully make him laugh a little bit."Then there is the story of the Bruins' Jaromir Jagr, who needed 21 years to return to the finals after last reaching them in 1992, quite the contrast to Hossa's run. It is not lost on Hossa."It never gets old being here," he said. "And it's even better when you win the last game."
CINCINNATI — Jay Bruce homered off Burke Badenhop with one out in the 10th inning on Friday night, rallying the Cincinnati Reds to a 4-3 victory over the Milwaukee Brewers in a game full of errors and wasted chances.It was Cincinnati's second straight extra-inning game. The Reds fell 6-5 in 14 innings at Wrigley Field on Thursday, leaving their bullpen depleted.Bruce connected on a 1-2 pitch from Badenhop (0-3) for his fifth game-ending homer. Alfredo Simon (5-2) retired the side in the 10th.The teams combined for five errors — including a season-high three by Cincinnati. Bronson Arroyo hit Martin Maldonado with the bases loaded to force in a run, and Maldonado homered off him to tie it in the eighth.
(Reuters) - While the biggest piece of silverware is not yet ready to be awarded, the NHL used a break in the Stanley Cup to hand out some hardware on Friday.The Chicago Blackhawks and Boston Bruins, who clash in Game Two of the best-of-seven series on Saturday, faced off against each other at the awards table.Chicago captain Jonathan Toews narrowly beat out Boston's Patrice Bergeron for the Frank Selke Trophy honors, that goes to the forward who best excels in the defensive aspects of the game.Toew's, whose trophy case already contains a Conn Smythe trophy as a Stanley Cup most valuable player, won in a photo finish collecting 1,260 points to edge Bergeron with 1,250.Bergeron, however, did not leave empty handed, taking home the King Clancy Memorial Trophy, awarded to the player who best exemplifies leadership on and off the ice.Ottawa Senators' Paul MacLean, who guided his team to a berth in the Stanley Cup playoffs despite working with a roster decimated by injuries, picked up the Jack Adams Trophy as coach of the year, beating out Blackhawks Joel Quenneville."When it started (injuries), it was like, Who's next?" said MacLean. "But once we got kind of through it, we were thinking, We got to find a way to win."That's what good teams do, is find a way to win. So we were challenged early in the season to find ways to win."The quality of our young players that we were able to bring up accepted that. I think that was a big reason for us having the success we had."Minnesota Wild goaltender Josh Harding, who missed much of the season battling multiple sclerosis before returning for the playoffs, was awarded the Bill Masterton Memorial Trophy, given to the player for perseverance, sportsmanship and dedication to hockey."I don't know if I ever really wanted to quit," said Harding. "I found out about the diagnosis and obviously it hit me hard."But right away I knew I had to do something to kind of get back at it and find out what would work for me."During the year I had that tough stretch but I don't think it ever crossed my mind that I was going to give up or anything like that."Other winners included Tampa Bay Lightning winger Martin St. Louis who took home the Lady Byng Trophy as the league's most gentlemanly player beating out yet another member of the Blackhawks Patrick Kane.The league's most prestigious individual honors, including the Hart Trophy, which goes to the league MVP will be handed out on Saturday before Game Two.Pittsburgh Penguins Sidney Crosby and Washington Capitals Alexander Ovechkin, both former-winners of the award, and New York Islanders John Tavares are the three Hart finalists.
CHICAGO — Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals, a physically demanding and mentally exhausting battle of attrition, began Wednesday night and ended Thursday morning, with the Chicago Blackhawks celebrating a 4-3 triple-overtime victory over the Boston Bruins . The teams combined for 117 shots, 120 hits and 1,523 shifts in the fifth-longest game in finals history. Nineteen players logged more than 30 minutes of ice time.As the game wore on, the pace slowed. Bruins center Patrice Bergeron said he repeatedly cramped and managed to keep going by "digging deep and just telling yourself you're not tired." Dressing rooms grew increasingly chaotic between overtime periods as players replenished fluids, changed into dry equipment and tried to eat to maintain energy."It seemed like we had more trainers than players in the dressing room," Chicago's Marian Hossa said.On Thursday, neither team practiced for Saturday night's Game 2 as they tried to overcome fatigue.The psychological toll, though, could be different. The Blackhawks erased a 3-1 hole in the third period. The game remained tied, 3-3, until Andrew Shaw's goal on a shot that deflected off his knee at 12 minutes 8 seconds of the third overtime.Patrick Kane said that responding to five hours of hockey would be easier for the Blackhawks, having emerged with the win."The game went a long time, and it's definitely a good feeling winning in the third overtime when it does go that long," he said. "Huge win, for sure."Kane was not exaggerating. N.H.L. teams that have won playoff games lasting three or more overtimes have captured 38 of 47 series.But the Bruins were hardly distraught. From the team president, Cam Neely, to Coach Claude Julien to the players, they talked about their rebounds from past brushes with adversity: how they rallied from a three-goal, third-period deficit to beat the Toronto Maple Leafs in Game 7 in overtime in the first round, and how they lost the first two games of the 2011 finals to the Vancouver Canucks before winning the Stanley Cup."Vancouver, everybody's first time around, right?" defenseman Andrew Ference said. Losing the first two games in that series left a "heavier feeling than it is this morning," he added.On Wednesday, Chicago's tying goal in the third period ricocheted in off Ference's skate. That kind of thing would have bothered him when he was 22, he said, but now, at 34, "you just shake your head — that's the way it goes in the playoffs.""Certain plays you can control, and certain plays you wouldn't change a single thing you did," Ference added.When it comes to long overtimes, Ference has deeper experience than most other players. When he was growing up in Edmonton, he mowed the lawn of his neighbor Petr Klima. In 1990, when Ference was 11, Klima ended the N.H.L.'s longest finals game, scoring at 15:13 of the third overtime to give the Oilers a 3-2 victory over the Bruins.Neely played for the Bruins in that game. He remembered the effect it had on his team and the Oilers — not so much physical as psychological. After a two-day break, Edmonton won Game 2 by 7-2."They were up from winning, and we were down from losing," Neely said.As the Bruins and the Blackhawks recover from Game 1, They stayed up late to watch the five-hour opener, lived and died with the result, and now face the anxiety of watching Game 2.Neely was asked if he had any advice for them.Bruins Coach Claude Julien said Thursday that the injury-plagued forward Nathan Horton was day to day after sustaining an undisclosed injury in Game 1. Horton left during the first overtime with a suspected shoulder injury. Horton leads the N.H.L. in playoff plus-minus differential by a wide margin, with a plus-22 mark in 17 games. He missed the last four games of the Bruins' victory in the 2011 finals with a concussion after a high hit from Vancouver defenseman Aaron Rome in Game 3. He sustained a second concussion in January 2012 and did not return until the season opener Jan. 19 against the Rangers.
CHICAGO — Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews got another victory on Friday. The trophy he wants the most is still up for grabs.Toews won the Frank J. Selke award, given to the NHL's best defensive forward. He emerged from a trio of finalists that included fellow centers Patrice Bergeron of the Boston Bruins and Pavel Datsyuk of the Detroit Red Wings.Toews helped the Blackhawks advance past Datsyuk and the Red Wings in the second round of the playoffs. He is currently competing against Bergeron and the Bruins in the Stanley Cup finals.The Blackhawks lead the series 1-0, with Game 2 scheduled for Saturday night in Chicago."To be able to go head to head with guys like that in the playoffs, and to know them from the past, you understand how much they mean to their teams and how much they contribute offensively and defensively," Toews said. "To be talked about in the same sentence and compared to those guys is absolutely amazing. So it's a special award to win."The 25-year-old Toews was third in the NHL with a plus-28 rating in 47 games in the regular season, helping Chicago post the most points in the NHL. He also was a finalist for the Selke after the 2010-11 season.Bergeron, who won the Selke Trophy last year, earned a different honor this season. He was awarded the King Clancy Memorial Trophy for leadership and humanitarian contributions to the community.Also Friday, Paul MacLean of the Ottawa Senators won the Jack Adams Award, given to the NHL's coach of the year. The top executive honor went to Pittsburgh Penguins general manager Ray Shero. The Lady Byng trophy for the NHL's most sportsmanlike player was given to Tampa Bay Lightning forward Martin St. Louis for the third time in four seasons."I don't think you start the season thinking you're going to win the Lady Byng, but all in all, you just try to push the envelope without getting caught, I guess," St. Louis said. "You play hard and stay out of the box, but at the same time by no means you're going through the season trying to accomplish that."MacLean, a finalist for the second straight year, led Ottawa to the No. 7 seed in the Eastern Conference while overcoming the prolonged absences of several key players. Chicago's Joel Quenneville and Bruce Boudreau of the Anaheim Ducks also were up for the award."It was a very proud day for myself, my family and the Ottawa Senators organization and what we've gone through. We're pretty pleased here today," MacLean said.One of MacLean's players, forward Daniel Alfredsson, was the winner of the Mark Messier Leadership Award, and Detroit forward Henrik Zetterberg was honored with the NHL Foundation Player Award for community service.Minnesota Wild goalie Josh Harding won the NHL's Bill Masterton Memorial Trophy. The award is presented to "the player who best exemplifies the qualities of perseverance, sportsmanship and dedication to hockey."Harding was diagnosed with multiple sclerosis last fall and missed 33 games as he underwent treatment. On April 22, he was activated from the injured list and returned to the Wild lineup."I feel better than ever," Harding said. "I just won an NHL award. It's something that I never thought I'd do in my life ever, and it happened with MS."I played five playoff games. I didn't know if I'd ever play a playoff game, and that came with MS. I want people to believe that goals are possible. Just because you get a label of a disease doesn't mean you're not going to complete your goals. That's what I hope people take out of this."Harding faced the condition head on, and never considered giving up his hockey career."There were some ups and downs," he said Friday. "Some days it would have been easy to throw in the towel. . But I've been playing hockey since I was 4. I'm not going to let something come in the way."For everybody that would be in my situation, I think you'd find a way to make it work."AP Sports Writer Dave Campbell and Associated Press freelancer Matt Carlson contributed to this report.
CHICAGO — The winning goal of the fifth-longest Stanley Cup final game did not come off a stick. It did not even come off a skate. It needed the knee of the Chicago Blackhawks' third-line forward Andrew Shaw.Like Shaw himself — undersized, unconventional, and a touch pesky — the goal that gave Chicago a 4-3 victory in the third overtime of Game 1 against the Boston Bruins was nothing glamorous.Dave Bolland finished a check and poked the puck free from a scrum in the corner. It trickled up the boards to Michal Rozsival, as Bolland and Shaw made a beeline for the front of the net. Rozsival fired a shot from the point, the Blackhawks' 63rd of the night, and the puck pinballed through traffic, taking one serendipitous bounce after the next:first off Bolland's stick, then Shaw's knee and past goaltender Tuukka Rask."We knew it wasn't going to be pretty at that point," Shaw said. "You could tell both teams were physically exhausted. We've preached it: go to the net, you'll find a way to get a greasy goal."The Blackhawks' celebration was subdued after more than 100 minutes of grueling hockey. They did not so much as mob Shaw as gather around him and lean on each other for support before wearily skating off toward their dressing room. In his national television interview on the ice immediately following, an ecstatic and exhausted Shaw let fly an expletive that anyone still awake and watching at home could not have missed."A slip of the tongue," Shaw said later with a smile. "I couldn't think at all, actually. I could barely breathe."When he met the news media, Shaw had composed himself, looking dapper in a suit and a dash of mousse in his hair. He could not hide, though, a cut on the bridge of his nose, and another one above his left eye, battle scars befitting his hard-nosed and dogged style of play."You could ask players on other teams and they'll tell you that he's not the type of guy that they like to play against," said Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews. "But that's what we love about him. He's not afraid.""It's what's got me here," he said. "I got to stick to it."Shaw, 21, was a fifth-round pick by the Blackhawks in 2011 and arrived in Chicago last January. He played 37 games and netted 23 points. This season, he appeared in all 48 games, contributing 9 goals and 6 assists.Against the Bruins, the Blackhawks are the smaller team, thought to be more skilled, but tasked with solving Boston's defense, which allowed only two goals in a four-game sweep of the high-powered Pittsburgh Penguins in the conference finals. At media day on Tuesday, the 5-foot-10 Shaw talked at length about the herculean battle that awaited him: fighting for position against the 6-foot-9 defenseman Zdeno Chara, a seemingly immovable force in front of Boston's net.Shaw took a powerful crosscheck from Chara early in the game, but was undaunted. He was credited with nine hits in the game, tied for the team lead. He also sparked the goal that revived the Blackhawks when they fell behind by 3-1 in the third period with a nifty assist to Bolland.Then he scored the game-winner, a greasy goal from a plucky player."That's a pretty big goal," Blackhawks forward Patrick Sharp said. "I'm not going to say that's the biggest he'll ever score, but it's right up there."A storm raged across Chicago during the game with a clap of thunder audible inside United Center during the second period. Winds reached 70 miles per hour and knocked out television feeds across the city. Inside the arena, the Blackhawks and the Bruins played on, waging their own epic clash.When Shaw finally ended it at the stroke of midnight local time, the United Center's public address announcer mistakenly announced that it was scored in the second overtime, instead of the third. During a postgame interview at his locker, Blackhawks defenseman Duncan Keith had to sit down after playing more than 48 minutes.For everyone, it was time to go home. They could, finally, thanks to Shaw."Obviously, emotions are high," Shaw said. "I'm too exhausted right now to express it."
CHICAGO — Milan Lucic remembers it as if it was yesterday.Boston got Nathan Horton in a trade with Florida three years ago, and Bruins coach Claude Julien decided to put the forward on a line with David Krejci and Lucic."It kind of just clicked right away," Lucic said.The high-scoring line combined for Boston's first two goals in a 4-3 triple-overtime loss to the Chicago Blackhawks in Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday night. It was the continuation of a terrific postseason for the three veterans, who also helped the Bruins win the title two years ago.Horton, who was sidelined for the last part of the 2011 postseason by a concussion, left the series opener against Chicago with an unspecified upper body injury, but he practiced Friday and appears to be on track to play in Game 2 on Saturday night."We'll have to make a decision on him tomorrow," Julien said. "It was encouraging to see him out there today. If he feels good tomorrow, he's in the lineup, simple as that."If Horton is unable to play, Tyler Seguin likely would move up to the top line. He filled in for Horton after he left Game 1, and had a handful of prime chances to lift Boston to the victory.Whether it's Horton or Seguin playing with Krejci and Lucic, the Blackhawks know they have to do a better job of defending that line."I think that's a line that has most of the offensive abilities that the good line should have," Chicago defenseman Niklas Hjalmarsson said. "They got a big body with Lucic and Horton is a pretty big guy, too, and Krejci's a good playmaker and good shot, too. So they're obviously one of the best lines in the league, if not the best."It's going to be a fun challenge to play against them again tomorrow and see how it goes."Hjalmarsson was wrestling with Horton in front of the Chicago net during a Boston power play in the first overtime when the wing skated off with the injury. It appeared to be a serious problem at the time, since Horton decided at that pivotal moment that he was unable to continue.But Horton managed to practice on the eve of Game 2 and didn't appear to be inhibited in any way. He was not made available to the media, but just his presence at practice seemed to provide a lift for the Bruins."It's great. He's a big part of this team and really missed him in the overtime after he went down," Krejci said. "So it's good to see him back on the ice."Krejci and Horton each had an assist when Lucic beat Corey Crawford for the first goal of the series in the first period. Krejci set up Lucic in the second, and he fired it into the net for his fifth goal of the playoffs.Krejci leads the NHL with nine goals and 14 assists in the postseason. Horton has seven goals and 11 assists in the playoffs, and Lucic also has 11 assists."I just think we're going out there and having fun and we're moving the puck well," Lucic said. "We're shooting it when we get those opportunities. We're skating well. We're doing good things on the forecheck and the offensive zone, and also we've been able to play pretty sound defensively. That is kind of the transition into our success for our line."The 27-year-old Krejci is the engine behind that success. The gifted center has a deft touch and a knack for creating opportunities for his teammates. He has at least 23 assists in each of the last five years, including a career-high 51 for the 2008-09 season.Krejci also is a proven playoff performer. He had 12 goals and 11 assists during the 2011 title run. His considerable skill is a major reason why Julien isn't concerned about who plays alongside him in Game 2."He's a pretty smart player," Julien said. "He just wants players to move and he finds them. I don't think it's a big challenge for David. I don't think it's a big challenge for whoever plays with him. All you got to do is the right thing: get open and he'll find you."When it comes to defending Boston's top line, Chicago wants to improve in a couple of different areas. A missed check by Hjalmarsson played a role in the first goal in the series opener, and Lucic was open again for his second score."We can be a little better," defenseman Duncan Keith said. "Obviously, they scored a couple goals off the rush there. The first one was kind of off a forecheck off the rush. But I think just being aware when those guys are out there, having good back pressure, and trying to keep the puck in their zone as much as we can when they're on the ice helps, too."Many of the line's rushes led to action in front of Crawford, who finished with 51 saves. He also is planning on making his own adjustments for Game 2."They're a tough line to stop," Crawford said. "They're big. They're strong and they go to the net hard, but they make plays. Our guys, you know, just try to keep them on the outside as much as possible. For me, just be patient. Don't commit to anything too early, because they do find the open guy."
(Reuters) - Dan Paille scored in overtime to lift the Boston Bruins to a 2-1 win over the Chicago Blackhawks in Game Two of the Stanley Cup Final on Saturday to level the best-of-seven series.It marked the second straight game that needed overtime to find a winner after Chicago won Game One on Wednesday in triple-overtime.Patrick Sharp scored from a wild goalmouth scramble to stake Chicago to 1-0 first period lead and they dominated the early play, outshooting Boston 19-4.But the Bruins came out stronger in the second period and were rewarded with the equalizer when Chris Kelly banged home a rebound for his first of the postseason.The best-of-seven series now shifts to Boston for Game Three on Monday.
CHICAGO — The Boston Bruins are no longer a team that plays four lines. The team that used 12 forwards and whose fourth line destroyed the Rangers in the second round has changed. It is now a team led by star forwards."There's no doubt I prefer to play with four, especially when you're going into a third overtime," Coach Claude Julien said Friday, acknowledging that he will probably use three lines against the Chicago Blackhawks on Saturday night in Game 2 of the Stanley Cup finals. "Certainly not an ideal situation, but a situation you have to deal with in the middle of a game."The problem for Julien started when Gregory Campbell went down with a broken leg blocking a shot in Game 3 of the sweep against Pittsburgh in the conference finals. That broke up the unit of Campbell, Shawn Thornton and Daniel Paille, which had combined for four goals and eight assists in the five-game defeat of the Rangers, vastly outperforming the Rangers' top lines.In Game 1 against the Blackhawks, which lasted 112 minutes, Paille logged close to 21 minutes of playing time. But Thornton skated for less than 10."When Campbell went down," Julien acknowledged, "we had to go down to three lines. That's the unfortunate part, is that Thorny is the one that gets pushed out a little bit."In the absence of a fourth line, the top line — David Krejci, Milan Lucic and Nathan Horton — shone especially bright in Game 1. Lucic scored Boston's first two goals in the 4-3 defeat, with Krejci recording two assists and Horton one.But Horton left the game in the first overtime period, doubled over in pain, and did not return. He practiced on Friday but did not speak with reporters."If he feels good tomorrow, he's in the lineup, simple as that," Julien said.The top Bruins line has rolled through the postseason. Krejci is the top scorer in the playoffs, with 23 points. Horton is No. 2 with 18 and Lucic is tied for third with 16.But if Horton cannot play, Tyler Seguin, who has only five points this spring, will fill in on the top line."Horty's going to do everything in his power to play," Lucic said. "If he doesn't, David and I have had success with Seguin in the past, and we'll look forward to the challenge."The Bruins would also like to see more production from two other slumping forwards — Rich Peverley (one goal and no assists in 16 games) and Chris Kelly (no points in 17).The Blackhawks continue to get production from all four of their lines. Andrew Shaw, their third-line center, scored the winning goal in the third overtime of Game 1. He has five goals and four assists in the playoffs."It's huge," Shaw said of contributions from Chicago's bottom two lines. "There's obviously a lot of pressure on the top two lines and they're playing against the other two lines that are just as good as they are."Shaw's linemate, Dave Bolland, also scored a crucial goal in Game 1, quickly answering Patrice Bergeron's tally, which had put Boston ahead, 3-1, in the third period. It was Bolland's first goal of the postseason."The depth sometimes wins you games," Bolland said. "You have your third and fourth line rolling, that's a key and an advantage."Bryan Bickell, who has eight goals this postseason, skated with Bolland and Shaw at Friday's practice, which could potentially add even more firepower to Chicago's third line for Game 2. Coach Joel Quenneville delivered lofty praise for his fourth line, as well, which includes Michael Frolik, Marcus Kruger and Brandon Bollig. Each played valuable minutes in Wednesday's marathon game.The strength in numbers is a familiar feeling for Chicago players who played on the franchise's Stanley Cup- winning team in 2010. "It's spotting in those players," Bolland said. "It's putting the team we had in 2010 sort of back together."
CHICAGO — As the Blackhawks and the Bruins skated into overtime Wednesday night, then another and yet another, Representative Mike Quigley was watching 700 miles away in Washington as he always does when he cannot be at United Center: alone."I was so nervous I had the sound down," Quigley, a three-term Democrat from Chicago and a die-hard Blackhawks fan, said this week between Appropriations Committee meetings. "I got three hours of sleep."Since replacing Rahm Emanuel in 2009 in a special election, Quigley has earned a reputation as the biggest hockey fan in Congress. Weeks after he was first sworn in, an item popped up in the gossip pages of a Chicago newspaper, noting that Quigley had gotten into a verbal spat with Detroit Red Wings fans during a playoff game.Quigley, who laces up his skates twice a week in recreational leagues, has also helped raise the sport's profile in Washington.He is one of a handful of hockey-playing lawmakers who founded the Congressional Hockey Caucus, a bipartisan group focused on spreading the sport and using hockey to fight childhood obesity and provide wounded veterans with physical therapy and a dose of fun.Senator John Kerry of Massachusetts was a member before he became secretary of state. He attended President Obama's 2012 State of the Union address with a broken nose and two black eyes, the result of a collision during a pickup game.When Anthony Weiner was in Congress, he would sometimes play goalie in pickup games."He was a good goalie, kind of a big mouth on the ice," Quigley said. "We had a practice game, and I heard somebody yelling. I thought there was a heckler in the audience, but it was Anthony, directing traffic on the ice."Representative Brian Higgins, who grew up in South Buffalo, played alongside the father of the Blackhawks star Patrick Kane and the father of Tim Kennedy of the San Jose Sharks."There are more kids playing hockey, and the game has become more diverse from a cultural, ethnic and geographic point of view, but we still don't have a lot of congressmen," Quigley said."I'm thinking of trying to talk Jonathan Toews into running for Congress," he said of the Blackhawks' captain. "We could use him."Despite the difficulty in finding members of Congress who own skates, the group hosts an annual Lawmakers Versus Lobbyists hockey game that has raised money for the Fort Dupont Ice Hockey Club, which operates out of a rink in Washington.Earlier this year, Quigley played with a group of wounded veterans at Soldier Field with the USA Warriors Ice Hockey program.Quigley, 54, is square-jawed and solidly built at 5 feet 7 and 150 pounds. Growing up in the Chicago suburbs, he fell in love with the game on frozen ponds and played against Brett Hull in his youth. He idolized Stan Mikita and attended games at venerable Chicago Stadium.In 2010, Quigley was in Philadelphia, where the Blackhawks won the Stanley Cup, cheering on his team while Flyers fans shouted abuse and showered him with debris. He took a train from Washington with Higgins, who represents the district in Buffalo where Kane grew up. That night Kane scored the overtime goal that won the Cup."The Flyers fans were not particularly friendly the whole game," Quigley said. "So after Pat Kane scored, I stood up and gave them a salute that my predecessor would be proud of. They were raining beer on me, and I had to get out of there."Escorted out of harm's way and to the ice by security, Quigley wound up in the Blackhawks' dressing room, where he lived every fan's dream of raising the Stanley Cup. A photograph captured the little-boy grin he wore."Honest to goodness, Brian Campbell, he was holding the Cup and there was no one around for a minute," Quigley said of the defenseman. "He says, 'Hold this for a second.' So he hands it to me — one of the best moments of my life."He had returned to the Capitol the following morning and, with a Blackhawks jersey, delivered a speech on the House floor commemorating the win.Over his career, Quigley said, he had needed five operations and hundreds of stitches to patch up injuries.Another came recently when he sustained a torn hamstring during a benefit game. It required surgery and has left him on crutches.On the Blackhawks' current run to the finals, Quigley has been at United Center as often as possible. When Chicago played Detroit in Game 7 of the second round, Quigley passed on a fund-raising dinner for his fellow Chicagoan President Obama."It didn't feel like the president needed me there, but the Hawks needed me there for Game 7," Quigley said. "I'm sure the president would appreciate that."
CHICAGO — Boston Bruins forward Nathan Horton will play in Game 2 of the Stanley Cup finals against the Chicago Blackhawks on Saturday night, three days after he left the series opener with an injury.Horton practiced with the team Friday and participated in Boston's morning skate on Saturday."He feels really good," coach Claude Julien said. "He looked really good out there, the last two days. There's absolutely no reason he shouldn't play tonight."Horton left with an unspecified upper body injury while Boston was on a power play during the first overtime of Chicago's 4-3 victory in Game 1. Horton skates with David Krejci and Milan Lucic on a formidable line that really hurt the Blackhawks on Wednesday night.Horton made a great pass to set up the first of Lucic's two goals in the series opener. The 28-year-old wing has seven goals and 11 assists in the playoffs.He said he's not worried about being targeted by the Blackhawks."It's the playoffs," he said. "Everyone plays physical. Everyone plays strong."Forward Jaromir Jagr did not participate in Boston's morning skate, but Julien said the 41-year-old veteran is fine.
DECATUR, Ill. — Canada's Sue Kim won the Decatur-Forsyth Classic on Sunday for her first Symetra Tour title, beating Laura Kueny with a birdie on the second hole of a playoff.Kim closed with a 9-under 63 to match Kueny at 10-under 206 at Hickory Point Golf Club. Kueny, the Symetra Classic winner in May, finished with a 69."I had a really easy, steady day out there," said Kim, from Langley, British Columbia. "I hit 17 greens. I actually had all 17 birdie chances out there. It just came to me. It was a very easy birdie day."
CHICAGO — All those missed shots added up to one big blown opportunity for the Chicago Blackhawks. They couldn't bury the Boston Bruins in the early going and paid for it in the end.Now, home-ice advantage is gone. So is their lead over the Bruins in the Stanley Cup finals.Daniel Paille fired a shot past Corey Crawford's glove to give the Bruins a 2-1 overtime victory on Saturday night and tie the series at 1-1 with Game 3 coming up Monday night in Boston."You've got to kind of swallow this one and move on," said Patrick Sharp, who scored his ninth goal of the postseason. "We know what's on the line in this series and going into Boston's going to be tough, but we're ready for the challenge. We'll find a way to be better for Game 3."The Blackhawks squeezed out a 4-3 triple-overtime thriller in Game 1 but couldn't pull this one out, with their stars once again invisible, much like their power play.Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane were quiet again, just as they were in the opener, and the Blackhawks couldn't take advantage when they had the advantage. They were 0 for 3 on the power play for the second straight game and are now 7 for 57 in the postseason.As if that's not enough, here's some more bad news for the Blackhawks. Teams winning Game 2 of the finals have gone on to win the Stanley Cup in 55 of 73 years (75.3 percent of the time) since the best-of-7 format started in 1939.The Blackhawks can't blame Crawford for this one, though. He was just fine in net, stopping 26 shots, after coming through with a terrific performance in Game 1.The problem was the Blackhawks couldn't convert and, looking tired late in the game, made a series of blunders, including a turnover that led to Paille's winning goal. They outshot Boston 35-28 for the game and really came out firing in the early going, blistering the Bruins 19-4 in the first period, but all they had to show for it was Sharp's goal. Just over a minute after he scored, Jonathan Toews' wraparound was stopped by Rask. Hossa appeared to poke the rebound in, but the whistle had sounded before the puck crossed the goal line with the goalie covering it.Otherwise, Rask was simply outstanding in net again, getting through that early siege and finishing with 33 saves."It does get frustrating," Chicago's Dave Bolland said. "You're getting pucks at the net. Things aren't going in. You do get a sense of frustration. That frustration, you have to leave it alone and you've got to keep throwing it at the net. You hit a hot goalie, you hit a hot goalie."The Blackhawks sure have hit their share of late but simply kept rolling along.They had won eight of nine after falling behind 3-1 to Detroit in the Western Conference semifinals, taking out Jonathan Quick and the defending champion Los Angeles Kings in five games before winning that epic opener in this series.They simply ran out of steam in this one."We just didn't continue playing the way we were playing," Toews said. "We let them have the puck a little bit too often. And you, know, we didn't hang on to it. We didn't move our feet with the puck. We were too easy to check."He thought the whistle was "a little too quick" on that wraparound. Hossa said he didn't hear it blow and thought he had a goal."I just tried to battle for the space, and all of a sudden, I saw the loose puck," he said. "I tried to put my stick at the puck. I just felt the puck was crossing the line, and the refs ... decided no goal."Instead of having a solid lead in the game, they were clinging to a narrow margin. And now, instead of having a big lead in the series, they are knotted up and packing for Boston.It would help if their top stars converted on offense. Sharp and Hossa each have 15 points. So does Kane, but four of his six goals came in the final two games against Los Angeles. Toews, meanwhile, has found the back of the net just once."We know what we're getting ourselves into heading to Boston and how well they play in their building, but it's not going to change our mindset at all," Sharp said. "We're going to play our best game, we're going to have to. There a good team over there, so I don't think anyone's expecting anything different."
(Reuters) - Dan Paille scored in overtime to lift the Boston Bruins to a 2-1 win over the Chicago Blackhawks in Game Two of the Stanley Cup Final on Saturday to level the best-of-seven series.It marked the second straight game that needed overtime to find a winner after Chicago won Game One on Wednesday in triple-overtime.Another tight game unfolded on Saturday and it looked like multiple overtime periods might be needed again until Paille, who also assisted on Boston's other goal, took a pass from Tyler Seguin and unleashed a wrist shot that fluttered underneath netminder Corey Crawford's outstretched glove off the far post and into the net.The series now shifts to Boston for Game Three on Monday."I don't really remember," Seguin told reporters when asked about setting up the game winner. "I just kind of got the puck wide and saw the weak side high and saw (Paille), put it over to him and went to the net."With the buzz from Wednesday's Game One thriller still echoing through a packed United Center, the Blackhawks came out looking to deliver the early knockout punch in Game Two.Patrick Sharp scored from a wild scramble in front of Bruins netminder Tuukka Rask to stake Chicago to a 1-0 first period lead as the Blackhawks dominated the early play, outshooting Boston 19-4."I thought the first period, we just weren't there. We were on our heels," said Bruins coach Claude Julien. "They had total control of that period. Tuukka kept us in there."I thought the second, we started turning it around. Third, same thing. We got better as the game went on."Like I told our guys, we got to show up on time for these kinds of games. It could have cost us tonight."After a one-sided first period by the Blackhawks that had the 'Madhouse on Madison' rocking, the momentum slowly shifted to the Bruins over the final two frames and into overtime."I thought we lost the pace of the game on that end of the rink," said Chicago coach Joel Quenneville. "We had the perfect start to the game, then we stopped doing what made us successful."We stood around. They countered."The Bruins came out stronger in the second period and were rewarded with the equalizer when Chris Kelly banged home a rebound for his first of the postseason.Game Two featured another sensational display of goaltending at both ends of the rink but Rask was particularly brilliant in the opening period as the Blackhawks peppered him with shots."We definitely were in survival mode there for a bit," said Rask. "It looked like they had more guys out there than we did."They were bouncing on every single puck in front of net, had a lot of chances. We definitely played pretty bad."It was good that we were only down by one and regrouped after that."
CHICAGO — After being dominated for more than a period and a half, the Boston Bruins turned the tables on the Chicago Blackhawks in Game 2 of the Stanley Cup finals Saturday night. The Bruins controlled most of the game's final 40 minutes, and Daniel Paille's overtime goal gave them a 2-1 victory that evened the series at one game apiece.Paille's open wrist shot from the top of the left circle at 13 minutes 48 seconds of overtime sailed past the glove of Blackhawks goalie Corey Crawford, completing the Bruins' difficult comeback. Boston will host Game 3 on Monday.Describing his feelings after scoring the winner, Paille, a tenacious third- and fourth-line forward, said: "Just relief that the game was over and that we were able to go back 1-1. We're happy with our result tonight."The Blackhawks completely dominated the Bruins in the first 34 minutes, with 23 shots on goal to Boston's 6. Counting shots that were blocked or missed the net, Chicago attempted 46 shots to Boston's 8."If somebody would watch the first period, I would've said, 'Oh, give them the Cup right now,' " Bruins forward Jaromir Jagr said."We definitely were in survival mode," said goalie Tuukka Rask, who was superb in stopping 33 of 34 Chicago shots."It was hard to watch and hard to coach," said Claude Julien, the Bruins' coach. "But in the second period we got better, and the further the game went on, the better we got."The game's length, 73:48, was short in comparison with Game 1, which the Blackhawks won by 4-3 in the third overtime after 112:08 of playing time. In that game, Chicago clawed back from a two-goal deficit.The two clubs have played more than 185 minutes in the finals — more than three full games packed into two.Despite the one-sided play early in Game 2, the Blackhawks led by only 1-0, on Patrick Sharp's goal at 11:22 of the first period."At the time, I think we were happy with the way we played," Sharp said. "Scoring first was big; the building was into it. We were using our legs and skating, and for whatever reason that didn't sustain itself."Sharp's goal came on a play that exemplified Chicago's iron grip on the game at that point.Chicago swarmed the Boston goal after Tyler Seguin lost the puck in the neutral zone, with Patrick Kane shooting twice and Michal Rozsival once within six seconds. The puck popped into the air, and the Bruins' Kaspars Daugavins batted it away — to Sharp on the right wing. Sharp spun and fired as his teammate Michal Handzus was draped over Rask and a pile of Bruins lay scattered in the goal mouth.As the United Center crowd celebrated Sharp's ninth goal of the postseason, Julien stood on his bench, gesturing angrily to the referees about the replay on the video board, which appeared to show Handzus impeding Rask's ability to stop Sharp's shot.Seventy seconds later, the Blackhawks appeared to score again, as Jonathan Toews pushed the puck across the goal line while Rask lay sprawled from post to post. But after a long review, the league's replay officials in Toronto ruled that a referee's whistle had blown a moment before the puck crossed the line.After that, Chicago kept the pressure on, thwarted only by Rask's unflappable goaltending.But suddenly, at about the 14-minute mark of the second period, the momentum turned. The Bruins started taking shots again, and at 14:58, they tied the score.Seguin and Paille pressured Chicago defenseman Nick Leddy behind the Blackhawks' net. Paille stole the puck and centered it to Chris Kelly, who had not scored a goal or recorded an assist in 17 previous playoff games. This time, he scored."Everyone would love to score and score consistently," Kelly said. "For whatever reason, I haven't. I try to stay positive."Now it was the Bruins' turn to dominate. In the game's final 40 minutes, they outshot the Blackhawks by 22-11.In overtime, both teams had great chances. It ended when Seguin found Paille open with a fine cross-ice pass, and Paille's quick wrist shot beat Crawford and clanged in off the goal post.The puck came to Seguin, "and I just popped open," said Paille, who finished the night with a goal and an assist. "He saw me pop out, and I had to shoot the puck quick, get it off my stick. I was able to pick it off the post."This is the second straight season in which the first two games of the Stanley Cup finals have gone to overtime. Last year, the Los Angeles Kings beat the Devils twice in overtime in Newark en route to a six-game series victory.
CHICAGO — Alexander Ovechkin and Sidney Crosby , the N.H.L.'s two highest-profile stars, split its two trophies for most valuable player, the league announced Saturday night. Ovechkin won the Hart Trophy, voted on by the Professional Hockey Writers Association. Crosby earned the Ted Lindsay Award, which is chosen by players.Washington's Ovechkin, 27, won his third Hart Trophy after leading the league with 32 goals in the lockout-shortened season. He was tied for third in points (56) and was first in power-play goals (16) and shots on goal (220). He edged Crosby in a close contest, earning 1,090 points and 50 first-place votes to Crosby's 1,058 and 46. The Islanders' John Tavares was third, with 919 points.Ovechkin credited his improved play to his engagement to the professional tennis player Maria Kirilenko and his move to right wing this season from his traditional position on the left wing. The new Washington Capitals coach, Adam Oates, insisted on the change, and after a slow start in his new position, Ovechkin compiled 23 goals in his final 23 regular-season games."It was a big challenge for me and the coaching staff," Ovechkin said of the switch. "But we made it."He won consecutive Hart Trophies in 2007-8 and 2008-9.Crosby, 25, a Pittsburgh Penguins center, also notched 56 points, despite missing 12 games. He earned his second Lindsay Award. Ovechkin finished second."To be recognized by the guys you play against, it's obviously a compliment," Crosby said.The Rangers' Henrik Lundqvist finished second in the Vezina Trophy voting for the league's best goaltender. Lundqvist was voted the top goalie by the N.H.L.'s general managers a year ago, but he finished behind Sergei Bobrovsky of the Columbus Blue Jackets. Antti Niemi of San Jose was third.Rounding out Saturday's award winners were the Montreal Canadiens' P. K. Subban, who won the Norris Trophy for the league's best defenseman as a first-time finalist, and Florida Panthers forward Jonathan Huberdeau, the Calder Trophy winner for rookie of the year.
CHICAGO — Alain Vigneault has agreed in principle to become the next coach of the Rangers, a person with knowledge of the situation indicated Saturday. The Rangers officially declined to comment on the reports, but an announcement of Vigneault's hiring could come as soon as Sunday, an off day between Games 2 and 3 of the Stanley Cup finals between the Chicago Blackhawks and the Boston Bruins, if final details between Vigneault and the Rangers are worked out quickly.A phone call to Vigneault on Saturday was not returned.Word of the imminent hiring came after reports circulated that Vigneault met with Madison Square Garden officials Friday and had withdrawn his name from consideration for the coaching vacancy in Dallas.Vigneault, who coached Vancouver for seven seasons until he was dismissed last month, interviewed with General Manager Glen Sather and the rest of the Rangers' management team in La Quinta, Calif., on Tuesday. The Rangers are seeking to replace John Tortorella, who coached the team for five seasons before he was fired May 29, four days after the Rangers were eliminated in the second round of the playoffs by Boston.On Friday, the Rangers would not confirm that Vigneault had met with James L. Dolan, the club's owner and the executive chairman of the Madison Square Garden Company.Late Friday, General Manager Jim Nill of the Dallas Stars told the Canadian network Sportsnet that Vigneault had removed his name from the list of candidates for that team's coaching opening.Vigneault, 52, has extensive experience in Vancouver and Montreal, two cities where an N.H.L. coach faces intense scrutiny from fans and the news media. He coached the Canucks to the 2011 Stanley Cup finals; they lost in Game 7 to the Bruins. The Canucks also won the Presidents' Trophy as the league's top regular-season team in 2011 and 2012, and they finished first in their division in four other seasons. He was fired after the Canucks were swept in the first round by San Jose, their second consecutive first-round elimination.With Vancouver, Vigneault won 313 games, the most of any Canucks coach, and lost 227. He was 33-35 in the playoffs.Vigneault favored an offense-oriented, possession-oriented style, and the Sedin brothers, Daniel and Henrik, were given license to concentrate on the attack. That approach contrasts with Tortorella's emphasis on forechecking and playing without the puck.Vigneault's tenure of a little more than three seasons in Montreal was far less successful than his time in Vancouver. The Canadiens never finished higher than fourth in their division in all three full seasons and made the playoffs only in 1998. He was fired after 20 games in the 2000-1 season. Under Vigneault, the Canadiens were 109-122-35.On Friday, Mark Messier confirmed that he had interviewed for the Rangers' coaching job. Messier, a special assistant to Sather and a former Rangers captain who led the team to the Stanley Cup in 1994, has no coaching experience in the N.H.L., the American Hockey League, major junior hockey or the N.C.A.A.Messier also has no experience as an assistant coach, leading to speculation that he might fill such a role under Vigneault to gain experience for a future coaching job."Glen has interviewed many candidates, and I'm one of those guys," Messier told the NHL Network in Chicago on Friday, the 19th anniversary of the Rangers' last Cup victory. "Other than that, I'm not going to speculate on what-ifs and things like that. It's just too premature."The Rangers also received permission from Buffalo to interview Lindy Ruff, who was fired in February after coaching the Sabres for 15 seasons, and John Stevens, an assistant coach with Los Angeles and a former coach of the Philadelphia Flyers.However, it seems that Vigneault will have the job. In an interesting twist, Tortorella has emerged as a candidate for the coaching vacancy in Vancouver. He interviewed with Canucks General Manager Mike Gillis last week.
CHICAGO — The Boston Bruins , already down a game to the Blackhawks in the Stanley Cup finals, left the ice after the first period of Game 2 in Chicago on Saturday night having been outshot by 19-4 and trailing by 1-0.To boost his listless team, which was teetering on the brink of an 0-2 hole, Boston Coach Claude Julien shook up his third and fourth lines, although the prospects did not quite suggest an immediate payoff. He put together Daniel Paille, a scrappy, bottom-six forward; Tyler Seguin, a young star mired in a playoff slump; and Chris Kelly, who entered without a postseason point and with a minus-9 differential in the playoffs, the worst of any player in the finals.Somehow the line clicked. Paille, Seguin and Kelly produced the goal that tied the score in the second period and then the overtime winner."We didn't have much going," Julien said. "At one point I thought that line would give us something."In the latter stages of the second period, Paille picked up a loose puck behind the Blackhawks' net and picked his way to Chicago goaltender Corey Crawford's crease. Crawford turned away his shot, but Kelly poked home the rebound."I just happened to be there," Kelly said, "tapped it in."After Chicago turned the puck over in its own zone in overtime, Seguin slid a pass to Paille. With space, Paille sent a wrist shot toward the net that beat Crawford and caromed off the inside of the post and in, tying the series at a game apiece, with the setting now shifting to Boston for Game 3 on Monday night."That's how it happens every game," Paille said. "There's going to be breaks that go in and breaks that don't."Julien called his move little more than a coach's intuition."It's a hunch," he said. "You look at last game when they won; their heroes were guys from the third, fourth lines."Same thing for us. That's why you need depth in the playoffs. Top lines are playing head-to-head against top defense. It's not always that easy to score."The Bruins' lines were thrown out of whack when Gregory Campbell broke his leg blocking a shot in Game 3 of the Eastern Conference finals against the Pittsburgh Penguins. Campbell and Paille were playing with Shawn Thornton on what was called the merlot line because of the color of their practice jerseys.Since Campbell's injury, Julien has mixed and matched his bottom lines, but without much luck. In Game 1, the Blackhawks' third line scored two key goals, including Andrew Shaw's game-winner in triple overtime.What Julien found in the combination of Paille, Seguin and Kelly were two speedy skaters and a grinder in Kelly.Kelly said the ability of Paille and Seguin to match each other's pace was an important part of the success of the line."They both skate extremely well," Kelly said. "They both jump on pucks. They're at kind of the same speed level, which makes it nice that one guy is not ahead of the other."Paille said Seguin entered the game with a positive attitude despite having managed only a goal and five points in the postseason."He looked like he was on a mission today and realized he needed to play big," Paille said. "He did for us today."As for Kelly, the Bruins' alternate captain, his offensive game had been nonexistent in the playoffs, but it took only one play for his fortunes to change."Everyone would love to score and score consistently," he said. "For whatever reason, I haven't. I try to stay positive."He added: "I think it's even more important to play the other parts of the game when you're not contributing offensively. I think you need to pick up other aspects of your game to make them better in order to be a better all-around player."With 17 players still on Boston's roster from its 2010-11 championship season, there is also the helpful air of familiarity no matter which of their teammates the Bruins skate with."The bottom six have all played together at certain times — if it wasn't this year, last year, even the year before," Kelly said."I think Claude is just trying to find different chemistry with different guys, who's going on any given night. Claude has a pretty good feel for his players."
(Reuters) - The Chicago Blackhawks are finding out what the Pittsburgh Penguins already knew - that Boston Bruins netminder Tuukka Rask is pretty good.The ice-cool Finn was unbeatable again on Monday, stopping all 28 shots he faced to backstop the Bruins to a 2-0 win over Chicago and a 2-1 lead in the best-of-seven Stanley Cup Finals.It was Rask's third shutout in his last seven games, putting him at the top of the list of Conn Smythe Trophy candidates for the Stanley Cup playoffs most valuable player.After picking up a pair of shutouts against Sidney Crosby and the high-powered Penguins in a four-game sweep of Pittsburgh in the Eastern Conference final, Rask has been equally as stingy against Chicago, posting a sensational .960 save percentage."He's been focused since day one of the playoffs," Bruins coach Claude Julien told reporters. "You watch him on off days, you watch him, he's quiet, focused, calm."Right now, all his energy is put towards his game. When the game starts, he's a focused individual."I've never seen a guy so calm, obviously confident with the way he's played. Probably quietest I've seen him so far, but in a good way."The Bruins defense has also done its part, keeping the front of the Boston net clear and forcing the Blackhawks to take most of their shots from the perimeter. But when called upon, Rask has been virtually unbeatable in the last two games."They had shots, but most of them came from the outside," Rask said. "We eliminated a lot of those rebound opportunities."They shot high shots from off the wing and I was able to just catch a lot of them with my glove."Then a few loose pucks were lying around there. Our 'D' (defense) or forwards took care of that."Chicago coach Joel Quenneville conceded that Rask had been solid but limited his praise, explaining that his team was making life easy for the relaxed Finn."We ran up against some of the best goalies in the league here," Quenneville said. "Tonight I thought we made it rather easy on him as far as traffic and finding and seeing pucks."I think we got to be better at going to the net in non-puck areas."
ST. LOUIS — Lance Lynn earned his 10th victory to tie for the NL lead, Matt Holliday homered and drove in two runs, and the St. Louis Cardinals beat the Chicago Cubs 6-1 on Thursday night.Yadier Molina batted cleanup for the first time this season and walked twice with a double, raising his NL-leading average to .366. Allen Craig, the regular cleanup man, made his first pinch-hit appearance of the season and had a two-run double off Hector Rondon during a four-run sixth.The Cardinals took three of four from the Cubs and lead the majors with a 47-26 record heading into a weekend interleague series against the Texas Rangers, the team they beat in the 2011 World Series.Welington Castillo homered leading off the third for the Cubs, who left the bases loaded in the fifth when slumping Starlin Castro fouled out. They're 20-18 against NL teams outside their division, but just 9-24 against the Central.Lynn (10-1) allowed a run on three hits in six innings with six strikeouts and has reached double digits in wins before the All-Star break both of his years in the rotation, going 11-4 last year and making the All-Star team. He joined teammate Adam Wainwright and Washington's Jordan Zimmermann for the league lead.Lynn retired the side in order four times and is 5-1 against the Cubs, the lone loss coming last month at Wrigley Field. He's won nine in a row at Busch Stadium.Molina was 8 for 13 in the series with a homer and is 11 for 21 overall this season against Chicago with a homer and five RBIs.Castro was 0 for 4 with two strikeouts and is in an 11-for-85 slump that has dropped his average to .232.Castillo's second homer of the season and first since April 8 briefly tied it at 1 after David Freese's run-scoring groundout off Scott Feldman (6-6) had given the Cardinals the lead. Matt Carpenter scored from second on Holliday's infield hit, a bouncer between third and short that Castro got his glove on but could not contain.Feldman retired one of the four hitters he faced in the sixth, the lone out coming on center fielder Ryan Sweeney's leaping catch at the wall to rob Matt Adams of a homer two at-bats after Holliday hit his 11th also to straightaway center.The Cardinals won consecutive games for the first time since June 6-7 after alternating wins and losses for nine games.Notes: Rookie Tyler Lyons (2-3, 4.65) opposes the Rangers' Derek Holland (5-4, 3.30) Friday night. ... The Cubs' three-game series against the Astros is their lone home action in a stretch of 19 games with Matt Garza (1-1, 4.98) opposing Dallas Keuchel (4-3, 4.23). ... Cardinals starters lead the majors with 41 victories.
GLENVIEW, Ill. — Professional golfers haven't played a tournament at North Shore Country Club in 80 years, when the U.S. Open was conducted and amateur Johnny Goodman upstaged the likes of Tommy Armour and Walter Hagen.That's too far back for someone like Bernhard Langer to recall, but the second-ranked player on the Champions Tour understands why North Shore was selected as the site of the new Encompass Championship."I could see why they would have had the U.S. Open here years ago," Langer said. "This course will punish you if you hit the ball offline, and if you don't hit it close on the greens you're going to have some crazy putts with these mounds."Langer is one of seven World Golf Hall of Fame members playing in the 54-hole tournament, which includes a celebrity pro-am for the first two days. He also leads the tour's money list and is second in the point standings behind David Frost, who won the Tradition, the most recent tournament on the tour, two weeks ago.Frost, from South Africa, feels right at home at North Shore."It's the kind of course where I grew up on where you've got to hit the fairways," Frost said. "If the shot calls from left to right off the tee, you've got to do it, or right to left, you've got to hit it right to left. It's very demanding off the tees."Langer and Frost will be chased by a field that includes Nick Price for the first time since last August. The long layoff included five months of recovery time from surgery to eliminate tennis elbow in his left arm."After all the exercise and rehab I've been doing, the best thing to do is play golf," Price said. "That's what's going to strengthen it up. I've never had this length of time off in my game at any time in my career. At 56, it makes it doubly hard to get back into it. It took a really long time before I felt good."I don't really want to get into the TV work of anything like that. I don't want to be cooped up in some tower."Crowd favorite Fred Couples, runner-up to Frost at the Tradition, may get the biggest galleries, but the man considered by some the definition of a cool golfer couldn't pinpoint his definition of cool."I never really thought about it," Couples said. "I played for a long time, but I don't know if that's a cool thing. I think I've played pretty well for a long time. I think that's why people want to come out and watch."The winner earns $270,000 of the $1.8 million purse.Nine of the tour's top-10 points standing leaders are on hand for the tournament on a course that dates to 1924. Aside from U.S. Open sectionals, only amateur tournaments, including the 1983 U.S. Amateur, have been played at North Shore since.That makes the course a mystery even to the senior set. Of this week's field, only Stan Utley and Andrew Magee played in that Amateur, and neither has strong memories of the course.The celebrity contingent includes new Chicago Bears head coach Marc Trestman, Bears kicker Robbie Gould, former Bull Toni Kukoc and Jack O'Callahan, member of the 1980 U.S. Olympic hockey team.The Encompass Championship is the successor to a similar tournament in Tampa, Fla., sponsored by Encompass last year, but Michael Allen, the winner, isn't considered the defending champion at North Shore.
BOSTON — Five things learned in the Chicago Blackhawks' 6-5 overtime win over the Boston Bruins in Game 4 of the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday night:BLACKHAWKS BOUNCE BACK: The Blackhawks had plenty to celebrate after splitting two games in Boston. Chicago hosts Game 5 on Saturday with the series tied at two apiece instead of in a 3-1 hole. The Blackhawks also atoned for their listless performance in a 2-0 loss in Game 3 on Monday. Chicago had six shots on goalie Tuukka Rask before the Bruins had any. The Blackhawks also came out hitting and never let up, showing some grit that was lacking in the previous game. While the Bruins rallied to tie it three different times, the Blackhawks never trailed. "They keep coming. They're a hard-working team. They have skill on all their lines," Chicago coach Joel Quennville said. "They have a mobile and active D. They have big shots. Defensively you're always going to get challenged and tested. But I thought we did a better job of our offense putting some pressure on their D."OT AGAIN: Maybe the 48-game lockout-shortened schedule was a good thing, because the postseason is getting stretched to the max. Wednesday's game was the 27th overtime game of this year's playoffs, one short of the record set in 1993. That was also the last time three games in the finals went beyond regulation, with Montreal taking all three while beating Wayne Gretzky and the Los Angeles Kings. "It's exciting. Everybody worked so hard tonight. Everybody's worked so hard through the playoffs," said Brent Seabrook, who scored on a slap shot 9:51 into OT. "We're all contributing. It doesn't matter if I score or anybody else scores, it's nice to get the win and move on to the next day." The Blackhawks are 5-2 in OT during the playoffs and the Bruins are 5-3, losing for the first time in an OT game in Boston in these playoffs.RASK ROUGHED — Boston goalie Tuukka Rask's remarkable postseason run stalled on Wednesday night and his shutout streak of more than 129 minutes was long forgotten by the time it was over. Rask had allowed seven goals over the previous seven games before the Blackhawks cracked him in the largest offensive outburst of the series. Chicago had just five goals in the series entering Game 4, and the teams had combined for just 12 before striking for 11 on Wednesday. The final one came on Seabrook's slap shot as captain Jonathan Toews provided a bulky screen in front of Rask as the puck got past him and tucked inside the far post. "We were just around the net. We were getting inside and found the rebounds," said Toews, who had gone 10 games without a goal before he scored early in the second to put Chicago up 2-1. "Ugly goals, we don't care. We'll find a way. It's something we need to keep doing." Boston coach Claude Julien did not blame Rask for the loss in his postgame comments, but didn't exactly rush to his goalie's defense, either. "I don't evaluate the players publicly here," Julien said. "I look at our whole team and tell you our whole team was average. You can take what you want from that. I think we can be a lot better. We have an opportunity to be better next game. Hopefully, if anything, that makes us even hungrier."NO GLOVE — The Bruins made it a long night for Chicago goalie Corey Crawford as well, finding a vulnerable spot on his glove side and targeting it all game. All five of Boston's goals were to Crawford's glove side and the Bruins tested him there one final time in OT on a snap shot by Rich Peverley. Crawford juggled the puck slightly, but held on to it and forced a faceoff. Seabrook scored 19 seconds later and Crawford had another win in the finals despite allowing five goals. "Corey has been great for us all year, all playoffs. He just moves forward," coach Joel Quenneville said. "Commend him. We got the win. You know, he'll be fine."SPECIAL TEAMS: The Bruins scored a pair of power-play goals, the Blackhawks scored once while a man up and another down a man as special teams finally were a factor. The Blackhawks were scoreless in 11 power plays through the first three games and mired in a 0-for-29 drought before Patrick Sharp scored to put Chicago up 5-4 with 9:41 left in regulation. The goal came just after a 5-on-3 advantage for Chicago expired, but before Boston's Jaromir Jagr could get from the penalty box into the play. The Bruins had killed 27 straight penalties entering the game.
BOSTON — Chicago Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews is what coaches like to call a "complete" ice hockey player.Defensively responsible, hard working, a leader and a playmaker, Toews has been all these things but mostly he is a goal scorer.On Wednesday he did what the Blackhawks expect him to do and scored a second period goal against the Boston Bruins in a 6-5 overtime win that leveled the Stanley Cup Final at 2-2.Toews' was not the most important goal of the night but it could have been the most significant if it signals the long-awaited end to a dismal postseason scoring slump that was growing more-and-more worrying with each goal-less game.When Chicago won their last Stanley Cup in 2010, Toews finished with seven goals and 29 points in 22 games and earned the Conn Smythe trophy as the postseason's most valuable player.These playoffs, Toews, who tied for the team lead in goals scored during the regular season with 23, had counted just one goal, against the Detroit Red Wings in the Western Conference semi-finals, before Wednesday's Game Four."I think it makes a world of difference for you when you finally see one go in," Toews told reporters. "You work hard, eventually you're going to find a way."Tonight was one of those games, we treated it as a Game Seven. We weren't going to be denied and I felt that same way, too."It's time to put all those other games behind us, the games where we struggled to score, forget about it, just find a way to do what you do."Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville defended his captain, pointing out at great length the many different ways that Toews had been contributing to the Chicago cause - logging heavy minutes, taking extra-care of his defensive responsibilities, winning faceoffs.For his work without the puck, Toews last week was awarded the Frank Selke trophy that goes to the NHL forward who best excels in the defensive aspects of the game.But with his team struggling to score against the Bruins, Quenneville needed his sniper to start finding the target again.In an effort to jumpstart Toews, Quenneville reunited him with Chicago's other top forward, Patrick Kane, and along with Bryan Bickell the line produced some magic.Kane also scored his first goal of the Final on Wednesday and the trio were also on the ice for Brent Seabrook's overtime winner, Kane and Bickell picking up assists while Toews was parked on the goalmouth ready to scoop up any rebounds.Few in the TD Garden were happier to see Toews find the back of the net than Quenneville."Johnny had the puck more today, I thought he was more friendly with it," said Quenneville. "That line was dangerous, be it off the rush or in the zone."Obviously scoring has got to help him."The excitement of that line, Kaner in possession, Bick around with the big body, they scored some different kind of goals.
BOSTON — Losing their balance in the Stanley Cup finals, the Chicago Blackhawks righted themselves Wednesday night with a 6-5 overtime victory in a wild Game 4 that they almost frittered away.The Blackhawks tied the series by reverting to what they do best, even though it was hardly a masterpiece and they blew a pair of two-goal leads.They played a wide-open game and broke through the Bruins' neutral-zone blockade. They got another clutch overtime goal from defenseman Brent Seabrook, whose overtime goal in Game 7 beat the Detroit Red Wings in the second round. And Coach Joel Quenneville reunited his stars Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane for the first time in this series.Toews and Kane each scored a goal, the first of the series for both of them. Along with their linemate, Bryan Bickell, they combined for 11 shots on goal. They were all on the ice for Seabrook's winner at 9 minutes 51 seconds of overtime that was assisted on by Kane and Bickell, with a screen provided by Toews. Kane and Toews finished at plus-2 each, and Bickell finished at plus-3."I like that line," Quenneville said. "Big picture getting reunited. They seem to have some chemistry."The last time Quenneville put Kane and Toews together, in Game 5 of the conference finals against the Los Angeles Kings, Kane scored a hat trick, including the series winner in overtime, and Toews had two assists. So after the Blackhawks managed only one goal in Games 2 and 3 against Boston, Quenneville was asked why he did not put them back together sooner."You always get second-guessed," he said. "Maybe it looks like I didn't know what I was doing."The game punctured for good any notion that the two goalies, Tuukka Rask of Boston and Corey Crawford of Chicago, were invincible. It was the third overtime game in four games in the series, which resumes Saturday in Chicago.Rask, who entered the game with a .960 save percentage in this series, stopped 41 of 47 shots, an .872 mark. At one point in the third period, he tried to catch a shot from Bickell that was going well wide; instead, he deflected it with his glove, it struck the crossbar and, fortunately for Rask, bounced away.Crawford, who entered with a .940 save percentage in the series, stopped only 28 of 33 shots, an .848 mark. He allowed all five goals to sail in over his glove. At least two of them were stoppable."We were playing our game to a T," Crawford said, but he acknowledged that he had a tough time in goal. "You have no choice but to brush off what happened and get ready for the next shift."The Blackhawks held leads of 3-1 and 4-2 but could not hold them. Patrice Bergeron evened the score with his second consecutive goal, at 2:05 of the third period. The TD Garden crowd was roaring, with the fans sensing a comeback victory, even though their Bruins were playing the kind of track-meet game the team hates.Patrick Sharp gave Chicago the lead with the Blackhawks' first power-play goal of the series at 11:19. It was his 10th goal of the playoffs, the most of any player. Marian Hossa, back after a one-game absence because of an undisclosed injury, earned an assist.But only 55 seconds later, Bruins defenseman Johnny Boychuk tied the score from 44 feet out, slapping the puck to Crawford's vulnerable spot above his glove hand. The game was bound for overtime, and the stage was set for Seabrook to become the savior again."It doesn't matter if I score or anybody else scores — it's nice to get the win and move on to the next day," Seabrook said.Even though Seabrook scored the winner, it was Toews and Kane who ignited the Blackhawks' offense. Toews tried to explain his chemistry with Kane."Kane and I have played together over so many years," Toews said. "Whenever we get the chance to get back together, we complement each other."Kane added of himself, Toews and Bickell: "I thought all three of us played pretty well. Just playing with each other for the first time in a little while again, we feel we can get even better."Kane and Toews noted that their success Wednesday came against the 6-foot-9 defenseman Zdeno Chara, who finished the game at minus-3."If you're matched up against him, try to win that battle and make some plays," Kane said. "We've done it for a long time in our careers, so no use backing down now, I guess."Quenneville described it best, however, in his own inimitable way."The excitement of that line: Kaner in possession, Bick around with the big body, they scored some different kind of goals," he said. "But Jonny had a nice night."N.H.L. general managers on Wednesday approved the mandatory use of protective visors for all players entering the league. They also approved an extra two-minute penalty for a player who removes his helmet before a fight and banned the "spin-o-rama" move from shootouts. In a decision aimed at cutting down injuries from icing chases, hybrid icing will be used in preseason games on a trial basis. The changes are expected to be finalized by the league's Board of Governors later this month.
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — Hector Santiago shut down the Royals' punchless offense for a career-best eight innings, and the Chicago White Sox roughed up Kansas City starter Jeremy Guthrie in a 9-1 rout Friday night.Dayan Viciedo hit a three-run homer and Alejandro de Aza added a two-run shot for the White Sox, who snapped a three-game skid with their best offensive output in nearly two weeks.They scored twice in the first inning and five times in the third, when they chased Guthrie (7-5) from the game. De Aza's homer came off reliever Bruce Chen in the sixth.Most of that offense turned out to be moot the way Santiago (3-5) was pitching.The left-hander gave up just three hits and a walk, and Eric Hosmer's homer in the sixth represented the only run Santiago has allowed to the Royals in 19 1-3 career innings.The replacement for injured starter Gavin Floyd, Santiago delivered easily his best performance since going seven scoreless innings May 7 against the New York Mets. It also helped the White Sox get back on a winning track after losing 17 of 22 and dropping a season-high 12 games below .500.It surely helped Santiago's confidence that the White Sox staked him to an early lead.On a warm, windy night at Kauffman Stadium, Guthrie walked three of the first five batters he faced, and the bases-loaded free pass that he issued to Paul Konerko brought in the game's first run. Conor Gillaspie added a sacrifice fly later in the first inning to give Chicago a 2-0 lead.The real trouble for Guthrie came in the third, when Alexei Ramirez led off with a single and Alex Rios doubled over the head of Alex Gordon in left field. Adam Dunn's single drove in another run, and Gillaspie's single knocked Guthrie from the game.Viciedo greeted Chen with a three-run shot to give the White Sox a 7-0 lead.Guthrie wound up allowing six runs on five hits and three walks in 2 1-3 innings, his shortest start since going the same distance for the Orioles on July 7, 2009. It was his second straight shaky outing, too — he allowed five runs over seven innings Saturday night at Tampa Bay.All the more puzzling is that Guthrie had been having success against the White Sox. Since joining the Royals last year, the right-hander had been 3-0 in six starts against their AL Central rivals, giving up just two earned runs in 44 2-3 innings.Guthrie had given up that many Friday night before escaping the first inning.De Aza's two-run homer in the sixth made it 9-0, the most runs that the Royals' stingy pitching staff had allowed since an 11-6 loss to the New York Yankees on May 10. It was also the most runs the White Sox had scored since beating Toronto 10-6 on June 10.Tyler Flowers was the only member of the White Sox starting lineup without a hit.NOTES: The White Sox recalled RHP Brian Omogross from Triple-A Charlotte before the game. ... Major League Baseball announced the Royals will make up their May 2 game against Tampa Bay that was snowed out on Aug. 26 at Kauffman Stadium. The first pitch will be at 1:10 p.m. CT. ... LHP Jose Quintana takes the mound Saturday against Royals RHP Wade Davis.
GLENVIEW, Ill. — Craig Stadler birdied five of his first 11 holes on Friday to jump into a share of the lead with Duffy Waldorf and Bernhard Langer at 5-under-par 67 in the rain-delayed Champions Tour Encompass Championship at North Shore Country Club.There were 23 players left on the course when play on the 54-hole tournament was suspended by darkness. Stadler, who didn't start until after a 3-hour, 28-minute delay for severe weather was in the next-to-last group to finish.The players with holes remaining will do so Saturday morning before the second round begins.The fourth of Stadler's five birdies was his best. His 7-iron from a divot in the middle of the fairway stopped a foot from the cup.Seven players, including Chicago-area native Gary Hallberg and area resident Jeff Sluman, are a stroke back at 4-under 68, while Peter Senior and Mark Calcavecchia are at 4-under on their back nine. Major championship winners Corey Pavin, Bob Tway and Hal Sutton lead a pack of eight players at 3-under 69.Both Waldorf and Langer finished their rounds after the delay, with Waldorf bogeying his last hole to drop from 6-under. Langer parred his final two holes after the thunderstorms passed. Hallberg holed out from the fairway for an eagle 2 at the 18th to reach 4-under.Sandy Lyle and Blaine McCallister were in the clubhouse at 68 before the storm hit and dropped eighth-tenths of an inch of rain on the course. Lyle birdied three of his first seven holes, and then played his final 11 in 1-under to settle at 68. McCallister was 5-under through 17 holes, but stumbled by missing the green in regulation and failed to convert a 20-foot par-saving putt.Among the others at 68, David Frost opened with a double-bogey 6, but played his back nine in 4-under-par 32 to claim a share of third. Jeff Hart birdied three of his last six holes to climb to 4-under, while Sluman played the back nine in 3-under 33 to score his 68. Hoch's round was birdie-free.Stadler's 67 was his best first-round score since a 67 at the AT&T Championship late in the 2008 season. On Friday, he benefited from soft greens that accepted shots from all angles, and hit 16 greens in regulation, even though he landed in only nine of 14 fairways."It was hard getting your short irons close, because the ball kept spinning back," Stadler said as darkness closed in.Waldorf was on the ninth hole, his last of the day, with the thunderstorm system on the verge of hitting the course when the horn was blown. He ended up three-putting his last hole for a bogey 5."When you're playing well, you definitely want to keep playing," Waldorf said. "It would have been a big difference."Waldorf hit 15 greens and one-putted eight holes, including all six birdie holes.McCallister played bogey-free golf until his last hole, the par-4 ninth, which he was hurrying to finish before play was halted."There's a lot running through your mind," McCallister said. "You're trying to beat the weather. You know it's coming, but I stayed patient today."McCallister nearly holed out for eagle on the par-4 second hole, his 11th of the day, sinking a one-footer for birdie, and added a birdie on the par-5 third to get to 5-under. He stayed there until the bogey at the ninth. It was still his best opening round since June of 2010.Lyle hit nine of 14 fairways and 13 greens en route to his 68, taking only 28 putts. The round would have been better had Lyle not bogeyed three of the four par-3 holes.There were 48 players under par and another 11 of the 80-man field at par when play was suspended for the day.The storm also left a large gallery to scatter. Many were following Sluman and former Chicago Bears linebacker Brian Urlacher, participating in the celebrity pro-am team portion of the competition.A pair of teams were tied at 13-under 59 for the first round lead.
CHICAGO — It has been a whirlwind few days for Chicago Blackhawks goalie Corey Crawford, drawing praise for his play in the Stanley Cup Final one day and the subject of criticism the next.Crawford was being mentioned as a candidate for the Conn Smythe Trophy given to the NHL playoffs' most valuable player and even tipped as the potential starting goalie for Canada at next year's Sochi Olympics.But his play in a 6-5 overtime win over the Boston Bruins that evened the best-of-seven Stanley Cup Final at 2-2 now has Crawford facing speculation he could be replaced by backup Ray Emery for Saturday's pivotal Game Five.Despite getting the victory, Crawford allowed five goals on 33 shots and was shaky enough to trigger talk of the need for a change in the Chicago net, something Blackhawks head coach Joel Quenneville shot down."No, we're very comfortable with Corey," Quenneville told reporters on Friday. "Corey has been rock solid all year for us, and when he's got the ball, he's been outstanding and he's the biggest reason why we're here today."Corey just seems to move forward whatever the challenge is, the next shot, the next game."I just think we want to make sure that we play strong in front of him and don't give up as many quality chances as we had in the last game."While outside of the Chicago locker room some are ready to push the panic button, inside the mood is calm.Certainly the Blackhawks have a capable backup in Ray Emery, a battle-tested 30-year-old veteran who led the Ottawa Senators to the Stanley Cup Final in 2007 and posted a sparkling 17-1 record for Chicago this season.But there is little chance Emery will been seen anywhere but at the end of the Chicago bench with players having expressed their full confidence in Crawford's ability to get the job done."With him you don't have to worry about his attitude, it is always the same," said Chicago forward Patrick Kane. "He's very focused and ready to play every day and every game."He's been great for us all playoffs, all year."I think for us that we can play better defensively, maybe get in some shooting lanes and block some of those shots."Crawford's glove side, however, has become a legitimate concern as Boston shooters seem to have found a chink in the netminder's armor.All five Boston goals during Wednesday's Game Four were to Crawford's glove side, the Canadian waving at the puck as it whizzed past his outstretched trapper.Even Crawford admitted that Bruins snipers were locked in on his glove and expected the trend to continue but had no plans to alter his playing style."Obviously they shot there a lot more than blocker side," said Crawford. "But I can't start thinking about that, you get in trouble if you starting thinking they are going to shoot glove."As a goalie you never want to be thinking out there, you just want to read and react."They made some good shots, you need to get over it and be prepared."The last series they were talking about my blocker so both sides are bad I guess."
CHICAGO — Matt Garza pitched into the ninth inning and Anthony Rizzo hit his first home run since May 18 to lead the Chicago Cubs over the Houston Astros 3-1 on Friday after a rain delay that lasted more than 3 hours.Darwin Barney and Scott Hairston also homered for the Cubs.The subject of trade speculation, Garza (2-1) allowed four hits and struck out eight in eight-plus innings for his first win since beating Arizona on May 31.Garza, who threw seven scoreless innings Sunday in a no-decision against the Mets, walked Jose Altuve to begin the ninth and was replaced by Kevin Gregg, who earned his 11th save in 11 tries.Chris Carter broke up Garza's shutout bid with a leadoff homer in the seventh. Carter's 15th home run was a sharp line drive to right-center.Rizzo, who entered in a 4-for-40 slump, finished with two hits after the start was delayed by rain for 3 hours, 18 minutes. The first baseman agreed to a $41 million, seven-year contract on May 13 and has struggled since the deal, hitting .200 with one home run and 11 RBIs.Barney was a triple short of the cycle for Chicago, which had lost four of five and scored 11 runs in its last five games. Hairston added a solo home run off Dallas Keuchel in the sixth to make it 3-0.Keuchel (4-4) lost for the second time in three decisions, pitching six innings and giving up three runs and nine hits while striking out a career-high nine. Houston had won six of eight.It was the first interleague matchup between the Astros and Cubs. The teams had played 705 times in the National League since 1962 and had been NL Central foes before the Astros shifted to the American League this season.Carlos Pena, who led the 2011 Cubs with 28 home runs, played the 1,458th game of his career but the first against Chicago. Facing Garza, a teammate on the 2008 AL champion Tampa Bay Rays, Pena was 0 for 3 before grounding out against Gregg to end the game.While a former Cubs first baseman was returning to Wrigley, the current one gave Chicago the lead.Rizzo's home run on the first pitch of the fourth gave the Cubs a 1-0 advantage. His 11th homer of the season was a towering drive to right field that landed outside Wrigley Field and traveled an estimated 410 feet.Dioner Navarro and Ryan Sweeney followed with singles, but Garza struck out swinging to end the inning.Barney led off the fifth with his fourth home run, sending a 1-2 pitch from Keuchel into the left-field bleachers. Keuchel hadn't allowed multiple home runs in any outing, and only seven all season before giving up three Friday.Hairston's home run in the sixth came on an 0-1 pitch and landed well into the left-field bleachers for the Cubs' third straight inning with a solo home run.NOTES: The Cubs traded Triple-A infielder Brent Lillibridge to the New York Yankees for a player to be named or cash. Lillibridge had one hit in 24 at-bats before being sent down to Iowa on April 18. ... Astros RHP Edgar Gonzalez began a rehab assignment with Triple-A Oklahoma City. Gonzalez went on the 15-day disabled list with a right shoulder strain May 26. ... Houston 1B-OF Marc Krauss made his major league debut in the eighth and struck out swinging. Krauss joined the team after being promoted from Oklahoma City, where he hit .277 with nine homers and 35 RBIs. He was brought up to replace Trevor Crowe, who went on the 15-day DL with a right shoulder injury sustained Thursday. ... Bud Norris (5-7, 3.64 ERA) pitches Saturday for Houston against Travis Wood (5-6, 2.74).
CHICAGO — Boston Bruins coach Claude Julien and his Chicago Blackhawks counterpart Joel Quenneville do not have all the answers but after a two-month Stanley Cup playoff marathon they know most of the questions.They meet with the media every day, twice on game days, win-or-lose, rain-or-shine, the daily scrums now as much a part of the Stanley Cup routine as playoff beards and pre-game meals.After four best-of-seven series and the finish line in sight the routine has become numbingly repetitive and on some days so have the questions."You have to start reading some transcripts here," Julien chastised the media for being asked the umpteenth time what Jaromir Jagr's presence means to the team. "I've answered that question about five times already."I'll answer it again," laughed the Boston coach.Both are former-players, both have sipped from the Stanley Cup and own Jack Adams trophies as National Hockey League coaches of the year.Both have developed a sharp wit and thick skins honed over decades of dealing with an increasingly demanding media."I think we have pretty similar personalities," said Julien. "These are two of many cities in this league that adores their sport, supports their sport, live and die for it."They want a championship team every year. They demand that."When things don't go well, sometimes the emotions get the better of people, whether it's fans, media, whatever. You have to live with that."I think to me, it's always been something that's part of our job description, to be able to handle that stuff."What you do is you go and work your way through the challenges that you have in your dressing room, not the challenges you have outside of it."While most coaches would rather stand in front of Zdeno Chara slapshot than deal with press, Quenneville and Julien have taken their media obligations seriously offering thoughtful insight where possible.It is a hockey conversation with a language all its own. To outsiders the men could be talking 'Klingon' as they dissect powerplays and game plans."I enjoy my work," said Julien. "If I could come to work every day, do this stuff, then walk out of the rink and nobody knew who I was, I'd be the happiest guy in the world."I love my job. I love what I do. I hate coming up here every day (the podium). But, no, it's just the way I am."I enjoy being around players. I enjoy the whole process of this work."Love my job. Just don't like the limelight that comes with it. I'm low-profile. That's just the way I am."With the best-of-seven Final level at 2-2 and Game Five set for Saturday in Chicago, there are still some big questions but winning the Stanley Cup will answer them all for one coach."It's a tough business," said Quenneville. "We all know the tough parts of it."Job security is not the safest career choice in the world. But I think we know going in with the challenges that you can face.
CHICAGO — They keep tinkering, each of them, looking for any advantage they can find.Claude Julien made a line change in Game 2 that led to a victory for the Boston Bruins. A couple of subtle adjustments by Joel Quenneville helped the Chicago Blackhawks get a big win in Game 4.Back and forth it goes. While the Bruins and Blackhawks compete on the ice, two former NHL defensemen are trying to become the 14th coach with at least two Stanley Cup titles."They've got a role to play, just like we do as players," Chicago forward Patrick Sharp said Friday. "Ultimately it's going to be decided on the ice, but our coaching staff, the Bruins as well, they have a lot to say with what goes on."They've already had an impact. And the next move, along with the response from the other bench, could be a deciding factor in who wins this tight series between two of the NHL's most beloved franchises.The Blackhawks' 6-5 overtime victory in Boston on Wednesday made it a split of the first four games. The series resumes on Saturday night in Chicago, with the rest of league's coaching fraternity enjoying the chess match between two of its most accomplished members."What has been fun to watch is, neither guy is hoping for chemistry to develop," St. Louis Blues coach Ken Hitchcock said. "They're not sitting on a combination. They're moving guys around to try to find something and their proactive approaches have been one of the great things about the series."Quenneville's team appeared to be in trouble heading into Game 4. The Bruins controlled the last part of a 2-1 overtime victory in Game 2, stealing home-ice advantage from Chicago, and shut down the Blackhawks in a 2-0 victory Monday night that put Boston up 2-1 in the finals.Looking for an offensive spark, Quenneville put captain Jonathan Toews back on the same line with Patrick Kane ahead of Game 4. Toews responded with his second goal of the playoffs, and Kane had a goal and an assist. The Blackhawks' defensemen also were more active in the offensive zone, with Brent Seabrook scoring the winning goal.Shortly after the series-tying victory, Quenneville still managed to poke fun at himself when asked about putting Toews and Kane together again."Maybe it looks like I didn't know what I was doing," he said with a chuckle.The moment of levity in the middle of a taut series was a prime example of why Quenneville has been so successful in his third stint as a head coach in the NHL."I think he's always been the same guy," defenseman Duncan Keith said. "I think you always know what you're going to get with him and I think that's probably the biggest thing for us, why we have success. He's level-headed, brings that even-keel attitude to the team."The Bruins were struggling on the second night of the series when Julien put Chris Kelly, Daniel Paille and Tyler Seguin together on the same line, and they were responsible for both of Boston's goals in a victory that gave the Bruins a split of the first two games in Chicago."I think Claude has always been leading the same way and kind of coaching the same way," center Patrice Bergeron said. "I think a little adjustment during the series is a little different because you're playing the same team over and over again. So it's about little tweaks here and there and I think the whole coaching staff is good at that."Boston has made it to the playoffs in each of Julien's six seasons in charge, and two more victories would make it two Stanley Cup titles in three seasons. It also won it all in 2011, coming back to beat Vancouver in seven games after losing the first two of the series.The same relentless approach that helped the Bruins overcome the Canucks two years ago popped up again when they staged an improbable rally in the third period of a 5-4 victory over Toronto in Game 7 of the first round of this year's postseason.It's no coincidence that the occasionally feisty Julien was behind the bench for each victory."I've always said I've got to be comfortable; in order to be comfortable, I've got to be myself," the 53-year-old Julien said. "As a player, I felt things. As a coach, I kind of remember those things. At the same time, when you are the coach, you are the guy that gives the direction so it's a fine line."Quenneville, who turns 55 in September, coached the Blackhawks to the best record in the NHL in his fifth season in Chicago. Under his leadership, the Blackhawks ended a 49-year drought when they won the Cup in 2010.Like Julien, Quenneville's coaching style also is influenced by his playing career."As a player, it's way more fun being a player than a coach," he said. "But at the same time, really enjoyed coaching in the different places I've been as a coach. I just think I've been fortunate to work with some great people, some great organizations. I've learned from some great people along the way."AP Hockey Writer Larry Lage in Detroit contributed to this story.
Jhonny Peralta hit a two-run homer off Andrew Bailey in the bottom of the ninth inning to give the host Detroit Tigers a 4-3 victory over the Boston Red Sox on Thursday.Boston led by 3-2 when Victor Martinez drew a leadoff walk off Bailey (3-1), and Peralta followed with a line drive over the fence in left field for his seventh homer of the year.Boston Manager John Farrell said after the game that Bailey would be given a break from closing."We're going to back him out of there right now and try to get him fixed," Farrell said. "So we'll look at some other internal options to close. His velocity hasn't come back since the D.L. stint, and although he says he feels fine, the results obviously aren't there."Bailey (3-1) spent time on the disabled list in May because of a biceps problem. Joel Hanrahan, Boston's top choice to close, is out for the season after elbow surgery.David Ortiz homered and drove in a tiebreaking run with an eighth-inning single to put Boston up, but Drew Smyly (3-0) replaced Phil Coke for Detroit and prevented any further runs. He struck out four in two innings of relief.RANGERS 4, ATHLETICS 3 Ian Kinsler put Texas ahead for the first time with a two-run single in the seventh inning, and the host Rangers held on for a series-clinching victory.Texas pulled to within a game of the A's, the American League West leaders, by winning three times in the four-game series.Kinsler came to the plate after Leonys Martin hustled for an infield single. With the bases loaded and two outs, Kinsler hit a full-count pitch through the middle of the infield.The game ended when Josh Donaldson was thrown out at the plate trying to score from first on Seth Smith's single to center.TWINS 8, WHITE SOX 4 Chicago starter John Danks allowed a career-worst four home runs, including a two-run shot by Brian Dozier, and host Minnesota finished its first three-game sweep of the season.Oswaldo Arcia homered in the second inning ahead of Dozier. Clete Thomas and Eduardo Escobar hit back-to-back shots in the fourth, sending the White Sox to their seventh defeat in the last eight games. They fell to 5-13 in June and an A.L.-worst 13-27 on the road.Danks (1-4) lasted five innings, giving up 12 hits and 6 runs.ASTROS 7, BREWERS 4 Carlos Pena hit a three-run homer in the 10th inning, giving Houston a victory over visiting Milwaukee.It was a sloppy game that included four errors and six unearned runs.Hector Ambriz (2-4) pitched a scoreless 10th to help Houston take two of three in the series.NATIONALS 5, ROCKIES 1 Jordan Zimmermann pitched eight innings to win his 10th game, Adam LaRoche had three hits, including a two-run triple, and host Washington spoiled Roy Oswalt's return to the majors.Zimmermann (10-3) allowed an unearned run on six hits. He struck out nine and walked one.Oswalt (0-1) went five innings in his Colorado debut, allowing four runs on nine hits. He struck out 11 and did not walk a batter.Oswalt, 35, was signed to a minor-league contract May 2, and he went 3-2 with a 2.16 earned run average in five starts for Class AA Tulsa before being called up.CARDINALS 6, CUBS 1 Lance Lynn earned his 10th victory to tie for the National League lead, Matt Holliday homered and drove in two runs and host St. Louis beat Chicago.Lynn (10-1) allowed a run on three hits in six innings with six strikeouts and has reached double digits in wins before the All-Star break both of his years in the rotation.Wellington Castillo homered leading off the third for the Cubs.PIRATES 5, REDS 3 Pedro Alvarez drove in all of Pittsburgh's runs with a solo homer, a bases-loaded double and a single, leading the visiting Pirates to a victory.By splitting the teams' four-game series, the Pirates remained a half-game behind second-place Cincinnati in the N. L. Central.Against Homer Bailey, Alvarez had a run-scoring single and his 16th homer. After Alfredo Simon (5-3) loaded the bases in the seventh, Alvarez doubled off the left-hander Tony Cingrani to snap a 2-2 tie.The five runs batted in were a season high for a Pirate and one short of Alvarez's career high.
CHICAGO — The best names in the NHL are the ones that never make the roster.Or get used by Mom.Tazer. Little Ball of Hate. The Great One. Sid the Kid. Looch (who also goes by Gino). The Bulin Wall. Kells."There's always someone, or a few guys, that want to call you different things," said Chicago Blackhawks left wing Brandon Saad, dubbed "The ManChild" by his teammates. "I guess it's just part of the camaraderie of the sport and the guys being close. I'm not really sure of the exact science."Anyone who has ever played a sport knows that nicknames are part of the game, a byproduct of both competition and camaraderie. But hockey players have taken it to an art form.From the littlest mite to the NHL's biggest stars, everyone's got a moniker — and usually more than one. Most are simplistic, involving the addition or subtraction of a letter or two. Shorten a last name, tack on an 's' or a 'y' ('ie' also works) and, voila! Instant nickname. Patrice Bergeron becomes "Bergy." Brent Seabrook is "Seabs" or "Seabsy."If a player's last name only has one syllable, just add an 'r' or a 'y' (the 'ie' rule applies here, as well). Patrick Kane is now forever known as "Kaner," while Patrick Sharp, his occasional partner on Chicago's second line, is "Sharpie."And anyone whose last name is Campbell is automatically "Soup" or "Soupy.""Pretty boring," said Boston Bruins center Chris Kelly, who is known as, you guessed it, "Kells." ''I wish we came up with cooler nicknames."But the beauty of the simplicity is in its versatility. It can be applied to almost any name, regardless of nationality.It even works with Bruins left wing Kaspars Daugavins."We call him Doggie," Kelly said.But just as there are exceptions to every grammatical rule, there are some names that defy the conventions of hockey nicknamification. Or lend themselves to some added creativity.Blackhawks right wing Jamal Mayers is "Jammer" — not to be confused with Chicago defenseman Niklas Hjalmarsson, who is "Hammer." Edmonton goalie Nikolai Khabibulin is "The Bulin Wall." Henrik Lundqvist, he of the 2012 Vezina Trophy, seven straight 30-win seasons and Olympic gold medal in 2006, is, simply, King Henrik.Other monikers come about because of something a player does on the ice.Hall of Famer Max Bentley was known as the "Dipsy Doodle Dandy from Delisle" because of his silky-smooth style of evading opponents. Steve Yzerman thought Johan Franzen looked like "a mule" whizzing around the ice as a rookie back in 2005. The nickname stuck. Phoenix enforcer Paul Bissonnette is "BizNasty."And some nicknames just happen.Boston forward Brad Marchand is now called the "Little Ball of Hate," thanks to President Barack Obama. But the nickname originally belonged to Pat Verbeek of the New York Rangers. He got it because teammate Glenn Healy had already dubbed Ray Ferraro the "Big Ball of Hate.""It's just a bunch of guys probably acting a little bit younger than they should and goofing around," said Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews, known as "Tazer" or "Captain Serious."But it's also a nod to hockey's roots, a reminder that no matter how big the NHL becomes, it's not that far removed from its quaint history of small towns and backyard ponds."It goes back to the fact that hockey, more than baseball, for example, was a Canadian frontier game ... and the large majority of players came from small areas," said Stan Fischler, the MSG hockey analyst and leading NHL historian."(The NHL) is a multibillion-dollar industry. But at the same time, it does have a folksy, family feel about it," Fischler said.Indeed, not only does everyone have a nickname, but everyone uses them, too.Imagine LeBron James' teammates calling him "Jamesy" or "Headband." Or Gregg Popovich referring to Tim Duncan as "Duncs."It would never happen.Yet Chicago coach Joel Quenneville routinely refers to his players by their nicknames, and sometimes is the one who comes up with them. The next Blackhawk to call Kane Patrick will be the first."That's part of the beauty part of hockey," Fischler said. "Apart from the intensity on the ice, it's a very friendly sport."AP Sports Writer Jimmy Golen in Boston contributed to this report.
CHICAGO — Patrice Bergeron left the arena in an ambulance. The Bruins headed home on the brink of elimination.Game 5 of the Stanley Cup finals didn't go according to plan for Boston, with Patrick Kane scoring two goals to lift the Chicago Blackhawks to a 3-1 victory and 3-2 series lead on Saturday night.The Bruins must win at home on Monday night to force a seventh game and keep their hopes alive for a second championship in three years."We're going to fight," David Krejci said. "We're going to fight with everything we have and force Game 7."It would help if they had Bergeron. But their top forward's status is in question after he was taken to a hospital in an ambulance with an undisclosed injury.That happened after he skated gingerly off the ice after playing just two shifts in the second period, and coach Claude Julien didn't say much about it afterward.He would not reveal how it happened or any other details. He did say Bergeron "may be in the next game," but brushed aside further questions."Guys, I'm not going there, so anything else but injury here," Julien said. "I'll update you when I have an update. There's nothing more. We can ask a million questions. I don't have any more information than probably you guys do right now."The Bruins don't have much more time, either.What they do have is a history of fighting back when they're close to being knocked out."We've been down this road before," Krejci said. "In past years, we've been missing some key players and other players that (were) at the top. This is the time of the year when other guys are going to step up and you know it's do-or-die for us."They were in several tough spots in 2011, only to keep rallying on the way to the championship.They opened the playoffs that year with back-to-back losses to Montreal but won that series in seven games. In the Stanley Cup finals, they trailed 2-0 and 3-2 before rallying to beat Vancouver for their sixth title.This year, they nearly got knocked off in the first round after jumping out to a 3-1 series lead against Toronto. They dropped the next two games and were down three in the third period in Game 7 before rallying to win that series, and their resolve is being tested again by the Blackhawks."We've been there before and done well in that situation," Julien said. "Right now, our goal is to create a Game 7. And to create a Game 7, we've got to win a Game 6. We've been good at home, and we need to be good at home the next game. It's as simple as that. There's no panic. You're not going to push us away that easy."The problem is the Bruins are facing a team that dominated like no other this season, getting off to a record start on the way to finishing with the most points in the NHL.The Bruins got a solid performance in goal from Tuukka Rask, who had 29 saves coming off a 6-5 overtime loss, but Chicago dictated the tempo, particularly in the second period.That changed down the stretch, even without Bergeron on the ice."It's kind of sad that you had to lose a guy like that to wake the team up and start battling out there," Rask said. "You're in the finals, you play 20 minutes and that's not going to be good enough to get you a hockey game. We have to realize that. Now we're going to have some new bodies, some new lines and everybody needs to put 110 percent in and leave their hearts on the ice."The Bruins looked like they might be building some momentum when Zdeno Chara fired a bullet from the left circle past Corey Crawford's glove to cut the deficit to one early in the third.They nearly tied it with 2:20 left, only to have Crawford stop Jaromir Jagr after the puck careened around in front of the net, and the Blackhawks hung on from there.Now, the Bruins are simply trying to hang on, period."We've been through it before, but it doesn't help to think about what happened in the past," Rask said. "We have to live in the moment. We have to be ready on Monday, get the first win. And Game 7, if that happens, it's going to be up for grabs."
CHICAGO — Patrick Kane and Jonathan Toews are not exactly imposing, their playoff beards about the only thing keeping them from being mistaken for somebody's little brothers.Try telling that to the Boston Bruins and their bruising tandem of Zdeno Chara and Dennis Seidenberg.Chicago's top line made the Bruins pay again Saturday night, with Kane scoring two more goals in a 3-1 victory that puts the Blackhawks one victory away from its second Stanley Cup title in four years. Since Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville tinkered with his top line before Game 4 to reunite his two best players, Kane and Toews have combined for four goals and seven points.And, most important, two wins."I think (Kane) gets excited playing with (Bryan) Bickell and Toews," Quenneville said. "They get excited about that togetherness, and they seem to read off each other. Everybody brings a little bit something different to the party, and they scored two huge goals for us tonight."Whether the star-studded line stays intact for Monday night's potential clincher in Boston isn't certain, however. Toews didn't play at all in the third period, though he stayed on the bench and was badgering Quenneville to give him a shift."We're hopeful he'll be ready next game," Quenneville said. "He wanted to play. We'll see."Kane and Toews are Chicago's version of peanut butter and jelly, a perfect combination that just isn't the same by itself. Drafted a year apart — Toews was the third pick overall in 2006, Kane was first in 2007 — they arrived together for the 2007-08 season and have been the cornerstones of Chicago's rejuvenation. They've already won one Stanley Cup, and began this year helping the Blackhawks set an NHL record for season-opening points."We're different style players, but I think we complement each other very well," Kane said of Toews. "We've played together for six years now. I know we didn't play together very much this year, but throughout times in the past you can look back at those times that we've had success."But with the Blackhawks facing Boston, Quenneville decided to split up his young stars.At 6-foot-9 and 255 pounds, Chara looks like a mountain on the ice — and he's about as impassable. Seidenberg is equally formidable, and Quenneville didn't want them ganging up on his phenoms at the same time and neutralizing them.With no goals from either Kane or Toews in the first three games, the Blackhawks found themselves trailing the Bruins 2-1. Needing a spark, Quenneville put Kane and Toews back together again for Game 4."I think we bring three different styles of play," said Bickell, who has three points in the last two games.Such a simple switch, yet it's turned the series around."Playing with Johnny and Bicks, they create a lot of space, and I've been taking advantage of the space they do make," Kane said. "I think everyone wants to be that guy in big-time games, and I've been lucky enough in a couple to step up."Toews scored his first goal in almost a month — May 25, to be exact — in Game 4, while Kane got his first goal of the series. It was more of the same Saturday, with Kane's quick reflexes putting Boston on the ropes.With 2:33 left in the first period, Johnny Oduya's slapshot hit Seidenberg's stick and shattered the blade. The puck trickled behind Boston goalie Tuukka Rask and Kane scooped it up and tucked it into the net to give Chicago a 1-0 lead.He doubled the score just over five minutes into the second period, getting help from both Toews and Bickell.Bickell picked up a pass from Toews and took a shot from the left side, along the goal line. He got his own rebound and circled around the net, looking like a shark searching for prey. He finally spotted an opening, but the puck caromed off the side of the net.Kane pounced on the rebound, and Rask never had a chance."It's an exciting time," Kane said, "especially when you're scoring in games like this."
CHICAGO — Patrick Kane scored twice as Chicago beat the Boston Bruins 3-1 on Saturday to leave the Blackhawks one win away from clinching the Stanley Cup.The best-of-seven series now shifts to Boston for Game Six on Monday with the Blackhawks holding a 3-2 lead and the Bruins needing a victory to extend the series.Kane scored the only goal in each of the first two periods to put Chicago ahead 2-0 before the Bruins' defenseman Zdeno Chara pulled one back early in the third.Chicago's Dave Bolland, however, ended the threat of overtime as the Bruins desperately pressed for an equalizer and he scored into an empty net with 14 seconds to play.Blackhawks netminder Corey Crawford, who had been criticized for his shaky play in Game Four, was razor sharp making 24 saves.After a rollicking 6-5 shootout in Game Four, the teams returned to the close-checking, punishing style seen earlier in the series and both team's paid a high price losing key players to bone-jarring hits.Boston's Patrice Bergeron, their leading scorer with four goals, exited in the second period and was later taken to hospital with an unspecified injury.Chicago captain Jonathan Toews, who assisted on the Blackhawks first two goals, also did not play in the third period after taking a thundering hit from the Bruins Johnny Boychuk as he cut across the Boston goalmouth.
CHICAGO — Ronny Cedeno's squeeze bunt scored Justin Maxwell with the tiebreaking run in the ninth inning to lead the Houston Astros over the Chicago Cubs 4-3 on Saturday.J.D. Martinez tied the game with a three-run homer in the sixth for Houston.Jose Cisnero (2-0) pitched two scoreless innings for the win, escaping a bases-loaded jam in the eighth. Jose Veras earned his 15th save in 18 chances.Maxwell hit a leadoff double in the ninth against Kevin Gregg (2-1) and moved to third on Matt Dominguez's sacrifice. Cedeno followed with another sacrifice bunt, putting the Astros ahead.Nate Schierholtz hit a solo homer in the fifth to give the Cubs a 3-0 lead. It was his 10th homer this season, setting a career high.Alfonso Soriano reached scoring position in the bottom of the eighth with a double to left field but was called out by second base umpire David Rackley on a pickoff play that drew Chicago manager Dale Sveum out of the dugout for an argument.Replays showed Soriano made it back to the bag before the tag. Ryan Sweeney then hit a single that would have given Soriano a great opportunity to score. Instead, the Cubs loaded the bases before Darwin Barney flied out to end the inning.Chicago starter Travis Wood appeared to be in control after getting a pair of outs to start the sixth inning. But after hard-hit singles by Jose Altuve and Chris Carter, Martinez tied the game with a long home run that cleared the left-field bleachers on its way to Waveland Avenue.Wood had given up just two hits heading into the sixth and looked primed to earn his first victory in his last four starts.Luis Valbuena put the Cubs ahead with a two-run single in the third after a pair of Houston errors.Barney hit a grounder to third that looked like a sure double play, but Dominguez threw high to second. Astros catcher Carlos Corporan compounded the mistake with an errant pickoff attempt that hit second base and ricocheted into shallow left field, allowing both runners to advance.NOTES: The Cubs are 7-3 in interleague play with 10 games remaining. They haven't had a winning record against the American League since 2007 (8-4). ... Jeff Samardzija (4-7, 3.35 ERA) pitches Sunday for Chicago against Jordan Lyles (4-1, 3.22).
The constantly-changing Yankees roster evolved once again on Friday when the team designated infielder Reid Brignac for assignment and recalled infielder Alberto Gonzalez from Class AAA Scranton/Wilkes-Barre.Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said Gonzalez, who had a stint with the team earlier this year, would most likely fill in at shortstop and third base. Girardi also said Jayson Nix and David Adams would get the majority of starts at shortstop and third base, respectively, while the team waited for the injured infielders Alex Rodriguez, Kevin Youkilis and Derek Jeter to return.The Yankees had hoped Brignac would solve their infield bench woes, but in 44 plate appearances he hit only .114 with a .270 on-base plus slugging percentage.Gonzalez's numbers were not much better in the minors. At Scranton, he was hitting .224 with a .587 OPS. In his previous stint with the Yankees, Gonzalez had three hits in nine at bats. He also was called on to pitch on May 15 in a 12-2 blowout loss to the Seattle Mariners."Hopefully he'll bring some offense," Girardi said of Gonzalez. "He's a shortstop that can play anywhere."Gonzalez said he was surprised when he learned of his promotion. It has been a complicated season for him; he played for the Chicago Cubs this season before joining the Yankees, then was designated for assignment in May to make room for Brignac, who was acquired from the Colorado Rockies in a trade."It never feels good to be designated," Gonzalez said. "It's been a bit tiring going through that. I had that happen to me with Chicago, too. I haven't been able to be in one place. But thankfully, I'm back here."ROOKIE GETS FIRST START The recently promoted rookie outfielder Zoilo Almonte was given his first start in place of the slumping Vernon Wells in left field.Girardi said that he was simply giving Wells a day off, but he did not discount the possibility that Almonte could earn more playing time if he performed well in spot duty."Any time you're out there, it's an opportunity," Girardi said.The 24-year-old Almonte has a career .766 OPS in the minors and was hitting .297 with a .369 on-base percentage for Scranton this season. Wells is hitting .102 in 61 plate appearances in June.GRANDERSON BACK Outfielder Curtis Granderson returned to the Yankees clubhouse after having surgery on Thursday to remove pins from his fractured left hand.Granderson, who sustained the fracture on May 25, said it would still be some time before he was able to swing a bat. He is not expected to be activated until at least late July.But Granderson said he expected to begin start his rehabilitation in a therapy pool shortly."I'm assuming that once we get things going, things will go relatively quickly," Granderson said.Granderson will begin his rehabilitation by taking one-handed swings with a small object in the pool. He will then begin to swing a bat one-handed before taking swings with both hands. Then it will be tee and toss before finally taking regular batting practice.Granderson, who started the season on the disabled list because of a fractured right forearm, acknowledged that it has been a difficult season."As soon as something good happens, something bad happens," he said. "But things could be way worse in the grand scheme of things."Despite having to miss extended time this season because of two injuries caused by being struck by pitches, Granderson said he was not going to make any changes at the plate."I'm going to be ready to dig in and go from there," he said. "There's no major adjustments that need to be made for it."
CHICAGO — Blackhawks goaltender Corey Crawford faced a crush of news media at his locker Friday afternoon. He spoke in French to reporters from his native Montreal, and then in English. The topic, no matter the language, was the same: his glove.Chicago won by 6-5 in overtime in Game 4 of the Stanley Cup finals Wednesday, tying the series at two games each. All five of the Bruins' goals beat the usually sure-handed Crawford on his glove side, and the puck whizzing past him to his left became an alarmingly familiar sight. Game 5 is Saturday night at United Center."There were obviously some goals I wasn't too happy with." Crawford said. "I don't think I was as sharp as I was in the other games."Crawford entered Game 4 as a contender for the Conn Smythe Trophy, awarded to the most valuable player of the N.H.L.'s postseason. He had posted a 1.9 goals against average and a .936 save percentage. He was even mentioned as a leading candidate to be the top goaltender on the Canadian team in next year's Olympics.Wednesday was a different story. Perhaps no shot was more perplexing than Patrice Bergeron's goal that tied the score at 4-4 early in the third period. Bergeron fired a one-timer at Crawford, who reached up with his glove as the puck sailed under it."There's such a focus on that glove now," said the former goaltender Chico Resch, who played 14 seasons in the N.H.L. and is now an announcer for the Devils. "I'm watching and I'm thinking, if they keep shooting at his glove, there's no way Chicago can win."He added, "If this were baseball, I'd score three of the five goals as errors."Blackhawks Coach Joel Quenneville expressed confidence in Crawford on Thursday, promising there would be no change in net despite the backup Ray Emery's 17-1 record in the regular season.Crawford appeared in good spirits Friday, saying that a five-goal game would have left him devastated when he played in juniors, but not at this stage of his career. At 28 and with three full N.H.L. seasons under his belt, he has the experience and maturity to harden him against drastic emotional swings. He said that he would watch film Friday evening and Saturday to see if there were any adjustments to make, but that he would not allow himself to be overburdened by thoughts of his glove."I can't start thinking about that, because you get in trouble if you start to think they're going to shoot glove," Crawford said. "As a goalie, you never want to be thinking out there. You just want to read and react."What Crawford would find in his video sessions, Resch said, was that his technique failed him. The key to a glove save, Resch explained, is making the pocket of the glove as large as possible to catch the puck. Crawford had his glove facing down for too long, instead of out toward the shots."He would wait until the last minute to turn his wrist," Resch said. "He needs to get his glove prepared earlier."Resch also suggested that because Crawford has been so effective on his blocker side, he could position his body six or seven inches to the left in his crease and protect the glove side with more of his body. But he added, "You don't want to be off balance if they come back to the blocker."John Garrett, an All-Star goalie in the 1980s and now an analyst in Western Canada, mentioned flaws in Crawford's shoulders and feet and said that he was leaning too far forward in his crouch."You want to be square to the shots and have quiet feet," Garrett said. "Crawford wasn't."Garrett, though, also said that the fixes to the technique were small and that he expected Crawford and his goalie coach to make them."It's not like his whole game broke down," Garrett said. "He only has to fix the glove."More than anything else working in Crawford's favor, at least psychologically, is that his team won. "It's huge," Crawford said when asked about the difference between bouncing back from a difficult game after a victory compared with a loss.In Game 5, though, there will again be a lot of eyes and pucks aimed at his glove."Corey's going to have a talk to his glove," Resch said. "He and that glove are going to have to come to some agreement."
CHICAGO — Patrick Sharp was a young center in the Philadelphia Flyers' organization when he got a lesson from Hall of Famer Bobby Clarke on taking faceoffs. Clarke played 15 seasons in the NHL and won two Stanley Cups, so Sharp listened intently.He carries the heart of the message with him to this day."The biggest thing he told me was, 'Get in there, get low and just battle and not be afraid to get dirty,'" said Sharp, now a wing for the Chicago Blackhawks. "Sometimes you get thinking about what the other guy's doing and what you want to do at the faceoff dot and sometimes the best way is just get in there and compete for that puck."That competition has taken on added significance in this year's Stanley Cup finals, with the evenly matched Blackhawks and Boston Bruins vying for the title. There are stars all over the ice, so every draw can lead to another opportunity for a gifted scorer to pick up a crucial goal."Faceoffs are critical, especially at this point in the season," Bruins defenseman Torey Krug said. "The more times you can start with the puck than not obviously boosts your team."You want to have first crack at playing with the puck, especially a team like them, they like to play with the puck a lot more rather than dump the puck in. It's important."Faceoffs played a huge role when Boston beat Chicago 2-0 in Game 3 to take a 2-1 advantage in the series. The Bruins won a whopping 40 of the 56 draws in the victory, including six of seven when they were on the power play or short-handed. The disparity was a factor in limiting the Blackhawks to just 28 shots on goal.Chicago gradually turned it around in each of the next two games, winning 39 of 77 faceoffs on Wednesday night and 33 of 57 in Game 5. The improved performance on the draws helped the Blackhawks to two victories that moved them within one win of their second Stanley Cup title in four years."I thought we were much more effective than in the prior game," Chicago coach Joel Quenneville said before Saturday night's 3-1 win. "They got better as the game went on. I just think starting with the puck is key. I think having it against this team is important."When you're at a disadvantage, that big of a variance, you're definitely against it, and I think especially in the big faceoffs, the critical ones, especially starting special teams plays a huge importance."Chicago and Boston each has one of the best centers in the league when it comes to winning faceoffs. Bruins star Patrice Bergeron had an NHL-best 62.1 percent faceoff winning percentage this season, and Blackhawks captain Jonathan Toews was second at 59.9 percent.While the natural talent for Bergeron and Toews is a factor in their success, there's so much more that goes into winning faceoffs, especially in the playoffs. It's about practice, scouting and the effort by the other players on the ice. The linesman that drops the puck also is important."Everyone's got to be competitive and hungry to get the puck," Toews said. "At the end of the day a lot of bounces can go the wrong way but I think if you're working hard and you're ready for it you're going to get more draws."The preparation starts with scouting and video work. The players and coaches examine past faceoffs to look for tendencies in opposing players and also where their own technique can improve."Every series when you play against the same guys for a few games, there are some tendencies that you learn," said Bergeron, who missed much of Game 5 with an injury. "You try to, I guess, counter and I'm sure they're doing the same things."Sometimes, some of the things you've been doing have not been working as well and you try to tweak some things and talk to your centermen as the series progresses."There's also plenty of gamesmanship when it comes to the linesman dropping the puck. It's up to the official to conduct a fair faceoff while the centers jockey for position and any little advantage they can find."They have a tough job, because there is a certain protocol that you're supposed to follow to take a faceoff and both teams, you want to cheat as much as you can and you're not afraid to get thrown out because a lot of guys can take draws," Sharp said. "It's like a three-way responsibility, both teams and the refs as well."While statistics show how well each team did on the draws and which players did well against other players, not all faceoffs are created equal.The importance of winning the draw depends on the location and the situation in the game. Faceoffs on special teams are crucial, because a successful one allows a team to set up its power play or can help it kill off a man-advantage situation for its opponent.In the NHL, it's more about which faceoffs you win than how many."At the end of the day you try to win it whenever the ref tries to throw the puck down," Sharp said. "You want that puck."
CHICAGO — A dozen slices of wheat bread and two plates of quartered oranges sat untouched on a table in the middle of the Boston locker room, fortifications for an overtime period that never came.In one corner of the room, attendants piled sticks into equipment bags as fast as they could. In the other, Bruins defensemen Zdeno Chara impatiently kept climbing off a table before the trainer massaging his sore right thigh was done. The team bus was already idling in a loading dock nearby.After a decisive 3-1 win by the Blackhawks on Saturday night in Game 5 of the Stanley Cup Finals, the Bruins apparently couldn't get out of town fast enough. Whether they'll make it back to Chicago for Game 7 rests on the slim hope that they'll be able to generate more offense than they managed in the third period, or the rest of the series for that matter."We had some momentum there," Boston goaltender Tukka Rask said afterward. "We just ran out of time."More troubling, though, the Bruins are down 3-2 and fast running out of options.Coach Claude Julien's plans to slow the high-flying Blackhawks and win another slugfest, the way the Bruins hemmed in and outhit the similarly offensive-minded Penguins, is in need of serious adjustment. It has been since the Blackhawks rolled out to a 3-1 lead in Game 4 three nights ago, forcing the Bruins to chase the game and leave more and more space open behind them to the opportunistic Chicago attackers."That's not our game," Rask said. "We don't want to take too many chances. We got desperate out there."The Blackhawks' last goal in this one was an empty-netter with 14 seconds left. They began that final period ahead 2-0, and didn't look flustered, relying on persistent forechecking and packing in the defense, even after Chara closed the gap with a short slap shot from the left face-off circle nearly four minutes in that beat goalie Corey Crawford — where else? — up on the glove side.So if all you heard was the score from this one, after watching the four previous games — there were 18 goals combined in the two that Chicago won, but just five in Boston's two wins — you would have bet the Bruins won. They're a defensive-minded bunch who don't give up goals and score just enough. But at the moment, they can't quite manage either trick.Making matters worse, center Patrice Bergeron was taken to a hospital for observation after playing just 49 seconds of the middle period, and there were no updates on his condition after the game. Bergeron is tied with David Krejci for the team lead in goals with nine, but that only covers half his value. He was edged out by Chicago's Jonathan Toews for this season's Selke Trophy, awarded to the league's best defensive forward, so his absence could spell double-trouble come Monday night."I feel we had some pretty decent chances, but I believe with Bergie in the lineup, I believe we would have gotten that second goal," Krejci said. "I think we were pretty close a couple of times. It's sad to see him go down. I don't know how he feels right now. I don't know if he'll be back next game or not, but we definitely missed him in the third.""We've got to do everything," Krejci added a moment later, "to get the first goal in Game 6."That likely won't come easily for Chicago, either, since Toews sat the entire third period on the bench after getting hammered by Chara. The Bruins have been mugging him throughout the series and the league's unwritten rule about not discussing injuries — anything above the waist, including a concussion, is described with the catch-all phrase "upper-body injury" — leaves Toews' status in question as well.But the Hawks might be the deepest team in the NHL across the front line and coach Joel Quenneville has plenty of scorers ready to step into Toews' slot with the first line. Andrew Shaw moved up to claim the centerman's place alongside Patrick Kane and Bryan Bickell and the offense barely lost a stride. Quenneville, in fact, seemed less worried about Chicago's ability to attack than he did getting a Toews-caliber commitment from all of his forwards to bottle up Boston behind their own blue line.Shaw, a rookie, doesn't have the numbers or trophies Toews does, but it's clear he's already bought into the idea of following the captain's lead. Asked whether this game had "broken" the Bruins, he shut the question down almost before it was complete."You can't say that," he said. "They're a great team. We saw what they did in the Toronto series, coming back in that last game. We know they'll push to the end."The Bruins erased a 4-1 deficit with 11 minutes left in Game 7 against the Maple Leafs and advanced. But Chicago is in a different class. The Blackhawks are more skilled, shift vs. shift, than anybody they've run into all season long, and as Rask pointed out, they punish teams that open up the ice trying to play catch-up.There's little Julien can do to change that balance of power, beyond coaxing even more effort from a team that's already on the back foot — and has been there before during the postseason."Right now our goal is to create a Game ... It's as simple as that. Again, there is no panic. You're not going to push us away that easily. We're a committed group," he said finally, "and we plan on bouncing back."Jim Litke is a national sports columnist for The Associated Press. Write to him at jlitke@ap.org and follow him at Twitter.com/JimLitke.
CHICAGO — Five things learned in the Chicago Blackhawks 3-1 win over the Boston Bruins in Game 5 of the Stanley Cup finals on Saturday night:STANLEY IS WAITING: The Chicago streets aren't being shut down for a victory party just yet, but don't blame city officials if they've already started planning the parade. After looking as lively as road kill in Game 3, the Blackhawks have bounced back behind the reconfigured line of Jonathan Toews, Patrick Kane and Bryan Bickell. Four goals in two games, 10 points and, in the most important stat of all, two wins after Saturday night's commanding 3-1 win. Now it's Boston that reeks of desperation. The Bruins were no match for Chicago's speed and skill in Game 5, and resorted to hits — big, cheap and otherwise — to try and keep it close. Expect more of the same in Game 6 on Monday night in Boston, but expect an inspired effort from the Blackhawks, too. "It's going to be exciting," Bickell said. "One win from the ultimate goal when you're a kid, to win the cup. ... It's going to be a hard task going to Boston. Hopefully we can finish it up then and not come back here."NOT SO FAST: Sure, it sounds good for players to say they're not discouraged and they still think they've got a chance. But the Bruins have the record to prove it. This, after all, is a team that was down 4-1 to Toronto with 11 minutes left in Game 7 in the first round of the playoffs. We all know how that one ended. Nathan Horton, Milan Lucic and Patrice Bergeron scored to tie it up, and Bergeron scored the game winner in overtime. And the last time the Bruins won the Stanley Cup? Yep. They fell behind Vancouver 3-2 in 2011, only to come back and win the last two games. "We're just going to worry about Game 6," David Krejci said. "We're not going to give them anything easily. If they want to win the cup, they're going to have to fight for it because we're going to be ready."BERGERON'S STATUS: Boston's hopes of forcing a Game 7 may very well rest with Patrice Bergeron. Which is not exactly encouraging considering the Bruins assistant captain was admitted to a Chicago hospital for observation in the third period Saturday night. The Bruins aren't saying what's wrong with Bergeron or how the injury happened, let alone predict whether the Selke Trophy finalist will be able to play Monday. But if coach Claude Julien's prickliness is any indication, it doesn't look good. "I'm not going there, so anything else but injury here," Julien said after getting a third straight question about Bergeron's status. "I'll update you when I have an update. There's nothing more. We can ask a million questions. I don't have any more information than probably you guys do right now."FITS LIKE A GLOVE: The "Kick Me" sign is off Corey Crawford's back for at least a day. Despite having his team one win from the Stanley Cup title, Crawford continues to be the source of great angst in Chicago. He gives up soft goals. He's vulnerable on his glove side. He's bland. And what's wrong with giving Ray Emery a shot, anyway? (Emery was 17-1 during the regular season.) Yet Crawford keeps doing his thing — and doing it quite well, thank you. Yes, Zdeno Chara scored Boston's lone goal on Crawford's glove side. But it was one goal! Tuukka Rask, who has been elevated almost to Martin Brodeur status during the playoffs, has been playing more like Martin Short, giving up eight goals — EIGHT! — in the last two games alone.POWER OUTAGE: The Boston Bruins did not have a single power play in Game 5. That may not be a big deal for the Blackhawks, whose power play is worse than that of some pee-wee teams. But the man-advantage has been big for the Bruins, who have scored four of their 13 goals in this series on power plays.
CHICAGO — The Chicago Blackhawks moved to within a win of clinching the Stanley Cup on Saturday beating the Boston Bruins 3-1 in a bone-jarring contest that cost both team key players.The best-of-seven series now shifts to Boston for Game Six on Monday with the Blackhawks holding a 3-2 lead and the Bruins needing a victory to extend the series."It's do or die," Boston coach Claude Julien told reporters. "Right now our goal is to create a Game Seven and to create a Game Seven you've got to win Game Six."It's as simple as that."There is no panic. You're not going to push us away that easily."After a rollicking 6-5 shootout in Game Four, the teams returned to the close-checking, punishing style seen earlier in the series and both team's paid the price.Patrice Bergeron, Boston's leading scorer with four goals, exited early in the second period and was later taken to hospital with an unspecified injury.The Blackhawks were not immune from the wreckage with captain Jonathan Toews, who assisted on Chicago's first two goals, not playing the third period after taking a thundering hit from Bruins Johnny Boychuk as he cut across the Boston goalmouth.Chicago coach Joel Quenneville would not elaborate on the injury describing the problem as an "upper-body injury" but said he was hopeful his captain could play in Boston"It's been a war. It's been a battle," said Quenneville. "It's every game, every shift you're fighting."You look at every minute from Game One to where we're at today, it's been an amazing series and relentless hockey and I commend the guys on both teams for leaving it out on the ice."The injuries overshadowed brilliant efforts from Chicago forward Patrick Kane and netminder Corey Crawford, who had been criticized for his shaky play in Game Four.Searching for more scoring Quenneville had reshuffled his lines for Game Four reuniting Toews and Kane with Bryan Bickell and the trio produced instant chemistry scoring twice.The line continued to produce magic on Saturday with an opportunistic Kane notching the first two goals."Sometimes you catch some breaks," said Kane. "I think I was in the right spot at the right time tonight on both goals."Playing with Johnny and Bicks, they create a lot of space and I've been taking advantage of the space they do make."I think everyone wants to be that guy in big-time games and I've been lucky enough in a couple to step up."Boston came out playing with desperation in the third period and pulled one back when Zdeno Chara blasted a shot from the left faceoff circle past Crawford.But that would be the only puck to get past Crawford as Dave Bolland ended the threat of overtime scoring into an empty net with 14 seconds to play."I'm not really listening to it (criticism). I have a job to do," said Crawford. "Whatever is being said doesn't really affect what I'm going to do on the ice."It's going to be another tough game, and we've got to prepare ourselves to play that tough game again."
CHICAGO — Ryan Sweeney had a career-high six RBIs, including a three-run homer, and the Chicago Cubs routed the Houston Astros 14-6 on Sunday.The center fielder drove in runs in each of his first four at-bats, capping the stretch with his longball to right-center field. He also had two doubles and a run-scoring grounder in the second inning.Chicago first baseman Anthony Rizzo added a two-run home run and finished 3 for 3 with four runs scored and four RBIs.Chicago scored its runs and had its most hits (16) this season. All nine starters reached base for the Cubs. The Cubs' outburst helped erase a pair of errors from shortstop Starlin Castro, who now leads the majors with 14 errors this season.Starting pitcher Jeff Samardzija (5-7) won his second straight, with five strikeouts and no walks. It was his first start without yielding a walk this season. Houston pitcher Jordan Lyles (4-2) lost for the first time since May 12.Houston first baseman Chris Carter finished with a career-high three doubles among his four hits. He drove in two runs and scored twice.Chicago pulled away in the fifth inning with consecutive hits by Alfonso Soriano, Rizzo and Sweeney. Each scored to give Chicago an 8-3 lead. Soriano hit his first triple of the season and Rizzo then hit a looping single to shallow center field. Sweeney's double sent Houston center fielder Justin Maxwell sprinting toward the warning track and the ball bounced off his glove. Rizzo beat the relay throw to home plate. Second baseman Darwin Barney added a two-out RBI single to score Sweeney.Houston second baseman Jose Altuve tried sparking a rally for the second straight day, this time leading off the fourth with a single. Jason Castro followed with a double and Altuve scored on J.D. Martinez's groundout.Carter had a run-scoring double to center field and Castro scored on Castro's first error, a wild throw on a routine grounder by Matt Dominguez.Chicago jumped out to a 5-0 lead in the bottom of the third inning. Samardzija started the inning with a single and the cubs loaded the bases on an error by shortstop Marwin Gonzalez and a walk. Nate Schierholtz hit a two-run single to get the scoring started. Rizzo followed with a sacrifice fly to right field and Sweeney doubled in two more runs.NOTES: The Cubs are expected to make a roster move, possibly adding a position player, before Tuesday's game against the Brewers. The Cubs currently have 13 pitchers. . Cubs manager Dale Sveum watched the Chicago Blackhawks' victory over the Boston Bruins in Game 5 of the Stanley Cup Finals on Saturday night. He said if he could live another life he would be a hockey player. "It's such a true sport," Sveum said. "You can't do anything but play hard the whole game. It's OK to be physical. It's OK to fight." . Houston center fielder Maxwell hit in the leadoff position for the first time this season.
CHICAGO — There is something about important games that brings out the best in Patrick Kane, the Blackhawks ' star wing with the magic touch. In 2010, he scored the overtime goal in Philadelphia that ended Chicago's 49-year Stanley Cup drought. In the conference finals this year, his hat trick in Game 5 eliminated the Los Angeles Kings.On Saturday night — six years after Chicago made him the No. 1 overall pick in the N.H.L. entry draft — Kane's pair of goals propelled the Blackhawks to a 3-1 victory against the Boston Bruins and gave them a three-games-to-two lead in the Stanley Cup finals.After the game, Kane stood at center ice, his helmet off and his mullet exposed, straining to speak over the roaring United Center crowd."One more win," he said as the fans cheered even louder.Kane now has 9 goals and 19 points in the playoffs, tops on the Blackhawks. He leads the Blackhawks in scoring in the Stanley Cup finals with 5 points. He also led the team in the 2010 finals against the Flyers with 8 points in 6 games.Patrick Sharp said about his teammate Kane: "I still remember when he got drafted, I was watching on TV. I remember him sitting at the desk on TV saying he was going to show up and make the team out of training camp, and I got a good chuckle out of that. Little did I know he'd win rookie of the year, and he's improved every season."In the first three games of this series, Coach Joel Quenneville baffled onlookers by splitting up Kane and his longtime forward-line partner, Jonathan Toews. The Blackhawks trailed the Bruins by two games to one."Maybe it looks like I didn't know what I was doing," Quenneville said after Game 4, when the reunited Kane and Toews each scored a goal in the Blackhawks' 6-5 overtime victory.Now Quenneville's belated move seems like the turning point of the series. But Toews, Chicago's captain and one of the best two-way centers in hockey, may not be able to play at all.Toews stayed on the bench throughout the third period. He was struck high by a hard, unpenalized check from Bruins defenseman Johnny Boychuk in the second period. After the game, Quenneville declined to specify the nature of Toews's injury beyond calling it "upper body.""It's been a war — it's been a battle," Quenneville said of both the game and the series.Patrice Bergeron, also a top two-way center, sustained what appeared to be an even worse injury.Bergeron was taken to a Chicago hospital for observation with an undisclosed injury after skating only two shifts in the second period, the second one lasting only 16 seconds. An ambulance with Bergeron inside was seen leaving the rink before the second intermission.Now the series shifts to Boston on Monday night, when the Bruins will try to stave off elimination and force a Game 7.They do so knowing that the Blackhawks beat them Saturday by sticking to their game plan of generating speed through the neutral zone. Chicago attempted 55 shots to Boston's 49, giving the Blackhawks the advantage in that category in every game of the series. Over all, the Blackhawks have tried 377 shots to the Bruins' 293 — a measure of how much more they have had the puck.On Saturday, the Bruins leveled plenty of hits — 53 to the Blackhawks' 22 — but deviated from one crucial element of their own game plan.The Bruins inexplicably failed to test Chicago goalie Corey Crawford, who surrendered five goals in Game 4, all over or under his glove hand. Nine of the Bruins' 12 goals in the first four games of the series came against Crawford's glove.Yet on Saturday they did not send a shot to his glove hand until two minutes into the third period.Defenseman Zdeno Chara beat Crawford on the Bruins' second shot to his glove side, a slap shot from 36 feet at 3 minutes 40 seconds of the third period. It reduced the Boston's deficit to 2-1. But the Bruins did not manage another shot to Crawford's shaky glove side the rest of the night.The Bruins swarmed the Chicago net in the final minutes, but the Blackhawks' Dave Bolland shot into an empty net with 14 seconds left in regulation. Bruins defenseman Torey Krug was tripped by Chicago forward Michael Frolik moments before, allowing Bolland to get to the puck, but neither referee called the penalty.In shots on goal, the Blackhawks outperformed the Bruins by 31-25. Tuukka Rask finished with 29 saves; Crawford finished with 24.Kane's first goal, which opened the scoring at 17:27 of the first period, came after Johnny Oduya's shot struck a Bruins stick and fell right to Kane, who was open at the side of the net.Kane made the score 2-0 at 5:13 of the second. The other wing on the line, Bryan Bickell, charged in around Seidenberg, shot the puck off the side of the net, gathered the rebound and fed it to Kane. Chara was caught between Bickell and Kane, and could only watch as Kane roofed a backhander over Rask.Chara finished minus-2 on the night. He was minus-3 in the Bruins' Game 4 defeat.After the game, Kane was asked if he remembered his overtime goal that won the Cup for Chicago in 2010. He described it, and how he was the only one in the building who saw it go in and how he broke into a celebration before anybody else knew what was going on."It was a great moment," he said. "I think it's exciting to be back in that situation again. This is what you work for all year, all summer, when you're training throughout the year at training camp, whatever it may be. This is what you work for, this opportunity. We've got to seize the moment and take advantage of it."Kane and the Blackhawks will soon have their chance to take advantage of their moment.
Zack Greinke allowed one run over eight sharp innings, Adrian Gonzalez ended a wild Edinson Volquez no-hit bid with a homer in the sixth and the Los Angeles Dodgers beat the San Diego Padres , 6-1, on Saturday night.In his first game in San Diego since breaking his collarbone in a brawl with Carlos Quentin, Greinke had a season-high eight strikeouts. He allowed four hits and pitched to two batters more than the minimum through seven innings in his longest outing of the season.Volquez, the San Diego starter, did not allow a hit until Gonzalez, a former Padres first baseman, led off the sixth with his ninth home run. But the right-handed Volquez allowed a run in the fifth on three walks and a fielder's choice by Skip Schumaker.ROCKIES 7, NATIONALS 1 Jhoulys Chacin pitched seven shutout innings and drove in a run, and Colorado snapped its season-high five-game skid by beating host Washington.Colorado's Michael Cuddyer extended his hitting streak to 20 games, the longest active streak in the majors.BREWERS 2, BRAVES 0 Francisco Rodriguez earned his 300th career save, finishing off Milwaukee's second straight 2-0 victory over visiting Atlanta.Donovan Hand, making his first big-league start, allowed two hits in four and two-thirds innings for Milwaukee. He struck out three and walked one in helping to extend Atlanta's scoreless streak to 24 innings.GIANTS 2, MARLINS 1 Hector Sanchez singled home the winning run with one out in the 11th inning, and San Francisco snapped a nine-game home losing streak to the Marlins.Giants right fielder Hunter Pence made a diving catch to rob Placido Polanco of a likely go-ahead single to end the 11th as Miami left runners on first and second in back-to-back innings. DIAMONDBACKS 4, REDS 3 Jason Kubel hit a two-run single in the bottom of the ninth inning to rally Arizona past Aroldis Chapman and visiting Cincinnati for the Diamondbacks' fourth straight win.Arizona's Paul Goldschmidt singled to lead off the bottom of the ninth before Chapman issued two consecutive walks. Kubel singled over second base for his third career game-ending hit.RANGERS 4, CARDINALS 2 Nelson Cruz got the decisive hit for the second straight game with a two-run homer in the third inning, and Martin Perez prevailed in a matchup of rookie starters as Texas beat host St. Louis.ASTROS 4, CUBS 3 Ronny Cedeno's squeeze bunt drove in Justin Maxwell for the tiebreaking run in the ninth inning to lead visiting Houston over Chicago.J. D. Martinez tied the game with a three-run homer in the sixth for Houston.BLUE JAYS 4, ORIOLES 2 Jose Bautista hit a tiebreaking home run in the eighth inning, and host Toronto won its 10th straight game.Toronto is on its longest winning streak since a 10-game run late in 2008. The Blue Jays, who are 14-4 this month, are one victory from matching the franchise record. Toronto had 11-game streaks in 1987 and 1998.TIGERS 10, RED SOX 3 Max Scherzer won his 11th straight decision to start the season, and Victor Martinez hit a first-inning grand slam to lead host Detroit over Boston.Scherzer allowed two runs in the first, including a towering solo homer by David Ortiz, but Martinez's drive put the Tigers ahead to stay.INDIANS 8, TWINS 7 Michael Bourn had three hits and three R.B.I. to help Corey Kluber win his third consecutive start as host Cleveland won its fourth straight.Cleveland took advantage of five first-inning walks to score six runs. Jason Kipnis added three hits to pace the Indians, who are 8-2 since losing eight in a row.WHITE SOX 3, ROYALS 2 Alejandro De Aza drove in Jordan Danks with a sacrifice fly in the ninth inning, sending Chicago to a victory over host Kansas City.Jesse Crain got through a shaky eighth inning for the White Sox, putting a runner on third with one out and then leaving him there.
CHICAGO — While sitting at the Chicago Blackhawks ' hotel before Game 4 of the Stanley Cup finals on Wednesday night, defenseman Brent Seabrook turned to the team captain Jonathan Toews and asked what he was thinking. Toews, who had one goal in 20 postseason games, replied: "Nothing. What are you thinking about?" Seabrook gave him a glare. Toews changed his answer."I snapped back and said, 'Scoring goals,' " Toews said Thursday.Before Game 4, Toews's only postseason goal had come in Game 5 of the conference semifinals against the Detroit Red Wings. But he broke through in the second period Wednesday.Parked in front of the net, Toews got a stick on a slap shot by Michal Rozsival, and the puck dribbled off Bruins goaltender Tuukka Rask and in for a 2-1 lead. It was far from elegant, but it was a goal. The Blackhawks went on to win 6-5 in overtime."Just wanted a lucky one, and that was it," Toews said. "It doesn't make much sense when you see a puck going off your stick from the point and you seeing it go in can kind of liberate you as a player and help you play the rest of the game."Seabrook said of his tough-love pep talk to Toews: "He's got to score goals for us. It wasn't about the little things that he does. It wasn't about his leadership that he brings. I just thought that maybe he needed to start thinking about scoring goals."Toews was not the only Chicago star to break through in a back-and-forth game that featured a breakneck pace. Two minutes after Toews scored, Patrick Kane scooped up a rebound and elevated a backhand shot over a prone Rask. It was Kane's first goal of the series as well.Kane and Toews are the Blackhawks' most potent offensive players, each scoring 23 goals during the regular season. During Chicago's 2010 run to the Stanley Cup, they combined for 17 postseason goals. Entering Game 4, they were far short of that output at seven. And three of the goals came in one contest, Game 5 of the Western Conference finals, when Kane had a hat trick.Boston's defense made sure the trend continued, bottling up both for the first three games of the series. Neither registered a point in Chicago's 4-3 victory in Game 1, and then the Bruins clamped down on the Blackhawks' offense, allowing only one goal over the next two games."As an offensive player, that's what you want to do," Kane said of scoring. "What you're supposed to do on the ice is produce."Added Toews: "You try and do the little things right, but at a certain point it's not enough. You're considered an offensive player, key player on your team. You've got to find a way to do something."The rejuvenation of Kane and Toews came after Coach Joel Quenneville placed them on the same line. They were usually not linemates during the regular season, but when Chicago faced a three games to one deficit in the conference semifinals to the Red Wings, Quenneville paired his two best offensive weapons together. At times during the conference finals against the Los Angeles Kings, he did it again.But against the Bruins the thought was to separate them and give one a chance to skate without Boston's 6-foot-9 defenseman Zdeno Chara on the ice. That strategy did not pay dividends, and with his team down a game against the Bruins, Quenneville opted for a line of Toews, Kane and Bryan Bickell, a bruising 6-foot-4, 230-pound forward."I need to be physical, give them open ice, give them time, get in front," Bickell said. "To see those guys score, I know it sparks the bench and definitely the team."Quenneville said simply: "I like that line."The Bruins can expect another dose of it Saturday night.
GLENVIEW, Ill. — Craig Stadler birdied four of the first six holes Sunday, then hung on to win the Encompass Championship by one stroke over Fred Couples by sinking a par-saving 12-foot putt on the final hole.Stadler's eight years and almost nine months between victories is the longest stretch in Champions Tour history. J.C. Snead had gone almost seven years between titles from 1995 to 2002.Stadler shot 1-under-par 71 at North Shore Country Club to finish at 13-under 203. Couples' final-round 66 put him at 12 under, but he bogeyed the final hole.Mark O'Meara, Bernhard Langer, David Frost and Jeff Sluman were among seven players tied for third at 205.The 60-year-old Stadler held a five-stroke lead on Couples at the turn after birdieing the first, second, fifth and sixth holes. He appeared to be cruising to victory until stumbling beginning at the ninth. Bogeys at the 12th, 14th and 15th followed, but after hitting his approach into a greenside bunker on the 18th, he recovered to 12 feet and sank the curling putt for victory.Couples birdied his first three holes, going out in 5-under 31, but had gained only one stroke on Stadler at the turn. He got up within a stroke of the lead until that bogey at the par-4 18th.O'Meara birdied the par-3 17th to jump to 11 under and finished with a68. Langer, among the first-round leaders, posted a 69, while Frost bogeyed the final hole to score 70 for his 205. Sluman squandered birdie chances down the stretch en route to a 71.Stadler hadn't scored an individual top-10 since tying for seventh in last year's 3M Championship. Working with teacher Billy Harmon beginning three months ago helped bring Stadler's game back to championship level."I missed every putt on the back nine and finally made one that counted," Stadler said.Stadler began to diminish his lead on the par-4 ninth when his approach flew over the green and he stubbed the subsequent chip shot. He two-putted from 12 feet for bogey.As Couples birdied the 11th and 14th to jump to 13 under, Stadler was missing three straight fairways and sliding to 14 under. But Couples failed to convert birdie chances on three late holes, then bogeyed the 18th from the middle of the fairway."I just kind of shanked it," Couples said of his wedge approach into a bunker. "It was really a bad swing on as easy a shot as you'll ever have."Final-round charges by Langer and Mark Calcavecchia brought them closer to Stadler, but not so close that they threatened the lead. Calcavecchia was 12 under with four holes to play, but bogeyed three of the last four holes to finish tied for 10th.
(Reuters) - The Chicago Blackhawks won the Stanley Cup championship on Monday by beating the Boston Bruins in the National Hockey League's (NHL) best-of-seven championship final.* Founded in 1926, the Blackhawks are one of the "Original Six" teams that made up the league before the first expansion in 1967. The others were the Boston Bruins, Detroit Red Wings, Montreal Canadiens, New York Rangers and Toronto Maple Leafs.* The Blackhawks currently play in the Central division of the Western Conference.* They have won 15 divisional titles and three conference championships (1992, 2010 and 2013).* Chicago have won the Stanley Cup five times (1934, 1938, 1961, 2010 and 2013).* After winning the championship in 1961, the Blackhawks lost five Stanley Cup Finals (1962, 1965, 1971, 1973 and 1992) until their triumph in 2010.* The Blackhawks (36-7-5) won the Central this season and were ranked first overall in the Western Conference. The also won the Presidents' Trophy for scoring the most points in the NHL.* After cruising by the Minnesota Wild 4-1 in the first round of the playoffs, Chicago faced elimination in the conference semi-finals before winning three straight over Detroit to prevail in overtime of the decisive seventh game. In the conference final, they beat the defending Stanley Cup champion Los Angeles Kings with a double overtime win in Game Five.* The Blackhawks' head coach is 54-year-old Canadian Joel Quenneville, a former NHL defenseman who joined the team in 2008 after coaching St. Louis and Colorado.* The captain is Canadian center Jonathan Toews. He has been selected to the NHL All Star Game twice. He won the Conn Smythe Trophy as the most valuable player in the 2010 Stanley Cup playoffs when the Blackhawks won their last title. He has also won Olympic gold and world championship gold medals.
BOSTON — The Chicago Blackhawks stunned the Boston Bruins with a pair of late goals in a series-clinching 3-2 victory on Monday for their second National Hockey League (NHL) title in four seasons.Trailing by a goal with 76 seconds remaining, Chicago scored twice in a dramatic 17-second span to clinch the best-of-seven series 4-2 for the franchise's fifth overall title.Boston, chasing a second Stanley Cup championship in three seasons, looked headed to a seventh and deciding game when they led 2-1 before the visitors struck twice.Bryan Bickell tied the game with a tap in from the side of net moments before Dave Bolland sealed the Cup for Chicago in front of a stunned Boston crowd.While it was anything but hockey weather with temperatures soaring to 95 degrees Fahrenheit (35 Celsius) in Boston, the city was caught in the grips of hockey fever with the Bruins facing a must-win game to force a winner-take-all showdown.With the Stanley Cup in the TD Center and the champagne on ice, it was all hands on deck with Chicago captain Jonathan Toews and Bruins alternate captain and top faceoff man Patrice Bergeron back on the ice after missing the end of previous game with undisclosed injuries.Boston had snatched the early lead when Chris Kelly scored the only goal of the opening period but the Blackhawks dominated the rest of the first Stanley Cup final between Original Six teams since 1979.Jonathan Toews, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy for the most valuable player when Chicago last won the Stanley Cup in 2010, tied the game with a goal in the second period.Boston regained the lead briefly in the final period when Milan Lucic scored but the celebrations were cut short by Chicago's stunning rally.Chicago's Patrick Kane, who led his team with 19 points during the postseason, was awarded the Conn Smythe Trophy as the most valuable player of the playoffs.
CHICAGO — Since 1980, the basketball team at DePaul University , the largest Roman Catholic college in the United States, has played its home games in the suburb of Rosemont, Ill., at a nondescript and, lately, mostly empty arena.For several years, DePaul, which is in the leafy Lincoln Park neighborhood on the North Side and a member of the Big East, has declared its interest in moving back to the city to try to recapture its glory days, when the team was a national powerhouse in the 1970s and '80s.In May, Mayor Rahm Emanuel and the university announced a proposal for a 10,000 seat, $173 million arena near McCormick Place, a convention center along the lakefront south of downtown. DePaul and the quasi-government agency that runs McCormick Place would chip in $70 million each for the publicly owned venture. The city's tab would be $33 million, and that has created a bit of a stir.The unveiling of the plan, which came six days before the Board of Education voted to close 50 public schools because of a $1 billion deficit and underutilization issues, has troubled some."This project could not be worse for human priorities," said Bob Fioretti, the alderman of the ward that would house the arena. "We can't afford neighborhood schools, but we can bankroll an unnecessary basketball arena for a private university?"Since the deal was announced and an accompanying bill was passed by the Illinois Senate and House, a report from Crain's Chicago Business detailed DePaul basketball's attendance woes. Estimates that the new arena would be a moneymaker sooner rather than later were pegged to DePaul's announced crowds of about 8,000 a game, but the actual numbers were closer to 2,600, according to the report. (DePaul is 7-83 in conference play over the last five years.)"School closings were a real horror for people," said Karen Lewis, the president of the Chicago Teachers Union, who noted that most of them were on the South and West Sides. "And here is another project for the central business district. There are other parts of town, and we don't have any plans for them."The city counters that calling the project only an investment in a basketball arena is shortsighted and incomplete. DePaul represents one piece of a $1.1 billion investment to boost tourism, a plan that includes adding amenities to McCormick Place, which has lost convention business to cities like Orlando and Las Vegas, and sprucing up Navy Pier, the state's No. 1 tourist attraction, which is just north of downtown.The arena is part of a goal to revitalize the South Loop neighborhood, and the project includes two hotels, new restaurants and areas for entertainment, and potentially a casino.The arena would be an events center for concerts and conventions when DePaul is not playing, and the university has agreed to pay rent at $25,000 a game for men's home dates and $7,500 for women's games.DePaul's $70 million investment was needed, Tom Alexander, a city spokesman, said, because it would ensure that construction at Navy Pier and McCormick Place could proceed in tandem. "This is really a facility the entire city can use," he said. "DePaul is helping facilitate it."Then there are the 10,000 construction and 3,800 permanent jobs that it would create, by the city's math. The unemployment rate in the Chicago metro area is more than 9 percent."I would be safe to assume any city in the country would love to have these jobs and these types of announcements," said Jorge Ramirez, the president of the Chicago Federation of Labor.He added, "Tax dollars that come in from convention and tourism can be spent anywhere in the city, and should be."The city declined to address the timing of the announcement but said in a statement that its "challenges are equal in urgency and priority."Still, the public financing remains a sticking point for critics. The teachers union says that the $33 million promised by the city, which comes from a complex method called tax increment financing, might otherwise be spent on education and other city functions (the figure reaches $55 million when the next-door hotel is included). Alexander called that charge "utterly wrong."In addition to the round of school closings, school budgets are expected to be cut next year, and that, too, puzzles some observers. "We're told there's no money, and suddenly there's money for this," said Allen Sanderson, an economics professor at the University of Chicago. "It's a mixed message."Sanderson also alluded to the long-rumored casino as the elephant in the room. "If that's the ultimate plan, I'd like to know about it," he said.The city is acquiring the land for the arena and hotel. Once a deal is reached, the City Council will vote whether to approve it."I wish the best for DePaul," Fioretti said. "I would love to see them go back to having a good basketball team. But I don't understand this, and neither do my constituents."
CHICAGO — The Boston Bruins ' captain, Zdeno Chara, is the tallest player in the N.H.L., and maybe the meanest, his reputation as intimidating as his 6-foot-9 frame. In the Eastern Conference finals, he delivered a punch to the chin of the Pittsburgh Penguins' Sidney Crosby , who had recently returned from a monthlong absence after jaw surgery . The Quebec government once held a criminal investigation into a hit he made on Max Pacioretty of the Montreal Canadiens.Chara, 36, is also perhaps the premier defensive force in the N.H.L. He was awarded the Norris Trophy as the league's top defender in 2009, and two years later, he helped Boston win the Stanley Cup.He is a reliable workhorse; the last time he averaged fewer than 22 minutes of ice time was in 1998-99, when he was 21 and playing for the Islanders.Before the Stanley Cup finals began, Chicago Blackhawks players spoke of Chara's ability and strength as the leader of a defense that had allowed only two goals by the high-flying Penguins in a four-game sweep. His size, reach, knack for bullying and his ever-looming presence made him a force in front of the Boston net, they said.Chicago, in deference to Chara, put its top forwards, Jonathan Toews and Patrick Kane, on different lines in an effort to give one a Chara-free matchup. The Bruins won two of the first three games and shut out the Blackhawks in Game 3 in Boston.In Game 4, Chicago changed course. Toews and Kane were paired with Bryan Bickell, a big and physical forward, though he still gave up five inches to Chara. The Blackhawks also took a different tack with Chara, engaging him rather than running from him. Bickell was particularly aggressive, and Chicago's offense roared to life.Chara was on the ice for five of Chicago's six goals and finished with a minus-3 differential, his worst in a game since January. Between Games 4 and 5, Toews brazenly suggested he and his teammates had a blueprint for neutralizing him."He's not a guy that we should be afraid of," Toews said. "We should go at him."Bruins Coach Claude Julien responded, "If that's what they think, then they should try it again."The Blackhawks were indeed at it again in Game 5 on Saturday night in Chicago, challenging and frustrating Chara in a 3-1 win that put them on the cusp of winning the Stanley Cup. The series returns to Boston for Game 6 on Monday night.On Chicago's first two goals, both scored by Kane, Chara was on the ice and in arm's length of Kane.The first came in the opening period on a deflected shot from Johnny Oduya that broke the stick of Boston's Dennis Seidenberg before bouncing past goaltender Tuukka Rask. As Kane stuffed the puck into the net, Chara watched from across the crease.Chara played a more central role in the Blackhawks' next goal. In the second period, Bickell skated behind the net and slipped a pass right by him to a cutting Kane. Chara waved helplessly at Kane with his stick while Kane buried a backhanded shot in the top of the net."He covers a lot of areas, so you don't see that too often," Bickell said. "He's an elite defenseman in this league, but we've been getting our chances and capitalizing."Chara had a moment of redemption when he blasted a perfectly placed one-timer past the glove of Corey Crawford in the third period to cut the deficit to a goal, but the Bruins did not get any closer. Chara was later on the ice for Dave Bolland's empty-net goal in the final seconds, finishing with a minus-2 differential. He had not been minus-5 in back-to-back games since February of last season.After the game, Chara met with reporters in the Boston locker room. He was curt and then surly.Asked about being on the ice for so many goals, Chara replied, "That's not normal, but it just happens they've been scoring some goals."Pressed on whether he had an explanation, he responded, "I'm not here to talk about myself."Chara is averaging nearly 30 minutes of ice time in the playoffs, the most of any player to advance past the first round. He has now been on the ice for eight of the last nine goals given up by the Bruins.The Blackhawks like the new math, a byproduct, they say, of their new attitude."There is a fine line between respectful and being overly respectful," defenseman Duncan Keith said.
CHICAGO — The Chicago Blackhawks brought the Stanley Cup home Tuesday and proceeded to take it on a pub crawl, with scores of ecstatic fans flocking to taverns and restaurants in hopes of catching a glimpse of their beloved players and the sacred trophy awarded to the NHL champion.Many fans, bleary eyed from staying up the night before to watch Game 6, looked to the skies for TV news helicopters that would alert them they were on the right track. Others set themselves up at bars, hoping the rumors from friends or Twitter might turn out to be true."We've been packed since 7 this morning." said Brad Tice, general manager of The Pony on Chicago's North Side. "In 2010 (the last time the Blackhawks won the cup) it came here, and players hang out here and live in the neighborhood, so everyone is hoping it will show up."In suburban Oak Brook, fans descended on a restaurant said to be a favorite spot of Blackhawks coach Joel Quenneville. By midafternoon, the cup hadn't shown up at either spot.The trophy that turns into a drinking buddy once it is awarded to the National Hockey League champions had already put in a pretty full day. Though it hadn't made it to the runway of a strip club or the bottom of a swimming pool — just two of the many places that players have taken it over the years — it did make the rounds, stopping at two restaurants and the United Center, where the Blackhawks play, and a downtown steakhouse."I'm shaking, that was so cool," said 21-year-old Anne Fernandez after she reached out and touched the cup as Blackhawks President and CEO John McDonough pulled it out of a black SUV in front of Phil Stefani's restaurant and held it aloft as so many players had on the ice in Boston the night before after their series-clinching win over the Bruins.Fernandez showed up after a rumor showed up on Twitter, while others got their tips from friends — though nobody knew where this intelligence was coming from."I got an email that said if I wanted to see the cup to be at 437 (the address of the steakhouse) in 15 minutes," said Carrie Williams, a 28-year-old magazine editor, who did not know how the emailer got that information.At about 4 a.m., the jet carrying the players and the Cup touched down at O'Hare International Airport, where they received a water cannon salute from about a dozen fire trucks and police cars, all with their lights flashing.Veteran forward Michal Handzus was the first player to emerge from the aircraft shortly after 4 a.m., hoisting the 35-pound cup above his head with both hands and shaking it several times. Guests, police officers and firemen cheered at the bottom of the stairs. Players, coaches and team officials mingled with the crowd for about 10 minutes before heading for the city to continue the party that began in Chicago shortly after the team stunned Boston by scoring twice in a 17-second span during the final 1:16 of the game.There was a stop at a Harry Caray's restaurant in Rosemont — the same first stop the Blackhawks made after winning the championship in 2010. There were more than 1,000 fans waiting, and players took turns hoisting the cup over their heads to screams of excitement.The Scout bar in the South Loop area of downtown was the next stop, as team members greeted cheering fans outside with high-fives before filing into the bar."My (5-year-old) son stayed up to watch the game but I told him he could go over there if it was packed and we looked outside and it was packed so we went," said Ekta Joshi after she and her son, Kabir, went over to cheer the players. Because she and her husband know people who work there, she was one of the lucky few to be allowed inside, where they met some players and the coach."He got a few autographs on his hat and I'm sure he's showing it off at school now," Joshi said.After that stop, the cup made it out to the United Center. There were rumors that it was on the move and, in fact, McDonough's driver at the steakhouse said earlier in the day when he drove off — without the cup — he saw in his rearview mirror TV news trucks that obviously thought he had it.
The Stanley Cup is back in the city of big shoulders and short memories, delivered by a Chicago team that featured neither.The Blackhawks started the lockout-shortened NHL season so fast, they were the team to beat for months. But they still couldn't outmuscle anybody. They were all about speed and skill, advantages that get squeezed tighter, round by round, in the defensive vise of the postseason.They had to find another way to play with 1:30 left Monday night in Boston, when goalie Corey Crawford headed for the bench to bring on another attacker. Turns out the Blackhawks do desperation well, too."That's kind of the way you had to score this whole series," coach Joel Quenneville said after Bryan Bickell and Dave Bolland banged in a pair of gritty goals during a 17-second span to stun the Bruins.Yet even after Bolland's putback of a rebound — off the goal post, no less — slipped by sprawling Bruins goalie Tuukka Rask, there were still 59 seconds left on the clock."An eternity," Patrick Kane, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy as playoff MVP, called it."Things were happening so fast," recalled winger Patrick Sharp, "I looked up at the clock and knew it was going to be the longest minute of the season."Better a minute like that one than all the minutes Blackhawks fans ignored just five short years ago. It wasn't that long, after all, that the current toast of the town was just toast.Toews, 25, and Kane, 24, came along in 2006 and 2007, when the Blackhawks were already beginning their bounce back from the bottom. Just a few years before that, the Blackhawks were roundly derided as the worst franchise in pro sports. At 32, Sharp is one of the longest-serving veterans of the team's core. He's made it a point not to let anybody in the locker room forget that.After Chicago's 3-1 victory in Game 5, Sharp sat at his cubicle exhausted and stories rolled out about the bad old days."We'd get, maybe 10,000 fans, and in our building that felt like empty. I could pick friends of mine out in the crowd. Some nights, they'd have their own section," he laughed."We used to have business cards with a website address and we'd tell people, 'Go there and you'd get two free tickets.' People wouldn't even take the cards!"The 2004-05 lockout hurt hockey, but the rule changes that opened up the game helped the Hawks.Then-general manager Dale Tallon finally quit pursuing draft picks and free agents with wide bodies and narrow skill sets. Suddenly, guys like Sharp and slick-passing defensemen Duncan Keith and Brent Seabrook had targets up ice with the imagination and ability to finish plays.Except at first, nobody noticed. A decade or so of continuing futility — in a city where the gold standard is the Cubs at a century and counting — kept all but the hardcore fans away.Tight-fisted owner William "Dollar Bill" Wirtz stubbornly kept games off TV, and drove off legacy names like Bobby Hull and Stan Mikita. Then Wirtz died in September 2007 following a brief battle with cancer and the bitterness spilled out in one sweeping gesture.During a moment of silence for Wirtz at the home opener, the crowd responded with boos. The Hawks made the postseason after a six-season hiatus, but those fans who chose self-exile only grudgingly began trickling back. It wasn't until Wirtz' son, Rocky, was in control for a full season — putting the games back on TV, bringing guys like Hull and Mikita back as ambassadors and putting up statues outside the United Center — that all was forgiven, and then some.Average attendance jumped 7,000 seats by the end of the 2008-09 season. The product on the ice was reflected in the fast-climbing value of the franchise. The season after that brought the team's fourth Stanley Cup title, giving one of the NHL's "Original Six" some recent history worth boasting about.The realities of the salary cap, though, dictated what happened next. The Blackhawks had to unload or choose not to resign nine players on that team, electing instead to lock up Toews, Kane, Keith and a handful of others.They got ambushed in their first postseason outings the next two years — something the Blackhawks remembered when they were down 3-1 in a series against Detroit in an earlier round, and again against Boston as the clock ticked down the final few seconds."You win it once and you think you're going right back to the Stanley Cup finals the next year after that," Toews said. "Two first-round exits for us last couple years will make you realize how tough it is to get here."The Blackhawks have become the first team to win a second Stanley Cup in the salary-cap age, a bit of smart spending that would have pleased old man Wirtz. And they did it as the last team standing from a final four that featured the last four cup winners, playing wide open or gritty as each game or each shift demanded.As talk of a third Cup and even the dreaded "dynasty" began making the rounds, Quenneville put up his hand and asked for a moment where he didn't have to recall what was behind or worry about what was ahead."I'm going to enjoy this one first," he said, "and have fun with it. And then we'll talk about that one."Jim Litke is a national sports columnist for The Associated Press. Write to him at jlitke@ap.org and follow him at Twitter.com/JimLitke.
BOSTON — Five things learned in the Chicago Blackhawks' 3-2 win over the Boston Bruins in Game 6 of the Stanley Cup Finals, clinching the series 4-2 on Monday night:PARTY ON: It appeared to be over. The Bruins had a 2-1 lead with 2 minutes left, and the Stanley Cup was all but packed away for a Game 7 back in Chicago. But then Bryan Bickell tied it with 1:16 left, and Dave Bolland scored 17 seconds later to give the Blackhawks the lead. Sure enough, the Stanley Cup was headed to Chicago on Monday night — only it was traveling on the Blackhawks' team plane. It turns out the NHL's second-highest scoring team in the regular season had one more brilliant burst left. It's the second championship in four years for Chicago and No. 5 overall, and it sure looks as if it's going to be quite the party this week in the Windy City. Fans filled the streets of Chicago after the victory, and there were honking car horns blaring well into the night.SWEET HOME — Home is for parades. The Blackhawks will take The Cup wherever they can get their hands on it, and their last three titles came in a Game 6 on the road. Chicago won in overtime at Philadelphia to decide the 2010 finals, ending a 49-year drought since it last won in 1961 — also clinched in Game 6 on the road with a 5-1 win at Detroit. And the 2013 Stanley Cup champions are still built around young talent like Patrick Kane, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy as the playoff MVP. "We thought we were going home for Game 7," Kane said. "You still think you're going to overtime and you're going to try to win it there, then Bolly scores a huge goal 17 seconds later. "It feels like the last 58 seconds were an eternity." There were also plenty of red jerseys in the arena and crowding the glass during the postgame celebration.OUCH — Boston forward Patrice Bergeron knows how to play through pain. After gingerly skating off in his last shift of Game 5, then being taken to the hospital with a mystery injury, Bergeron fessed up after Game 6 about what exactly was wrong with him. And it was not another concussion. It was a list of other areas: a broken rib, torn cartilage and muscles and a separated shoulder. "It's Stanley Cup Final. Everyone's banged up. Everyone wants to help the team and obviously I couldn't do that in Game 5," Bergeron said. "It was mostly because they were worried about my spleen being hurt, so that's why we had to go to the hospital. But everything was fine so it was just the ribs, and the muscles, and the soft tissue."NEXT — The fifth Stanley Cup in Blackhawks history tied Chicago with Edmonton for fifth on the franchise list of most titles. Boston is next with six, Detroit is third with 11 and Toronto stands at No. 2 with 13 Cups. And all would need a double-figure run of consecutive titles to catch all-time leader Montreal, which has won 23.NO GOALS FOR JAGR — What may have been the final NHL playoffs for 41-year-old Jaromir Jagr ended without a goal. Boston's trade-deadline acquisition had 10 assists, but did not score a goal for the Bruins in any of the four rounds. Jagr made his playoff debut with Pittsburgh in 1991, winning the first of back-to-back Stanley Cup titles, and his 199 career playoff points are fifth all-time.
BOSTON — From a spectacular start to a stunning finish, the Chicago Blackhawks put a shine on a tainted National Hockey League season, lifting the Stanley Cup in dramatic fashion on Monday to become the toast of the Windy City.The Blackhawks ended a bruising and riveting battle with the Boston Bruins in dramatic style, scoring twice in the final 76 seconds to steal what seemed an improbable 3-2 victory and take the best-of-seven Final 4-2 over their Original Six rival.With two Stanley Cups in four years, the Blackhawks can claim bragging rights over Chicago's other major sports teams and return home to be feted with the traditional victory parade through the city."It was that type of season where we did a lot of good things," Chicago coach Joel Quenneville told reporters. "I commend the competitiveness and the perseverance of our team, especially the way things ended today."It was that type of season, and it was special."After a bitter labor dispute was settled and the season finally began after a four month delay, the Blackhawks burst out of the starting blocks with a record 24 game unbeaten run and would spend the entire abbreviated 48 game regular season at the top of the Western division.But the road to the Stanley Cup does not come without a few bumps.After easing past the Minnesota Wild in five games in the opening round the Blackhawks were forced to conjure up a miraculous escape in the conference semi-finals, needing a Game Seven overtime winner from Brent Seabrook to see off the Detroit Red Wings."It was a great season, a lot of good things," said Quenneville. "We went through losing basically half a team, even more so, coming in the last couple years."The highs and the lows that we experienced throughout this playoffs, I guess the disparity is as high as you could see."Being down three games against Detroit, on the ropes, life or death situation didn't look very promising, finding a way that definitely gave us a boost."I thought we had a great LA series and a great finish."The final hurdle Chicago had to face on their way to the Final was defending champion Los Angeles Kings and the Blackhawks cleared that with ease ending their reign in five games.But the Blackhawks saved their best for last, battling the Big Bad Bruins in pulsating Final that featured three overtime games, including one that required three extra periods to decide a winner."There's been so many amazing games this playoff series that are very memorable," said Quenneville. "Those endings and the last three rounds is as remarkable endings as you'll ever see."I thought we played some very meaningful games through that stretch, particularly later where we learned what it was like playing on big stages because everybody seemed to approach it like a Game Seven."The highs and lows of this playoff round, we got tested against some good teams in the Western Conference, and then we might have saw the best team we saw all year in this round."
BOSTON — Chicago Blackhawks winger Patrick Kane was awarded the Conn Smythe Trophy as the most valuable player of the Stanley Cup playoffs after helping his team to the National Hockey League championship on Monday.The 24-year-old American was presented with the trophy after Chicago rallied in the final minutes to beat the Boston Bruins 3-2 and clinch the best-of-seven series 4-2.Kane was Chicago's leading point scorer during the playoffs with 19 points from 23 games, including nine goals, but said he felt lucky to win the award, insisting his teammates did all the real work."We actually came up with a name for myself this morning, calling me the 'Benefish,' for the beneficiary of all their hard work," he told a news conference."I had a couple chances to finish and ended up doing that, so got to give them the credit."Despite his reluctance to take credit for his achievements, Kane's star has been rising for years.A native of Buffalo, New York, he was drafted first overall in 2007 after an outstanding junior career and was named the NHL's rookie of the year in 2008.He won a silver medal with the American team at the 2010 Vancouver Winter Olympics then his first Stanley Cup with Chicago later that same year, scoring the championship-clinching goal in overtime against the Philadelphia Flyers."I think there's something about our core. Hopefully we can stay together a long time because that's two Cups in four years, and we seem to only be getting better and better," he said."It's unbelievable to be in this situation."It's just a great group and it's going to be fun to celebrate with them."Kane paid a special tribute to Chicago captain Jonathan Toews, who won the Conn Smythe trophy in 2010, and played in Monday's Game Six despite saying he had his "bell rung" in the previous game."He's a great player. He's played big in a lot of big games," Kane said. "That's really all you can say about Jonathan Toews is he's a competitor. He leads the team in the right way and we all follow."
BOSTON — A National Hockey League season that nearly never was will be remembered as one of the greatest after the Chicago Blackhawks stunned the Boston Bruins on Monday for their second Stanley Cup in four years.A labor dispute that delayed the start of the season by four months was all but forgotten when the best-of-seven Stanley Cup Final came to a close with a wild Game Six that saw Chicago score 17 seconds apart in the final 76 seconds for a 3-2 win.For Chicago, it was their third consecutive win and ended a season that began with the team setting an NHL record by going on a remarkable run in which they earned at least one point in their first 24 games."It was one of those seasons we were saying, we're almost charmed the way we started the season and the way we ended," Chicago coach Joel Quenneville told reporters. "Nobody saw that one coming either way."A lot of great things in between, some great challenges in this playoff series or this playoff round, and then let alone the other three (series)."But it was one of those seasons, fairytale ending and an amazing season."While it was a fairy tale finish for the Blackhawks, it was a nightmare end to the season for Boston.Bruins fans had believed the series was headed back to the Madhouse on Madison in Chicago for a winner-take-all Game Seven after Milan Lucic scored late in the third period to put the Bruins ahead 2-1.But with the TD Garden in full party mode, the Blackhawks staged an improbable rally that is sure to go down as one of the most spectacular comebacks in a Stanley Cup clinching game.With Chicago goalie Corey Crawford pulled in favor of an extra attacker, Bryan Bickell tied the game with a tap in from the side of net moments before Dave Bolland crushed Boston's Cup dreams when he drove a loose puck into the Bruins goal.As the final seconds ticked off the clock Blackhawks players poured off the team bench and tossed their sticks and gloves into the air as the arena fell silent.By the time the Blackhawks paraded the treasured silver mug around the ice it was to a mostly deserted arena as Bruins fans had no interest in watching their Original Six rival celebrate.While it was anything but hockey weather with temperatures soaring to 95 degrees Fahrenheit (35 Celsius), Boston had been caught in the grips of hockey fever with the Bruins facing a do-or-die moment needing a victory to extend the series.With the Stanley Cup in the TD Garden and champagne on ice, it was all hands on deck for with Chicago captain Jonathan Toews and Bruins top faceoff man Patrice Bergeron on the ice after missing the end the previous game with undisclosed injuries.For many of the players who took part in the traditional hand shake at the end of the game, they were not so much winners as survivors of a punishing playoffs marathon that featured four hugely entertaining but bone-jarring best-of-seven series.Toews was among the wounded, admitting afterwards that he had his bell rung in Game Five while Bergeron soldiered on despite a separated shoulder and damaged ribs.The Conn Smythe Trophy winner the last time the Blackhawks won the Cup in 2010, Toews was fit enough to tie the game after Chris Kelly had given Boston a 1-0 first period lead."Since the start of the Stanley Cup, we had some injuries," admitted Boston coach Claude Julien. "It's hard to keep guys out."They want to play through it and some guys were able to do that."But playing hurt is part of it, and our guys did that, and that's why I said earlier you've got to be extremely proud of those guys."
BOSTON — They got the start they envisioned — the first time in the series that the Boston Bruins dominated the first period. They got the game's first goal, a pretty play by Tyler Seguin, converted by Chris Kelly into an open net less than eight minutes into the game. That was another boost for a team on the precipice.The momentum and adrenaline of that first 20 minutes, in which the Bruins outshot the Blackhawks, 12-6, won 17 of 24 face-offs and outhit the visitors, 16-13, could only last so long. The only question as the game wore on and the Blackhawks got their skating legs was: would the Bruins have enough left at the end to force a Game 7?Had the game been 58 minutes instead of 60, they would be on their way to Chicago today. Instead, they are still trying to dissect a most uncharacteristic and fatal breakdown in the final 76 seconds, which led to two Chicago goals within 17 seconds and a 3-2 defeat. The Blackhawks won the series in six games."It's a cruel feeling," Bruins defenseman Andrew Ference said in a somber locker room. "Especially given the effort that everyone put forth. It's really sickening. You feel helpless."The Bruins seemed to be in control, despite unmistakable slippage in the second period and the third period, when Milan Lucic scored with 7 minutes 49 seconds remaining on a typical, bruising, Lucic effort, forcing the play in back and then controlling it in front for a swipe past goalie Corey Crawford.In a defensive, low-scoring game, this goal looked as if it would stand up, especially when the Bruins killed off a penalty to Kelly and headed into the final minutes nursing the lead as Chicago pulled its goalie.Goalie Tuukka Rask appeared to be on his game despite surrendering a second-period goal to Jonathan Toews. But the same kind of comeback that started the Bruins on their playoff run — the late two-goal rally to force overtime in Game 7 against Toronto — was instead replicated by the Blackhawks in front of a stunned TD Garden crowd, which included a large contingent of Chicago fans.Bryan Bickell converted a Toews pass with the Blackhawks using an extra attacker with 1:16 remaining to tie the game. It was his first goal of the series after he scored eight in the first 22 games. Then, as everyone was awaiting and expecting overtime, Dave Bolland rapped home a Johnny Oduya rebound with 59 seconds to play for the game and Cup winner."We did it to Toronto, so I guess we got a taste of our own medicine," said Rask, who weathered 31 shots, 16 in the third period.The Bruins had their chances. They failed to convert on four power-play opportunities. Zdeno Chara and David Krejci missed late scoring chances. The Bruins had injury issues as well. Jaromir Jagr left with an injury, and then returned, only to leave again, playing just 6:27 seconds and only nine shifts.Patrice Bergeron revealed that he separated his shoulder during the game — and that was after breaking a rib and tearing cartilage in Game 5, necessitating a trip to a hospital.He gamely soldiered on, playing 24 shifts covering nearly 18 minutes, but he was clearly laboring. Whatever pain he still felt after the game, he said, was not nearly as bad as watching the Blackhawks celebrate in Boston's building."It's tough to put into words," Bergeron said. "To work so hard to get to this point, you feel you're right there, Game 7. It hurts. Give Chicago credit, but it hurts to see them raise the Cup."
BOSTON — The Chicago Blackhawks pulled off perhaps the most improbable comeback in the history of the Stanley Cup finals on Monday night. Trailing the Boston Bruins, 2-1, with 76 seconds left, the Blackhawks erupted for two goals 17 seconds apart to stun the Bruins, 3-2, and win their second Cup in the last four seasons."This goal, this ending — nobody saw it coming," said Blackhawks Coach Joel Quennville, after a finish that strained credulity. So sudden and late was Chicago's rally that even the Blackhawks themselves seemed not to believe what they had just seen.Milan Lucic put the Bruins ahead, 2-1, with 7 minutes 49 seconds left in regulation, seemingly forcing a Game 7 in Chicago on Wednesday.But then lightning struck. With 1:16 left, Bryan Bickell finished a feed from Jonathan Toews, knocking the puck past Boston goaltender Tuukka Rask and tying the score at 2-2. With 59 seconds to go, Dave Bolland beat the sprawling Rask after a rebound off the goal post, and just like that, the Blackhawks were ahead."How can you call that?" Toews said, beaming, in the moments after victory. "We knew we needed just one bounce there. Obviously, that was a big goal for them to go up 2-1. But you never know what can happen, so you don't stop playing until the end."Moments later, Toews was lifting the Stanley Cup over his head in triumph, the first Blackhawks captain in the club's 87-year history to win it twice."These are the feelings you live for," said his teammate, Patrick Kane.Bolland's goal was the latest Stanley Cup-winning goal scored in regulation time, breaking the mark set in 1929, when Boston's Bill Carson scored to win the Cup with 1:58 left in the deciding game against the Rangers.The Blackhawks also became the first club to win a Stanley Cup-clinching game in regulation by overcoming a deficit in the final two minutes.On the Bruins side, shock mingled with dejection."It's a tough way to lose, tough way to lose a game, tough way to lose a series," said Zdeno Chara, the Bruins' towering 6-foot-9 defenseman. Chara was especially glum. He had been on the ice for 10 of the Blackhawks' last 12 goals in the series, although not Bolland's Cup winner.Bolland, a third-line center, was surprisingly blasé about what he had done."I could always imagine the season ending this way," he said, a sentiment that was as credulity-straining as the goal he scored. He was asked the difference between winning the Stanley Cup this season and in 2010."What's the difference?" he said. "Nothing."Bolland and Bickell's goals ended this classic, almost unbearably tense series, in which three games went to overtime and every game was razor close. Kane was voted the winner of the Conn Smythe Trophy as the playoffs' most valuable player, becoming the third straight American to receive the honor. He had 9 goals and 10 assists in the postseason.It was the Blackhawks' fifth championship, joining their triumphs in 1934, 1938, 1961 and 2010.Chicago trailed, 1-0, and did not mount a real threat until Toews, motoring at full speed after an undisclosed injury that knocked him out of Game 5 on Saturday, scored at 4:24 of the second period.In Game 6, players dropped left and right as they put everything on the line with the Cup at stake. Bruins center Patrice Bergeron played a full game despite a series of injuries that did not become known until after the game.Blackhawks forward Andrew Shaw played despite taking a hard shot to the face; later he carried the Cup around the ice while bleeding through his stitches. Blackhawks defenseman Niklas Hjalmarsson left for a short time after blocking a shot. Bruins forward Jaromir Jagr was rattled by a check from Bolland and missed most of the second period. Chicago's Marian Hossa and Boston's Nathan Horton played on through nagging injuries, as they have throughout this series.
CHICAGO — New York Mets manager Terry Collins said top prospect Zack Wheeler is tipping his breaking pitches.Collins said in his pregame media session Wednesday the Mets noticed the flaw in Wheeler's motion during his second big league start a night earlier. Wheeler allowed four runs in 5 1-3 innings against the Chicago White Sox."We saw it. We tried to address it during the game a little bit," Collins said.The 23-year-old right-hander is scheduled to start again Sunday, and Collins says pitching coach Dan Warthen will work with Wheeler during a bullpen session Thursday."Guys look for it all the time. It starts with the glove," said Collins. "Moving the glove there's different things to look for and then all of sudden you start to look when he speeds up, when he slows down, what the pitches are. You start to get a read on it."Collins said he's talking publicly about it because the problem was so obvious he received about 10 text messages and emails alerting him to the issue."This is going to get out as a scouting report, but he's been tipping his off-speed stuff more than his fastball," Collins said. "We've got to fix it. We'll fix it tomorrow."Collins said Wheeler was also tipping is pitches in his debut, when he tossed six shutout innings."It shows you what kind of stuff he's got," said Collins.A 23-year-old right-hander, Wheeler was selected by San Francisco with the sixth overall pick of the 2009 amateur draft and was obtained by the Mets two years ago in the trade that sent All-Star outfielder Carlos Beltran to the Giants.
CHICAGO — After Zack Wheeler's first start last week, the Mets were cataloging all the exciting things they had seen. After his second one Tuesday night, they were listing the things they hoped to see him improve upon.Wheeler, a 23-year-old rookie right-hander, struggled to his control his fastball Tuesday night and failed to make it through the sixth inning. The Mets, meanwhile, wasted a surprising ninth-inning comeback and watched the White Sox celebrate a 5-4 walk-off win.Asked to compare his second start with his first, when he pitched six scoreless innings against the Atlanta Braves, Wheeler was blunt: "Bad," he said. "I didn't throw a lot of strikes, and when I did, they were bad strikes. The balls were up. The only thing I really had working for me was my curveball today."Such will be the process ahead for Wheeler, who could be a mainstay for years to come, assuming he grows each outing, good or bad.He pitched five and a third innings, allowing four runs, four hits and three walks, and struck out one batter. He threw a wild pitch and hit a batter during the White Sox' fifth-inning rally."Everybody goes over some bumps," Wheeler said. "I've been struggling with my command lately, and you really can't do that up here, so I've got a lot of work to do."The Mets showed late life, entering the ninth behind one run, tying the game on a bizarre play that unfurled as the final out hovered above the infield. Addison Reed induced a two-out pop-up from the pinch-hitter Daniel Murphy. But as David Wright sprinted home from second, three White Sox players converged before the mound. Second baseman Gordon Beckham made an attempt to catch the ball, but only after he bumped into Reed, and it glanced off his glove, extending the game.The play immediately invoked the infamous 2009 flub by Luis Castillo at Yankee Stadium, where he dropped a two-out popup by Alex Rodriguez that allowed the Yankees to score two runs to win in the bottom of the ninth.But the Mets lost this time, too, when the White Sox struck right back in the bottom of the inning against LaTroy Hawkins. Jeff Keppinger hit a leadoff single up the middle.  After an error by Hawkins, a fielder's choice and popout, Alexei Ramirez ripped a single down the left-field line, sending fireworks exploding.It was disheartening for the Mets, who arrived on a small high after having won their last two series, against the Braves and Phillies. Manager Terry Collins said Dan Warthen, the pitching coach, was already cataloging things for Wheeler to work on before his next scheduled start, Sunday at Citi Field. It included sharpening his slider, adjusting his arm angles, and possibly adding a slide step when men are on base."But you've got to like what you see," Collins added. "Gosh, he's got a live arm."Wheeler was overshadowed by the left-hander Chris Sale, who struck out 13 and allowed 4 hits over eight solid innings.The Mets jumped ahead against Sale, showing verve on the basepaths. Eric Young Jr. doubled to open the game, stole third base and was soon sliding headfirst into home to score on a shallow sacrifice fly. Later that inning, Wright walked, stole second and scored from there when Josh Satin rolled a soft single to center.Thunder clattered and lighting flashed through the game beyond the stadium's eastern end, above Lake Michigan, but the rain never intensified. Wheeler meanwhile worked briskly, picking up a rhythm but often dropping it, his fastball sailing high from his hand.Wheeler allowed an infield single to Alejandro De Aza to begin his outing, and De Aza advanced around the bases to score on a stolen base and two straight groundouts. Two innings later, Wheeler hung a slider to Tyler Flowers, the No. 9 hitter, who blasted it over the center-field wall, an estimated 392 feet from home plate, to tie the score at 2-2.Sale retired 10 straight Mets at one point, racking up nine strikeouts through the first four innings. But Andrew Brown, the designated hitter, broke the streak and put his team ahead, 3-2, when he lifted a solo home run to right field to start the fifth.But Wheeler surrendered the lead during a wild fifth. He allowed a single and hit a batter to start the inning and then bounced a wild pitch to put the runners on second and third. The White Sox pushed them across on a groundout and sacrifice fly to go ahead, 4-3.It was a rocky start for Wheeler, one that provided a lengthy to-do list for the future.The Mets traded outfielder Collin Cowgill to the Los Angeles Angels on Tuesday for Kyle Johnson, a 23-year-old minor league outfielder. Cowgill, 27, who played 23 games for the Mets this year and batted .180, was designated for assignment June 18. Johnson will start out in Class A.
The Baltimore Orioles have come to expect home runs from Chris Davis, who delivered a much-needed clout in the seventh inning of a tight game against the Cleveland Indians . What happened next came as a surprise.The light-hitting Alexi Casilla capped a five-run seventh with a three-run homer, and the Orioles broke a four-game losing streak with a 6-3 victory Tuesday night in Baltimore.Davis tied the game at 3-3 with his major-league-leading 28th home run, a two-run shot. Casilla had not homered all season before crushing a pitch from Justin Masterson (9-6). On a team that leads the majors in home runs, contact can come from anyone — even the No. 9 batter."That takes pressure off the big guys, to know that we've got other guys who can contribute, and do contribute," the leadoff hitter Nate McLouth said. "Alexi came up huge tonight."That he did was much to the delight of his teammates, who have come to appreciate Casilla, a backup second baseman. It was Casilla's first home run since Aug. 8, 2012 — also off Masterson.Chris Tillman (9-2) gave up three runs, four hits and four walks in seven innings to win his fifth straight start.RAYS 5, BLUE JAYS 1 Matt Moore overcame control problems to allow one run over six innings and Tampa Bay beat visiting Toronto. Moore (10-3) tied career highs with 6 walks and 11 strikeouts. ANGELS 14, TIGERS 8 Albert Pujols doubled, singled, scored a run and drove one in — all in an eight-run fifth inning — and Los Angeles routed Detroit again. The Angels have won seven straight against Detroit, by a combined score of 48-17. Miguel Cabrera hit a two-run homer for the host Tigers, but he also made two of Detroit's six errors.NATIONALS 7 DIAMONDBACKS 5 Adam LaRoche hit a three-run homer and Gio Gonzalez won for the first time since May 5 as host Washington defeated Arizona. Gonzalez (4-3) went six and a third innings, giving up two runs on nine hits.BREWERS 9, CUBS 3 Rickie Weeks homered twice and drove in four runs as Milwaukee beat Chicago. Milwaukee has defeated Chicago 19 of the last 21 times at home, including nine in a row.RED SOX 11, ROCKIES 4 Dustin Pedroia drove in four runs and had three of Boston's season-high 20 hits, and Ryan Dempster took advantage of an early cushion for the host Red Sox in their victory over Colorado. BRAVES 4, ROYALS 3 Kris Medlen outpitched Ervin Santana over seven innings, Jason Heyward hit a go-ahead homer, and Atlanta's bullpen hung on in the team's first visit to Kansas City.CARDINALS 13, ASTROS 5 Allen Craig homered and had a season-high four hits with three R.B.I., and Carlos Beltran and David Freese both added homers as St. Louis got back on track by rolling to a victory in Houston.MARLINS 4, TWINS 2 Marcell Ozuna drove in two runs and Derek Dietrich homered to help Miami, which has won four of five, beat Minnesota at home.
CHICAGO — Ike Davis has shown signs that he may be rediscovering his power swing, but he is not being rushed back by the Mets , even as a roster hole exists.Davis, who was demoted this month after he could not emerge from a season-long slump, was passed over for promotion this past weekend when Lucas Duda, who was playing first base during Davis's absence, was put on the disabled list. Zach Lutz was promoted instead.It was not that Davis had not been producing. On Monday, he was named Pacific Coast player of the week after he hit .474 with four home runs over a six-game stretch last week for the Las Vegas 51s, the Mets' Class AAA affiliate. It was a minor distinction — a small consolation for enduring his exile — but it represented a positive sign."Good; I'm very happy for him," Manager Terry Collins said dryly, when asked about the award, inciting laughter inside his office. "I want him to be the National League player of the week pretty soon."But the Mets want the conditions to be right for Davis to make a positive return to the team. Collins said the Mets discussed promoting Davis when Duda was placed on the disabled list Saturday. The decision to leave him at Class AAA and promote Lutz was based partly on the pitchers the Mets were set to face.The Mets encountered a left-hander Sunday during their series finale against the Philadelphia Phillies, and they were to face two more left-handers during a two-game series that opened Tuesday at U.S. Cellular Field against the Chicago White Sox."The one thing I didn't want to do was have him go — even if he took some good swings — go 0 for 9, and all of a sudden now it's, 'Send him down again,' " Collins said. "I think when the time is right, he'll be up here, and his confidence will be soaring, and it'll probably be when we make sure we face some righties."The Mets are expected to face Tyler Chatwood, a right-hander, when they play a makeup game against the Colorado Rockies on Thursday, but Collins said there was not necessarily a reason to believe Davis would join the team then, either."We've got two lefties this weekend again," he said, referring to the Mets' series at home against the Washington Nationals.Whether Davis appears or not, cosmetic changes will occur in the Mets' roster throughout the week. Second baseman Daniel Murphy was given a day off Tuesday, and Collins said he planned to give third baseman David Wright some rest later this week.The Mets also announced they were mixing up their rotation somewhat, moving up Matt Harvey to pitch Friday night at Citi Field against the Nationals. Harvey moves ahead of Dillon Gee, who will start Saturday afternoon. Collins said the move was made so that Harvey and Zack Wheeler, who have vaguely similar styles, would not pitch on consecutive days. Collins said he also wanted to split up Gee and Jeremy Hefner, who share their own resemblances."When they go back to back against a certain team, it's a pretty similar look," Collins said about the two pairs.The team's complexion will be most changed, however, when Davis returns. And Collins warned that challenges would remain whenever the Mets decided it was time for him to rejoin the roster.Collins recalled a situation last year when the Mets were debating whether to send Davis to the minors amid similar struggles. Collins said one of the reasons they decided not to was that success at Class AAA would not necessarily translate to success in the majors."You can clear your head in Triple-A," Collins said. "That's great. But how are you going to do it when you get back in the batter's box here? Are you going to be able to maintain that same composure, that same focus, without putting that added pressure on yourself?"The question cannot be answered until Davis rejoins the team, and it remains unclear when that will occur.The Mets traded outfielder Collin Cowgill to the Los Angeles Angels for Kyle Johnson, a 23-year-old minor league outfielder. Cowgill, 27, who played 23 games for the Mets this year and batted .180, was designated for assignment June 18. Johnson will join the Mets' Class A team.
CHICAGO — Bryan Bickell looks around and sees Jonathan Toews, Patrick Kane and the rest of a good young nucleus. He likes Chicago, and the Blackhawks are the only NHL team he has ever known.He is looking forward to the celebration Friday for the Blackhawks' Stanley Cup title, and he wants more.Bickell is eligible for unrestricted free agency and could cash in after coming up with a big postseason despite playing the last series against Boston with a sprained right knee that raised questions about if he would be able to play at all against the Bruins.But the 27-year-old Bickell, drafted by Chicago in 2004, wants to remain with the Blackhawks and says he is open to giving the team a discount in order to stay."That hometown discount, I think a lot of players that would (take) and there's a lot of players have took it on our team to play for this team because it's a great team," Bickell said Thursday. "We have a great core of guys and we won two Cups in four years and there's going to be many more to come, and I'm willing to do it because it's fun and winning is fun."With the salary cap dropping to $64.3 million next season, it looked as if Bickell might have priced himself out of the Blackhawks' reach after he had nine goals and eight assists in the postseason. The nine goals matched Patrick Kane for second on the team and his 17 points were second only to 19 for Kane, who won the Conn Smythe Trophy awarded to the MVP of the NHL playoffs.Bickell provided a physical presence in front of the net that proved crucial in the march to the Stanley Cup, especially in the last two rounds against the Kings and Bruins. He had the tying goal with 1:16 left in the third period of Chicago's 3-2 win in Boston on Monday night that clinched the title."We're going to do whatever it takes to keep me here," said Bickell, from Bowmanville, Ontario. "I enjoy this city. I think this is a second home to me."That's music to the ears of general manager Stan Bowman, who has talked to Bickell's agent, Todd Diamond, about a new deal. Bowman said the team wants to bring Bickell back and they're trying to figure it out."We are trying to make something work for Bryan to remain with the Blackhawks," Diamond said in an email to The Associated Press. "It is much simpler in theory than in practice in a diminishing cap environment."Plunging right into a short offseason with the draft coming up on Sunday and free agency set to start on July 5, Bowman announced that the Blackhawks plan to buy out the contracts of defenseman Steve Montador and forward Rostislav Olesz. Montador and Olesz did not appear in a game this season for Chicago.Also Thursday, as the Blackhawks continued their recovery from a bruising series against the Bruins and days' worth of impromptu parties across the city:—Forward Marian Hossa said he might need further treatment for the back issue that shelved him for Game 3 of the Stanley Cup finals. One possible option is surgery, which could have a dramatic effect on the Blackhawks' offseason.Asked if winning the Stanley Cup was worth it given all his injuries over the past couple years, Hossa didn't hesitate. "It's well worth it right now," he said.—Viktor Stalberg kept the door open for a possible return to Chicago after he was in and out of the lineup during the playoffs, and Bowman sounded determined to keep defenseman Nick Leddy after he struggled at times against Boston.Stalberg, a speedy forward who is eligible for unrestricted free agency, said he is looking for consistent playing time and thinks he deserves it after scoring 43 goals and adding 47 assists over the past three seasons."I don't know at this point," he said when asked about coming back to the Blackhawks. "We'll see what happens."Leddy, who played in every game this year, is a restricted free agent and could receive an offer sheet from another team. He has three NHL seasons under his belt and just turned 22 in March."We're not letting Nick go," Bowman said. "We're going to keep him here. I'm not concerned about offer sheets."—Jamal Mayers, who played in just 19 games this season and turns 39 in October, said he will make a decision on his future in the next couple weeks. He also talked about how much it meant to him that Toews decided he would be third in line to hoist the Stanley Cup during the on-ice celebration."He's really turned into an unbelievable leader," Mayers said about Toews. "Everybody knows what he does on the ice, but his conscience and ability to see all pieces of the pie are I think what separate him at such a young age. It kind of reminds me about what people used to talk about Mark Messier."
CHICAGO — Shaun Marcum has called it his two-and-a-half-month ordeal. After joining the Mets this winter to buttress their starting rotation, Marcum was nearing the All-Star break without recording a victory.But after nine fruitless starts and two relief outings, the ordeal came to an end Wednesday, when Marcum produced eight masterly innings to lead the Mets to a 3-0 win over the Chicago White Sox at U.S. Cellular Field.Manager Terry Collins said: "You don't get to the big leagues without having a little bit of an ego and a sense of pride, and nobody likes to look up and see a zero in the win column under their name. I think this probably is a great kick-start for Shaun."Marcum improved to 1-9 and ensured that his professional tribulation would not reach record lengths.The Mets are at once beloved for and besmirched by their colorful past — comically dismal periods are remembered as often as the brief spurts of superior play — and Marcum wandered into a loopy part of franchise lore when he became the third Mets pitcher with nine straight losing decisions to start a season.Win-loss records can be flawed indicators about a pitcher's value. Still, a record showing no victories and numerous defeats was something to behold, and Marcum's inglorious run summoned images from two futile eras in the team's past.The worst start to a season for a Mets pitcher, as far as win-loss records go, was Anthony Young's 0-13 mark during the 1993 season. Combining a run of failure from the season before, Young produced baseball's longest streak of losing decisions, a stretch of 27 straight defeats from May 1992 to July 1993.The streak was a quirky one because Young at one point worked as a closer and converted 12 straight save opportunities. The streak ended on July 28, 1993, after Young entered a tie game in the top of the ninth and surrendered a run, setting him up for loss No. 28. His teammates then rallied for two runs in the bottom of the ninth.The rally turned out to be one of the few things the Mets did right during the early 1990s. The 1993 club lost 103 games and was largely a dysfunctional mess.The Mets' inaugural year of 1962 was laughably awful — the team went 40-120 — and a pitcher named Bob Miller went 0-12 before getting his only victory of the season in game No. 160, against the Chicago Cubs. The Mets employed two pitchers that season named Bob Miller, one right-handed and one left-handed; the right-hander was the one with the unsightly record.Marcum went to the mound Wednesday night hoping he could his end his losing streak against a Chicago team, the way Miller did 51 years ago.The Mets' batters provided just enough help, scoring three runs off John Danks and a sloppy White Sox defense during the fifth inning, and Marcum did the rest.He needed just 96 pitches to get through his eight innings. He faced three batters over the minimum, allowing four hits and two walks while getting two strikeouts. His fastball hovered around the mid-80s, but it was deployed artfully and complemented well."It's nice to be able to do that every now and again," Marcum said. He added, "If I didn't have the  guys behind me, it probably wouldn't have looked as good as it did."Bobby Parnell finished a 1-2-3 ninth to get his 13th save.Pitchers say their records are mostly an aesthetic concern, not a good reflection of performance. Dillon Gee, a Mets right-hander, noted a pitcher's record probably says more about the overall state of his team than it does about the pitcher."If you throw the ball well on a consistent basis, you'll have more wins than losses, but that gets skewed," said Gee, who is 5-7 this season. "There are so many different factors that go into actually getting a win."For Marcum, after an ordeal, the factors finally came together.The Mets believe the right-hander Zack Wheeler was tipping his off-speed pitches during his start Tuesday night. Manager Terry Collins said he received at least 10 text messages and e-mails from acquaintances that night about it. Collins said Dan Warthen, the team's pitching coach, would help Wheeler correct the issue before his next outing, Sunday at Citi Field. The start, Wheeler's third, will be his home debut.
CHICAGO — Nick Swisher singled in the tiebreaking run in the eighth inning, and the Cleveland Indians beat the Chicago White Sox for the third time in less than 24 hours, 4-3 Saturday.Swisher's homer in the ninth inning Friday night helped Cleveland secure a sweep of a marathon doubleheader Friday night.This time, Cabrera, Jason Kipnis and Swisher consecutive one-out singles off Jesse Crain (2-3) in the eighth. Crain allowed his first run since April 12. He went 31 outings before Saturday without giving up an earned run.Joe Martinez (1-0), called up from Triple-A Columbus Saturday, earned the victory in his first major league appearance this season. He pitched two innings and held Chicago to two hits and no runs with one strikeout.Cleveland closer Chris Perez earned his seventh save in nine attempts.Kipnis tied the game 3-all with a crushing two-run home run in the sixth inning. Michael Bourn started the inning with a walk and Cabrera flew out to right field before Kipnis homered beyond the bullpen in right field.Chicago rallied with two outs in the fifth inning to take a 3-1 lead. Conor Gillaspie and Dayan Viciedo had back-to-back RBI singles to score Alex Rios and Jeff Keppinger. Catcher Tyler Flowers had a chance to add on but struck out looking with the bases loaded.Cleveland shortstop Asdrubal Cabrera hit his sixth home run of the season to tie the game at 1 in the fourth inning.White Sox left fielder Viciedo made a pair of terrific catches that easily could have been base hits for the Indians. His first was a diving grab of a looper from Cabrera that was fair and in shallow left field, where Viciedo snagged it just as it was about to hit the ground. His second highlight catch prevented Michael Bourn from reaching base in the third inning, when Viciedo sprinted into the gap to make the play.Chicago took the lead in the bottom of the second inning when Flowers had an RBI double, but the White Sox stranded runners on second and third.NOTES: White Sox 1B/DH Paul Konerko took batting practice Saturday, his first action since last playing June 23 in Kansas City. Konerko, who has pain in the lower right side of his back, doesn't think he's headed to the disabled list and hopes to play Sunday. Manager Robin Ventura said Konerko "probably" won't play Sunday but "there's a good chance" he would be in the lineup Tuesday against Baltimore. . Before Saturday's game the White Sox recalled pitcher Simon Castro, who has never pitched in the major leagues. . Chicago right fielder Alex Rios snapped an 0-for-13 streak at the plate with his single in the fifth inning. . Cleveland manager Terry Francona was surprised to hear Friday's doubleheader was the longest in Major League history. "I guess that's the one advantage to waking up every day feeling (lousy), you really don't feel all that different." . The Indians called sent right-handed pitcher Matt Langwell to Columbus. . Chicago will start Chris Sale (5-6, 2.75 ERA) and Cleveland starts Justin Masterson (9-6, 3.76) in today's series closer at 1:10 p.m.
Max Scherzer became the first starting pitcher to win 12 consecutive decisions to begin a season in 27 years, and the Detroit Tigers beat the Tampa Bay Rays , 6-3, behind two home runs by Miguel Cabrera on Friday night.Scherzer (12-0) allowed three runs and four hits, walked one and struck out nine in seven innings to become the first pitcher in Tigers history to win his first 12 decisions as a starter.He also became the first in the majors to begin a season with at least 12 straight victories since Roger Clemens did it on the way to starting 14-0 with the Boston Red Sox in 1986.RED SOX 7, BLUE JAYS 5 Jonny Gomes broke a tie with a seventh-inning single, and host Boston beat Toronto after squandering a five-run lead.The Red Sox had 15 hits, giving them at least 10 for the sixth time in seven games.Koji Uehara pitched the ninth for his fourth save of the season and third in three days.INDIANS 19, WHITE SOX 10 Jason Kipnis reached base six times and scored four runs, Ryan Raburn homered and drove in four, and Cleveland rallied from five behind early on to pound host Chicago in Game 1 of a doubleheader.The Indians matched a season high for runs. They also set one with eight doubles in a game that lasted a little more than four hours.Nevertheless, Cleveland had to dig itself out of a five-run hole after the first inning and hang on after a nine-run lead dwindled to four.ANGELS 4, ASTROS 2 Pinch-runner Peter Bourjos scored the go-ahead run in the eighth inning on an error, and Erick Aybar added a two-run single in the ninth for Los Angeles at Houston.ROYALS 9, TWINS 3 Eric Hosmer hit two of visiting Kansas City's season-high four home runs, and James Shields pitched six strong innings. Billy Butler and Mike Moustakas also homered for the Royals.Minnesota had another rough start from P. J. Walters (2-4), who allowed six runs in three innings one start after giving up six in the first.RANGERS 4, REDS 0 Martin Perez pitched six-hit ball into the seventh inning and host Texas beat scuffling Cincinnati.The Reds right-hander Johnny Cueto (4-2) left after facing one batter in the second inning because of tightness.Perez (2-1) struck out three in six and two-thirds innings.BRAVES 3, DIAMONDBACKS 0 Julio Teheran pitched six strong innings, Andrelton Simmons homered and host Atlanta beat Arizona. Teheran (6-4) allowed four hits and one walk. He struck out 10.ROCKIES 4, GIANTS 1 Michael Cuddyer homered to extend his hitting streak to 25 games, Jhoulys Chacin pitched eight scoreless innings and host Colorado beat slumping San Francisco.Wilin Rosario also homered, and Jordan Pacheco had three hits for the Rockies.PIRATES 10, BREWERS 3 Gerrit Cole overcame a rocky start to become the first Pittsburgh pitcher to win his first four career starts in more than a century as the host Pirates won.Starling Marte missed the cycle when he fell a few feet short of a home run on a deep fly to center field in the eighth.PADRES 9, MARLINS 2 Will Venable drove in three runs and saved one with a diving catch in right field to help San Diego beat Ricky Nolasco and host Miami.Logan Forsythe hit a two-run homer for the Padres and had 3 of their 15 hits. Nolasco (4-8), the subject of trade speculation, allowed 6 runs and 11 hits in five-plus innings.
The most meaningful games the Mets will play this year are the ones that cast an eye toward future seasons, when the team hopes to contend. For that reason, any Matt Harvey start is worth watching, but so are starts by the prized rookie Zack Wheeler.On Sunday afternoon, Wheeler will make his Citi Field debut when he starts against the Washington Nationals. Although Wheeler started twice during the Mets' recent 11-game trip, Sunday's game will carry yet another set of expectations as the home crowd will have its first live look at him."This is going to be a fun start for him on Sunday," Manager Terry Collins said. "There's a lot of people that have not seen him that have read about him, heard about him and talked about him, so Sunday will be a lot of fun for him."Wheeler tried to play it cool."Just another start," he said. "Obviously, it's my first start at Citi. It's going to be very exciting and a big point in my life. I'm just soaking it in; it's going to be fun."In two starts, Wheeler is 1-0 with a 3.18 earned run average. He has yet to pitch past the sixth inning and has had a high pitch count in each start. On Tuesday in Chicago, Wheeler threw 109 pitches despite lasting only five and a third innings. The Mets also thought he was tipping his pitches.Collins said that in the past two days, Wheeler had worked on a few things with the pitching coach Dan Warthen. On Friday, Wheeler threw a bullpen session and made a few mechanical adjustments."Just keeping it simple, nothing too much," Wheeler said of the changes. "Just the instructions will be enough. I don't think it's something difficult. A little small tweak here and there and we'll be ready to go."Wheeler said that he is aware of the need to limit his pitch counts. He said he hoped the adjustments he made with Warthen would make a difference."Two years ago I was going deeper into games, and getting ahead of guys early, it allowed me to get quick outs," Wheeler said. "I need to get back to that: first-pitch strikes, and get my pitches over for strikes."Wheeler said that he would monitor Harvey's outing Friday to begin sorting out a game plan for his start on Sunday. Both are power pitchers, so it is likely that the approach for each will not be much different. Watching Harvey has already made a difference for Wheeler this season, he said.On the day Wheeler made his major league debut, Harvey pitched the day game of a day/night doubleheader. Harvey allowed only three hits in beating the Atlanta Braves. Wheeler followed by allowing four hits and earning his first major league victory."I sort of watch him and see how he goes about his game and how he goes about getting certain hitters out," Wheeler said. "I did that in Atlanta. It helped me out a little bit."The Mets minor leaguer Brandon Nimmo is on the ballot for this summer's Futures Game. Fans can vote for Nimmo at mets.com. Nimmo, who was the 13th overall pick in the 2011 draft, is hitting .274 with a .751 on-base plus slugging percentage with Class A Savannah.
SEATTLE — Alfonso Soriano and Darwin Barney each doubled twice and the Chicago Cubs built a six-run lead before holding off the Seattle Mariners 7-6 Sunday.Anthony Rizzo drove in two runs and the Cubs tied a season high by hitting six doubles.Chicago led 7-1 after four innings. The Cubs' bullpen, which has blown 16 save chances this season, gave up three runs in the eighth.Edwin Jackson (4-10) pitched into the seventh inning, allowing three runs and seven hits and striking out six.Jason Bay homered for the Mariners and Brad Miller doubled twice for his first major league hits .Jeremy Bonderman (1-2) was chased after giving up six runs — four earned — and six hits in 3 1-3 innings. It was his shortest start since going 2 1-3 innings on July 29, 2007 with Detroit.The loss was the first for Bonderman since being called up June 2 and making his first major league appearance since 2010. That time out, he gave up seven runs in 4 2-3 innings, but since he had been on a roll, giving up a total of four runs in the four starts before Sunday.Bonderman's trouble against the Cubs started in the second inning when the Cubs doubled four times, leading to three runs. Soriano and Rizzo led off the inning with doubles, and with one out Brian Bogusevic and Barney hit consecutive RBI doubles.In the fourth, Barney led off with another double and scored when Wellington Castillo's grounder to third went through Kyle Seager's legs for a two-base error. Starlin Castro's run-scoring single marked the end for Bonderman.Reliever Blake Beavan gave up an RBI double to Soriano and another run on Rizzo's single as the Cubs took a 7-1 lead.Beavan settled down and pitched through the eighth inning. The Cubs only managed one hit over the final five innings.The Mariners' comeback started in the fifth when Nick Franklin's single drove in a run. Bay's leadoff homer in the seventh cut the lead to 7-3.Raul Ibanez led off the eighth with his 19th homer of the season. Kendrys Morales singled and Seager broke an 0-for-19 slump with a deep home run down the right-field line to bring the Mariners within a run.NOTES: Cubs OF Ryan Sweeney will be placed on the disabled list after breaking a rib on his left side crashing into an outfield wall. Sweeney will be held out of baseball activities for four to six weeks. ... Seattle CF Dustin Ackley should be able to return "in a couple days" after spraining his right thumb Saturday, manager Eric Wedge said. "All things considered, could be a lot worse," Wedge said.
CHICAGO — Justin Masterson pitched his major league-leading third shutout of the season and the Cleveland Indians completed their first four-game sweep in Chicago since 1948, beating the White Sox 4-0 Sunday.Masterson (10-6) gave up six hits, struck out eight and walked one. He blanked the White Sox for the second time this year.Masterson faced the minimum 18 batters through six innings thanks to two double plays and a pickoff. The Indians turned four double plays overall.After Masterson began the ninth with two strikeouts, he allowed a single to Alejandro De Aza and hit Alexei Ramirez with a pitch. Masterson struck out Alex Rios looking to end the game.The win moved Cleveland into a virtual tie with Detroit atop the AL Central. The White Sox have lost 23 of 31 and fallen a season-high 15 games under .500.Yan Gomes got three hits as the Indians won for the 10th time in 13 games.Chris Sale (5-7) struck out 10 while allowing three runs in eight innings. He recorded double-digit strikeouts for the fourth time this season.Sale was perfect through the first three innings before Drew Stubbs led off the fourth with a bunt single.Sale went 0-4 with a 3.19 ERA and two no-decisions in June — the White Sox scored a total of nine runs during his six starts in the month. Sale hasn't won since May 17 against the Los Angeles Angels.The Indians scored twice in the fourth. Ryan Raburn hit a two-out double that drove in Stubbs, and Carlos Santana added an RBI single.The Indians added a run in the fifth. Michael Brantley led off with a single and later scored on Lonnie Chisenhall's groundout.Stubbs hit an RBI double in the ninth.The White Sox put two on in the seventh before Rios hit into a double play and Adam Dunn struck out.NOTES: White Sox GM Rick Hahn said he hopes the team gets on a roll. If not, changes could occur as the July 31 trade deadline approaches. Hahn said his staff has been receiving "a pretty healthy pace" of calls from other teams over the last few weeks. He indicated no player is untouchable for a possible deal ... 1B Paul Konerko remained out of the White Sox lineup with a sore back for the sixth straight game. He said he hopes to play on Tuesday. The team has Monday off. ... Ramirez will eventually get a day off, manager Robin Ventura said. The shortstop is the only player in the majors to play every inning this year. He has committed an AL-leading 14 errors. ... The Indians placed OF Michael Bourn on the three-day paternity list and recalled LHP Nick Hagadone. Bourn, who went to Houston after Saturday's game to be with his wife, will be eligible to return to the roster Wednesday. Bourn is hitting .299 as the Indians' primary leadoff hitter. Hagadone is 0-1 with a 5.40 ERA. ... Indians 2B Jason Kipnis and 1B Nick Swisher had the day off.
CORNELIA, Ga. — Just before noon, Sara Wright unlocked the small store on the first floor of a fatigued two-story building and flipped the sign to "Open" from "Closed." On went two fans in place of the broken air-conditioning. A small ringer was positioned on a glass counter atop a handwritten notice that read, "Please shake the bells. I am in the back."For the next five hours, Wright enjoyed the inanimate companionship provided by the beloved baseball merchandise at her Cornelia Sports Card Shop. There was no other option, given the scarce human traffic. She made two sales that day, and only one was for baseball cards."That's just the way it is, and I accept it," Wright said, looking forward to dinner out with relatives at her favorite eatery, the seafood chain restaurant Captain D's, to toast her 89th birthday in three days.She first opened 33 years ago in this tiny town tucked into the northeast corner of Georgia. It was an era when baseball card collecting engaged scores of passionate Americans, especially children.The hobby ultimately engulfed adult baby boomers — some driven by the investment potential, others willing to spend considerable discretionary dollars just for fun. By the early 1990s, baseball cards were the engine of a full-blown billion-dollar industry that capitalized on a card collection craze.Wright's involvement can be traced to her two young sons, who swapped cards with friends. When they grew up and moved out of the house, she gathered the cards left behind and performed a parenting role reversal — following in the footsteps of her children.She took it a step further, at first operating card shows at a local school in the 1970s, with dealers renting tables for $5. Then, freshly retired from her job as a school dietitian, she scraped together $10,000 for a baseball-centric shop located a hilly block from Cornelia's compact downtown.Wright immersed herself in the trade, educating herself on the value of cards. She boned up on baseball by making televised big league games, especially those of her Atlanta Braves, a nightly ritual with her husband.Customers came — and still do, if less frequently — from neighboring cities as well as metro Atlanta, at least an hour's drive south. Children gobbled up the small packs, their fathers the jumbo ones. One Atlantan paid $2,300 for a set, her biggest score.Her next largest sale was a single card. Ordered shipments sometimes included a special pack with one player, unidentified, inside. Attempts to sell it for $5 proved fruitless, so she tore open the silver wrapping to discover a Joe DiMaggio card from an exclusive series.For once, she resorted to the Internet, relying on one of her sons to list the no-longer-hidden treasure for sale. It fetched $1,800.Mostly, Wright has catered to the casual collector, marking up the price of packs and sets just enough to assure a small gain for herself while keeping them affordable."This has been such a fun thing," she said.But not nearly as profitable over the last two decades. As much as nostalgists might like to protect the collecting hobby with the type of clear cellophane case that keeps vintage cards from aging, interest has faded from its peak period."The standard card is no longer a draw enough for an average baseball fan," said Tom Bartsch, the editor of the Sports Collectors Digest. "It won't ever be what it was. It's a different culture now."At the annual National Sports Collectors Convention, which begins July 31 in Chicago, the inventory devoted to baseball cards will fall to about 15 percent from more than half in the late 1990s, according to Mike Berkus, the convention's founder and executive director.Berkus estimated that the amount of money from card sales across the country each year has declined by nearly two thirds from its peak. Illustrating the trend is the reduction in the number of manufacturers licensed by Major League Baseball to one this season, from five during collecting's heyday, though at least two other companies still churn out cards.
CHICAGO — Chicago Bulls star Derrick Rose says he's still recovering from knee surgery and vows to show sitting out last season was the right decision.In an interview posted Wednesday on the team's website, Rose said he had to be selfish in his rehab as he tried to work his way back from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee even though sitting out was "one of the hardest things I've had to go through in my life.""I'm not a selfish guy at all, but having this injury and going through what I had to go through and being smart, it's something that I had to be selfish with," he said. "I couldn't worry about anyone else but myself and my health."He thinks fans who questioned him will realize sitting out was the right call once they see him playing again."I think me going on the court and showing them and letting them know it was the right decision," he said.Rose hasn't played since he crumbled to the court near the end of the 2012 playoff opener against Philadelphia, sending the top-seeded Bulls to a first-round exit. He had surgery on May 12 that year, and his doctor said the recovery would probably take about eight to 12 months — the final stage being playing in games.Rose practiced without restrictions the last few months of the season but never suited up for a game even though he had medical clearance. He and the Bulls never publicly ruled out a return, either.Without him, Chicago clawed its way to 45 wins and knocked out the Brooklyn Nets in the first round of the playoffs before bowing out to the champion Miami Heat. They were particularly banged up during the postseason, with players fighting through injuries and illnesses and Rose serving as a spectator.The Chicago product saw his image taking a hit, with analysts such as Charles Barkley and Steve Kerr, not to mention some fans, questioning why he wasn't playing."When you're in practice, of course it's not like game-like speed, unless it's like training camp," Rose said. "Game-like experience is totally different when you have strategy, this and that, double teams. When I play, I get double-teamed a lot. We play the same defense (in practice) we play in the game, so there wasn't any double-teams. So I was able to roam around freely. And in a game ... I wasn't able to take on that double-team yet."Every day I was working out like my leg is going to feel better," he continued. "I was pushing myself every day, eating right, trying to take care of my body so that I can be out there as soon as possible. But it didn't happen."Rose insisted he had his teammates' support."They saw how hard I was working in practice, just trying to rebuild my leg," he said. "All my teammates that were going through injuries, they used to tell me don't rush back just because they were going through stuff. So just to hear them say that, they knew I was trying to get back on the court as quickly as possible. They made a huge run at it. When they were playing, I told them things that I saw if they didn't see, or I was just working with them, just to show them I really cared about the team, and like I said they fought for me."
Another hard-throwing Texan who wears No. 34 made some no-hit history Tuesday night.That Texan, Homer Bailey, threw his second no-hitter in 10 months for the Cincinnati Reds in a 3-0 win over San Francisco.Bailey became the third Reds pitcher with more than one no-hitter, joining Jim Maloney and Johnny Vander Meer — still the only big leaguer to toss two in a row. Bailey no-hit the Pirates, 1-0, in Pittsburgh last Sept. 28 and got another no-hitter 17 starts later.This one was at home with 27,509 fans standing and chanting "Homer! Homer!" as he finished it off in a tidy 102 pitches with one walk — in the seventh inning — and nine strikeouts."It was a pretty easy no-hitter," Giants Manager Bruce Bochy said. "We didn't hit too many balls hard. He was really overmatching us all night."Yes, it was reminiscent of Nolan Ryan, a Hall of Famer from Texas who holds the record with seven no-hitters.Bailey threw the last of the majors' seven no-hitters last season, and now the first of 2013. The last pitcher to throw one no-hitter and then another before anyone else in the majors was Ryan, according to STATS. Ryan, baseball's career strikeout king, did it for the California Angels on Sept. 28, 1974, against Minnesota, and on June 1, 1975, versus Baltimore."Obviously, being from Texas and what a legend he is," said Bailey, who wears No. 34 in tribute to his boyhood hero. "To do it once is extra special. To do it twice — I don't really have the words for it right now."DODGERS 8, ROCKIES 0 Clayton Kershaw tossed a four-hitter for his second shutout of the season and the rookie sensation Yasiel Puig had three more hits, including a solo home run, to lead visiting Los Angeles. Colorado's Michael Cuddyer had his franchise-record 27-game hitting streak halted.PHILLIES 3, PIRATES 1 Jonathan Pettibone pitched neatly into the sixth inning, and Philadelphia snapped host Pittsburgh's nine-game winning streak.BREWERS 4, NATIONALS 0 Stephen Strasburg had hitters flailing at curveballs for seven scoreless innings in a magnificent outing that was wasted when visiting Milwaukee scored off the Washington bullpen.BRAVES 11, MARLINS 3 Chris Johnson's two-run, go-ahead double was the big hit in a four-run sixth inning that helped host Atlanta to a win over Miami.MARINERS 9, RANGERS 2 Kendrys Morales homered twice and tied a career high with six runs batted in to lead visiting Seattle past Texas.RAYS 8, ASTROS 0 The American League Cy Young Award winner David Price pitched three-hit ball for seven innings in his return from the disabled list and Desmond Jennings homered and drove in four runs as Tampa Bay won at Houston.TIGERS 7, BLUE JAYS 6 Torii Hunter drove in the tiebreaking run with a two-out infield single in the eighth, and Detroit rallied from a 4-0 deficit to win at Toronto.INDIANS 6, ROYALS 5 Carlos Santana and Asdrubal Cabrera each drove in a pair of runs for Cleveland at Kansas City.WHITE SOX 5, ORIOLES 2 Adam Dunn and Conor Gillaspie homered to help Chicago snap visiting Baltimore's four-game winning streak.RED SOX 4, PADRES 1 Brandon Snyder hit a bases-loaded double and John Lackey struck out six over eight strong innings in Boston's victory at home.
PITTSBURGH — Major league loss leader Cole Hamels pitched seven strong innings, Carlos Ruiz hit a tiebreaking single and the Philadelphia Phillies beat Gerrit Cole and the Pittsburgh Pirates 6-4 Thursday.Hamels (3-11) gave up one earned run and five hits, striking out eight without a walk. The former World Series MVP won for the first time since June 5.Cole (4-1) lost for the first time in the majors after becoming the first Pirates' pitcher to win his first four career starts since Nick Maddox in 1907. Cole allowed three runs and eight hits in 5 1-3 innings.Hamels received some rare support as the Phillies have scored just 22 runs in his 11 losses.Ben Revere had three of the Phillies' 13 hits and two RBIs. Ruiz, Jimmy Rollins and Delmon Young each had two hits.Jonathan Papelbon worked a perfect ninth inning for his 17th save in 21 opportunities.Ruiz's two-run single came off Vin Mazzaro in the middle of a four-run sixth inning in which Cole was chased.Ruiz, who sat out the first 25 games of the season after being suspended by Major League Baseball for testing positive for a banned stimulant, had driven in just four runs all year prior to Thursday.Cole was removed after Ryan Howard walked with one out and Dominic Brown followed with a single.Mazzaro, who had not allowed any of his 12 inherited runners to score this season, came on and gave up three straight singles. Young's hit loaded the bases and Kevin Frandsen's single tied it before Ruiz hit a liner to center to score Brown and Young and put Philadelphia ahead.Revere capped the inning by driving in a run with a grounder.Pinch-hitter Michael Young's sacrifice fly in the eighth extended the Phillies' lead to 6-2.The Pirates scored twice in the eighth on a pinch-hit RBI single by Garrett Jones and a double-play grounder by Andrew McCutchen.McCutchen's two-run double off Hamels in the third opened the scoring. The Phillies cut the deficit to 2-1 on Revere's RBI single in the fifth.Starling Marte and Jose Tabata each had two hits for Pittsburgh, which has the best record in the majors, but has lost two of three since a nine-game winning streak. Marte ran his hitting streak to nine games.Philadelphia won for just the 10th time in 25 games as it avoided dropping to a season-worst six games below .500. The Phillies won a series in Pittsburgh for the first time since 2008.NOTES: Pittsburgh RHP A.J. Burnett is likely to come off the disabled list Sunday and start against the Cubs at Chicago, though Pirates manager Clint Hurdle would prefer the veteran make one minor league rehab start. Burnett, who has been out since June 9 with a strained right calf, insists he does not need to go on a rehab assignment. ... Philadelphia manager Charlie Manuel said he will rest Howard against certain left-handed starters but will not use him in a strict platoon with right-handed hitting John Mayberry Jr. ... Phillies 3B Michael Young was not in the lineup, getting a rest in a day game after a night game. ... Pirates SS Jordy Mercer got the day off after going 1 for 9 in the first two games of the series and making an error on Wednesday night that allowed a run to score. ... The Pirates open their three-game series with the Cubs on Friday with LHP Francisco Liriano (7-3, 2.23) pitching against RHP Jeff Samardzija (5-7, 3.34) ... The Phillies open a three-game home series with Atlanta on Friday night as LHP Cliff Lee (9-2, 2.59) faces RHP Tim Hudson (4-7, 4.22).
CHICAGO — Francisco Liriano pitched a four-hitter for his first complete game in more than two years, and the Pittsburgh Pirates won for the 11th time in 13 games, beating the Chicago Cubs 6-2 on Friday.Liriano (8-3) went the distance for the first time since he tossed a no-hitter for Minnesota against the White Sox on May 3, 2011. He struck out seven and walked four to improve 5-1 in his last six starts. He also had an RBI single.The Pirates, meanwhile, continue to roll along. They came in with the best record in the majors and a two-game lead over St. Louis in the NL Central, and they had little trouble with Jeff Samardzija (5-8) and the Cubs.Starling Marte had three hits, scored two runs and stole two bases for the Pirates.
ST. PETERSBURG, Fla. — Matt Moore won his fourth consecutive start to help the Tampa Bay Rays beat All-Star selection Chris Sale and the Chicago White Sox 3-0 on Saturday night.Moore (12-3), who could still become an All-Star as an injury replacement, gave up five hits, two walks and struck out six over 6 1-3 innings.The Rays have won seven of eight, improving to a season-best eight games (48-40) over .500. Fernando Rodney, the third Tampa Bay reliever, pitched the ninth for his 19th save — completing the six-hitter.Sale (5-8) allowed three runs, six hits, one walk and had nine strikeouts in seven innings for the White Sox, who have lost eight of 10. The left-hander, despite giving up just 20 runs — 17 earned — over 49 1-3 innings, is 0-6 in his last seven starts.Sale and Moore hooked up in a pitcher's duel on May 28th of last year at Tropicana Field, a 2-1 White Sox victory in which the pair combined for 25 strikeouts (Sale 15, Moore 10).Tampa Bay took a 2-0 lead in the second when Luke Scott got the first extra-base hit this season by left-handed hitter off Sale, an RBI double, and Desmond Jennings had a run-scoring grounder.Wil Myers opened the sixth with an infield single, a liner that went off Sales' glove, and advanced two bases to third on a nifty baserunning play when Jose Lobaton hit a one-out grounder that third baseman Conor Gillaspie had to move toward second to field. The Rays rookie then scored to make it 3-0 on a single by Sam Fuld.Moore got a key defensive play from third baseman Evan Longoria, who caught Alex Rios' liner with two on and no outs in the third and dove to the bag to double up Alejandro De Aza. The threat ended when Adam Dunn flew out.On "Turn Back the Clock Night," the Rays, an expansion team in 1998, wore hypothetical uniforms from 1979, while the White Sox used 1972 replica home uniforms."It definitely reeks of the mid-1970's, and I like that," Tampa Bay manager Joe Maddon said. "I think they're very tasty."Injured White Sox reliever Jesse Crain was also named to the AL All-Star team with Sale before the game. Tampa Bay's lone selection was infielder-outfielder Ben Zobrist.NOTES: Tampa Bay LHP David Price (2-4) will make his second start Sunday since returning from a strained left triceps. The 2012 AL Cy Young Award winner, who allowed three hits over seven innings in an 8-0 win over Houston Tuesday, will face Chicago LHP John Danks (2-5). ... White Sox RHP Jake Peavy, on the DL since June 6 with a broken left rib, is scheduled to pitch in a simulated game on Tuesday. ... Maddon decided to keep left-handed hitting 1B James Loney, who has a career-high 16-game hitting streak, out of the lineup against Sale. Loney entered as a defensive replacement in the eighth. ... Chicago OF Dewayne Wise (strained right oblique) is set to start a minor league rehab assignment with Triple-A Charlotte.
CHICAGO — Alfonso Soriano hit two-run homers in consecutive innings to lead the Chicago Cubs to a 4-1 victory over the Pittsburgh Pirates 4-1 on Saturday.Edwin Jackson and three relievers combined on a five-hitter, and the Cubs handed the Pirates just their third loss in 14 games.Pittsburgh came in with the best record in the majors and a seven-game road win streak, but the Pirates couldn't get much going at the plate or find a way to contain Soriano.His drive off Charlie Morton in the fourth after Pedro Alvarez homered in the top half put the Cubs ahead, and he followed that with a long drive to the bleachers in left to make it 4-1 in the fifth.That was enough for Jackson (5-10), who won his second straight start. A disappointment after signing a four-year deal with Chicago in January, the veteran right-hander had one of his better outings.He held the Pirates to just one run and four hits in 5 2-3 innings, leaving to cheers after he walked Garrett Jones to put runners on first and second.James Russell came in and struck out Alvarez to end the threat.Matt Guerrier worked two scoreless innings, and Kevin Gregg came on in the ninth for his 15th save in 16 chances.Morton (1-2) pitched six innings for Pittsburgh, allowing four runs and seven hits. He struck out six and walked three.Starling Marte had two hits for the Pirates after collecting three the previous day and extended his streak to 11 games. He also had two steals, although he got caught trying to swipe third in the third inning.Pirates second baseman Neil Walker left the game because of discomfort on his right side. Brandon Inge replaced him at second base in the fifth.Soriano put the Cubs ahead in the fourth after Anthony Rizzo doubled off the left-field wall, and he struck again with a shot in the fifth.The ball sailed to the last row of the left-field bleachers for his 12th homer this season.That gave him 32 multi-homer games in his career and two this season. He also tied Harold Baines for 59th on baseball's career home run list with 384 and took sole possession of 12th place on Chicago's list with his 175th and 176th homers as a Cub after beginning the day even with Hall of Famer Andre Dawson.NOTES: Pirates manager Clint Hurdle was a bit amused by footage showing an usher interrupting an interview with his dad by Pittsburgh broadcaster Robby Incmikoski during Friday's game. The usher told them they were blocking fans' view. Hurdle said a few of his family members were upset. "I'm kind of just taking the high road and chuckling about it," Hurdle said. This weekend is the Pirates' annual father/son trip, where players and coaches get to bring their dads. ... The Cubs gave top prospect Javier Baez a promotion, moving him from Class A Daytona to Double-A Tennessee. The infielder was their minor league player of the month for June. "It's time for a new challenge for Javier, and I think he'll respond well to it," general manager Jed Hoyer said. He also said it's "highly unlikely" Baez will reach the majors this year. ... A.J. Burnett (4-6, 3.12 ERA) returns to the Pirates' rotation after missing the past month with a strained right calf, and Carlos Villanueva (2-4, 3.45) starts for the Cubs on Sunday.
CHICAGO — Matt Garza pitched seven strong innings, Alfonso Soriano homered and scored four runs, and the Chicago Cubs pulled away late to beat the White Sox 8-2 on Monday night.Dave Sappelt had a career-high four hits, while Soriano had three. Luis Valbuena drove in three runs, hitting the tiebreaking two-run double and scoring during a five-run eighth.Garza (5-1), meanwhile, came through with another terrific outing. He's 4-0 in his last five starts after allowing two runs — one earned — and five hits, striking out six without a walk. He's lowered his ERA from 4.98 to 3.22 during this stretch, while his trade value — his name has been mentioned in rumors — has remained high.Valbuena broke a 2-2 tie with a two-run double off reliever Matt Thornton (0-3) and came around on a single by Sappelt off Nate Jones. Ransom capped the rally with a two-run, bases-loaded single, and the Cubs completed the four-game season sweep against their crosstown rivals.White Sox starter Hector Santiago lasted 5 1-3 innings, allowing two runs and five hits.The game, a makeup from May 28, this game was delayed 29 minutes at the start by rain.The Cubs continued to unload players before the game, trading outfielder Scott Hairston to the Washington Nationals for minor league pitcher Ivan Pineyro. In the past week alone, they've also dealt pitchers Scott Feldman and Carlos Marmol, along with catcher Steve Clevenger, and Garza could be on his way out, too.General manager Jed Hoyer acknowledged Monday that teams are interested in the right-hander, saying he's "a guy we've gotten a lot of phone calls on" and has "opened a lot of eyes" of late.Garza gave up a solo drive in the third to Josh Phegley, who hit his first career homer against Tampa Bay's David Price on Sunday. That made him the quickest White Sox rookie to homer in consecutive games since Magglio Ordonez went deep in his second and third games in 1997.Soriano gave the Cubs a 2-1 lead when he knocked a high pitch to the seats in left leading off the sixth, just after lightning flashed and thunder cracked. The home run was his 13th on the season and sixth in 10 games. It was also the 385th of his career, putting him in sole possession of 59th place on baseball's all-time list ahead of former White Sox All-Star Harold Baines.But the White Sox immediately tied it, thanks to some shaky defense by the Cubs.Second baseman Darwin Barney threw wildly to first on an infield single by Gordon Beckham with one out, allowing the runner to advance to second, and a single by Alex Rios put men on the corners. With two outs, catcher Dioner Navarro bounced a throw to second that Barney could not handle on a double steal, allowing Beckham to score the tying run. It was also the first time a White Sox player swiped home since Juan Pierre did it against Cleveland on Oct. 2, 2010.NOTES: Neither team had swept the season series with its crosstown rival since they moved to a home-and-home format in 1999. ... The White Sox open a three-game series at Detroit on Tuesday, with LHP Jose Quintana (3-2, 3.69 ERA) starting against RHP Justin Verlander (9-5, 3.54). ... Wood (5-6, 2.69) starts Tuesday for the Cubs against the Angels, with RHP Joe Blanton (2-10, 5.14) going for the Angels.
SILVIS, Ill. — It took years for Zach Johnson to feel comfortable at his hometown tournament.These days, Johnson is more relaxed than anyone in the field — and that's a major reason why he's in early position to repeat as the champion of the John Deere Classic.Johnson shot a 7-under 64 and is tied with Camilo Villegas for the lead after Thursday's opening round of the John Deere Classic.It was the 17th straight round in the 60s at TPC Deere Run for Johnson, who grew up roughly 100 miles away in Cedar Rapids, Iowa.Matt Bettencourt made the field as a late alternate and shot a 6-under 65. He's tied for second with Daniel Summerhays and Brendon de Jonge.Boo Weekley is among a host of players at 5-under 66, while three-time tournament champion Steve Stricker is at 4-under 67 heading into Friday's second round."It's hard to believe that it's been a year. Yeah, I just kind of felt like you're just leading into the next round here," Johnson said. "I've just gotten so used to just everything about this tournament."It wasn't always that way for Johnson.Johnson finished 69th here five years ago after shooting 75 and 71 in the final two rounds — but he hasn't touched 70 since.Johnson, who was second in 2009 and third in 2011 before winning last year, topped his final-round 65 of 2012 by one stroke Thursday. He avoided bogeys while picking up birdies on five par-4s."It just feels so natural now," Johnson said. 'It just feels very, very comfortable, much like my golf game — though I don't want to get overly content with the fact that I'm overly comfortable. So I've still got to go to work."Villegas was also very comfortable on a course that proved player-friendly in the morning session. He converted a pair of par-3 birdie putts to highlight a strong day on the greens."Made some great putts and just kept out of trouble. The golf course is a little receptive, and you could be aggressive," Villegas said. "I was very pleased with the way I handled myself out there. It was nice, relaxed, chill attitude."Stricker entered the tournament as a co-favorite with Johnson, having won at TPC Deere Run from 2009-11. Stricker quickly showed why he's considered the man the rest of the field could be chasing this weekend.He just couldn't keep it going for 18 holes.De Jonge began his day with the one of the best shots of the tournament so far, holing out from 88 yards for an eagle on the par-5 10th hole. But Stricker matched him on No. 10 just 20 minutes later — chipping in from 83 yards out.Stricker appeared to be in good shape as he made the turn at 4-under, but back-to-back bogeys helped put him three shots back of the leaders.The most unlikely name among Thursday's leaders had to be Bettencourt's.Sensing this week's field would be full, Bettencourt booked a flight to Salt Lake City for this weekend's Web.com event. But as he was sitting on a plane in Atlanta, the PGA Tour office called to tell him that he was eligible to replace Neal Lancaster.Bettencourt was stuck with a flight to Utah regardless. But he then flew straight to Chicago, rented a car and arrived in the Quad Cities just before midnight.Bettencourt didn't need any practice time though. He shot his best round at Deere Run since also opening the 2009 tournament with a 65."Fortunately I know the golf course, pretty much know the setup, been here enough times," Bettencourt said. "I love this golf course. It's a lot of fun, so I was really excited the entire flight to Chicago and kind of (on) adrenaline I guess."
CHICAGO — Carlos Beltran had three hits and drove in a run, while reliever-turned-starter Joe Kelly (1-3) won his first game of the season as the St. Louis Cardinals beat the Chicago Cubs 3-2 Friday at Wrigley Field.Beltran was a homer short of hitting for the cycle, with a run-scoring triple, double and single as the Cardinals bounced back from Thursday night's loss to the Cubs that snapped a five-game winning streak.Kelly allowed three hits and a run in 5 1-3 innings, striking out four and walking two. Edward Mujica pitched the ninth for his 26th save in 27 opportunities.St. Louis jumped on Cubs starter Carlos Villaneuva (2-5) for two runs in the top of the first inning. Matt Carpenter singled and scored on Beltran's triple, followed by Allen Craig's RBI single.The Cubs cut St. Louis' lead to 2-1 in the third. Luis Valbuena walked, went to second when Starlin Castro was hit by a pitch, Anthony Rizzo hit into a fielder's choice that pushed Valbuena to third and then Alfonso Soriano's single scored Valbuena.The Cubs threatened in the sixth with runners at first and second with just one out, but Brian Bogusevic hit into an inning-ending double-play.The Cardinals increased their lead to 3-1 in the seventh. Pinch-hitter Rob Johnson, batting for reliever Randy Choate, hit a two-out triple to right field, just out of reach of a diving Nate Schierholtz, and Matt Carpenter followed with an RBI double to left-center.Castro closed the score to 3-2 with a lead-off homer in the eight, but the Cubs would get no closer, stranding seven runners in the game.The Cubs are 12-8 in their last 20 games, and are 3-5 vs. St. Louis thus far this season. They faced the best team in baseball for the second straight week. Last weekend, they took two-of-three from the Pittsburgh Pirates, who had the major leagues' best mark at the time.NOTES: Cardinals LF Matt Holliday was held out Friday with right hamstring tightness and is day-to-day. . In addition to signing first round draft pick Kris Bryant, the Cubs also inked 12th round RHP Trevor Clifton and 19th round C Will Remillard. . Saturday's pitchers will be the Cards' Lance Lynn (11-3, 3.67) vs. Matt Garza (5-1, 3.22) for the Cubs. Garza has been the subject of trade rumors in recent days. "He's obviously throwing extremely well and he's very healthy and there are teams out there looking for pitching who are going to call and try to acquire him," Cubs president Theo Epstein said before Friday's game. "He's helping us win games right now, there's a chance to possibly retain him beyond this year, so we'll just balance all that out and do what's best for the organization." . The Cubs have used 42 players thus far this season, a pre-All-Star break team record. . The Cubs came into Friday's game leading the National League with 293 extra-base hits. . Attendance was 37,322.
PHILADELPHIA — The Philadelphia Phillies and Chicago White Sox are going in different directions as they head into their final series before the All-Star break.The Phillies, recently thought to be trade-deadline sellers like the White Sox, have played perhaps their best baseball of the season the past last two weeks. Philadelphia has won seven of 10 and now might be a buyer before the deadline.Chicago (36-53) is in the cellar of the A.L. Central and will likely be a target for contending teams looking to add players for a late-season stretch drive.The Phillies and White Sox got an unexpected Friday night off when rain postponed the opener of their weekend series. The game will be made up as part of a split doubleheader on Saturday with games starting at 3:05 and 8:15 p.m.The weather is the only thing that has slowed the Phillies lately."Our batting average has been going up," manager Charlie Manuel said Friday. "We've been improving as far as our offense, getting runners on base, things like that."Philadelphia, which won five straight NL East titles from 2007-2011, has won four of its last five series, including taking two of three against division leaders Atlanta and Pittsburgh. The Phillies entered Friday 7½ games behind the Braves in the NL East and need one win to get back to .500 for the first time since June 7.White Sox left-hander John Danks (2-6, 4.31) will face right-hander Jonathan Pettibone (5-3, 3.84) in the doubleheader opener on Saturday. Chicago lefty Hector Santiago (3-5, 3.49) will take on Philadelphia's John Lannan (2-3, 4.23) in the nightcap.Manuel hopes the Phillies can carry their hot play into the All-Star break."It would be real good if we could win a series before we go into the break," Manuel said. "It's what we need to do, start winning series. If you do that every day, you're right there, you're sitting in good position."The White Sox began Friday with the third-worst record in baseball, and they trailed Detroit by 13 games in the AL Central. They will likely take a look at young players in the second half.If that happens, manager Robin Ventura said winning won't be sacrificed for development."You try to teach them the right way to do things," Ventura said Friday. "Ultimately, it's to win the game. They have to learn how to win and get better at the same time. That's part of the process."One young player who has shown promise for the White Sox is Josh Phegley, who was called up last week and homered in three of his first five games. He hit the go-ahead grand slam in Thursday's 6-3 victory over Detroit.The Phillies also have been getting production from young players to climb within reach of playoff contention. Twenty-five year-old Ben Revere, who struggled at the start of the season, has batted .441 while hitting safely in 13 of his last 14 games. He raised his average from .200 on May 1 to .304.Domonic Brown, who was selected to his first All-Star team, has been producing all season. He is hitting .281 with 23 homers and 64 RBIs after securing a job during spring training."I'm very proud of him," Manuel said. "He's come a long way. He made a big change. That's what gave him a chance to play, but he's the guy that did it. He's learned a whole lot in the time he's been here."He's very deserving. He was determined. He was going to win a job (in spring training)."The Phillies hope Brown continues to produce. Manuel knows he will need it and more from the rest of the roster."It takes a very good team to compete, to win a division, to go to the World Series," Manuel said. "It takes a very solid baseball team."NOTES: The White Sox placed right-hander Brian Omogrosso on the 15-day disabled list, retroactive to June 29, with a right triceps strain. . Chicago has lost 29 of 41 and is 17-32 on the road this season. . The Phillies are 5-4 in the all-time series against the White Sox and have won all three meetings at Citizens Bank Park.
CHICAGO — Matt Garza pitched into the seventh inning for his fifth consecutive win and Alfonso Soriano homered again, leading the Chicago Cubs to a 6-4 victory over the St. Louis Cardinals on Saturday night.Garza allowed a season-high 10 hits in 6 2-3 innings, but held the NL's highest scoring offense to two runs while improving to 5-0 with a 1.24 ERA in his last six starts. With a handful of scouts from several contenders watching his every move, the right-hander struck out four and walked two.Garza's hot stretch has made him one of the top names on the market ahead of the July 31 non-waiver trade deadline. But he also is eligible for free agency after the season, adding a tricky element to the negotiations between any interested team and a Cubs franchise looking for more top-level prospects for its rebuilding project.Jon Jay had four hits and Matt Adams went 2 for 4 for St. Louis, which had won six of seven, including a 3-2 victory in the second game of the four-game series on Friday night. Lance Lynn was knocked out in the fifth inning in his second-shortest outing of the season.The Cardinals played without outfielder Matt Holliday, who left Thursday's night's 3-0 loss to Chicago due to tightness in his right hamstring. All-Star catcher Yadier Molina was out of the starting lineup on his 31st birthday, but he hit for Rob Johnson in the eighth and stayed in the game.Molina reached on an error by right fielder Julio Borbon, loading the bases with one out. Matt Carpenter hit a sacrifice fly, trimming the Cubs' lead to 6-3, but James Russell got Daniel Descalso to fly out to end the inning.Kevin Gregg allowed Jay's two-out RBI single in the ninth before retiring Pete Kozma with runners on the corners for his 17th save in 19 chances.Tony Cruz started for St. Louis at catcher and singled in Adams in the second. But he also was called for interference during Chicago's three-run rally in the bottom half, setting up Starlin Castro's dribbler up the third base line for an RBI single.The interference call was later changed to a hit for Darwin Barney because he hustled to first on the grounder.Soriano drove Lynn's first pitch of the third over the wall in center field for his 16th homer, extending the lead to 4-1. The slugger went 2 for 5 and is batting .350 (21 for 60) with nine homers and 19 RBIs in his last 15 games, increasing the likelihood that he could be dealt in the next couple weeks.Garza (6-1) escaped a jam in the fourth and was in control until the Cardinals chased him with three hits in the seventh, including Allen Craig's run-scoring single.Garza received a standing ovation from the crowd of 42,240 as he trudged off the mound following Craig's hit, but the pitcher slammed his glove on his right leg as he made his way to the dugout, upset with the hit by his last batter.Matt Guerrier came in with two runners on and got Adams to fly out to end the inning.Lynn (11-4) was charged with six runs, five earned, and a season-high 10 hits in 4 1-3 innings. The right-hander dropped to 5-2 with a 3.30 ERA in eight career appearances against the Cubs.NOTES: The Cubs claimed OF Cole Gillespie off waivers from the San Francisco Giants. Gillespie was hitless in nine at-bats over three games with the Giants before he was designated for assignment on Tuesday. He will join the Cubs before the finale of the four-game series on Sunday night. ... Lynn lasted just four-plus innings in his first start of the season on April 3 at Arizona. ... Cubs OF Nate Schierholtz rested, and manager Dale Sveum said he probably will be off again on Sunday. Sveum said Schierholtz is a little banged up. "A little bit of everything, nothing major," Sveum said. ... Cubs RHP Scott Baker will throw approximately 65 pitches in his first rehab start with Class A Kane County on Sunday, according to Sveum. Baker missed last season with Minnesota after having elbow-ligament replacement surgery. ... The attendance set a season high this season for Wrigley Field. ... All-Stars Adam Wainwright (12-5, 2.30 ERA) of the Cardinals and Travis Wood (6-6, 2.69 ERA) of the Cubs face off on Sunday night in the final game before the break.
CHICAGO — Yadier Molina hit a three-run homer in St. Louis' four-run ninth inning, and the Cardinals beat the Chicago Cubs 10-6 on Sunday night in the majors' final game before the All-Star break.Allen Craig lined a tiebreaking RBI single into left field before Molina drove an 0-2 pitch from Kevin Gregg (2-2) over the wall in left for his seventh homer. Craig and Molina tuned up for Tuesday's game in New York with four hits apiece, helping St. Louis to a season-high 21 hits overall.Chicago went up 4-3 on Darwin Barney's three-run homer in the sixth and pinch hitter Cody Ransom had a tying two-run double in the eighth, but the Cubs' bullpen was unable to hold off the NL's highest-scoring team.Pete Kozma had two RBI singles as the Cardinals won for the seventh time in nine games to salvage a split of the four-game series. Edward Mujica (2-1) had his second blown save opportunity in 28 chances, but managed to get the win on the same day he was chosen to replace teammate Adam Wainwright on the NL All-Star team.Despite injuries to key pitchers Chris Carpenter, Jaime Garcia and Jason Motte, St. Louis heads to the All-Star break with baseball's best record at 57-36. It leads the NL Central by one game over surprising Pittsburgh, which lost 4-2 to the New York Mets earlier in the day.Barney also had a run-scoring single for the Cubs, who went 6-4 on a 10-game stretch in Chicago that included a makeup game at the crosstown White Sox last Monday. The four RBIs for Barney matched a career high set in a 14-4 victory against Pittsburgh on July 30, 2012.After a slow start, the Cubs (42-51) are a respectable 24-21 in their last 45 games. It's good enough for a four-game improvement compared to last year at this point, when the North Siders were 38-55 on their way to their first 100-loss season since 1966.The Cardinals carried a 3-1 lead into the sixth, but Wainwright got into trouble after Alfonso Soriano began the inning with a fly ball to the warning track in right. Dioner Navarro and Brian Bogusevic then hit consecutive singles to put runners on first and second.Wainwright bounced back to strike out Dave Sappelt, but his first pitch to Barney was up and over the plate, and he drove it into the basket in left field for his sixth homer.That proved to be just a minor little speed bump for the Cardinals, who used four hits to regain the lead during a two-run seventh. Kozma singled in Molina to tie it at 4 and eventually came around on Matt Carpenter's bouncer into center field.Adams tacked on an RBI double in eighth, setting the stage for the wild finish.Travis Wood, who will represent the Cubs at the All-Star festivities, allowed three runs and a season-high 10 hits in 5 2-3 innings. It matched the shortest outing of the year for the consistent lefty, who pitched at least six innings in 17 of his first 18 starts.Molina was out of the starting lineup for St. Louis' 6-4 loss on Saturday night and began the night in a 1-for-19 rut covering his previous seven games. But he singled in each of his first two at-bats and forced Bogusevic to make a leaping catch against the wall in center in the eighth.NOTES: Cardinals OF Matt Holliday (right hamstring tightness) missed his third consecutive game. "We need to be real careful so we can continue to progress, make sure we are aiming for that first day after the break," manager Mike Matheny said. ... OF Cole Gillespie joined the Cubs, and reliever Henry Rodriguez was designated for assignment to make room on the roster. Gillespie was claimed off waivers from San Francisco on Saturday. He had a pinch-hit single in the eighth. ... Cubs RHP Scott Baker allowed four runs and six hits in three innings in his first rehab start with Class A Kane County. Baker missed last season with Minnesota after undergoing elbow-ligament replacement surgery. "Today was a big hump, to pitch against hitters and getting in a real game and the whole atmosphere and everything," Cubs manager Dale Sveum said, "and then hopefully we just start seeing gradual pickup in the velocities and all that."
NEW YORK — One by one they came out of the bullpen, hard throwers on a mission to shut down many of baseball's top hitters.Even with its own studs such as Matt Harvey and Clayton Kershaw, the National League couldn't match up. The AL's 3-0 victory at Citi Field on Tuesday night was an arms showcase."We all came tonight and we brought it," Scherzer said. "You got guys who just can absolutely light up a radar gun, but not only that, throw multiple offspeed pitches for strikes."It was just the third shutout for the AL, following 1946 at Boston's Fenway Park and 1990 at Chicago's Wrigley Field.Scherzer, throwing at up to 99 mph, pitched a 1-2-3 first. Sale followed with a pair of perfect innings, reaching 96 mph.Six up. Six down."I don't think I've been a part of a baseball experience like that in my entire life," Sale said.The rest weren't shabby either, with Greg Holland topping out at 97 and Grant Balfour at 95. Matt Moore, Steve Delabar and Joe Nathan all reached 94, Brett Cecil 93 and Felix Hernandez 92, throwing sinkers on nine of 13 pitches.Mariano Rivera threw 16 pitches, all cutters ranging from 89-91, in a perfect eighth remembered for his introduction, when the other All-Stars left the field to him alone during a 1 1-2 minute ovation.The NL managed three hits and one walk for four baserunners in all. And these weren't just any batters, but All-Star sluggers with shining colored spikes and enough honors to fill two dozen trophy dens."It's not fun," said David Wright of the host New York Mets. "You think of the broad spectrum of being an All-Star and it gets you excited. And then when you get down to the nitty-gritty and you look in there and you've got to face those pitchers, it's like, 'OK, maybe this isn't as fun as I thought it was going to be.' Every guy comes in throwing high 90s with good secondary pitches. And this is difficult."Carlos Beltran's one-out single to left-center in the fourth against King Felix gave the NL its first baserunner, and pinch runner Andrew McCutchen was stranded on third base when Wright grounded out.Hernandez isn't used to warming up in the middle of a game."It was pretty weird. I don't feel that comfortable that way," he said.Michael Cuddyer reached on a leadoff walk against Balfour in the sixth, Wright singled softly to center against Greg Holland in the seventh and Paul Goldschmidt doubled to deep right off Nathan in the ninth."That's a good lineup we threw out there, a lot of great hitters," NL manager Bruce Bochy said. "They shut us down."
DENVER — Jeff Samardzija pitched effectively into the eighth inning and Anthony Rizzo doubled home the go-ahead run in the seventh, leading the Chicago Cubs past the Colorado Rockies 3-1 Friday night.Alfonso Soriano added a home run, his 17th, and Junior Lake, recalled by Chicago from Triple-A Iowa before the game, had three hits in his major league debut, including a double in his first career at-bat. Darwin Barney drove in an insurance run with a ninth-inning double.Samardzija (6-9) kept the Rockies in check by limiting them to one run on four hits in 7 1-3 innings, bouncing back after tying a career high by allowing nine runs in a 13-2 loss to the Los Angeles Angels on July 10.He walked three and struck out six, including striking out the side in the seventh, when he set down All-Stars Carlos Gonzalez, Troy Tulowitzki and Michael Cuddyer.D.J. LeMahieu doubled off Kevin Gregg to start the ninth and advanced to third on a ground out by Gonzalez. Tulowitzki walked before Gregg induced Cuddyer to ground into a game-ending double play for his 18th save in 20 chances.Chicago regained the lead in the seventh, sparked by Cody Ransom's two-out walk off reliever Edgmer Escalona (1-3). Rizzo followed by lining a double down the right field line. He was thrown out trying for third but not before Ransom had crossed the plate with the go-ahead run.Soriano gave the Cubs a 1-0 lead when he homered to start the fourth inning, driving Jorge De La Rosa's 0-1 pitch into the stand of evergreens beyond the center field wall. It was his 389th homer, tying him with Hall of Famer Johnny Bench for 57th on the career list.Dexter Fowler evened the score when he led off the Rockies' half of the fourth with a homer, his 11th. He drove Samardzija's first offering beyond the center field wall in almost the same spot as Soriano's.The Rockies had a chance to go in front after Tulowitzki and Cuddyer hit consecutive two-out singles. With Todd Helton up, a low pitch skipped past Welington Castillo, but the ball bounced off the backstop and the catcher corralled it, making an off-balance throw to Samardzija covering at home just in time to tag out Tulowitzki, who had broken for the plate.De La Rosa went six innings and allowed one run on five hits.NOTES: Lake, an oufielder-infielder, filled the roster spot of OF Brian Bogusevic, who was placed on the 15-day disabled list with a left hamstring strain. ... The home run was Soriano's 15th extra-base hit since June 28, tops in the NL in that span. ... Fowler's home run was his first since hitting two against the Los Angeles Dodgers on June 2. ... The Rockies opened the second half with a 10-game homestand, while Cubs began a 10-game road trip. ... Rockies right-hander Juan Nicasio (5-4) is set to pitch Saturday night's game against the Cubs. He'll be opposed by RHP Carlos Villanueva (2-5).
CHICAGO — Alex Rios hit a grand slam and drove in five runs, and Jake Peavy pitched six solid innings in his return from the disabled list to lead the Chicago White Sox to a 10-6 victory over the Atlanta Braves on Saturday.Rios, who had been in a 2-for-20 slump, went 3-for-5 to help Chicago win for just the 10th time in 32 games.Peavy (7-4), making his first start since June 4 because of a fracture rib, got off to a shaky start. He allowed a two-run homer to Dan Uggla in the second inning and two more runs in the third. But he shut down the Braves during his final three innings.He allowed seven hits in six innings, and just two of the four runs charged to him were earned.Braves starter Paul Maholm (9-9) was forced out in the fourth inning because of a sprained left wrist. He was staked to a 4-0 lead but couldn't hold it. He allowed seven runs and seven hits in three-plus innings.The soft-tossing left-hander started struggling with his location after retiring six of the first seven batters he faced.But the first five batters in the third inning got on, capped by Rios' grand slam that gave the White Sox a 5-4 lead.Rios' 12th homer of the season ended a power drought of 120 at-bats. It also came a day after the right-fielder was pulled out of a game for not running hard to first base.During the White Sox 6-4 loss to the Braves on Friday, Rios hit what appeared to be a routine double-play grounder in the fifth inning. Braves shortstop Andrelton Simmons bobbled the ball, and Rios likely would have beaten the throw to first, but he didn't run hard out of the box.Instead of a run scoring, the White Sox were out of the inning. Chicago manager Robin Ventura removed Rios in the seventh.On Saturday, the Sox followed their five-run third with a four-run fourth to break the game open.NOTES: Before the game, Rios acknowledged he was wrong for not hustling, but wished it had been managed differently. "It would have gone through better if he put me in his office and talked to me personally," he said of Ventura. "If he wants to make a statement for the team, it probably worked." . Braves RHP Brandon Beachy, recovering from Tommy John surgery in 2012, pitched five innings to get the win in a minor league rehab start on Friday. "He threw the ball really well," Braves manager Fredi Gonzalez said. "The report after the game was it's the best he's felt in a while." . Braves LHP Mike Minor (9-4) faces LHP Jose Quintana (4-2) in the series finale on Sunday.
ST. LOUIS — The St. Louis Cardinals are making the best of the All-Star break with outfielder Matt Holliday, who they believe just needs a little more time to recover from a strained hamstring.Holliday was placed on the 15-day disabled list on Saturday, retroactive to July 12. The No. 3 hitter had already missed four games after getting hurt running to first on July 11 at Chicago."It was that missing 10-20 percent where he still felt a little something," manager Mike Matheny said. "We just had too many things going in our favor, all the time that's already passed, the break, a day off on Monday."Matheny didn't want to risk keeping Holliday active to pinch hit, knowing players have a hard time throttling back."If it's a big run, it's the last out of the game, when you kick it in gear and you might be safe and we win, how do you not?" Matheny said.The team purchased the contract of first baseman/outfielder Brock Peterson, a Pacific Coast League All-Star at Triple-A Memphis, in time for Saturday night's game against the Padres. Carlos Beltran batted third.The 33-year-old Holliday, a career .310 hitter, is batting .268 with 13 home runs and 47 RBIs.The 29-year-old Peterson was batting .306 and led the PCL with 22 homers to go with 66 RBIs in 93 games at Memphis and is making his major league debut."His eyes are spinning a little bit now, and rightfully so," Matheny said. "He's very excited and it's just a great story. But nothing's been given to him, he's had a tremendous season and I think he'll fit in well with what we're looking to do."
It was late February, sunny and warm in San Diego, when Mark Prior picked up his phone to make a call. Prior, the former can't-miss fireballer who had been expected to help end the most unquenchable of sports droughts, was again unemployed.It had been seven years since he last appeared in a major league game, and longer since he was supposed to lift the curse that has kept the Chicago Cubs out of the World Series. The Cubs had decided he was no longer worth their time, that he was not ever going to be the answer.Although it is difficult to recall now, Prior once set the bar for big-name rookies, receiving what was then the largest contract for a baseball draft pick. He was an All-Star and a Cy Young contender by 2003, the year he became a Sports Illustrated cover boy and a designated franchise savior.He was, in most every way, Stephen Strasburg before Stephen Strasburg.But as quickly as Prior rose, he fell.He was on the mound for one of baseball's most notorious playoff losses. He was a 22-year-old with history in his grasp, with five outs to go to put the Cubs in the World Series for the first time in nearly 60 years. But it did not happen.Quickly enough, he became injury prone and was considered soft. By age 25, he was a cautionary tale. By 26, he was gone from the major leagues.As he descended, he became the subject of considerable hand-wringing. Someone had to be blamed for his demise, for the waste of all that talent, and someone was. But on that late February day, that did not keep Prior from reaching out to the scapegoat. He called Dusty Baker.Their paths first crossed in 2003 in Chicago, where Baker was the Cubs' new manager and Prior was a second-year starter. Baker was a baseball lifer, an outfielder for four teams during a 19-year major league career. The previous fall, in his 10th season as a big-league manager, he guided Barry Bonds and the San Francisco Giants to the World Series, where they lost to the Anaheim Angels in seven games.Prior was a University of Southern California standout, selected by the Cubs with the second pick of the 2001 amateur draft after the Minnesota Twins took Joe Mauer. The Cubs gave Prior a $10.5 million deal, a figure that was not exceeded until 2009, when the Washington Nationals gave $15 million to Strasburg.Prior whizzed through the minor leagues, striking out 13.9 batters per nine innings and reaching the majors in 2002. The Cubs were terrible that year, needing three managers to get through the season, and Prior went 6-6 in 19 starts.But 2003 was different. Behind Baker and a young rotation led by Prior and Kerry Wood, the Cubs won the National League Central title on the final weekend of the season, a modest 88-win team with two tough young pitchers.Prior was particularly splendid. He was second to Wood in the N.L. in strikeouts (245), third in earned run average (2.43) and tied for second in wins (18). He also blew away the pitching field in wins above replacement, a measure of a player's value to his team compared with a league average fill-in, posting a 7.5, according to Fangraphs.com.But he was also working a lot of innings, and throwing a lot of pitches, to help get the Cubs into the postseason. He logged 2111/3 innings, almost 45 more than he had a year earlier. In September, as the Cubs battled to make it to the postseason, he averaged 126 pitches a start.Prior and Wood helped the Cubs get past the Atlanta Braves in the first round of the playoffs, which went a full five games. But then came Oct. 14, 2003, Game 6 of the N.L. Championship Series, with the Cubs needing only a victory at Wrigley Field to move past the Florida Marlins and into the World Series.Prior worked seven scoreless innings that night and took a 3-0 lead into the top of the eighth when, with one out, everything unraveled. A double-play grounder was booted by shortstop Alex Gonzalez and, far more famously, a foul ball was not caught when a Cubs fan named Steve Bartman got in the way of Chicago left fielder Moises Alou.The Cubs lost that game and then Game 7, too. Prior never led them back to the postseason. Instead, he began to compile a catalog of injuries, some of them flukes, others stemming from breakdowns of his Achilles' tendon, his elbow, his shoulder.On Aug. 10, 2006, Prior was pulled from a start against the Milwaukee Brewers after three innings. He had allowed five earned runs and walked four batters.It was the last time he appeared in a major league game. Prior missed the 2007 season after Dr. James Andrews placed seven screws in his right shoulder. Prior had torn his labrum, rotator cuff and anterior capsule. The Cubs granted Prior free agency toward the end of 2007, and the San Diego Padres, his hometown team, signed him, knowing he would not be ready to help them until the middle of 2008.Prior never reached the Padres' roster, although after his one-year deal was up, San Diego tried again, re-signing him in January 2009. But Prior could never return, not even to compete in the minor leagues. In all, he tore his anterior capsule three times from 2006 to 2009, a crippling diagnosis for most pitchers."Usually, guys don't come back from that," said Jackson Crowther, his strength and conditioning coach.As it became clear that Prior would never be what he once was, Baker began to realize he was a scapegoat, the manager who squeezed too much from Prior in his quest to get the Cubs into the World Series. Baker, critics said, had been simply too slow to pull Prior out of games.
DAYTONA BEACH, Fla. — Hanging in the corner of Joie Chitwood III's office here is a neon construction vest with a red bull's-eye in the middle and Chitwood's name next to it. The vest is a not-so-subtle joke aimed at managers who are under pressure to get their buildings built on time and under budget.Chitwood, the president of Daytona International Speedway, gets the joke, and the urgency. Eager to recapture the buzz and dollars that defined Nascar's long ascendancy, Chitwood plans to spend two and a half years and up to $400 million to overhaul the 54-year old, 147,000-seat track, transforming the racing world's equivalent of Wrigley Field.With occasional breaks for events like the Daytona 500, Chitwood says he expects to replace the track's rickety bleachers, minimalist concessions and maze of staircases and ramps. The stands along the backstretch will disappear, shrinking the capacity of the track by 31 percent, to 101,000 seats, a nod to declining attendance. Bathrooms, filled with rusting troughs, will be modernized.Five grand entrances, 40 escalators and a dozen elevators (including some large enough to fit a show car) will be added to funnel fans — including a growing number of elderly ones — to wider seats and more lavish suites. The number of points of sale will triple, and wider concourses will include themed "neighborhoods" the size of football fields with a wider variety of food and merchandise choices, like those found at the newest N.F.L. stadiums.The parallels with football are no accident. Like the N.F.L., racing circuits have been trying to attract fans who more and more prefer to watch games and races on high definition screens at home, where food and Internet connections are nearby. So track and stadium operators have been adding in-home experiences like better dining, air-conditioned seating and other amenities."We're all in the same business," said Chitwood, who oversaw the construction of Chicagoland Speedway from 1999 to 2002. "We need to get you off your couch and get you to come to the event. Only it's a little tougher for me because you don't wake up one morning and say, 'I'm going to the Daytona 500 today.' I've got to not just get you off the couch, but get you to make the plans because it's not really a day-of 'I'm going to go to the race' kind of choice."Daytona International Speedway, which is across the street from Nascar's headquarters, is one of many tracks trying to shrink to increase sagging revenue and attendance. Two weeks ago, International Speedway Corporation, which owns Daytona, said it planned to reduce capacity at some of its dozen other racetracks. Indianapolis Motor Speedway, the country's largest racetrack, has also reduced its seating."We're all trying to figure out how to make the facility appear more full," said Doug Boles, the president of Indianapolis Motor Speedway, which plans to spend about $100 million on renovations. "We're looking at how to bring technology to the fans' seats, how does the experience compare to other facilities, how do you make the fans get to their seats easily, and are the concessions easy to find."In some ways, racing is following what baseball, football and other sports have been doing for two decades, starting with the Baltimore Orioles, who moved into Camden Yards, the first in a line of cozier stadiums. Building smaller venues with bells and whistles to attract high-end fans and corporate clients — and to get the average fan to spend more on food and merchandise — is now the norm.But trying to jump-start revenue this way can backfire if prices are raised so high that they alienate budget-minded fans. This is no small matter in the racing world, where fans save their money for months to be able to attend events, and take coolers and drive campers to the races. Treating them as consumers of food and beverages instead of sightseers with a passion for racing could be a mistake, according to some observers."If all of what they do is optimize the experience, widen the seats, put more tchotchkes in there, they are missing the boat," said Rich Luker, the founder of Luker on Trends and ESPN Sports Poll. Fans, he said, are "not there for the Cadillac experience; they're there for a vacation."
ARLINGTON, Texas — Yu Darvish allowed two singles over 6 1-3 scoreless innings in his first start in 16 days, combining with three relievers on a three-hitter as the Texas Rangers beat the New York Yankees 3-0 Monday night.Darvish (9-4), who last pitched July 6 before going on the disabled list with a right trapezius strain, struck out four and walked two. He left after allowing consecutive batters to reach in the seventh, having thrown 60 of 90 pitches for strikes.Just before the game, the Rangers announced they had acquired right-hander Matt Garza from the Chicago Cubs. Garza, who had been scheduled to start for Chicago at Arizona on Monday night, likely will make his Texas debut Wednesday night against the Yankees.Ivan Nova (4-3) struck out four while throwing a season-high 112 pitches over seven innings.All-Star closer Joe Nathan pitched the ninth for his 31st save in 32 chances to cap the Rangers' eighth shutout of the season.The Yankees, coming off an 11-inning loss late Sunday night at Boston, were held scoreless for the eighth time.Texas had reliever Robbie Ross warming up while the Rangers were batting in the sixth. But Darvish came out to start the seventh, and appeared frustrated when manager Ron Washington came out of the dugout to make the pitching change.Ross then got Travis Hafner, the only batter he faced, to ground into an inning-ending double play. Tanner Scheppers worked a perfect eighth.Nelson Cruz homered for the Rangers, who had lost seven of eight games. They were swept at home in a three-game series by Baltimore over the weekend after the All-Star break.Cruz's 23rd homer was a 412-foot solo shot in the seventh that landed in the Yankees' bullpen in left-center field and made it 3-0.The Rangers led for good after Ian Kinsler drew a leadoff walk in the first, stole second base and scored on Adrian Beltre's single — the first run they've scored in the first inning in 11 games. In the sixth, Elvis Andrus had a walk and a stolen base before Geovany Soto doubled.New York didn't have a hit until Lyle Overbay led off the fifth with a bloop single into short left field out of the reach of third baseman Adrian Beltre. The Yankees didn't have another hit until Overbay lined a single to right in the seventh, just before Vernon Wells walked and Darvish came out of the game.Darvish only missed one start for Texas, but was unable to pitch in the All-Star game even though he did go to New York last week.Texas sent rookie right-hander Justin Grimm, top prospect third baseman Mike Olt and Class-A pitcher C.J. Edwards to the Cubs. There will also be at least one player to be named later, possibly two, depending on who is chosen by Chicago.NOTES: The Rangers' bullpen has pitched 22 1-3 consecutive scoreless innings. ... Yankees OF Curtis Granderson, expected back early next month from a broken pinkie, got three at-bats in his first simulated game in Tampa and continued running the bases. Granderson said he feels like it's "at the spring training point again" where preseason games are just a few days away. His status will be evaluated after simulated games Tuesday and Wednesday. ... C Francisco Cervelli, sidelined by right wrist and elbow injuries, did on-field defensive drills and expects to soon start taking batting practice in an indoor cage in Tampa, while INF Jayson Nix (strained right hamstring) got six at-bats in his latest simulated game, but did not run the bases.
CHICAGO — Rick Porcello pitched four-hit ball over seven scoreless innings, Jhonny Peralta homered and the Detroit Tigers took advantage of four errors in a 6-2 victory over the Chicago White Sox on Tuesday night.With MVP and Triple Crown winner Miguel Cabrera sidelined by a hip problem, the AL Central leaders again got all the help they needed from Chicago. One night after matching what was a season-high with three errors and giving up five unearned runs in a 7-3 loss to the Tigers, the White Sox managed to outdo themselves.The four errors matched their highest total since a game at Kansas City on April 6, 2011, and gave them 68 in all — two shy of last year's total. They also matched a season high by falling 19 games below .500.Peralta, meanwhile, delivered an RBI single and scored in a three-run fourth in which the Tigers took advantage of two errors. He also hit a solo drive off Hector Santiago (3-6) in the sixth, and Detroit scored three in the inning to go up 6-0.That was more than enough for Porcello (7-6), who won his third straight start after dropping three in a row. He struck out one and walked three.Santiago took the loss after four straight no-decisions, allowing six runs over six innings. Only three were earned, but just like Chris Sale the previous night, he got no support from his fielders.The error procession started in the first inning when first baseman Adam Dunn appeared to bump Torii Hunter and force him out of the baseline in a rundown. The runner was awarded second base, and manager Robin Ventura got ejected for the first time this season after a heated argument with first base umpire Gary Darling.It only got worse for Chicago in the fourth.Matt Tuiasosopo reached leading off when third baseman Conor Gillaspie booted his grounder and scored from third on a single by Peralta after Victor Martinez doubled. There was also a bases-loaded walk to Don Kelly and a sacrifice fly by Hernan Perez in which right fielder Alex Rios' throw home got away from catcher Josh Phegley, allowing the runner to advance from first to second.Peralta made it 4-0 with his drive to left with one out in the sixth, and the Tigers added two more in the inning with the White Sox committing another error along the way.That happened when left fielder Dayan Viciedo bobbled the ball several times trying to pick it up after Perez tripled with a man on first, allowing both runners to score.As for Cabrera, it wasn't clear how long he will be sidelined. He left Monday's game with a sore left hip flexor muscle and was to be evaluated on Tuesday. But other than saying his star was out, manager Jim Leyland would not reveal much.NOTES: Leyland said 2B Omar Infante, on the disabled list with a sprained left ankle, could soon begin a rehab assignment. Assuming no setbacks from Tuesday's workout, Infante would leave for Class-A West Michigan on Wednesday and could rejoin the Tigers this weekend. Leyland also said LHP Darin Downs (tendinitis in his pitching shoulder) is "probably close to going out and pitching. But I can't tell you when." ... White Sox reliever Jesse Crain threw off a mound Tuesday for the first time since he went on the disabled list with a strained right shoulder and could be ready to return as soon as this weekend, pitching coach Don Cooper said. He is tentatively scheduled to throw on the side on Thursday.
CHICAGO — A relieved Miguel Cabera said he was feeling better after sitting out the Detroit Tigers' 6-2 victory over the Chicago White Sox on Tuesday night because of an injured left hip.He also said he did not go for an MRI and was not sure when he would return to the lineup. Manager Jim Leyland said that could happen that could happen within the next two days against Chicago, and he doesn't expect Cabrera to wind up on the disabled list."I doubt very much he'll play (Wednesday)," Leyland said. "I can assure you, he's not going to play both these games the next two days. ... Will he play one? I can't answer that. But if he played (Wednesday) night, he certainly wouldn't play the day game. I don't know if he'll player either of the two, to be honest with you."The American League MVP and Triple Crown winner, Cabrera left Monday's 7-3 win over Chicago in the fifth inning. He was replaced at third base by Don Kelly with one out in the bottom half of the inning — after scoring in the top half — and walked off holding his left side.The Tigers said then that he had a sore hip flexor muscle and would be evaluated on Tuesday.Kelly was at third base and batting eighth on Tuesday night. Left fielder Matt Tuiasosopo had the No. 3 spot in the lineup.Cabrera, who became baseball's first Triple Crown winner in 45 years last season, had played in 97 of Detroit's 98 games this year. He was leading the majors with a .358 batting average and was second in RBIs with 96.In other injury-related news, Leyland said second baseman Omar Infante, on the disabled list with a sprained left ankle, could soon begin a rehab assignment. Assuming no setbacks from Tuesday's workout, Leyland said Infante would leave for Class A West Michigan on Wednesday and could rejoin the Tigers this weekend."That's the scenario we're hoping for," Leyland said.He also said left-hander Darin Downs, out with tendinitis in his pitching shoulder, is "probably close to going out and pitching. But I can't tell you when."
STATE COLLEGE, Pa. — The NCAA asked a Pennsylvania court on Tuesday to dismiss a lawsuit filed by the family of the late coach Joe Paterno that seeks to overturn the sanctions against Penn State for the Jerry Sandusky child sex abuse scandal.Some trustees, former players and coaches and current faculty members are also taking part in the same lawsuit, which the NCAA said was flawed and contained "various significant legal deficiencies."College sports' governing body said in the filing in Centre County court late Tuesday that the civil suit must be dismissed in part because the university itself isn't part of the suit. The sanctions handed down in July 2012 were agreed to by the NCAA and the university president.The NCAA also firmly denied a claim that it had conspired with former FBI director Louis Freeh's team in formulating the sanctions. Freeh led the school's internal investigation into the scandal, and the Paterno family and three former school officials have vehemently denied Freeh's scathing allegations of a cover-up."Their suit complains primarily about the conclusions of the Freeh Report, conducted at the behest of the Penn State Board, and the university's acceptance of its findings," NCAA chief legal officer Donald Remy said in a statement outlining the organization's arguments. "The NCAA did not commission the Freeh Report nor had any role in it.It was the NCAA's first response to the case since the lawsuit was filed in late May. The NCAA also asked for related complaints against NCAA president Mark Emmert and Oregon State president Ed Ray to be dismissed for lack of merit. Ray was chair of the NCAA executive committee when the penalties were announced."Universities must be free to manage their own affairs, including their membership in the NCAA, without interference by disappointed or disgruntled individuals," Remy said. "While the plaintiffs may be unhappy with the conclusions and university's acceptance of the Freeh Report, the plaintiffs in this case were not sanctioned by the NCAA and have no legal basis to sue."Paul Kelly, a lawyer representing the plaintiffs other than the Paterno family, said Tuesday he had not a chance yet to review the NCAA's lengthy response.The landmark sanctions were announced a year ago Tuesday, on July 23, 2012. They included a four-year bowl ban, steep scholarship cuts and a $60 million fine.The penalties, and the NCAA's handling of the Penn State case, remain the subject of scrutiny among some alumni, area residents and Pennsylvania politicians, as well as in the courts.Earlier Tuesday, three trustees who took seats earlier this month offered support for the five board colleagues involved in the litigation. The suit said that the NCAA bypassed the organization's own rules in levying penalties against the football program with uncharacteristic speed.The lawsuit also attacks Freeh's handling of the internal investigation, along with how and why the NCAA used Freeh's report as a basis for sanctions. "We firmly believe that truth and justice should never fear an open hearing and review — whether in the courts or before the Board of Trustees," trustees Ted Brown, Barbara Doran and William Oldsey said in their joint statement.The alumni-elected trustees elected this spring were endorsed by an alumni watchdog group that has been critical of the decisions of board leaders after the scandal began with Sandusky's arrest in November 2011, including Paterno's firing.The NCAA filing came on the same day that Penn State issued a statement on bowl revenue. The school's nearly $2.3 million share of bowl revenue has been divided among the Big Ten's 12 member schools, including Penn State, to distribute for causes focused on child protection or advocacy. The school said the individual share for each school amounted to more than $188,000.The Nittany Lions finished the 2012 season bowl-eligible at 8-4, but were banned from the postseason as part of NCAA sanctions for the Jerry Sandusky child sex abuse scandal. The $2.3 million represents Penn State's share of conference bowl revenue had the school been allowed to play in the postseason.Penn State said its portion of the carved-up bowl share would be funneled through the Centre County United Way with instructions to split the money between the Stewards of Children program and the Children's Advocacy Center.Coach Bill O'Brien and three players are scheduled to take part in Big Ten media days beginning Wednesday in Chicago.
CHICAGO — Prince Fielder, Austin Jackson and Torii Hunter homered, and Anibal Sanchez pitched six scoreless innings to help the Detroit Tigers overcome Miguel Cabrera's absence in a 6-2 win over the Chicago White Sox on Wednesday night.Cabrera, the reigning AL MVP and baseball's first Triple Crown winner in 45 years last season, left Monday's game in the bottom of the fifth inning with a left hip flexor injury. He hasn't played since and might sit out Thursday, too, when the Tigers go for a four-game sweep.Detroit has won four straight and 13 of 21.Sanchez (8-7) earned his first win since July 6, allowing six hits and striking out five. The right-hander had only allowed five earned runs in his previous two starts, both losses.John Danks (2-8) lost his second straight start and is winless since July 2. He worked seven innings and gave up six runs and 11 hits — including three home runs. Danks is 4-8 against Detroit.Danks has yielded 17 homers in 12 starts for Chicago, which dropped to 20 games below .500 for the first time Sept. 26, 2007. The White Sox are a season-high 16 games out of first place.Detroit, even without Cabrera who is hitting .358 with 31 homers and 96 RBIs, showed plenty of power. Danks matched his season-high by allowing six earned runs.Fielder gave the Tigers a 3-0 lead in the first with his 17th home run. Hunter reached on a fielder's choice, and Matt Tuiasosopo walked before Fielder hit a 1-0 pitch into deep right-center field for his first homer since July 10.Danks retired the first two batters in the second before Jackson hooked the first pitch around the foul pole in left to make it 4-0.Alexei Ramirez's throwing error on Hernan Perez's grounder in the fourth was Chicago's 69th of the season, after the White Sox committed 70 in 2012. Danks got out of the inning by getting Alex Avila to ground to second.In the fifth, Hunter hit his ninth homer of the season to give Detroit a 5-0 lead. Hunter went 2 for 5, improving to .354 in July.Detroit added to its lead in the sixth on an RBI single by Avila.The White Sox avoided a shutout in the seventh on Ramirez's RBI single off Bruce Rondon, bringing in Dayan Viciedo. Viciedo also homered leading off the ninth and had three hits, along with Alejandro De Aza.NOTES: Both White Sox pitcher Jake Peavy and right fielder Alex Rios addressed trade speculation surrounding them. Peavy, bothered by sore ribs after his Saturday start, said he is "pretty abreast" of what's happening and won't "be caught off guard" if he is traded. Rios said he doesn't "have people asking me or telling me what is going on" and he has "no idea" what will happen. . RHP Jair Jurrjens signed a Triple-A contract and will join Detroit's affiliate Toledo on Friday. Jurrjens started his career with the Tigers in 2007 and spent five seasons with Atlanta before signing with Baltimore. He made two appearances this season before becoming a free agent on July 18. . White Sox 2B Gordon Beckham missed his fourth straight game with a strained left wrist sustained Friday. He took soft tosses. . White Sox RHP Jesse Crain, out since July 3 with a strained right shoulder, played catch and said he felt OK. . Thursday's pitching matchup is two former Cy Young Award winners, with Detroit's Justin Verlander (10-7, 3.69) facing Peavy (7-4, 4.19).
ARLINGTON, Texas — Matt Garza wants to make the Texas Rangers proud that they long coveted having him in their rotation.The big right-hander made quite an impression when he finally pitched in a Texas uniform."Same thing I've always saw when he pitched against us," manager Ron Washington said. "The guy can execute pitches. He never gets rattled."Garza pitched into the eighth inning of his Rangers debut, two days after getting traded from the Chicago Cubs. The only run he allowed was unearned after his throwing error in a 3-1 victory over the New York Yankees on Wednesday night."I'm excited. I couldn't be more happy being in a place where I'm at, a place where I'm wanted, been wanted. It's awesome," Garza said. "I felt good. I just wanted to throw strikes."Garza (1-0) was 6-1 in his 11 starts this season for the Cubs. He was 5-0 with a 1.24 ERA his last six starts for Chicago, winning the last five.After giving up consecutive singles to start his first game in a Rangers jersey, Garza retired 15 of the next 16 batters before his throwing error on Brett Gardner's comebacker leading off the sixth. He finished with five strikeouts and no walks, throwing 66 of 95 pitches for strikes."Pounded the zone with vengeance," Washington said."He was as advertised," said David Murphy, who homered for Texas. "We've seen him do it before. It was impressive to see him attack the zone like that."A.J. Pierzynski drove in two runs for Texas, including a tiebreaking solo homer in the bottom of the sixth off Andy Pettitte (7-8).The Rangers were interested in Garza when Tampa Bay traded him to Chicago after the 2010 season. They also inquired about him last summer before he missed the last two months with a stress reaction in his right elbow. He missed the first seven weeks this season because of a strained left lat muscle."He's got good stuff. He has a very good fastball and slider. We hit some balls hard, but right at them," Yankees manager Joe Girardi said. "He gave up hits to the first two batters and got out of the inning, and he kind of got on a roll after that."Gardner's comebacker leading off the sixth rolled away from Garza even though the pitcher was able to get a glove on it. He scrambled to grab the ball, but threw awkwardly off his knee well wide of first base. The speedy Gardner was credited with an infield single and got to third on the errant throw.Garza then snagged Ichiro Suzuki's comebacker for an out before Robinson Cano lined a single over second baseman Ian Kinsler's head to tie the game at 1.Walking off the mound after the inning, Garza was clearly frustrated at himself. He already felt better soon after that, pumping his arms in the air and slapping his hands together when Pierzynski hit his 10th homer."It's just I kept turning. I didn't stop myself from sliding, that's why I didn't let the ball go too well. ... Caught me off guard, it's one of those things " Garza said. "But I made sure I got the next guy out and so close to not letting them score. That's what I was a little (mad) about."Neal Cotts retired all four batters he faced before Joe Nathan got the final out for his 32nd save in 34 chances. The All-Star closer rebounded from the previous night when he gave up two runs in the ninth of a 5-4 loss to the Yankees.Pettitte allowed eight hits and two runs while pitching into the seventh. The 41-year-old left-hander struck out two and walked one."Pierzynski killed him. He usually handles lefties well. He left a slider down but kind of in the middle of the plate, and he hit it out," Girardi said. "We just need to get (Pettitte) some runs."The Rangers quickly led 1-0 after Ian Kinsler had a leadoff single, went to second on a sacrifice bunt by Elvis Andrus and scored on a single by Pierzynski. It was the second time in three games this series they scored a run in the first inning, after 10 consecutive games without a run in the initial frame.NOTES: Even with the victory for the Rangers, it was the 27th day in a row they failed to gain ground in the AL West since Oakland won 4-3 at Houston earlier Wednesday. The Rangers have gone from a half-game lead to three games back in that span. ... Rangers opening day starter Matt Harrison threw live BP, facing hitters for the first time since April. The lefty has been on the DL and had two back surgeries since his last start April 6. Harrison says he felt good and is expected to throw BP again Saturday in Cleveland. ... Yankees OF Curtis Granderson (broken pinkie) said he will start a minor league rehab assignment Thursday night with Class A Tampa and will evaluated at the end of the weekend.
CHICAGO — Urban Meyer was hailed as a savior when he agreed to take over Ohio State in the wake of the tattoo scandal that sullied the program. That support became even more frenzied when he coached the Buckeyes to a 12-0 record in his first season.Like Meyer said Wednesday at the Big Ten media days, it's been a great year — right up until last weekend.Running back Carlos Hyde, star cornerback Bradley Roby and two freshmen were disciplined by the school after a run of legal problems that brought to mind the end of Jim Tressel's time in Columbus, and once again raised questions about Meyer and how he disciplines his players."When a mistake happens or something happened, you have to react and get it done," Meyer said. "So I'm disappointed. I think furious might be the word that would best describe when I first got the phone call, because, like I said, for 12 months it's been really, really good."Hyde, who had a team-high 17 touchdowns last season, was suspended indefinitely after he was named a person of interest in an investigation into an alleged assault of a woman at a downtown Columbus bar early Saturday morning. Roby was one of the players selected to represent Ohio State at the kickoff event in Chicago, but he was pulled after he was arrested in Bloomington, Ind., and accused of misdemeanor battery.Tight end Marcus Baugh also was suspended from all team activities, and Meyer decided to send defensive lineman Tim Gardner back home to Indianapolis. Baugh was arrested last weekend for underage possession of alcohol and possessing a fake identification, and Gardner was charged Saturday night by Columbus police with obstruction of official business."I don't know that you can really blame a guy going out and making a poor choice on coach Meyer because of free will," offensive tackle Jack Mewhort said. "He did not walk in with us everywhere we go, telling us to do this and that. He has a set of core values in place and we know them and we're told them every day. We know as players that if we violate them we're going to be held accountable for our actions."The off-the-field problems come with Meyer facing questions about his relationship with Aaron Hernandez while the tight end played for him at Florida. Hernandez has been arrested and charged with murder in Massachusetts.Asked what it was like to hear his name mentioned in connection with Hernandez in the wake of the charges, Meyer responded: "I felt awful. It's a sick feeling. Your thoughts and prayers are with the family of the victims. Every player situation, every recruit situation, all I know is (it) will always be in the back of my mind. That's all I can say."Ohio State was barred from postseason play last year as part of its punishment for a memorabilia-for-cash scandal that led to the resignation of Tressel. Luke Fickell coached the Buckeyes for a year before Meyer took the reins of the storied program after taking a season off.Meyer spent six years at Florida, winning national titles in 2006 and 2008. He also had 25 players account for 31 arrests during his tenure with the Gators.While Meyer said he isn't worried about his reputation, he acknowledged that the criticism over disciplinary issues still stings."I'm a human, so it does," he said. "I don't read. I don't really get involved with following stuff, because I think people need to get facts before they start just making accusations and those type of things. I'm human and I think that is something that I'm constantly evaluating and making sure we are doing the right thing."With Hyde in particular limbo, Meyer said he would evaluate all the facts before making any decisions about the senior. Sgt. Rich Weiner, a spokesman for the Columbus Police Department, said the investigation was ongoing and cautioned against any rush to judgment in any direction."I've been following reports on this case and most of them have been inaccurate," Weiner said in a phone interview. Weiner said investigators plan to interview Hyde and the woman when she returns next week from a scheduled vacation out of the country.The questionable future for Hyde and Roby casts a shadow over Ohio State's chance for another undefeated season. Star quarterback Braxton Miller leads a talented group of returning players, making the Buckeyes the favorite in the Big Ten and a legitimate contender for the national title.Meyer, for one, is vowing to keep the focus on the field for the sake of the other players on the squad."I don't want a disruption for this team," he said. "The guys work too hard. To have a couple of knuckleheads make some decisions that reflect the entire program, that's not -- I guess it's part of the deal. It's something that bothers me, bothers our staff, and we work very hard to avoid with our players."
ARLINGTON, Texas — By even the very high standards of coach Jurgen Klinsmann, Landon Donovan is regaining top form after taking a break from the national team.Donovan scored two goals and set up another on Wednesday night, helping the United States beat Honduras 3-1 to advance to the CONCACAF Gold Cup final.Klinsmann said the performance was "wonderful to watch.""I have told him in our conversations that 'I measure you. Your benchmark is the best Landon Donovan ever,'" Klinsmann said. "I'm not taking anything less than that. And he is trying to catch up with that. Give him more games. Give him time."While Klinsmann has declined to confirm that Donovan will be rejoining the World Cup qualifying team later this year, the top goal scorer in U.S. history is leaving little doubt that he belongs.Donovan has five goals in the tournament, tying him with teammate Chris Wondolowski for most in the Gold Cup. Donovan has set up seven goals, including four in the last two games.Entering the game, he was the only U.S. player to play every minute of the tournament. He finally was subbed out in the 72nd minute, having earned a rest."It's the most relaxed I've felt," Donovan said. "I feel good, and I'm really enjoying it."The Americans will play the winner of the Panama-Mexico match on Sunday in Chicago. The U.S. has won a team-record 10 straight games.The U.S. struck first when Donovan found Eddie Johnson running through the middle of the Honduran defense. Johnson took a dribble and powered a shot past goalkeeper Donis Escober, giving the U.S. a lead 11 minutes into the game.In the 27th minute, Johnson started another scoring sequence with a pass to midfielder Alejandro Bedoya. Donovan received Bedoya's short chip off his chest in the middle of the goal box and poked a shot past Escober."The first 30 minutes was brilliant football. Brilliant, high pressure, high tempo," Klinsmann said. "We wanted to move the football around and create chances, and that's what we did."Nery Medina of Honduras made it a one-goal game in the 52nd minute, heading in a cross from Marvin Chavez. The Americans countered a minute later when Bedoya ran down a long ball from Clarence Goodson and crossed it to Donovan, who scored from a few yards out."In the end, the U.S. was able to beat us in every aspect of the game," Honduras coach Luis Fernando Suarez said.After the game, it was uncertain whether Klinsmann would be suspended for the final after being ejected in the 87th minute for slamming a ball into the ground. A CONCACAF official said the referee would file a report with CONCACAF's disciplinary committee, which will announce a decision in the next day or two.Klinsmann said he was reacting to a number of hard fouls over the game's final 30 minutes."It was a reaction out of frustration," he said. "It was not meant against the referee, against anybody. It was just frustration. I apologize for that."
CHICAGO — Chicago on Wednesday approved a $500 million proposed renovation of Wrigley Field, the storied home of the Chicago Cubs, which will add luxury boxes, a nearby hotel and eventually a jumbo outfield electronic sign to the 99-year-old baseball venue.The privately financed proposal calls for a $300 million renovation of the park itself and $200 million for improvements outside the park, including the hotel.Famous for its ivy-covered outfield walls, hand-operated scoreboard, and urban location where home run balls sometimes drop onto a residential street, Wrigley Field is a top tourist attraction and has been declared a city landmark.Approval by the Chicago City Council on Wednesday came after months of tortured negotiations between the Ricketts family - which has owned the team since 2009 - and city officials including Mayor Rahm Emanuel. The park is located in a densely populated and affluent neighborhood.At one point in May, Cubs Chairman Tom Ricketts was so frustrated with the negotiations that he threatened to take the team out of Chicago if he did not obtain the outfield signs for advertising.The upgrades also include luxury boxes for fans and corporations, new bullpens for the teams and more space for concessions.Some owners of buildings across the street from Wrigley, who sell tickets to watch games from their rooftops, have objected to the renovation because new outfield signs could obscure their views.Before construction can begin, the Cubs franchise must resolve the threat of a legal challenge from the rooftop club owners, said Julian Green, a spokesman for the Cubs. Another unresolved issue is a proposed pedestrian bridge from the hotel.Ricketts has agreed not to put up the outfield signs for 10 years, on condition that the rooftop owners do not sue and the city strictly enforces its laws on rooftop viewing, such as limits on the capacity of the rooftops, Green said."Thanks to his efforts we are one big step closer to a major investment in one of the top tourist destinations in the state and a major economic engine for Chicago," Green said, referring to Emanuel.Emanuel said he thought the proposal struck "the perfect balance" between the interests of the neighborhood and those of the team, and praised the Cubs ownership for investing in the community."They actually stepped up in the way the prior ownership never had stepped up," Emanuel said, referring to the Chicago Tribune, which owned the team before Ricketts.The Cubs started playing at Wrigley in 1916 and have not won a World Series since 1908, the longest championship drought in Major League Baseball.Attendance at the park, which holds 41,100, has fallen to 12th place from 6th place among all Major League clubs over the last 10 years, according to league data. Crowds at home games this year have averaged 33,000, down from an average of 37,000 in 2003.The Cubs are currently in fourth place of five teams in the National League Central Division, with a losing record.A lurid reminder of the Cubs' record was sent to Ricketts in April - a goat's head in a box. Chicago legend says that a bar owner cursed the Cubs in 1945 when his pet goat was not allowed into Wrigley during the team's last failed trip to the World Series.
CHICAGO — The Chicago City Council is expected to approve on Wednesday a $500 million proposed renovation of Wrigley Field, the historic home of the Chicago Cubs baseball team.The 99-year-old ballpark, famous for its ivy-covered outfield walls and hand-operated scoreboard, is a key tourist attraction and has been declared a city landmark, so major plans like a jumbo video message board in left field and a neighboring hotel need approval.The privately financed proposal includes a $300 million renovation of the park itself and $200 million for improvements outside the park, including the hotel.The plans have already been approved by the city's landmarks and plan commissions, and the city council's zoning committee approved the proposal on Tuesday evening.The Cubs started playing at Wrigley in 1916 and have not won a World Series since 1908, the longest championship drought in Major League Baseball.The Ricketts family, which bought the Cubs from the Chicago Tribune in 2009, say they want to change that losing record and need to revamp Wrigley to generate more revenue to invest in the team.Attendance at the park, which holds 41,100, has fallen to 12th place from 6th place among all Major League clubs over the last 10 years, according to league data. Crowds at home games this year have averaged 33,000, down from an average of 37,000 in 2003.With the alderman for the densely populated neighborhood surrounding the park agreeing to support the proposal after months of negotiations, the full council is expected to approve it on Wednesday.
ARLINGTON, Tex. — When the Yankees first became enamored with Alex Rodriguez in 2004 , the price to acquire him from the Texas Rangers was the young and dynamic Alfonso Soriano.A decade later, the Yankees are trying to bring back Soriano, in part to replace some of the power they have lost in Rodriguez's extended injury absence.Soriano, 37, who has a history of knee troubles, is not the right-handed-hitting threat he once was. But he still possesses more power than most players the Yankees have now, so General Manager Brian Cashman has been in discussions for several days with the Chicago Cubs on a trade that would send Soriano back to the Bronx, according to a person who has been briefed on the matter but was not authorized to speak about it publicly.The New York Post first reported the possible trade in Tuesday's editions.Through Monday, Soriano was batting .256 this season with 17 homers, 24 doubles and 51 runs batted in, predominantly as a left fielder. The 17 home runs would be second on the Yankees behind Robinson Cano's 21, and the doubles would lead the team."He's been a productive player over his career, there's no doubt about it," Manager Joe Girardi said before the Yankees played the Texas Rangers on Tuesday. "He's been an exciting player, a guy that can steal 40 bases, a guy that can hit 40 home runs. So, he's been a good player."Any deal for Soriano would necessitate the Cubs paying some of the nearly $25 million left on his contract. Soriano is being paid $18 million this year and is owed $18 million next year, and the Yankees still are concerned about keeping their payroll below the luxury-tax threshold of $189 million in 2014.Because of his age and his contract, Soriano is hardly the ideal player for the Yankees, who are already saddled with several players older than 35. But there are few better options for the Yankees, whose offense is among the worst in the American League.Cashman has been looking for a right-handed power hitter for the last month and has been tracking Soriano, as well as Justin Morneau of the Minnesota Twins, Michael Young of the Philadelphia Phillies and Mark Reynolds of the Cleveland Indians. The Yankees were told that for now, Young and Reynolds are not available because their teams still think they have a chance to make the playoffs.The Cubs (44-53 through Monday) have little chance, which is why they traded their best pitcher, Matt Garza, to the Rangers on Monday for prospects. They will certainly seek at least one prospect from the Yankees for Soriano, and the better the players the Yankees send, the less they would pay Soriano.If the trade is made, Soriano could play some left field for the Yankees, allowing Vernon Wells to be the designated hitter, or Soriano could be the D.H. Travis Hafner, the current D.H., has been a disappointment, batting only .210 with 12 home runs and a .393 slugging percentage. He has not hit a homer since June 25 and is batting .169 with three doubles in 19 games since then.Soriano hit eight home runs in his first 17 games in July.He first joined the Yankees in 1999 for nine games after he was signed from the Hiroshima Carp in Japan. He did not receive significant playing time until 2001, when he hit .268 with 18 home runs and 43 stolen bases while playing second base. He batted .400 in the 2001 American League Championship Series and hit a memorable home run in Game 7 of the World Series that year in Arizona. The next year, he hit .300 with 39 home runs and 41 stolen bases.But on Feb. 16, 2004, the Yankees traded him to the Rangers with Joaquin Arias for Rodriguez, who at the time was considered the best player in baseball. Soriano played only two seasons in Texas before he was traded to the Washington Nationals. He signed an eight-year, $136 million free-agent deal with the Cubs after hitting 46 homers for the Nationals in 2006.Soriano never really lived up to that big contract, at least in the minds of often-frustrated Cubs fans, who have booed him at various times during his seven years in Chicago. He was perceived as someone who did not always hustle and was not reliable in left field, a position he did not play in the major leagues until he joined the Nationals in 2006. At various times, the Cubs tried to unload him, but his contract made that prohibitive.Eventually, Cubs fans grew to appreciate his relatively steady contributions, which continued as the team struggled in recent years. He even had something of a renaissance in 2012, hitting more than 30 home runs for the first time since 2007 and driving in more than 100 runs for the first time since 2005.Soriano grew to appreciate Chicago, vetoing a trade to the Giants last year because he was afraid the cold weather in San Francisco would jeopardize his achy knees.By remaining in Chicago, he missed a chance to win a championship, something he has never been a part of in his 15 years in the major leagues, although he was three outs from one in 2001.His addition to the Yankees this year would hardly make them championship contenders. But after 10 seasons away, he may still find himself back in a Yankees uniform, which is more than can be said about Rodriguez, whose future with the team remains unclear.
CHICAGO — Bill O'Brien thinks he can do a better job of managing the clock. He wants to improve his communication with his coaches in the press box. Then there are the adjustments for recruiting, practice and team meetings.After a most unusual season, the Penn State coach is focused on putting everything he learned in Year 1 to good use."When you've never done it as a head coach, you're definitely learning on the job, and I learned a lot in my first year," O'Brien said Thursday at Big Ten media days.O'Brien and the Nittany Lions enter this season in a much different spot than a year ago, when the former offensive coordinator for the New England Patriots was adapting to his new role with the school facing unprecedented sanctions for the Jerry Sandusky sex abuse scandal.Just 6½ months after he accepted the job, O'Brien found out he was looking at a four-year bowl ban and steep scholarship cuts. Not exactly an ideal situation for a first-time head coach."A year ago, we had just found out about the sanctions, so that was a tough time," O'Brien said. "That was a time when we had just received in many ways, as far as I'm concerned, some unexpected news. We knew there was something coming down the pipe. And then I'm coming to my first Big Ten media days as a head coach, on top of all that."I think we've learned a lot in a year. I believe we've improved. The years ahead aren't going to be easy, but we have a better handle on things."Considering the controversy swirling around the program, Penn State's 8-4 record last season was one of the best coaching jobs in the country, and O'Brien received several awards. The Nittany Lions dropped their first two games, then won five in a row. The offense developed into one of the most potent units in the conference.But listen to the 43-year-old O'Brien for a while, and it's clear the Boston native expects more — from himself, and his players."We want to be a tough, smart football team. We want good kids. We want to be able to play in all kinds of weather and all those different things," O'Brien said. "I talk about that a lot, whether it's recruiting or Xs and Os."That public emphasis on improvement is consistent with the coach the Nittany Lions see in practice and meetings."He's the same guy but with any competitor and coach O'Brien is a competitor, he always feels like he needs to improve something," safety Malcolm Willis said. "Just certain things like just different techniques that he'll learn or things that he'll watch on film that he picks up, you know he'll inform the team and he's always 100 percent honest with us."While there is an ongoing competition at quarterback and concerns at linebacker, there is still plenty for O'Brien to work with in his second season. Whoever wins the QB job gets to throw it to dynamic receiver Allen Robinson, who had a school-record 77 receptions for 1,013 yards last season. There are 16 returning starters in all, and a total of 38 letterwinners coming back.There will be no postseason again this year, but that hasn't dampened the expectations the Nittany Lions have for themselves."We have the same motivation that any football team in the country does," senior guard John Urschel said. "We love each other. We're a team. We want to do well for each other. We want to fight for each other and we want to win football games for each other, for our team, for our head coach and for our university."While O'Brien is more comfortable in his position than he was a year ago, it's not as if the Sandusky scandal is completely behind the program.The NCAA asked a Pennsylvania court on Tuesday to dismiss a lawsuit filed by the family of the late coach Joe Paterno that seeks to overturn the sanctions against Penn State. Some trustees, former players and coaches and current faculty members are also taking part in the same lawsuit, which the NCAA said was flawed.The ongoing legal questions make for a tricky situation for O'Brien, who recently spoke with the university's Board of Trustees about the NCAA penalties."When I'm asked questions, at times I'll give my opinion," he said. "But right now I'm so focused on the 2013 season, I don't really care about those other things. I know my job is to go out here and do the best job I can to keep this team focused on training camp and Syracuse."
CHICAGO — Reigning American League MVP Miguel Cabrera is not in Detroit's lineup for the third straight game Thursday against the Chicago White Sox.The Tigers third baseman who was baseball's first Triple Crown winner in 45 years last season left Monday's game in the bottom of the fifth inning with a left hip flexor injury. Detroit manager Jim Leyland gave no update Thursday on Cabrera's condition other than to say he's not playing.Cabrera is hitting a major league-best .358 with 31 home runs and 96 RBIs.Don Kelly is playing third for Detroit and batting seventh.Without Cabrera in the lineup, Detroit has won two in a row over the White Sox and scored 12 runs.
ARLINGTON, Texas — By even the very high standards of coach Jurgen Klinsmann, Landon Donovan is regaining top form after taking a break from the national team.Donovan scored two goals and set up another on Wednesday night, helping the United States beat Honduras 3-1 to advance to the CONCACAF Gold Cup final.Klinsmann said the performance was "wonderful to watch.""I have told him in our conversations that 'I measure you. Your benchmark is the best Landon Donovan ever,'" Klinsmann said. "I'm not taking anything less than that. And he is trying to catch up with that. Give him more games. Give him time."The Americans will play Panama, a 2-1 winner over Mexico in the second semifinal, on Sunday in Chicago. The U.S. has won a team-record 10 straight games.While Klinsmann has declined to confirm that Donovan will be rejoining the World Cup qualifying team later this year, the top goal scorer in U.S. history is leaving little doubt that he belongs.Donovan has five goals in the tournament, tying him with teammate Chris Wondolowski for most in the Gold Cup. Donovan has set up seven goals, including four in the last two games.Entering the game, he was the only U.S. player to play every minute of the tournament. He finally was subbed out in the 72nd minute, having earned a rest."It's the most relaxed I've felt," Donovan said. "I feel good, and I'm really enjoying it."The U.S. struck first when Donovan found Eddie Johnson running through the middle of the Honduran defense. Johnson took a dribble and powered a shot past goalkeeper Donis Escober, giving the U.S. a lead 11 minutes into the game.In the 27th minute, Johnson started another scoring sequence with a pass to midfielder Alejandro Bedoya. Donovan received Bedoya's short chip off his chest in the middle of the goal box and poked a shot past Escober."The first 30 minutes was brilliant football. Brilliant, high pressure, high tempo," Klinsmann said. "We wanted to move the football around and create chances, and that's what we did."Nery Medina of Honduras made it a one-goal game in the 52nd minute, heading in a cross from Marvin Chavez. The Americans countered a minute later when Bedoya ran down a long ball from Clarence Goodson and crossed it to Donovan, who scored from a few yards out."In the end, the U.S. was able to beat us in every aspect of the game," Honduras coach Luis Fernando Suarez said.After the game, it was uncertain whether Klinsmann would be suspended for the final after being ejected in the 87th minute for slamming a ball into the ground. A CONCACAF official said the referee would file a report with CONCACAF's disciplinary committee, which will announce a decision in the next day or two.Klinsmann said he was reacting to a number of hard fouls over the game's final 30 minutes."It was a reaction out of frustration," he said. "It was not meant against the referee, against anybody. It was just frustration. I apologize for that."
Scott Kazmir allowed just one hit over eight innings Wednesday, Michael Bourn hit his first career grand slam and the Cleveland Indians routed the host Seattle Mariners , 10-1.The only hit Kazmir gave up was a leadoff single by Justin Smoak in the fifth. Kazmir struck out seven, walked two and allowed an unearned run.Bourn blew the game open in the fifth with his slam on a full-count pitch from reliever Hector Noesi. The loss ended the Mariners' eight-game winning streak.ANGELS 1, TWINS 0 Jered Weaver outpitched Mike Pelfrey with eight innings of two-hit ball, and Albert Pujols drove in the game's only run, leading the Angels to a home victory over Minnesota. Weaver struck out nine and walked one, retiring 19 consecutive batters during one stretch.A'S 4, ASTROS 3 Coco Crisp hit a two-run homer in Oakland's three-run seventh inning to help the Athletics win in Houston.RAYS 5, RED SOX 1 David Price pitched a five-hitter for his third complete game of the season, Wil Myers had a two-run single, and surging Tampa Bay won for the 19th time in 22 games by beating Boston at Fenway Park.ROYALS 4, ORIOLES 3 Eric Hosmer hit two home runs and Alcides Escobar drove in the winning run in the ninth to lift host Kansas City over Baltimore.TIGERS 6, WHITE SOX 2 Prince Fielder, Austin Jackson and Torii Hunter homered, and Anibal Sanchez pitched six scoreless innings to help Detroit overcome Miguel Cabrera's absence in a win at Chicago.PIRATES 4, NATIONALS 2 The Pittsburgh left-hander Francisco Liriano did not allow a hit until the sixth inning, and Pedro Alvarez homered off Stephen Strasburg, leading the Pirates to a victory in Washington. The Nationals fell to 0-6 since the All-Star break.CARDINALS 11, PHILLIES 3 Jake Westbrook pitched seven solid innings and contributed offensively with his second career stolen base, leading St. Louis to a home victory over Philadelphia.BREWERS 3, PADRES 1 Kyle Lohse pitched seven strong innings and Carlos Gomez had four hits and drove in two runs to lead Milwaukee to a victory at home over San Diego.DODGERS 8, BLUE JAYS 3 Mark Ellis hit a two-run homer to highlight Los Angeles's five-run 10th inning as the Dodgers won in Toronto to complete a three-game sweep.RENOVATION FOR WRIGLEY Chicago's City Council gave final approval to a $500 million renovation of Wrigley Field that includes its first Jumbotron.WEDGE HAS STROKE Mariners Manager Eric Wedge sustained what the club called a "very mild stroke." He has been released from the hospital and is expected to make a full recovery.KEMP ON D.L. AGAIN The Los Angeles Dodgers placed Matt Kemp on the 15-day disabled list with a sprained left ankle and activated the left-handed pitcher Ted Lilly. This is the third time Kemp has been on the D.L. this season.
Putting in another solid performance, the United States national team advanced to the final of the Concacaf Gold Cup with a convincing 3-1 win over Honduras on Wednesday night in Arlington, Tex.Landon Donovan once again proved to be the difference maker; no player in the tournament is playing as well as Donovan, a three-time World Cup veteran. He was involved in all three goals — scoring two of them — and is playing like the standout performer he was at the 2002 and 2010 World Cups. The big question will be how Coach Jurgen Klinsmann fits him into the first team in the remaining World Cup qualifying games later in the year.Kyle Beckerman and Alejandro Bedoya were also standouts, helping the United States create chances and win the midfield battle. Entering the summer, both players were on the bubble as to whether they had a chance to be involved with the World Cup qualifying team. Questions remain, but each helped his cause Wednesday night. Both could play big roles in Sunday's final against Panama in Chicago, when the Americans will try to win the Gold Cup for the first time since 2007.The ratings (on a scale of 1, diabolical; to 10, world class):Nick Rimando: The Real Salt Lake veteran could not be faulted on the Honduran goal, but otherwise it was good performance. He was rarely asked to make a difficult save but commanded his area well. Rating: 5.5Michael Parkhurst: Throughout this tournament, Parkhurst is showing himself to be a dependable right back. He did not have any highlight plays on Wednesday, but Honduras did not have success attacking down his side, and that is his most important job. Rating: 6.0Matt Besler: It is easy to see why Klinsmann rates Besler highly. He is sturdy defensively and, unlike many American center backs in the past, he can pass well. All of these attributes were on display against Honduras, and the midtournament addition of Besler to the team should give the Americans an advantage in the final. Rating: 6.5Clarence Goodson: After a series of standout performances in the Gold Cup, Goodson did not have a good game against Honduras. He lost Nery Medina on the Honduran goal and nearly cost the U.S. a second goal with a turnover in the 70th minute. His very nice long ball out of the back to set up the final U.S. goal helps his rating, but it would not be a surprise to see Omar Gonzalez get the start over Goodson in the final. Rating: 4.5DaMarcus Beasley: It has been a good tournament for Beasley, but he struggled to make an impact offensively. Rating: 5.0Kyle Beckerman: A second straight strong performance. Beckerman forced numerous turnovers and distributed the ball well from deep positions. He is not a flashy player but does the dirty work needed to win games, as he did Wednesday by eliminating Honduras's ability to control the midfield. Rating: 6.5Stuart Holden: Holden has shown glimpses of the way he was able to play before a series of injuries cost him about two years away from the national team. What is missing, however, is consistency, and Holden did not have a complete performance against Honduras. He helped the U.S. maintain more possession but was also invisible for long stretches. He deserves praise for fighting through injuries, including a vicious elbow to the face in the first half. Rating: 5.0Alejandro Bedoya: While Landon Donovan's goals will grab all the attention, Bedoya might have had the most important night from an individual perspective. After a terrific season in 2013 with Helsingborg in Sweden, Bedoya needed to show that his club success could translate to the national team. With two assists and an outstanding overall performance, Bedoya made a case that he can help this team in the important games that lie ahead. To make the World Cup team next year, he will probably have to beat out Joe Corona as a player who can play both on the wings and centrally. It will be an interesting competition. Rating: 7.5Jose Torres: It was a mixed performance from Torres, who helped the U.S. maintain a possession advantage but was not able to create as many dangerous opportunities as he had in recent games. He was not effective in the final third and was not involved in many scoring chances. He appeared rattled by the very physical play of Honduras. Rating: 5.0Landon Donovan: It is getting a little redundant to heap praise on Donovan in this Gold Cup, but he was remarkable yet again. In his 150th international appearance, Donovan scored twice and assisted on the third goal. His numbers since his return this month are staggering: in six games, he has seven goals and seven assists. For his international career, he has 56 goals and 55 assists. The next challenge for Jurgen Klinsmann will be finding a role for Donovan with the first team. If he successfully integrates Donovan into the core group of players, the U.S. could be very dangerous next year in Brazil. Rating: 8.5 and man of the matchEddie Johnson: In a game in which the U.S. needed a target striker, Johnson was a perfect fit. He showed good ball control and finishing ability — scoring the opening goal — and he was instrumental in the second goal, when he headed the ball to a rushing Bedoya, who then passed it to Donovan. Johnson is not a complete forward, but he is lethal in certain situations, and Honduras proved to be one of those times. Rating: 7.0Mix Diskerud: Coming into the game in the 67th minute for Beckerman, Diskerud had an off night in an otherwise good tournament. In contrast with his performance in earlier games, he did not connect well with his teammates, nor did he force as many turnovers as Beckerman. Rating: 4.5Brek Shea: Like Diskerud, Shea came on in the 67th minute, for Jose Torres, and was not as productive either offensively or defensively. He had little impact, and his confidence is clearly lacking. Rating: 4.0Chris Wondolowski: Coming on in the 72nd minute, Wondolowski had the unenviable job of replacing the magnificent Donovan. The U.S. was not pressing as much late and didn't have many opportunities, but he should have earned a penalty — if the referee hadn't blown the call. Rating: 5.5Jurgen Klinsmann: One of the major story lines from the game was how Klinsmann was sent off by the referee Walter Quesada in the 87th minute, but Klinsmann had every right to be upset. Quesada had a poor game and lost control of the match early. The U.S. was fortunate to escape the game without an injury. A disciplinary committee will determine if Klinsmann will be suspended for the final. As for the game, Klinsmann chose the lineup well, and it was a bold decision to start Bedoya over Corona, who had been playing well. Bedoya repaid Klinsmann's faith with a terrific performance. None of his substitutes helped the U.S., but it was a good performance nonetheless, and he probably earned the respect of his players by sticking up for them with the officials. Rating: 7.0
ARLINGTON, Tex. — Landon Donovan scored two goals and set up another, and the United States beat Honduras, 3-1, on Wednesday night to advance to the Concacaf Gold Cup final.Coach Jurgen Klinsmann said Donovan's performance was "wonderful to watch."The United States struck in the 11th minute after Donovan found Eddie Johnson running through the middle of the Honduran defense. Johnson took a dribble and powered a shot past goalkeeper Donis Escobe. In the 27th minute, Johnson started another scoring sequence with a pass to midfielder Alejandro Bedoya. Donovan received Bedoya's short chip off his chest in the middle of the penalty area and poked in a shot.Nery Medina of Honduras made it a one-goal game in the 52nd minute, heading in a cross from Marvin Chavez. But the Americans countered a minute later when Bedoya ran down a long ball from Clarence Goodson and crossed it to Donovan, who redirected it in from close range.The Americans will play Panama, a surprise 2-1 winner over Mexico in a later game on Wednesday, in Chicago on Sunday. The United States has won a team-record 10 straight games.Donovan has five goals in the tournament, tying him with his teammate Chris Wondolowski for most in the Gold Cup. Although assists are not an official statistic in the Gold Cup, Donovan has set up seven goals, including four in the last two games.It is uncertain whether Klinsmann will be suspended for the final after being ejected in the 87th minute for slamming a ball into the ground. A Concacaf official said the referee would file a report with the disciplinary committee, which will announce a decision in the next day or two. Klinsmann said he was reacting to a number of hard fouls over the game's final 30 minutes."It was a reaction out of frustration," he said. "It was not meant against the referee, against anybody. I apologize for that."
CHICAGO — Urban Meyer, the football coach at Ohio State , stepped to the lectern at Big Ten media day Wednesday and summed up his predicament succinctly. "Tough couple days," he said.For an event usually highlighted by buzzwords like excitement, two-a-days and potential, Meyer's afternoon was decidedly more somber.The way Meyer runs his program has been scrutinized since Aaron Hernandez was charged last month with the murder of Odin Lloyd. Hernandez, a former New England Patriots tight end, had several brushes with the law at Florida, where he played for Meyer. Critics have noted that 41 players from Meyer's 2008 Florida team, which won the national championship, were arrested during or after college.Recently, concern has risen over player conduct at Ohio State. This week, Meyer announced discipline for four Buckeye players.Running back Carlos Hyde was suspended after he was investigated in connection with an assault case. The junior cornerback Bradley Roby did not attend media day after he was arrested on a battery charge. The freshman Marcus Baugh will not play in the team's first game after he was charged with possession of fake identification and underage possession of alcohol. Tim Gardner, another freshman, will not be on the team this season after a charge of obstructing official police business.All of that meant Meyer faced a series of questions Wednesday about the pattern of behavior, personal responsibility and his role in the episodes. At times, he sounded like a guidance counselor as much as a football coach."I think you always can do more," Meyer said. "I mean, that's something you wake up every day with."Meyer, for the most part, spoke calmly, dutifully and with a measure of introspection. Asked what it was like to hear his name mentioned in discussions about Hernandez, Meyer paused before answering."It felt awful," Meyer said. "It was a sick feeling. Your thoughts and prayers are with the family of the victims. Every player's situation, every recruit's situation, it's in the back of my mind."He seemed to vacillate between soul searching about what he could have done differently and expressing frustration in his players who have had legal troubles."In the end you've got to feel in your heart we're doing the right thing, that we're in the people business and we have to do what's right by those people," Meyer said. "There's never been one time that I thought that we did wrong by that person."Now, sometimes I sit back and evaluate that we give too many second chances. That seems to be a big key, and that's something I'm going to continue to evaluate."He added, in defense of the Ohio State program: "The guys work too hard. To have a couple of knuckleheads make some decisions that reflect the entire program, it's something that bothers me, bothers our staff, and we work very hard to avoid with our players."Meyer, about to enter his second season as the Buckeyes' coach, dominated the proceedings at a downtown Chicago hotel.Most of the other Big Ten coaches were asked to comment on his situation and to discuss what, if anything, coaches could do to ensure their players were good citizens.Gary Andersen, the first-year coach at Wisconsin and a former Meyer assistant at Utah, acknowledged the difficulty Meyer was facing. But Andersen expressed confidence in him."He's a good person, good family man, and somebody I have great respect for," Andersen said. "I think Coach will handle it very fairly."Of coaching college players, Andersen said: "They're never going to be perfect, but that doesn't mean we shouldn't strive for that and educate them, help them grow from young men to men. Then you hope they make the right decisions."Ohio State quarterback Braxton Miller also expressed support for his coach."People are coming down on Coach Meyer, but I don't really feel like that's his responsibility or his fault," Miller said. "I feel like it was just college kid mistakes."In his introductory remarks, Meyer joined the chorus of the coaches who preceded and followed him, speaking of high hopes for the coming season. But he was not afforded much of an opportunity to talk about football once the question-and-answer session began.After 15 minutes with reporters in a large ballroom and another 15 minutes in a more intimate setting at an upstairs banquet hall, Meyer looked weary. After yet another question about player conduct, he said, "I'm going to move on and talk about the Buckeyes.""One of the best things that happens is in 12 days we move into a hotel," he added, referring to training camp. "We wake up every morning and go to work."
CHICAGO — James Shields tossed seven shutout innings and rookie David Lough homered and drove in another run to lead the Kansas City Royals to a 5-1 victory over the Chicago White Sox on Friday night.The Royals (49-51) have won four straight and six of eight since the All-Star break. The White Sox (40-60) have lost four of five.Shields (5-7) allowed eight hits and walked two but faced only one real scoring threat, working out of a bases-loaded jam in the sixth inning.The veteran right-hander, in his first season in Kansas City, has pitched better than his won-loss record might indicate. He lowered his ERA to 3.09 and has been especially effective on the road, where he improved to 4-3 with a 2.50 ERA in 12 starts.Chicago starter Jose Quintana (5-3) also pitched well but allowed two runs on six hits in seven innings to pick up the loss.Lough led off the top of the third inning with a home run into the right-field bullpen to give the Royals a 1-0 lead. That's where the score stayed until the seventh, when the Royals stretched the lead to 2-0 on a sacrifice fly by Miguel Tejada that scored Salvador Perez, who led off the inning with a double.The White Sox's best threat against Shields came in the sixth, when they loaded the bases with two outs. But catcher Josh Phegley grounded into a fielder's choice to third base on the first pitch to end the inning.The Sox finally got on the board in the eighth on a solo homer by Conor Gillaspie, but the Royals added three insurance runs in the ninth on run-scoring hits by Lorenzo Cain and Mike Moustakas, and a sacrifice fly by Lough.NOTES: White Sox RHP Jesse Crain, who has been on the disabled list since July 3 with a right shoulder strain, played catch on Thursday and said afterward, "It definitely wasn't better today." Crain, who has a 0.74 ERA in 38 appearances this season, said he will take four or five days off before throwing again next week. . Although he's not ready to commit to it long-term, Royals manager Ned Yost said he will keep first baseman Eric Hosmer batting second for now. "Traditionally, a situational guy hits second," Yost said. The slugging Hosmer was hitting .321 with a .519 slugging percentage in July before Friday. . White Sox infielder Gordon Beckham was back in the lineup on Friday after missing five games with a strained left wrist, the same wrist he had surgery on earlier this season. "There's some soreness but no pain, so it's go time," he said. . Royals RHP Wade Davis (4-9) faces LHP Chris Sale (6-9) Saturday night in the second game of the series.
UNCASVILLE, Conn. — Elena Delle Donne will miss the WNBA All-Star game on Saturday while recovering from a concussion.The No. 2 pick in the draft was injured in the Chicago Sky's loss to Washington on Wednesday when she was going for a loose ball with a minute left in the third quarter."It's unfortunate that I am unable to be a part of All-Star weekend," Delle Donne said. "I was very excited to join the other players for a memorable experience. It's upsetting not only for me but also for the fans who voted for me. The most important thing for me at this time is to rest and recover for the second half of the season."Delle Donne, who is averaging 18.2 points a game, is the first rookie to lead the All-Star voting and will be replaced on the Eastern Conference roster by Atlanta's Erika de Souza.Top draft pick Brittney Griner won't play but will attend the league's showcase game this weekend at Mohegan Sun Arena. Griner is still recovering from a sprained left knee and was replaced on the roster by veteran Tina Thompson on Thursday.A former star at Delaware, Delle Donne helped guide Chicago to first place in the Eastern Conference, and the Sky are looking to make the playoffs for the first time in franchise history.Had Delle Donne and Griner both played, it would have been the first time in league history that two rookies from the same class started an All-Star game. Sue Bird and Catchings started in 2002. Catchings missed her entire 2001 rookie season because of a knee injury.Griner, Delle Donne and fellow rookie Skylar Diggins have already provided a boost to the league, increasing ratings, attendance and merchandise sales. TV household ratings have doubled on ESPN2 compared to last season, and the game pitting Griner against Delle Donne drew the league's highest regular-season ratings in nine years.
ARLINGTON, Tex. — Nine years after he was traded by the Yankees to the Texas Rangers for Alex Rodriguez, Alfonso Soriano appears headed back to the Bronx, while the injured Rodriguez languishes in Tampa, Fla.The Yankees and the Chicago Cubs were on the verge of completing a deal Thursday to trade Soriano to the Yankees, according to one of the baseball officials involved in the deal.Cubs Manager Dale Sveum scratched Soriano from the starting lineup on Thursday in Arizona, then told reporters a deal with the Yankees was close to being completed.The Yankees are in desperate need of more offense, especially from a right-handed hitter. Soriano was batting .254 for the Cubs, with 17 home runs and 24 doubles. Eight of his home runs have come in July.Soriano could be used mostly as a designated hitter, and he should play left field at least some of the time. But like so many of the current Yankees, he is in his late 30s (he's 37) and has a history of injuries, especially knee problems. But few other trade options were available, so Soriano became the Yankees' primary target with less than a week to go before the nonwaiver trade deadline.The Yankees' weak offense ranks last in the 15-team American League in slugging percentage (.371) and 14th in batting average (.242) and home runs (88). A year ago, Curtis Granderson and Mark Teixeira combined for 67 home runs, but both are injured, along with Derek Jeter and Alex Rodriguez.Soriano is still guaranteed nearly $25 million through next year, and the Yankees still have interest in keeping their payroll below the luxury-tax threshold of $189 million in 2014. The Cubs are expected to pay a large portion of the salary left on his contract.Although his time in Chicago was marred by what Cubs fans felt was a lack of production relative to his huge contract, Soriano became a leader on the team, and he hit 181 home runs in seven seasons. After two years in Texas following the deal for Rodriguez, Soriano was traded to the Washington Nationals, and he hit 46 home runs for them in his final season before free agency.He signed an eight-year, $136 million deal with the Cubs in 2007, and soon became the target of booing from that team's fans. The Cubs tried in vain to trade him, but his prohibitive contract made that impossible until last year, when he showed signs of a comeback. He hit .262 in 2012, smashing 32 home runs and knocking in 108 runs. The Giants tried to trade for him, but Soriano vetoed the deal — as was his right as a player with 10 years in Major league Baseball and the latter 5 with one team — citing the cold weather in San Francisco as a detriment to his knees.Returning to New York was not considered an obstacle.Soriano's contract was originally purchased from the Hiroshima Carp in Japan 1998, and he joined the Yankees briefly in 1999. In 2001 he hit .268 with 18 home runs and 43 stolen bases while playing second base. He batted .400 in the 2001 American League Championship Series and hit a memorable home run in Game 7 of the World Series that year against Arizona that briefly gave the Yankees the lead. The next year, he hit .300 with 39 home runs and 41 stolen bases.But on Feb. 16, 2004, after the Boston Red Sox failed to acquire Rodriguez in a trade, the Yankees swooped in. They traded Soriano to the Rangers with Joaquin Arias for Rodriguez. At the time, Rodriguez was considered the best player in baseball. Today both he and Soriano are older, fading players. While Rodriguez's future is in doubt, the Yankees believe Soriano has enough power left to help them.
SAN FRANCISCO — Julio Borbon and Junior Lake scored on an error by San Francisco first baseman Brandon Belt in the ninth inning and the Chicago Cubs rallied for a 3-2 win over the Giants on Friday night.Borbon singled leading off the inning against Giants closer Sergio Romo (3-5) and moved to second when pinch-hitter Dioner Navarro walked.After David DeJesus struck out looking, Lake reached on a fielder's choice. Anthony Rizzo then hit a sharp liner that went through Belt's legs and into the right field corner.The Cubs, who earlier in the day completed a trade sending slugging outfielder Alfonso Soriano to the New York Yankees, rallied for just the fourth time when trailing after eight innings.Jeff Francoeur had two hits for the Giants, who lost for the fifth time in six games.Matt Guerrier (4-4) retired four batters for the win while Kevin Gregg worked the ninth for his 20th save.Chicago's 14th come-from-behind win came after Francoeur's two-run single off starter Edwin Jackson in the seventh gave the Giants a 2-1 lead.The wild ending was in stark contrast to the pitching duel between Jackson and San Francisco starter Matt Cain.Jackson faced just one batter over the minimum through four innings and carried a two-hit shutout into the seventh until giving up two walks and a double before Francoeur's two-run single.Cain allowed six hits, struck out seven and walked one and was in line to win consecutive starts for the first time since early May until Romo's fourth blown save following the Giants' NL-leading 74th error.The Cubs won only hours after the club completed the Soriano deal with the Yankees. Earlier this month, the team also traded pitcher Matt Garza to Texas and pitcher Scott Feldman to Baltimore.Cubs manager Dale Sveum said he isn't sure if the team is done making moves, but doesn't want it to become a distraction."I'm not exhaling yet," Sveum said before the game. "I don't really see anything else happening but until that 11th hour is here, I don't think you can relax. We don't dwell on it anyway."Nate Schierholtz, batting in the cleanup spot with Soriano gone, doubled and scored Chicago's first run to continue a strong stretch for the Cubs slugging right fielder. He went 1 for 3 and is batting .428 (9 for 21) on the road trip.Pablo Sandoval and Hunter Pence both doubled and scored for San Francisco, which dropped a season-high 10 games below .500 with the loss.Sandoval walked with one out in the seventh and took third on Pence's double. After Belt was intentionally walked to load the bases, Francoeur blooped a two-run single that landed in between second baseman Darwin Barney and right fielder Schierholtz to give the Giants a 2-1 lead. Belt was tagged out trying to score.Notes: Lake went 0-for-5, ending his seven-game hitting streak. It was the longest by any Cubs player starting his career since Jerome Walton's seven-game streak in 1989. ... As part of the trade with the Yankees, the Cubs will send almost $17.7 million to New York to cover the rest of Soriano's contract. Chicago received minor league pitcher Corey Black in the deal. ... San Francisco activated Joaquin Arias from the disabled list, more than two weeks after the reserve infielder underwent an emergency appendectomy. To make room, the Giants optioned right-handed reliever Jake Dunning to Triple-A Fresno (PCL). ... The Giants also acquired RHP Guillermo Moscoso from the Cubs. Moscoso has appeared in 57 games in the majors with Texas, Oakland and Colorado, but has spent this season with Chicago's Triple-A team in Iowa. ... LHP Madison Bumgarner (10-6) pitches for San Francisco on Saturday and has a 2.17 ERA over his past eight starts. ... LHP Chris Rusin (1-0) makes his third start for the Cubs. ... Chicago purchased the contract of RHP Eduardo Sanchez from Iowa (PCL). Sanchez began the season with St. Louis before being waived in May. ... Former Giants Robb Nen and Darren Lewis were in attendance.
(Reuters) - United States coach Jurgen Klinsmann has been suspended for the CONCACAF Gold Cup final for showing dissent on the sideline following his side's 3-1 semi-final victory over Honduras.The suspension was announced on Friday by the CONCACAF disciplinary committee after it reviewed a report from the referee of the match on Wednesday.Klinsmann, who had been unhappy with a series of what he perceived as non-calls and hard tackles against his team, was asked to leave the technical area after "showing dissent towards the referee by throwing the ball in a violent manner".The U.S. will seek its fifth Gold Cup title when it faces Panama on July 28 in Chicago.The decision can not be appealed, CONCACAF said.
While the Yankees continued to field questions about Alex Rodriguez and Derek Jeter, two injured superstars who are not on the 25-man roster, the team announced the reacquisition of the seven-time All Star outfielder Alfonso Soriano, whose return to the Bronx may bring a sorely needed spark to a depleted and feeble lineup.A much-speculated trade with the Chicago Cubs finally became official moments before the team took the field for batting practice on Friday. The 37-year-old Soriano, who played with the Yankees from 1999 to 2003, joined his new teammates just in time to step into the batting cage to take a few swings.In exchange for Soriano, the Yankees sent the 21-year-old pitcher Corey Black to the Cubs. Chicago will pay approximately $18 million of the $25 million Soriano is owed for the next two years.In a sign of how badly the Yankees needed Soriano, he was immediately slotted into the cleanup spot by Manager Joe Girardi despite having hit .254 with a .754 on-base plus slugging percentage with Chicago. His 17 home runs and 51 runs batted in ranked him second on his new team behind Robinson Cano's 21 and 70. The Yankees came into Friday's game second to last in the American League in O.P.S. and home runs. Against left-handed pitching, the Yankees ranked last in the A.L. with a .576 O.P.S. Soriano has a career .860 O.P.S. against left-handers."He's been swinging the bat great; he provides punch to our lineup," Girardi said before the game.Soriano wound up 0 for 5, with a run scored and a run batted in.In five seasons with the Yankees, Soriano, then a second baseman, hit .284 with 98 home runs and an .824 O.P.S.Soriano slumped in the 2003 postseason and was benched in Game 5 of the World Series against the Florida Marlins in favor of Enrique Wilson. In the deciding Game 6, which the Yankees lost, 2-0, Soriano hit ninth. It would be his last appearance with the Yankees. He was traded to the Texas Rangers just before the 2004 season in a package that netted third baseman Alex Rodriguez."By far, he's the best available bat to date," General Manager Brian Cashman said.Meanwhile, the player the Yankees received in exchange for Soriano in 2004, Rodriguez, continues to give the team headaches. Cashman was asked Friday about Rodriguez's interview with the radio station WFAN on Thursday evening in which he hinted at his displeasure with the team regarding the diagnosis of his quadriceps injury."I'm not going to comment on the Alex stuff," Cashman said, and then sighed. "Feel free to reach out to Alex and ask him, because it's something that's hard to keep up with and follow."The news about Jeter, who is also on the disabled list with a quadriceps injury, seemed more promising. He continued to work out with the team and was scheduled to visit with a doctor just before Friday's game. The Yankees said they were preparing to set up a simulated game for Jeter on Saturday, at a place to be determined. KURODA ON SORIANO Before Soriano became a Yankee, he was a teammate with Hiroki Kuroda on the minor league team of the Hiroshima Carp in the mid-1990s, Kuroda recalled this week."We lived in the same dormitory," Kuroda said through his interpreter. "We would joke around together. We kidded around a lot."Soriano played in only nine games for the Carp's top-flight team in before signing with the Yankees on Sept. 29, 1998. Kuroda couldn't remember much about Soriano's playing ability back then. But he did say that he didn't predict that Soriano would go on to attain stardom in the majors.
(Reuters) - The United States capped off a dominant tournament with a 1-0 victory over Panama to capture the CONCACAF Gold Cup on Sunday.Brek Shea broke through with the only goal of the game in the second half to give the United States their first Gold Cup title since 2007 and make up for back-to-back defeats to Mexico in the last two finals.While they were thrilled with the result, the Americans hope it is also a springboard to the 2014 World Cup in Brazil."Hopefully this is just the beginning for a lot of us," Landon Donovan told reporters. "We want to be a part of the bigger picture. This is not the end."The win was the 11th in a row for the United States and came without manager Juergen Klinsmann, who was serving a one-game suspension after being ejected in the semi-finals.The United States had outscored their opponents 19-4 in their five games leading up to the final but Panama, who eliminated Mexico in the semi-final, proved a serious test for the home side at Soldier Field in Chicago.The United States had much of the possession but were unable to make it count until the 69th minute when Donovan set up the game-winner for Shea.Donovan, who was named the tournament's most outstanding player, has played his way back into Klinsmann's plans and finished the Gold Cup with five goals, to tie team mate Chris Wondolowski and Panama's Gabriel Torres.U.S. midfielder Stuart Holden exited the match with a knee injury during the first half. Holden has a history of knee problems that includes multiple surgeries.Panama's Jaime Penedo, who allowed just four goals in five games, was named the tournament's top goalkeeper for the second time."We were all hopeful, we all wanted to win," said Panama coach Julio Dely Valdes. "But we all go away feeling we gave it our all. I said I wanted to walk away from the Gold Cup feeling good, and I do."
PHILADELPHIA — Eagles wide receiver Jeremy Maclin tore the ACL in his right knee during practice and could miss the season.Maclin went down at the end of a non-contact Saturday drill and appeared to be in pain while he was on the ground for several minutes. He was helped onto the cart and needed assistance getting off it and going into the team's practice facility."Appreciate all the love and support twitter fam....sad day but I have setbacks my entire life. Minor setback for a MAJOR comeback! #birdgang," he wrote on Twitter.Philadelphia is in its second full practice under new coach Chip Kelly. The first practice with pads is Sunday.The Eagles signed wide receiver David Ball to the 90-man roster. The 29-year-old Ball played for Kelly at New Hampshire, and broke Jerry Rice's Division I-AA record for touchdown receptions. Ball spent time in training camp with Chicago and the New York Jets in 2007-08.Maclin is headed into his fifth season with the Eagles. He led the team with 69 catches for 857 yards and seven touchdowns last season, and the former first-round pick is in the final year of his rookie contract.Two-time Pro Bowl wide receiver DeSean Jackson is Philadelphia's other starter. The team has veterans Jason Avant and Riley Cooper, along with several younger wideouts in camp.Maclin has averaged 64 catches, 863 yards and six TDs in his first four seasons. His best year was in 2011 when he had 70 receptions for 964 yards and 10 TDs.
CHICAGO — Brek Shea sure knows how to make an entrance.Just 42 seconds after coming into the game as a substitute Sunday, Shea pounced after Landon Donovan whiffed a shot and poked the ball into the net. His goal in the 69th minute gave the United States a 1-0 victory over Panama and the CONCACAF Gold Cup title. It is the fifth Gold Cup title for the Americans, but their first since 2007. It also is the first international title as a coach for Jurgen Klinsmann, who won the 1990 World Cup and 1996 European Championship with Germany."It doesn't matter who scored today," Shea said. "We won."The U.S. is doing a lot of that lately.This was the 11th straight victory for the Americans, four more than their previous record, and they likely will leapfrog Mexico as the best team from the North and Central America and Caribbean region when the next FIFA rankings come out Aug. 8.When the final whistle sounded, the Americans on the field began celebrating while the rest of the team raced off the bench. Several players jumped up and down, and hugs and high-fives were exchanged. Klinsmann, who watched the game from a luxury box after being suspended for his tirade over the officiating in the semifinal, quickly made his way down to the field, pumping his fists in the air as he walked."They wanted to send out a signal that they are the best group in CONCACAF, and they are," Klinsmann said. "For today."But their performance in this tournament is likely to stay with the Americans for a while. At least until the next round of World Cup qualifying in September. Not only did they outscore opponents 20-4 in the tournament — no other team had more than 11 goals — but they showed they are deeper than they've ever been, with one young player after another stepping up.And one veteran, too.Despite his big whiff, Donovan was selected the tournament MVP. He finished with five goals and seven assists, a particularly impressive performance considering it followed a four-month sabbatical over the winter that cost him his place on the national team."In terms of just having fun, it's up there," Donovan said. "I'm just enjoying being part of it, I really am."Though Klinsmann picks his roster based on form, not reputation, he acknowledged it would be almost impossible to leave Donovan off the roster for the next round of qualifying."He deserves every compliment for this tournament," Klinsmann said.The only disappointment for the Americans was the loss of Stuart Holden with another right knee injury. Holden sprained his knee early in the first half, and while he will have further tests, Klinsmann said after the game that "it's not looking good.""We are very, very sad for him," Klinsmann said. "We are very concerned about Stuey's situation. It looks like a very serious knee injury."While most expected a Mexico-US final, Panama had other ideas, upsetting El Tri twice on the strength of its stingy defense. Panama was just as dogged against the Americans early, crowding Donovan and Eddie Johnson and not giving the U.S. any space.But rather than taking wild shots or trying to force things, the Americans stayed patient."At times it may have been a little slow or been going back and forth, but we stuck to the game plan," Besler said.And as the game went on, the Americans began to break Panama down. They finished with three shots on goal and another eight that were off target — six in the second half alone. Their best chance came in the 56th minute, DaMarcus Beasley chipped a ball into Donovan, who was in front of the goal at the near post. Donovan got his head on the ball, but not at the angle he wanted and it flew wide of the net. As the crowd groaned, Donovan threw back his head and Beasley swatted the red flag in the corner."We were all hopeful, we all wanted to win," Panama coach Julio Dely Valdez said. "But we all go away feeling we gave it our all. I said I wanted to walk away from the Gold Cup feeling good, and I do."Shea replaced Joe Corona in the 68th minute, just as the Americans were pressing forward again. Alejandro Bedoya got the ball on his left foot and crossed to Donovan, who took a mighty swing — and missed. But it was enough to throw goalkeeper Jaime Pendeo off, and when the ball rolled past Panama's Roberto Chen and on toward the net, Shea was ready. Parked inches from the goal line, Shea stuck out his left foot and tapped the ball into the net for his second international goal."I was there just to put it away," he said.Asked if it was the quickest goal he'd ever had or the closest, Shea replied, "Easiest."The Americans had a chance to double the lead in the 84th minute when Shea fed a wide-open Eddie Johnson 2 yards from the goal. But Johnson couldn't finish it, sending the ball flying over the cross bar.But it didn't matter as Panama never threatened."I think they were rewarded today for the fantastic Gold Cup they played," Klinsmann said. "They put all their energy in that they had. They should be very, very proud of themselves."
CHICAGO — If the United States wins its fifth Gold Cup title and extends its record 10-match winning streak Sunday, it will do so without its coach, Jurgen Klinsmann.Concacaf, the regional soccer confederation that runs the tournament, announced late Friday that Klinsmann had been suspended for the Gold Cup final against Panama because of his ejection from a semifinal victory over Honduras on Wednesday."We have to be ready to be in the final," Klinsmann said Saturday at Soldier Field. "We have to be ready to win this trophy."Klinsmann will not be allowed on the bench or in the locker room and cannot communicate with his team. The assistants Andreas Herzog and Martin Vasquez will take over Sunday. Klinsmann said he had full confidence in the two because of their experience as head coaches, Herzog in Austria's national team program and Vazquez with Chivas USA in Major League Soccer.Landon Donovan, who has led the United States with five goals and seven assists in this year's Gold Cup, struck a tone of regret that Klinsmann would not be on the sideline for the final."We're obviously disappointed," he said. "This month has been about a group of 30 to 40 people together doing something special. You would hope every measure was taken to allow people to be a part of it."He added, "We're going to use it as a little bit of a rallying cry."The United States was leading Honduras, 3-1, when Wednesday's semifinal match turned more physical. Klinsmann appeared upset after a series of hard fouls by Honduras, and in the 87th minute, DaMarcus Beasley was brought down by two Honduran players near Klinsmann on the sideline. When no card was issued, Klinsmann spiked a ball. Klinsmann called it a "reaction out of frustration."The suspension was levied by a Concacaf disciplinary committee and could not be appealed. According to a statement from Concacaf, Klinsmann was ejected "for showing dissent towards the referee by throwing the ball in a violent manner." FIFA rules required a further ban, the statement said."It doesn't change anything," United States forward Eddie Johnson added. "We're well prepared. You have to adapt to certain situations like this."Panama defeated Mexico in Wednesday's second semifinal in Arlington, Tex., to reach its first Gold Cup final since 2005, when it lost to the United States on penalty kicks under nearly identical circumstances. United States Coach Bruce Arena was suspended for that match after he was ejected from a semifinal win over Honduras.
CHICAGO — Carlos Gomez broke a scoreless tie in the ninth inning with an RBI single and Jeff Bianchi added a two-run double to lift the Milwaukee Brewers over the Chicago Cubs 5-0 on Monday night.The Brewers, sitting in last place in the NL Central, won for the third time in eight games and ended the Cubs' winning streak at three games.Cubs reliever Pedro Strop (1-1) gave up the single to Gomez on an 0-2 pitch and Jean Segura easily scored from second to give the Brewers a 1-0 lead. With one out and the bases loaded, Bianchi gave the Brewers insurance with a double to right to score two more runs and Rickie Weeks also added a two-run double as Milwaukee batted around in the ninth.On a cool July night, the Cubs opened an eight-game homestand with a little different look. Left fielder Alfonso Soriano and pitcher Matt Garza were both traded while the Cubs were on a 10-game road trip as team president Theo Epstein continues the rebuilding process.In his Wrigley Field debut, left fielder Junior Lake was 2-for-4, breaking out of an 0-for-14 slump.Neither starter factored into the decision despite strong outings.Brewers starter Kyle Lohse pitched six innings. He pitched around five hits and three walks with six strikeouts. Lohse has only allowed one run in his last 19 innings.Cubs starter Jeff Samardzija pitched seven innings, allowing just three hits with two walks and seven strikeouts.Samardzija did not give up his first hit until two outs in the fifth on Caleb Gindl's single. He quickly got out of the inning by striking out Juan Francisco looking.With runners on first and second with one out in the sixth, Samardzija knocked down Norichika Aoki's comebacker with his bare hand to retire him at first. After being checked out by a team trainer and few practice pitches to see if he could continue, Samardzija struck out Segura looking to end the inning.Samardzija was 1-2 with a 6.85 ERA in his four previous July starts.NOTES: Before the game, the Cubs observed a moment of silence for former pitcher Frank Castillo. Castillo apparently drowned at a lake northeast of Phoenix on Sunday. Castillo had an 82-104 record in 13 major league seasons. He pitched for the Cubs, Colorado, Detroit, Toronto, Boston and Florida from 1991 to 2005 before retiring and lived in the Phoenix suburb of Scottsdale. He was 44. He was with the Cubs from 1991 to 1997. ... The Cubs and the Brewers are scheduled for a day-night doubleheader Tuesday. ... Segura was back in the lineup after missing Sunday's game with forearm tightness.
CHICAGO — U.S. coach Jurgen Klinsmann likes to describe Brek Shea's style of play as "unpredictable."Nobody could have predicted this.Just 42 seconds after coming into the game as a substitute Sunday, Shea scored and his goal in the 69th minute gave the United States a 1-0 victory over Panama and the CONCACAF Gold Cup title. It is the fifth Gold Cup title for the Americans, but their first since 2007. It also is the first international title as a coach for Jurgen Klinsmann, who won the 1990 World Cup and 1996 European Championship with Germany."I was there just to put it away," Shea said.This was the 11th straight victory for the Americans, four more than their previous record, and they likely will leapfrog Mexico as the best team from the North and Central America and Caribbean region when the next FIFA rankings come out Aug. 8.When the final whistle sounded, the Americans on the field began celebrating while the rest of the team raced off the bench. Several players jumped up and down, and hugs and high-fives were exchanged. Klinsmann, who watched the game from a luxury box after being suspended for his tirade over the officiating in the semifinal, quickly made his way down to the field, pumping his fists in the air as he walked."They wanted to send out a signal that they are the best group in CONCACAF, and they are," Klinsmann said. "For today."But their performance in this tournament is likely to stay with the Americans for a while. At least until the next round of World Cup qualifying in September.Not only did they outscore opponents 20-4 in the tournament — no other team had more than 11 goals — but they showed they are deeper than they've ever been, with one young player after another stepping up. And they got a dazzling performance from Landon Donovan, who was named the tournament MVP after finishing with five goals and seven assists.The only disappointment for the Americans was the loss of Stuart Holden with another right knee injury. Holden sprained his knee early in the first half, and while he will have further tests, Klinsmann said after the game that "it's not looking good.""We are very, very sad for him," Klinsmann said. "We are very concerned about Stuey's situation. It looks like a very serious knee injury."While most expected a Mexico-US final, Panama had other ideas, upsetting El Tri twice on the strength of its stingy defense. Panama was just as dogged against the Americans early, crowding Donovan and Eddie Johnson and not giving the U.S. any space.But rather than taking wild shots or trying to force things, the Americans stayed patient."At times it may have been a little slow or been going back and forth, but we stuck to the game plan," Besler said.And as the game went on, the Americans began to break Panama down. They finished with three shots on goal and another eight that were off target — six in the second half alone. Their best chance came in the 56th minute, DaMarcus Beasley chipped a ball into Donovan, who was in front of the goal at the near post. Donovan got his head on the ball, but not at the angle he wanted and it flew wide of the net.As the crowd groaned, Donovan threw back his head and Beasley swatted the red flag in the corner."We were all hopeful, we all wanted to win," Panama coach Julio Dely Valdez said. "But we all go away feeling we gave it our all. I said I wanted to walk away from the Gold Cup feeling good, and I do."Shea replaced Joe Corona in the 68th minute, just as the Americans were pressing forward again. Alejandro Bedoya got the ball on his left foot and crossed to Donovan, who took a mighty swing — and missed. But it was enough to throw goalkeeper Jaime Pendeo off, and when the ball rolled past Panama's Roberto Chen and on toward the net, Shea was ready. Parked inches from the goal line, he stuck out his foot and tapped the ball into the net for his second international goal."It doesn't matter who scored today," Shea said. "We won."
For the first time since 2007, the United States national team is the Gold Cup Champion, its title secured with a 1-0 victory over an upstart Panama team on Sunday at Soldier Field in Chicago.It was not the most pleasant game to watch, as Panama had a clear defensive game plan from the start. While most Concacaf teams tend to bunker against the United States, Panama is clearly better at it than most. In that sense it made Sunday's final a better-played game than it appeared, because it was a true tactical battle that the U.S. handled well. Patience was the key for the Americans, and the players never appeared frustrated as the scoreless deadlock dragged on deep into the second half.In the first half, the United States dominated possession but had nothing to show for it. In the second half it increased the pace even more and began to create dangerous opportunities. The U.S. team always looked confident it was going to score.By winning the tournament, the U.S. team will have the opportunity to face the winner of the 2015 Gold Cup (provided it is not the United States) for an opportunity to play in the 2017 Confederations Cup. In addition, several players made strong cases to be part Jurgen Klinsmann's plans as it builds towards next year's World Cup in Brazil. Mix Diskerud had never played for the U.S. team except for friendlies, but his play during the tournament proved that he should be considered. Kyle Beckerman is not an offensive threat but his defense always gave the Americans an edge.The most noteworthy takeaway from the Gold Cup, however, was that Landon Donovan is truly an exceptional player. After Donovan's four-month sabbatical, Klinsmann was reluctant to bring him back into the U.S. camp. Donovan, however, dominated the tournament and showed that he is back to his old self. When Donovan is inserted into the top United States roster along with Clint Demspey, Michael Bradley, Jozy Altidore, Jermaine Jones and Fabian Johnson, Klinsmann will have the building blocks for a dangerous team.The ratings (on a scale of 1, diabolical; to 10, world class):Nick Rimando: For his first shutout of the Gold Cup, Rimando did not have much to do. While he faced little danger, he commanded his area well and his distribution was solid. Rating: 5.5Michael Parkhurst: Gradually improving throughout the Gold Cup, Parkhurst had a strong final. His passing was crisp and he was aggressive when he attacked. Defensively, he was rock on the right side. With Steve Cherundolo coming off surgery and Timothy Chandler not fully integrated into the U.S. team, it would not be a surprise if Parkhurst became the first-choice right back for the time being. Rating: 6.5Clarence Goodson: It was a very good tournament for Goodson, who developed a nice chemistry with Matt Besler in central defense. Goodson was dominant in the air and solid with his passing out of the back, and he won his battles against Blas Perez, which limited Panama's attack. He greatly improved his stock. Rating: 7.0Matt Besler: It has been a great year for Besler, who earned his first cap in January but over the past seven months has risen to the top of the depth chart in central defense. Against Panama he showed why he will probably be a starter with the top team. His passing was stellar and he helped in the possession game. Rating: 6.5DaMarcus Beasley: Beasley is still adjusting to the left back position, and while it will never be his best spot, he showed that he can play there in important games. Against Panama he was dangerous moving up the left side, and his speed allowed him to recover defensively. Rating: 6.0Kyle Beckerman: Defensively it was another impressive performance from Beckerman, the Real Salt Lake central midfielder. Panama was never dangerous up the middle of the field, and that was his primary job. Offensively he is not flashy, but he remains a very good defensive midfielder. He won a lot of balls and helped the team in its overwhelming possession edge. Rating: 7.0 and man of the match.Stuart Holden: It was a short outing for Holden, who left the game early in the first half with what was described as a sprained knee. He has been battling injuries for most of the past two years and will be further evaluated this week. Rating: Incomplete [UPDATED, Monday, 7 p.m.: U.S. Soccer and Holden's club, Bolton Wanderers, announced that Holden has a torn A.C.L. in his right knee.]Alejandro Bedoya: When the United States was struggling to break down Panama's well-organized defense, Bedoya was the most energetic attacker and the only player able to get himself into dangerous positions until the game opened up in the second half. His pass to Donovan in the 69th minute produced the game's only goal, even if Brek Shea was the player who touched it into the net. Rating: 6.5Joe Corona: After sitting out the semifinal, Corona returned to the starting lineup, though it was not his best game. He struggled to create opportunities against Panama's tough defense, and while he had some nice moments, he was not a major factor in the attack. It is obvious that playing on the wings is not his best position. Rating: 5.0Landon Donovan: For Panama to have any chance at winning the game, it had to neutralize Donovan. For the most part that plan worked, as Donovan had his worst game of the tournament. He missed a point-blank header in the second half and even whiffed on Bedoya's cross on the goal. Despite that, he improved as the game progressed and was the focal point of the offense in the second half. He wasn't the best player in the game, but he was the best player throughout the tournament. Rating: 6.0 and player of the tournament.Eddie Johnson: After two strong performances in the knock-out stages, Johnson had a poor game against Panama. He was rarely dangerous and missed an absolute sitter in the 84th minute. He helped maintain possession in his hold-up play but his frequent back-passing seemed to deflate the attack. Rating: 4.5Mix Diskerud: Coming on for Holden in the 23rd minute, Diskerud was initially rusty, but he had a strong second half as the American attack came to life. He was terrific on both sides of the ball and was instrumental as the offense improved after halftime. A question mark before the tournament, Diskerud improved his chances at being part of the team for the remaining World Cup qualifiers. Rating: 6.5Brek Shea: Subbing into the game in the 68th minute, Shea made an instant impact by scoring a goal less than a minute after stepping onto the field. Yes, it was not the most difficult goal, and the rolling ball probably would have gone in even if he hadn't touched it, but his overall appearance was good. He added much-needed width to the U.S. attack and sent in a series of good crosses. After a poor outing in the group stages against Cuba, Shea rebounded nicely. Rating: 6.5Omar Gonzalez: The Los Angeles Galaxy defender replaced Bedoya in the 89th minute. Rating: Incomplete.Jurgen Klinsmann/Martin Vasquez/Andreas Herzog: While Klinsmann was suspended for the final, he did a good job preparing the team for the final. The U.S. was patient in breaking down a well-organized Panamanian defense, and the defense made few mistakes. The team did not lose focus despite losing Holden early in the game with a knee injury, and the Shea substitution paid off immediately — as did most of the U.S team's substitutes throughout the tournament. The United States had the most talented players in the tournament, but the coaching staff made sure it had the best team. Rating: 7.5
CHICAGO — Landon Donovan did not score the goal that clinched a title for the United States in the Gold Cup, a tournament that will be remembered for his return to the national team and the national stage. Nor was he credited with the assist.Donovan was, however, both the driving force and the creative director behind the goal on Sunday, as he has been for most of what his team has accomplished in the past few weeks.In a scoreless game marked by sluggish play and a slow pace, the United States broke through against Panama in the 69th minute when Alejandro Bedoya sent a centering pass toward the goal mouth. Donovan ran past the ball, inadvertently pulling a dummy maneuver that froze goalkeeper Jaime Penedo and set up Brek Shea for a tap-in goal."I took a mighty swing at it and missed," Donovan said.The 1-0 victory secured the fifth Gold Cup title for the United States in front of an announced crowd of 57,920 at Soldier Field.Just as this tournament marked Donovan's return, it was an arrival of sorts for his coach, Jurgen Klinsmann. The win was a record 11th in a row for the United States and earned Klinsmann his first trophy since he took over for Bob Bradley two summers ago, a month after the United States lost to Mexico in the last Gold Cup final.Klinsmann was not on the bench Sunday; he was forced to watch from a suite after he was suspended for his ejection from Wednesday's semifinal win over Honduras. But he joined his players on the field after the game."Watching the game was horrible," he said. "They gave me a nice Champagne shower."Klinsmann added: "It's always nice to win a trophy. But we want to win in a way that you deserve it, and this was the best team in the Gold Cup."The United States had advanced to the final on the strength of a dynamic offense and an aggressive brand of soccer pushed by Klinsmann, scoring a team-record 19 goals in the tournament.That pace and much of the flair was missing for most of Sunday's game. Perhaps it was Klinsmann's absence, the inherent nerves that accompany a final or the opponent — Panama, and not archrival Mexico. There were many Mexico jerseys in the stands belonging to fans surely disappointed that their team had failed to advance.The final was flat from the start and devoid of quality scoring chances until a DaMarcus Beasley cross in the 56th minute was headed wide by Donovan. Shea replaced Joe Corona in the 68th minute and scored less than a minute later. Panama had mounted little offense before Shea's strike — it did not register a shot — and that did not change after it.What this victory means is debatable. As Klinsmann has said, "Concacaf is not the World Cup." It does ensure that the United States will play the winner of the 2015 Gold Cup for a place in the 2017 Confederations Cup. But only a few players from this squad are likely to be in Brazil for the World Cup next summer.Donovan's status had been uncertain since he took a leave of absence from his club and the national team last year. After he was awarded the Golden Ball as the most valuable player of the tournament for his five goals and seven assists, it was almost unthinkable that he would not be selected for next year's World Cup."He earned every compliment he got this tournament," Klinsmann said. Of Donovan's status for September's World Cup qualifiers, he said, "There is a high probability he joins us."Panama made its first appearance in a Gold Cup final since 2005, when the story lines were remarkably similar to Sunday's. Then, the United States was without its coach, Bruce Arena, who was suspended after he was ejected from a semifinal win.On that day, the United States needed penalty kicks to defeat Panama at Giants Stadium. Ninety minutes were enough Sunday, as the United States claimed its first Gold Cup since 2007. The Americans had lost the previous two finals to Mexico.There was one negative Sunday. Stuart Holden, who tore his anterior cruciate ligament in 2011 and then reinjured it when he tried to return later that year, left in the 23rd minute after banging knees with Alberto Quintero. Klinsmann said Holden might have another serious injury.Otherwise, the Americans were looking forward."This is not the end," Donovan said. "It's the end of the tournament, but hopefully this is just the beginning for a lot of us."
CHICAGO — Ken Harrelson was sitting in the television booth at U.S. Cellular Field last week before the Chicago White Sox hosted the Kansas City Royals when he broke into the story of how he would like to die. Harrelson, who goes by the nickname the Hawk, said he would be calling a White Sox game against the Yankees and Chicago first baseman Paul Konerko would step to the plate against C. C. Sabathia."Here's the pitch," Harrelson, 71, said, his voice rising. "That ball hit deep, way back. Curtis Granderson looks up, you can put it on the board — "Before he finished his signature call, Harrelson slumped in his chair and dropped his head, feigning his perfect ending."I want to die in the booth," he said. "Just like that."Harrelson, in his 38th year of broadcasting and 28th with the White Sox, is many things, perhaps none more than a showman. His nickname is derived from his prominent nose, and it comes with a healthy dose of flamboyance dating to his days of long hair and Nehru jackets when he played for the Boston Red Sox in the 1960s.Today, in his 50th year in baseball, his look is more befitting of a grandfather, but he is no less a character. His broadcasting style has been alternately called nauseating and nostalgic — and rarely anything in between.From the booth, where he works with the color man Steve Stone, he tells stories in a syrupy southern style about old friends and teammates like Mickey Mantle and Carl Yastrzemski; a walking, talking testament to baseball's golden age. In between, he shamelessly roots for the White Sox and routinely takes on umpires.And these days, in an approach that could alternately be described as endearing or absurd, he has decided to take on the entire, and increasingly entrenched, world of statistical analysis. During a broadcast a couple of months ago, Harrelson went so far as to contend that those analytics — often referred to as sabermetrics — had cost too many good baseball people their jobs because they were unable to adjust to baseball's new way of making judgments.That, in turn, led the MLB Network host Brian Kenny to devote a segment of his own show to chastising Harrelson, seeing his attack on sabermetrics as a predictable, and ridiculous, outcry by an old-timer stuck in a bygone era. And then Harrelson joined Kenny on the MLB Network for a debate during which Harrelson declared that the only statistic he cared about was something called "T.W.T.W."That's right, not O.P.S. (on-base and slugging percentages combined) or WHIP (walks and hits per inning) or WAR (wins above replacement, as in the number of wins a player creates versus an average replacement player, and a tough one for a lot of people, not just Harrelson, to get a handle on) or anything else from the new category of measurements. Just T.W.T.W., or in long hand, the will to win. A category that, of course, cannot be in any way shape or form be determined by looking at numbers.Kenny said that when Harrlelson unveiled his T.W.T.W. yardstick he was "completely incredulous."Harrelson maintains that he does, in fact, like numbers and that sabermetrics does have a valued place in baseball, but that he would prefer it be a role much more limited that it is now and that too much deference is being paid in general to numbers crunching. He called its rise over the last decade "the biggest joke I've ever seen.""Look down there at a guy like Gordon Beckham," he said, peering down at the White Sox' second baseman. "If you got someone who gets a chance to take him out on a double play — like me — I'm not going to take him out, I'm going to take him out into left field."So if the shortstop bobbles the ball, and I have a chance to get him, he knows that. Gordon will get busted and he'll take the hit. There's no number to define that in a player."The role that advanced metrics has in an announcer's booth is, of course, different from the one it has in the office of a general manager, who needs to be conversant with every measurement there is these days, even if he doesn't believe in every one of them.
BOSTON — The Boston Red Sox needed a starting pitcher. The Detroit Tigers were looking for infield help. The Chicago White Sox wanted more prospects for the future.And that's why baseball's biggest trade of the season came together.The Red Sox acquired Jake Peavy from the White Sox in a blockbuster three-team deal on Tuesday night that also sent shortstop Jose Iglesias to the Detroit Tigers.The slick-fielding Iglesias provides a nice insurance policy for AL Central-leading Detroit in case Jhonny Peralta is suspended as part of baseball's Biogenesis drug investigation. Iglesias also can play second and third."The frank reality is that I do not know what is going to happen with Jhonny, but with this move, we now feel well protected if there is a long suspension," Tigers general manager David Dombrowski said."We didn't feel we were well protected in that situation with our internal options. If it were a 15-day thing, like a typical injury, I think we could have comfortably dealt with it with the players we already have, but when you start to talk about 50 days and a possible playoff run, we feel better going ahead with Jose."Peavy is 8-4 with a 4.28 ERA in 13 starts this season. The 2007 NL Cy Young Award winner was considered the best starting pitcher on the market ahead of Wednesday's non-waiver deadline."If there's one thing we wanted to do — if we could pull it off — is to add a starting pitcher as we look at the next two months," Boston general manager Ben Cherington said.Peavy tweeted a message to White Sox fans after the deal was done:"THANK YOU Chicago! It's been an honor & a privilege to pitch for u! You are 1st class & I will never forget you! So many emotions right now!"With Clay Buchholz on the disabled list with a shoulder problem, the move gives Boston another proven starter for the stretch run in the tough AL East. It also could strengthen the bullpen if the Red Sox decide to return rookie Brandon Workman to a relief role if Buchholz comes back."We thought Peavy, of the starting pitchers available, was the right fit for us," Cherington said. "It just came together that this was the deal we thought made the most sense."The Red Sox also got reliever Brayan Villarreal from the Tigers. They shipped Iglesias to Detroit and three minor leaguers to the White Sox as part of the trade.Chicago also received prized prospect Avisail Garcia. Garcia, who turned 22 in June, hit .374 with five homers and 23 RBIs in 33 games for Triple-A Toledo.The outfielder, who was the Tigers' minor league player of the year last season, was assigned to Triple-A Charlotte."We're very excited about his upside," general manager Rick Hahn said. "We truly feel this is a five-tool player, someone who's not only going to hit for average but for power, run well, play above-average defense."He's still young and he still has a little bit of development ahead of him, but we feel we've acquired someone with a great deal of upside who's going to have a big impact on the South Side for many years to come."Peralta is among a group of players who have been linked in media reports to Biogenesis, a closed Florida anti-aging clinic that was accused by Miami New Times in January of distributing banned performing-enhancing drugs, sparking an investigation by Major League Baseball. The league could hand down multiple suspensions as part of the case in a matter of days.The 23-year-old Iglesias hit .330 with a home run and 19 RBIs in 63 games with the Red Sox, who trail division-leading Tampa Bay by a half-game. He was the AL rookie of the month for June, when he batted .395 with six RBIs."Jhonny Peralta is our shortstop until someone tells us he can't be our shortstop," Dombrowski said. "If that happens, we are very comfortable with Jose going forward, but until then, we have a talented young player who can play second base and third base very well."Cherington said discussions with the White Sox had been going on for some time, but the two teams couldn't agree on a deal until the Tigers joined the mix.By giving up a young asset in Iglesias, Cherington said the Red Sox wanted a player for the future as well as the stretch run this season. Cherington said there was no cash involved in the deal and the Red Sox are assuming all of Peavy's contract, which includes a $14.5 million salary for next year and an incentive-laden player option for 2015."He's an intense competitor. He loves to pitch," Cherington said. "I think he'll fit in nicely with the group that we have."Cherington said Boston was familiar with Peavy's medical history and comfortable the 32-year-old would be a healthy addition."We're going to get Jake here and get him into the mix," Cherington said. "It won't be tomorrow. We don't know quite yet when it will be."The other minor leaguers headed to Chicago are infielder Cleulius Rondon and pitchers Francelis Montas and Jeffery Wendelken. Each of them were at the Class-A level with the Red Sox.
CHICAGO — Yasiel Puig hit a long home run and scored two runs to lead the Los Angeles Dodgers to a 6-4 win over the Chicago Cubs on Thursday.Hanley Ramirez and Jerry Hairston each drove in two runs for the Dodgers, who got a win a night after having a four-game winning streak snapped and improved their record to 11-2 since the All-Star break.Junior Lake and Anthony Rizzo each homered twice for the Cubs, who lost for the fourth time in five games.Dodgers starter Ricky Nolasco (7-9) allowed three long solo home runs and lasted just five innings, but that was enough to get the win. Kenley Jansen pitched a perfect ninth to earn his 15th save.The Cubs took a 2-0 lead in the bottom of the first on back-to-back solo homers from Lake and Rizzo.The Dodgers tied it in the top of the third inning on a two-run double by Ramirez, scoring Puig and Adrian Gonzalez.The Cubs reclaimed a 3-2 lead in the bottom half on another solo homer by Lake.Cubs starter Chris Rusin (1-1) was sharp in the fourth and fifth innings, but appeared to get tired in the sixth. He was pulled after allowing a single and a walk to the first two batters.Following a sacrifice bunt by eighth-place hitter Tim Federowicz, Hairston pinch hit for Nolasco and singled off reliever Michael Bowden to give the Dodgers a 4-3 lead.One out later, Puig doubled to send runners to second and third and Gonzalez dropped a soft liner into center to make it 5-3. Cubs center fielder David DeJesus threw out Puig at the plate with a perfect one-hop throw.Rizzo added another solo homer in the eighth, his second two-homer game of the season, to pull the Cubs within a run, but Puig answered with a long solo blast in the top of the ninth.NOTES: RHP Carlos Marmol returned to Wrigley Field for the first time since being traded to the Dodgers on July 2. "I feel great wearing the uniform," he said before the game. "I'm in first place right now. I'm so happy." ... The Dodgers had a night game in Los Angeles on Wednesday, so they didn't arrive at their Chicago hotel until 7:30 a.m. on Thursday. "That's the way travel with TV in the game today," manager Don Mattingly said. "There's no reason to complain about it. I just have to try to make sure the guys are rested." ... The Cubs announced the signing of 16-year-old OF Eloy Jimenez from the Dominican Republic. Jimenez was considered one of the best international prospects available this season. ... Dodgers LHP Hyun-Jin Ryu (9-3) faces LHP Travis Wood (7-7) in the second game of the series.
CHICAGO — Edwin Jackson pitched eight solid innings, David DeJesus drove in three runs and the Chicago Cubs beat the Milwaukee Brewers 6-1 on Wednesday night to salvage the finale of the four-game series.Anthony Rizzo hit a two-run homer and Starlin Castro belted a solo shot as Chicago closed out a 14-13 July, its first winning calendar month since it went 15-10 last July. Jackson allowed one run and eight hits in his longest outing of the season, staying in the game after a 66-minute rain delay in the sixth inning.Jonathan Lucroy had two doubles for Milwaukee, driving in Rickie Weeks with a grounder down the first-base line in the eighth. Jeff Bianchi and Caleb Gindl also had two hits apiece.The Cubs bounced back from a frustrating doubleheader sweep on Tuesday, when they blew late leads in each game. They also dropped the series opener on Monday when the Brewers scored five times in the ninth inning of a 5-0 victory.Rizzo went deep in the third, driving a 3-1 pitch from Wily Peralta (7-11) over the wall in center for his 15th homer — matching his career high set a year ago. Castro connected an inning later, making it 3-0 with a drive to the bleachers in left.The Cubs added another run in the fourth when an error on shortstop Yuniesky Betancourt set up DeJesus' RBI single. DeJesus then had a two-run single in the sixth.The six runs were more than enough for Jackson (7-11), who struck out four and walked none. The right-hander finished July with a 3-1 record and a 1.83 ERA in five starts.The Brewers got a runner to third in the third, fourth and fifth innings and failed to score each time. Lucroy was thrown out at the plate by left fielder Julio Borbon when he tried to score from second on Gindl's base hit in the fourth.Peralta allowed four runs, three earned, and five hits in five innings. He was coming off a rough start at Colorado, when he was charged with five earned runs and seven hits in 3 2-3 innings.Chicago and Milwaukee, the two worst teams in the NL Central, did not make a trade on a quiet deadline day throughout baseball. The Cubs and Cardinals talked about veteran catcher Dioner Navarro, but he was still in Chicago at the end of the night."I think one thing is obvious from today, if you look around the league, is that people hold real tight to their young players," Cubs general manager Jed Hoyer said. "We need to get a lot more of them. That part isn't going to change."There wasn't much left for Hoyer to trade by the end of the month. The Cubs made three major deals in July, trading away pitchers Scott Feldman and Matt Garza, and slugger Alfonso Soriano. They received an array of prospects in return, strengthening their burgeoning minor league system.While Chicago (49-58) tries to avoid a fourth consecutive losing season, Hoyer thinks there is hope for the future."We never got that close, actually, in the last couple days to doing anything," he said. "The good thing is I feel like we were incredibly productive this month. Made a lot of deals, I feel like we got a lot better as an organization this month."Milwaukee (46-62) traded reliever Francisco Rodriguez to Baltimore last week for minor league infielder Nick Delmonico, but that was it for July. There was thought to be further interest in its bullpen, namely left-hander Mike Gonzalez.Manager Ron Roenicke said he had talked to general manager Doug Melvin in the last few days and wasn't surprised when the non-waiver deadline passed without a deal."That's fine with me," Roenicke said. "I know with just moving Frankie how much it's changed what I have to do, you know, with the bullpen. It's hard. It's hard when you lose guys."NOTES: The Brewers put RHP Yovani Gallardo on the 15-day disabled list with a strained left hamstring, and Roenicke said RHP Tyler Thornburg will take Gallardo's spot in the rotation. INF Scooter Gennett, who served as the Brewers' 26th man during Tuesday's doubleheader, was optioned to Triple-A Nashville, and then recalled to the major league club. ... Lucroy made his first career start at first base and was charged with an error on Borbon's chopper in the fourth. Roenicke worked with the catcher at first base during batting practice. ... Hoyer said the team has talked to the agent for RHP Jeff Samardzija about a contract extension. "It's something we'd like to do. We love to have him on the team," Hoyer said. ... Milwaukee is off Thursday before opening a weekend series at home against Washington on Friday night. ... The Cubs begin a four-game series against Los Angeles on Thursday night, with LHP Chris Rusin (1-0, 2.93 ERA) slated to face Dodgers RHP Ricky Nolasco (6-9, 3.72 ERA).
CHICAGO — No matter where they're playing, the Los Angeles Dodgers keep racking up wins. And the latest tied a franchise record that stood for nearly nine decades.The Dodgers matched an 89-year-old club mark with their 12th straight road win, beating the Chicago Cubs 6-2 Friday in a game that saw Mark Ellis extend his hitting streak to 13 before both he and manager Don Mattingly were ejected."Good teams to me win on the road," Mattingly said. "You've got to win on the road. Something these guys should be proud of."They took this one even though they lost their second baseman and manager along the way. Ellis doubled and scored in the third before being tossed when he and Mattingly argued a called third strike with plate umpire Alan Porter in the fourth inning."I don't know if he was having a bad day or what," Ellis said. "That's about all I'm going to say commenting on an umpire."Bad call or not, it didn't stop the Dodgers from improving to 12-2 since the All-Star break.The NL West leaders remained unbeaten on the road since a loss at San Francisco on July 6 and matched the 1924 Brooklyn Robins for the longest streak in franchise history."It's pretty special," said Nick Punto, who had two hits and drove in two runs. "Pretty cool. Since 1924 someone was saying. That's really cool. This is a really special team."Adrian Gonzalez and Yasiel Puig each added a pair of hits and scored a run for the Dodgers.Los Angeles took control early, scoring two in the third and two more in the fourth while building a 5-1 lead and chasing All-Star Travis Wood (7-8).That was enough for Hyun-Jin Ryu (10-3), who became the first Dodgers rookie to win 10 games since Kazuhisa Ishii in 2002. The left-hander matched a season high by allowing 11 hits in 5 1-3 innings but held Chicago to just two runs. He also struck out six without a walk.Chicago's Junior Lake delivered another eye-popping performance at the plate, becoming the first Cubs player since at least 1916 to collect four hits twice in his first 16 major league games — and the first in the majors to do so since St. Louis' Bo Hart in 2003. He's batting .358 since he got called up from Triple-A Iowa on July 19."(I) feel so good," he said through an interpreter. "(I'm seeing) the ball real well now."But with Wood struggling with his control, the Cubs lost for the fifth time in six games.The left-hander lasted just 3 1-3 innings in his shortest outing of the year, allowing five runs and seven hits. He threw 96 pitches and walked a season-high five, including four in a row in the third to force in the inning's second run after back-to-back doubles by Ellis and Punto and make it 3-1."No. I felt like I was just missing," Wood said.The Dodgers added to their lead in the fourth after Ellis and Mattingly got tossed.Ryu had just led off with a single when Ellis got called out on a 3-2 pitch. He threw his bat a few feet and raised his arms, leading to an ejection by Porter, and then slammed his helmet in disgust."It should never happen," Ellis said. "It's embarrassing to get thrown out of a game, especially when there was no reason for it."His manager wound up getting thrown out for the third time this season and bumping into Porter as the argument continued. Mattingly thought the umpire actually walked into him."I felt like he did," Mattingly said. "I didn't feel like I was going forward. I'm sure the video will show. I'm pretty sure I wasn't going forward. I feel OK about that."NOTES: Former Cubs closer Carlos Marmol worked a scoreless ninth, allowing a hit and a walk in his first appearance at Wrigley Field after being dealt to the Dodgers a month ago. ... President of baseball operations Theo Epstein said July was a winning month for the Cubs, and he wasn't talking just about their 14-13 record. They beefed up their farm system by trading away Alfonso Soriano and Matt Garza and signing draft picks and international players. "It was a good month," Epstein said. "For people who are wanting things to go well in the organization, looking for progress, they can see the progress, seize onto it. It's a time for hope and optimism. That applies to all of us. It was easier to come to work the last few days than it was a couple months ago. It's an important time to remind everyone, remind ourselves, that the progress isn't linear. There are going to be other really bad months."... Mattingly said pitcher Stephen Fife, on the disabled list with right shoulder bursitis, will "chuck" for Triple-A Albuquerque or in Chicago on Sunday. If Fife is with Albuquerque, he would presumably pitch. But Mattingly was a bit evasive when asked if Fife would throw on the side or pitch in a game on Sunday if he's in Chicago. Zack Greinke is scheduled to start that day for the Dodgers, and Mattingly said, "Right now we're in line."
SAN DIEGO — One by one they are returning, nursed to health and thrust into the lineup, hoping to resuscitate a sagging offense and flagging playoff hopes, all the while hoping their bodies can remain intact.But just as with Derek Jeter's return Sunday, Curtis Granderson's rejoining the Yankees on Friday served as a pointed contrast with the Yankee who so desperately wants to come back but may be prevented from doing so.And that is how it is likely to be for the Yankees until the Alex Rodriguez saga reaches a resolution, whether with a suspension that ends his season — and possibly his career — or with Rodriguez somehow playing for them in the coming days.Granderson, who had played eight games this season between stints on the disabled list, found himself before the game answering a few questions about his return, but . After nearly 15 minutes, a Yankees official suggested that the session had lasted long enough.While the Yankees continue to say that they are proceeding as if Rodriguez will join them, perhaps as soon as Monday in Chicago against the White Sox, the Rodriguez spectacle is at the moment obscuring a more immediate concern: whether Jeter and Granderson can return to form, and how long they will take to get there.The same can be said for their erstwhile ace, the left-hander C. C. Sabathia, who has been one of the Yankees' few healthy stalwarts but has hardly pitched like one.Sabathia struggled with his command once again, as well as his poise, in Friday's 7-2 loss to the San Diego Padres. Sabathia, who had hoped to turn his season around after the All-Star break, has instead been worse. He allowed five runs, a season-high-tying 11 hits and has failed to make it through the sixth inning in his three starts since the break. He has allowed 19 runs in those starts.Sabathia compounded his troubles with a pair of mental lapses — walking in a run after reacting emotionally to a 2-2 borderline pitch that was ruled a ball, then failing to cover first base on a ball hit to the right side.Afterward, Sabathia, the Yankees' most physically imposing player, was a picture of fragility after losing his fifth consecutive decision. His record is 9-10 and his earned run average climbed to 4.78. Asked if he was lacking confidence, Sabathia said, "Of course. Who wouldn't be?""We've dealt with a lot this year and me not being able to help us is killing me."Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said Sabathia was not hurt, that he exhibited none of the signs that an ailing pitcher typically does: his velocity is at 93 miles per hour, and he has not skipped a start or a throwing session between starts.But if Sabathia does not regain his form, "it obviously makes it more difficult" to contend, Girardi said. "We need him to be C. C. if we're going to make a run."The Yankees had arrived here with a modicum of momentum, having beaten the red-hot Los Angeles Dodgers on Wednesday and having survived a gantlet of strong teams, having seen the Boston Red Sox, the Texas Rangers, the Tampa Bay Rays and the Dodgers since the All-Star break. They also might have been buoyed by a rare sellout crowd at Petco Park, made up of a large contingent of Yankees fans.But instead of making up ground, they fell four games behind the Baltimore Orioles and the Rangers for the final wild-card berth and eight and a half games behind the American League East-leading Red Sox as the Padres smashed three home runs out of their pitcher-friendly park.Sabathia was not the only catalyst who continued to struggle. Jeter, though he hit a single to right in his first at-bat and lined out in his final one, is now 2-for-14 since belting the first pitch he saw upon his return for a home run. More concerning, he continued to show the range of a 38-year-old in the field, twice struggling to reach ground balls and then making hasty, errant throws. He did not look graceful on the bases either. Still under orders not to cut loose running the bases with a tender quadriceps, Jeter nevertheless headed from first to third on Robinson Cano's first-inning single to right in what appeared to be third gear. When the play was closer than Jeter expected, he slid clumsily into the base but did not injure himself."That was a little awkward," said Girardi, who acknowledged that Jeter was not 100 percent.But Jeter said he was fine."I don't care who you are, how good you are, at some point you're going to struggle," Jeter said. "That's the bottom line. If you guys can think of a player who has played this game that's never struggled, I'd like to see it."There was at least some encouragement in Granderson's return. He looked better in each at-bat: striking out, tapping back to Andrew Cashner and turning on an inside fastball that ended up in fitting fashion: in the glove of first baseman Yonder Alonso, who stepped on first for a double play that ended the sixth. He struck out after a competitive at-bat against Tim Stauffer in the ninth.In the field, Granderson bobbled one ball but recovered to throw a runner out. In the field and at the plate, he looked like a player searching for his footing. When Logan Forsythe ripped a line drive over his head, Granderson retreated and then faced the wall, preparing to play the carom.But it never came.The ball ended up over the wall instead. If the Yankees don't get more help and soon from the likes of Sabathia, Jeter and Granderson, never mind an unlikely boost from Rodriguez, that vision of a Yankees outfielder waiting, waiting, waiting might come to represent a playoff race that is also going, going, gone.
Bill Parcells will be inducted into the Pro Football Hall of Fame on Saturday, prompting some recollections of his wandering and winning journey as coach of the Giants, the Patriots , the Jets and the Cowboys over more than two decades.As a Jersey guy himself, he enjoyed Jersey guys. On his way to Giants Stadium the morning of the 1990 team's playoff game with the Chicago Bears, he stopped for coffee at a diner. A customer sitting at the counter recognized him."He looked up from his eggs and said, 'Hey, Billy, gonna beat them Bears?' " Parcells said later that day in his best Jersey accent. "He called me Billy, don't you love that? But before I could answer, he said, 'How about them Niners next week?' He went right past the Bears."The grizzled Jersey guy in the diner knew. Those Giants defeated the Bears, 31-3, then the 49ers in the N.F.C. championship game, 15-13, then won Super Bowl XXV against the Buffalo Bills, 20-19.In the days before that Super Bowl, Bruce Smith, the Bills' All-Pro defensive end, kept bragging about how superior he and the Bills were, but in the game, Giants tackle Jumbo Elliott neutralized him. In Parcells's news conference the morning after the Super Bowl, a reporter started to ask, "After the game, Bruce Smith said ...""Is he still talkin'?" Parcells interrupted. "Tell him to come over and talk to Jumbo."As the Jets' coach, he let the assistants Bill Belichick and Al Groh assemble the defensive game plans. When they brought it to him for his input, he would say, "And what have you wizards come up with this week?"His ability to motivate players was as much an attribute as any X's and O's he devised. Even with the Giants' best player. "You're not Lawrence Taylor anymore," he said one day. "You're What's the Matter With Taylor now.""What are you talking about?" Taylor, the future Hall of Fame linebacker, asked."Everybody's asking me: 'What's the matter with Taylor? He hasn't had any sacks in the last three games.' So now you're 'What's the Matter With Taylor.' "The next game L. T. had two sacks, maybe three.He created nicknames that stuck. Quarterback Phil Simms was Blondie. His offensive linemen were the Suburbanites, each with a wife, small children and a grill in the backyard. He even baptized a reporter, the knowledgeable Vinny DiTrani of The Record in North Jersey. He respectfully labeled him Sage, which The Record later used as the title of DiTrani's column.With a 35-mile-per-hour wind blowing through Giants Stadium at the N.F.C. championship game in January 1987, Parcells told linebacker Harry Carson, the team's captain, "If we win the coin toss, take the wind and let the Redskins receive." Russ Grimm, the Redskins' captain, called tails. It came up heads. Against the wind, the Redskins' offense couldn't move. The Giants took a quick 10-0 lead and won, 17-0. But Parcells mostly praised punt returner Phil McConkey for not fumbling seven twisting punts in that wind."More than any one player, McConkey won that game," Parcells said.Two weeks later, the Giants won Super Bowl XXI, 39-20, over the Broncos with 30 points in the second half as Simms completed 22 of 25 passes for 268 yards and 3 touchdowns, one to McConkey.He welcomed rookies by joking with them. Before the 1987 season opener in Chicago, the rookie wide receiver Mark Ingram, out of the Michigan State, was doing calisthenics before practice when Parcells turned to Wellington Mara, the Giants' co-owner."Hey, Well," he said. "Ingram thinks if we're going to Chicago, we're playing Northwestern."Ingram caught only two passes for 32 yards that season, but in 1990 he caught 26 passes for 499 yards and 5 touchdowns. In the Super Bowl XXV victory, he bulled his way through three Bills tacklers for a vital first down.He's superstitious. He won't pick up a penny unless it is on heads. He collects miniature elephants with their trunks up.He knew who could really play. A year after leaving the Patriots to join the Jets, he pounced on running back Curtis Martin's status as a restricted free agent. The Jets shipped their first- and third-round draft choices to the Patriots and signed Martin to a six-year, $36 million contract that was a bargain. Martin rushed for 14,101 yards and 90 touchdowns and caught 484 passes for another 3,329 yards and 10 touchdowns in his Hall of Fame career.Even in Dallas, he remained a Jersey guy. Before a Monday night game at Giants Stadium in 2003, his first season as the Cowboys' coach, he took Rich Dalrymple, their vice president for public relations, on a tour of the Bergen County area where he grew up. The final stop was Bischoff's, a popular ice cream parlor in Teaneck.In assessing an outstanding player on his or an opponent's team, Parcells liked to say, "He's going to Canton on roller skates." Now Parcells is in Canton, not on roller skates, but as a coach who improved each of the four franchises he coached. And next to his bronze bust at the Hall of Fame, will somebody please place a penny with the head side up and a miniature elephant with its trunk pointing upward?
Max Scherzer took a shutout into the eighth inning Saturday and became baseball's first 16-game winner as the host Detroit Tigers held on for a 3-0 victory against the Chicago White Sox .Chicago has lost nine straight. The Tigers have won 11 of 12 despite playing most of that stretch without Miguel Cabrera, who has been bothered by hip and abdominal problems.John Danks allowed six hits, including solo home runs by Torii Hunter, Jhonny Peralta and Jose Iglesias, Cabrera's replacement at third base.Matt Garza lost for the first time since June 11, and Texas lost ground in the American League West to first-place Oakland for the first time in nearly a week, falling three and a half back.MARINERS 8, ORIOLES 4 Michael Saunders homered twice and drove in 5 runs and Erasmo Ramirez retired 18 of the first 20 batters he faced to help visiting Seattle beat Baltimore and end a four-game losing streak.ANGELS 7, BLUE JAYS 3 Jered Weaver pitched into the eighth inning to win his third straight decision, Kole Calhoun hit his second homer in two days and host Los Angeles beat Toronto.TWINS 6, ASTROS 4 Ryan Doumit hit the go-ahead single in the seventh inning, Minnesota's bullpen pitched six scoreless innings and the Twins beat visiting Houston.RED SOX 5, DIAMONDBACKS 2 Jake Peavy allowed four hits and struck out seven in seven innings to lead host Boston, winning his first start since joining the Red Sox at the trade deadline.RAYS 2, GIANTS 1 Wil Myers had a run-scoring single in the 10th inning, lifting host Tampa Bay.David Price allowed one run and five hits and struck out five in nine innings. Tim Lincecum allowed one run, six hits and one walk and had five strikeouts in seven innings.INDIANS 4, MARLINS 3 Michael Bourn had three of visiting Cleveland's six stolen bases, helping the Indians earn their ninth victory in the past 10 games.DODGERS 3, CUBS 0 Chris Capuano scattered six hits in six and a third innings, and Los Angeles set a franchise record with its 13th straight road win.The Dodgers, who lead the National League West, eclipsed the 1924 mark set when the team was the Brooklyn Robins.REDS 8, CARDINALS 3 Devin Mesoraco drove in three runs with two homers, and host Cincinnati beat St. Louis for the fourth time in 11 games this season.PIRATES 5, ROCKIES 2 Francisco Liriano continued his recent dominance with seven strong innings, and Jose Tabata homered to lead host Pittsburgh.BRAVES 5, PHILLIES 4 Dan Uggla hit a tiebreaking grounder in the 12th, the Atlanta bullpen pitched five and two-thirds scoreless innings, and the visiting Braves beat slumping Philadelphia for their ninth straight win.NATIONALS 3, BREWERS 0 Dan Haren pitched seven strong innings, and Adam LaRoche and Wilson Ramos hit home runs to lead Washington at Milwaukee.PADRES SIGN SHORTSTOP The San Diego Padres signed shortstop Ronny Cedeno to a minor league contract in case the All-Star Everth Cabrera is suspended for 50 games by Major League Baseball as part of its investigation of the Biogenesis drug clinic.
SAN DIEGO — It was good to be back, Curtis Granderson had said the night before, even though he had gone through a hitless evening in his return from a second stint on the disabled list, visits that have cost him all but a handful of games this season.But he looked forward to really arriving, that time when he might recover the form that could provide a jolt of power to a Yankees team that desperately needed it. All it would take, Granderson said, was one good swing.That at-bat came sooner than might have been expected, but not too soon for the struggling Yankees, who rode Granderson's two-run, seventh-inning homer and another stellar pitching performance from Ivan Nova to a 3-0 victory over the San Diego Padres.The win was a momentary salve for the Yankees, who learned earlier in the day that Derek Jeter, another veteran they were counting on to help rejuvenate their offense and their season, had injured his calf and would sit out Saturday's and Sunday's games here. The hope is that Jeter could be in the lineup, at least as the designated hitter, when the Yankees head to Chicago for a series against the White Sox that begins Monday. But mixing hope and health has been a fruitless endeavor this season for the Yankees."We've got to find this voodoo doll and whoever keeps poking at it and ripping at it," Granderson said after the game.By Monday, of course, interest in Jeter's status will be dwarfed by the circumstances surrounding Alex Rodriguez, who could be in the lineup for the Yankees or coming to grips with a lengthy suspension handed down by Major League Baseball.Manager Joe Girardi reiterated Saturday that the Yankees were proceeding as if Rodriguez would join them in Chicago. Girardi laughed when asked if it was possible that Rodriguez, who played a minor league game in Trenton on Saturday, could join the Yankees on Sunday."What are we going to do?" he said. "I don't think we have a fighter jet to get him here."For a night, at least, the Yankees were able to enjoy a hard-earned victory, their sixth in 14 games since the All-Star break. They trail Cleveland by three and a half games for the American League's final wild-card berth, but they also must pass Baltimore and Texas. The Yankees are eight and a half games behind Boston in the A.L. East.The Yankees, as often happens when they win these days, needed superb pitching, and Nova kept them in a scoreless tie until Granderson pulled a 1-0 fastball over the right-field wall. Granderson also scored the final run, singling in the ninth and scoring on Jayson Nix's two-out single."He was a part of all three runs," Girardi said of Granderson, "and I've talked about how Curtis can change the complexion of a game really quickly, and that's what he did tonight."Nova allowed four hits in seven innings, striking out eight and walking one before yielding to Dave Robertson and then Mariano Rivera, who was flawless in notching his 35th save. Nova has a 2.15 earned run average since returning June 23 from the disabled list with an inflamed triceps."You've got to keep your team in the game, and hopefully the offense wakes up," said Nova, whose teammates had not scored behind him in 22 consecutive innings until Granderson's home run.Until then, the Yankees had been dominated by the lanky, unheralded Tyson Ross, who retired the first 14 batters he faced and struck out a career-high nine through six innings. Other than Lyle Overbay's sharp single in the fifth, the only hit the Yankees managed before Granderson's homer was a lazy fly by Alfonso Soriano that Padres center fielder Alexi Amarista broke back on and could not recover in time to catch. Soriano scored on Granderson's home run.The Yankees had hoped that Jeter's presence might resuscitate an offense that ranked 25th in runs and had fewer total bases than any other team except the Miami Marlins, whose payroll is nearly $200 million less than that of the Yankees.Few of the high wage earners are on the field. Rodriguez has not played at all, and Mark Teixeira, Granderson and Jeter — who combined to hit 82 home runs a year ago — have hit six homers this season.When Jeter smacked a home run last Sunday on the first pitch he saw after coming off the disabled list, it fed the notion that a 39-year-old coming off a serious injury and a lengthy layoff might be a driving force rather than an ancillary piece.But Jeter awoke Monday with a sore right calf, Girardi said. The Yankees were so desperate that Girardi kept him in the lineup even though it was clear, especially from his play in the field, that Jeter was far from peak form. He went 1 for 11 in two games against the Los Angeles Dodgers and a game Friday against the Padres.More disconcerting was how uneasy Jeter looked in the field. He was slow to reach balls and then errant with his throws. He has also looked uncomfortable running the bases, under an edict from Girardi not to run full speed. That led to an awkward moment Friday when Jeter cruised into third but had to slide at the last moment to avoid being out."It's a concern of ours, and we've got to try to get him healthy," Girardi said of Jeter, who was not in the clubhouse when it was opened to reporters after Saturday's game. "This is not something we want to mess with. Today, he said it's the best he felt in a few days. If it is going in the right direction, I want to keep it going in the right direction and get him back at 100 percent."The task of replacing Jeter for now falls to Eduardo Nunez, who had spent several days preparing to move to third base, which had figured to be a long-term move given Rodriguez's tenuous status.That meant trotting out a lineup Saturday evening that included Nunez (.228), third baseman Brent Lillibridge (.200) and catcher Chris Stewart (.232) hitting ahead of Nova. Granderson, in his second game back, was plugged in at the cleanup spot.If it was a sign of desperation — and of how mightily the Yankees missed Jeter — Granderson showed what one well-placed swing of the bat can mean.
SAN DIEGO — Derek Jeter stood at his locker Friday night and insisted that he was healthy, that his legs — the left leg that had gone through a lengthy rehabilitation from a twice-broken ankle and the right one that sustained a quadriceps strain — were not bothering him."I'm all right," Jeter said. "Like I told you, if I play, you don't hear anything about it. So I played."As it turned out, Jeter was not O.K.The awkward moments running the bases and the clumsy episodes in the field were not simply a matter of rust, dismissed because it had been nearly 10 months since he had played regularly.Jeter was to sit out Saturday night and Sunday afternoon in the final two games of a weekend series against the Padres, as he nursed lingering soreness from the quadriceps injury and dealt with a previously undisclosed right calf injury. Manager Joe Girardi said he hoped to have Jeter in the lineup Monday in Chicago against the White Sox, but he acknowledged that it may be as the designated hitter."It's just the right leg," Girardi said when asked which injury was most troublesome. "It's a concern of ours, and we've got to try to get him healthy. This is not something we want to mess with."Girardi said Jeter, who homered on the first pitch last Sunday in his return from the quadriceps injury, woke up Monday with soreness in his calf. Girardi said that if there were 150 games left in the season, Jeter probably would not have played after the calf injury surfaced.But entering Saturday there were only 54 games remaining, and the Yankees were trailing Baltimore and Texas by four games in the race for the final American League wild-card berth.The Yankees were so desperate to give a boost to their struggling offense that Jeter was in the lineup Tuesday and Wednesday against the Dodgers and Friday night against the Padres. He went 1 for 11 in those three games and has looked ill at ease in the field, slow to reach balls and then errant with his throws. He has also looked uncomfortable running the bases, under an edict from Girardi not to run full speed. That led to an awkward moment Friday when Jeter cruised into third but had to slide at the last moment to avoid being out.Jeter was not available in the Yankees' clubhouse Saturday after Girardi announced that he would not start, but Jeter said Friday night that he was not disheartened by his struggles."I don't care who you are, how good you are; at some point you're going to struggle," Jeter said. "That's the bottom line. If you guys can think of a player who has played this game that's never struggled, I'd like to see it."If the Yankees thought that a less-than-healthy Jeter would be enough to perk up their offense, there was little evidence of it in recent days. In the three games since his calf injury, the Yankees have scored a total of seven runs."Today he said it's the best he felt in a few days," Girardi said. "If it is going in the right direction, I want to keep it going in the right direction and get him back at 100 percent."It has not been easy for teammates who have watched Jeter in his brief return play far below the standards he has established over his 19-year career."He's not running as well, but I don't know if they're telling him not to do that just to make sure," first baseman Lyle Overbay said. "I like him in the lineup. He's part of jump-starting everything in the heart of the lineup. He can hit and when we need some offense or to get something going, he's done it and done for a long time, so when you don't have him in there, it's hard to replace."The task of replacing Jeter for now falls to Eduardo Nunez, who had spent several days preparing to move to third in the seemingly likely event that Alex Rodriguez, who is nearing the end of a rehabilitation assignment, receives a lengthy suspension by Major League Baseball.Girardi reiterated Saturday that the Yankees were proceeding as if Rodriguez would join them, possibly Monday in Chicago. He laughed when asked if it was possible that Rodriguez, who played a minor league game in Trenton on Saturday, could join the Yankees on Sunday."What are we going to do?" he said. "I don't think we have a fighter jet to get him here."If some similar action were available to stimulate the Yankees' offense, Girardi might be less dismissive. The lineup he sent out Saturday included Nunez (.228), third baseman Brent Lillibridge (.200) and catcher Chris Stewart (.232) hitting ahead of pitcher Ivan Nova. Curtis Granderson, who returned Friday after the second of two lengthy injury absences, was plugged in at cleanup hitter.That was as good an indication as any of how desperate the Yankees were for the return of a healthy, reliable Jeter — at least the one they have known for years.
SAN DIEGO — Despite a combative stand Friday night that seemed to set him on a collision course with Major League Baseball over his impending suspension, Alex Rodriguez reached out to the commissioner's office Saturday, through the players union, and also contacted the Yankees directly to seek a meeting, according to two people briefed on the matter who were granted anonymity because they were not permitted to speak about it publicly.The commissioner's office dismissed the request, both officials said, and for now is sticking to a take-it-or-leave-it proposal that Rodriguez accept a suspension through the end of the 2014 season or baseball will administer the punishment anyway.The request to M.L.B. was made by Michael Weiner, the executive director and general counsel of the players association, on behalf of Rodriguez, the Yankees' embattled third baseman.The Yankees, who declined to comment on the matter, ignored Rodriguez's direct request for a meeting because they are not involved in the investigation into his association with Biogenesis, a defunct anti-aging clinic in South Florida that reportedly sold performance-enhancing drugs to players, or the negotiations involving Rodriguez's suspension from baseball.The purpose of the proposed meetings was to work out an agreement that would mitigate baseball's suspension of Rodriguez, which is expected to be handed down by Monday.Even if Rodriguez is suspended, he may still be able to appeal and play for the Yankees when they face the White Sox on Monday night in Chicago."As far as any of that stuff, I'm going to let those guys take care of what they need to take care of," Rodriguez said Saturday in Trenton, where was playing for the Yankees' Class AA affiliate. "I'm not addressing anything."A person close to Rodriguez said the requests did not constitute a new direction. Rather, they were part of a continuing dialogue between the players association and Major League Baseball about the Biogenesis investigation.Although the idea of a meeting was rejected, baseball officials will listen if Rodriguez or one of his representatives calls on Sunday to say he is willing to accept a severe punishment, one of the people informed on the matter said.Rodriguez, a three-time most valuable player, has admitted using performance-enhancing drugs while he played for the Texas Rangers from 2001 to 2003. His most recent troubles stem from an article in January in The Miami New Times that described how various players, including Rodriguez, received drugs from Biogenesis. Major League Baseball began an investigation that is now close to fruition, with Rodriguez the highest-profile target. He has not played this season as he rehabilitates from hip surgery, and now faces a possible suspension that could cover as many as 214 games. He stands to lose as much as $36 million in salary.As a result of the Biogenesis investigation, M.L.B. is expected to suspend Rodriguez and more than a half-dozen other players, and people on both sides of the matter say they do not see how Rodriguez's situation can be resolved amicably, unless something changes in a matter of hours.Rodriguez has become increasingly aggressive about the investigation. On Friday, after a rehabilitation game in Trenton, he made a thinly veiled accusation that the Yankees and M.L.B. were conspiring to "cancel" his contract. He is set to earn roughly $95 million through 2017, but he would not be paid during a suspension.If Rodriguez were suspended immediately for the rest of this season and all of 2014, he would be 39 when his ban ends and trying to play after missing two full seasons.Baseball would prefer that Rodriguez accept a punishment the way Ryan Braun, the Milwaukee Brewers slugger, recently did. Braun agreed to be suspended for 65 games this season for violating baseball's antidoping code and for violating the collective bargaining agreement. He forfeited nearly half his $8.5 million salary.Baseball is prepared to make its case to an arbitrator if Rodriguez appeals any ban, which appears likely. The person close to Rodriguez said his legal team was preparing for a lawsuit.Once a player is suspended, he has the right to appeal to an arbitrator, and under normal circumstances can play until a decision is rendered, a process that can take more than 30 days. Commissioner Bud Selig could invoke a special clause in the collective bargaining agreement to avoid that process, leaving Rodriguez unable to play immediately. But the union would immediately go to the arbitrator and request a stay of that penalty. If the stay is granted, Rodriguez would be allowed to play.Amid the acrimony and legal posturing, Rodriguez is rounding into shape after hip surgery and a quadriceps injury. On Friday night, he hit a towering home run in Trenton. After the game, he indicated he would fight any suspension through the appeals process. He said the Yankees and M.L.B. would benefit from a suspension and were therefore conspiring to impose one."When all this stuff is going on in the background and people are finding creative ways to cancel your contract and stuff like that, I think that's concerning for me," he said.People who spoke to Yankees officials after Rodriguez's comments said they were saddened and amused by them, and they pointed out that the Yankees did not initiate the investigation into his reported involvement with Biogenesis.With the Yankees' offense looking so sluggish this year, they could actually use Rodriguez on the field."We're seeing three lefties," Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said, referring to the White Sox pitchers the Yankees expect to face in Chicago. "I'm looking forward to him coming back."Rodriguez remained defiant and optimistic Saturday. He said he planned to work out on Sunday and then travel to Chicago, even with a suspension looming that could banish from baseball."Yeah," he said. "I'm flying to Chicago."
CHICAGO — It was one strange day, even for Alex Rodriguez.First, he was hit with a long suspension. Then he made his season debut. He got booed, blooped a single and, all things considered, said he felt pretty good out there.Rodriguez went 1 for 4 in his first game for New York, but the Chicago White Sox beat the struggling Yankees 8-1 on Monday night to snap a 10-game losing streak."I just hope that there's a happy ending there somewhere," he said.Rodriguez returned to the big leagues hours after he was suspended through 2014 by Major League Baseball in the Biogenesis case, a punishment he plans to appeal. The three-time MVP had been out following hip surgery.His punishment overshadowed everything else, whether it was teammate Derek Jeter going back on the disabled list because of a strained right calf or Andy Pettitte (7-9) getting knocked out early.Alex Rios drove in four runs, Alexei Ramirez added four hits and Jose Quintana (6-3) pitched into the seventh for the White Sox.Was it a good day for baseball?"A little bit of both," Jeter said. "I don't know if you can say it's a good day anytime you're talking about a negative, negativity. I understand what baseball is trying to do, They're cracking down on players."Rodriguez, meanwhile, is digging in, ready to go toe to toe with MLB."We're just getting started in this process," he said. "But for me, personally, I just want to get back to baseball, playing hard and playing with a lot of intensity. I just want to see what our team has to offer."At 38 and coming back from the hip injury, he said he's fighting for his life. He was welcomed back with the same sort of greeting he got on the road in the past, a series of boos and jeers amplified by the penalty announced earlier in the day.The crowd at U.S. Cellular Field booed Rodriguez during pregame warmups and introductions. When he stepped to the plate in the second inning, the fans could have drowned out a jet.They weren't feeling any better after Rodriguez dropped a leadoff single into shallow left on the third pitch. He moved to third with no outs on Vernon Wells' double but was stranded.Rodriguez flied out in his second and third at-bats and handled a few grounders at third, getting booed every time he stepped to the plate or touched the ball.He also struck out in the eighth as fans chanted "Steroids! Steroids!"Rodriguez shrugged off the reaction. "I love Chicago," he said. "I love the fans here. It's just a great town, great people. I'm just so humbled being on the field, being able to play the game I love."Rodriguez did not deny using performance-enhancing drugs in a news conference after the punishment came down. Instead he said he will talk about whether he used PEDs at another time when he is more free to speak.He did say he has to defend himself because no one else will."I want nothing but the best for Al and his family," Pettitte said. "Glad to see him back. He's going to help this club. He's a great ballplayer. He's in to the game. He'll definitely help us."The Yankees are hoping Rodriguez can provide some sort of spark even though they're fading from the playoff picture. They need more power for their lineup, something that's been a particular problem for their third basemen.Pettitte, however, did them no favors. He lasted 2 2-3 innings in his shortest outing since July 18, 2010, while matching season highs for runs (seven) and hits (11). He fell to 0-3 in his last four starts.Rios delivered an RBI single and scored during a three-run first. He added a two-run single in the second that made it 5-0.Rios then capped a two-run third with a bases-loaded walk after Preston Claiborne replaced Pettitte, making it 7-0.That was more than enough for Quintana, who gave up one run and eight hits in 6 2-3 innings."It was just a good night offensively," White Sox manager Robin Ventura said. "Guys were swinging it."NOTES: Pettitte is the first Yankees pitcher since at least 1920 to allow runs in the first inning in seven straight starts within a single season, according to STATS LLC. ... Besides Rodriguez, Yankees C Francisco Cervelli and minor league OF Fernando Martinez were suspended 50 games. "I think he had made strides this year as a player, and I want him to come into spring training ready to go, try to learn from what has happened," manager Joe Girardi said when asked about Cervelli. ... With Jeter going on the DL, the Yankees recalled infielder Dave Adams from Triple-A Scranton/Wilkes-Barre. They also designated infielder Brent Lillibridge for assignment, and Rodriguez was activated from the disabled list. Outfielder Thomas Neal was claimed off waivers by the Cubs. ... White Sox LF Dayan Viciedo jammed his left thumb diving for Robinson Cano's single in the first inning and left the game. The team said X-rays were negative and he's day to day. ... RHP Hiroki Kuroda (10-6, 2.38 ERA) starts for the Yankees, with LHP Chris Sale (6-11, 2.92) pitching for Chicago on Tuesday.
NEW YORK — Alex Rodriguez, vowing to continue playing for the New York Yankees while he appeals his doping suspension, said he felt like he was "fighting for his life."Describing the last seven months as a "nightmare," Rodriguez told a packed news conference in Chicago on Monday that he was prepared to go the distance to clear his name after being given a 211-game ban for alleged drug offences."I'm fighting for my life," he said. "I have to defend myself. If I don't, no-one else will."Rodriguez was among 13 players suspended by Major League Baseball for their alleged links with a Florida clinic accused of supplying players with performance-enhancing drugs.The other 12 players all accepted 50-game bans, which is about eight weeks in MLB, but Rodriguez appealed after he was given a much stiffer penalty, suspended until the end of the 2014 season.The 38-year-old has not played this season because of injury but is allowed to play until his appeal, which has yet to be scheduled.On the same day the penalty was announced, the third baseman was preparing to rejoin the Yankees against the Chicago White Sox.Before the game, he addressed reporters, declining to talk about the specific allegations again him, talking instead about his joy at playing after being sidelined following hip surgery."I am thrilled and humbled to have the opportunity to put on this uniform again and to play Major League Baseball again," he said."I feel like I was 18 years old, back in Fenway Park back in 1994, when I went in to face the Red Sox for the very first time."It's been 20 years, and I'm just very excited to go out there and play baseball."Rodriguez was twice asked whether he had used performance enhancing drugs but did not say, replying instead that the case was still ongoing."We'll have a forum to discuss all of that, and we'll talk about it then," he said."It's been the toughest fight of my life, and not by any means am I out of the woods," he added."This is probably just 'phase two' probably starting. It's not going to get any easier. It's probably going to get hard, but I am humbled and I am thankful for the support."
CHICAGO — By every measure, Urban Meyer's first season at Ohio State was a smashing success. The Buckeyes won all 12 games, and Braxton Miller developed into a superstar quarterback along the way.That's all gone now, practically ancient history in football-mad Columbus. The pressure is on for a blockbuster sequel, even if Meyer himself is preoccupied with the opening scenes."Our job is to compete for championships in November. That's all I want them to think about," Meyer said. "A team is a complex animal that you got to be really careful how you approach things. Start talking about things that are way beyond even, I don't want to say expectations, but we don't talk about those things. We talk about we have to get to November to compete for a championship and that's complicated enough."It sure is. While Miller and Ohio State begin the year as the Big Ten favorite, there are plenty of potential challengers.Dynamic quarterback Devin Gardner thinks he's ready to lead Michigan back to the top of the conference. Taylor Martinez wants to put together another great year in his final season at Nebraska. Then there's Wisconsin, coming off a Rose Bowl trip and looking to make a smooth transition to new coach Gary Andersen, and Michigan State and more."I like our football team," Michigan coach Brady Hoke said. "I usually don't say that. I said it after the spring. I will continue to say it because I like how they've handled themselves on the field and off the field so far this summer. I like their work ethic, and I like how they've represented Michigan in a lot of ways."Denard Robinson is gone after a stellar career, but Gardner is back to provide the same sort of sizzle in Michigan's backfield. The 6-foot-4 junior began last season at wide receiver, and then played quarterback for the last five games. He threw for 1,219 yards and 11 touchdowns against five interceptions, and also had 101 yards and seven TDs on the ground.Gardner is a work in progress — "I have to start to checking the ball down. Always want the big play," he said — but his teammates have noticed a change in the former Detroit prep star since he became the starter behind center."He's grown right into it," senior safety Thomas Gordon said. "He's a lot more comfortable. You can see that."While Gardner is the toast of Ann Arbor, he has a ways to go to match the celebrity that Martinez enjoys in Nebraska. The senior star, who accounted for a school-record 3,890 yards of offense and 33 touchdowns last season, spent more than an hour signing autographs during one recent trip to the mall.Martinez has started 39 consecutive games for the Cornhuskers and will leave the school with several offensive records. While he will go down as one of the best players ever at the powerhouse program, he doesn't seem too concerned with his legacy headed into his final year."I've done a lot so far in my career, so I've just got to take this season for what it's worth and just enjoy it and just remember everything that happens," Martinez said.Five things to watch in the Big Ten:1. TOUGH UP FRONT: If you love the big guys up front, check out the offensive linemen of the Big Ten. Senior Jack Mewhort leads an experienced group for Ohio State, and Martinez raves about the unit at Nebraska. Michigan left tackle Taylor Lewan flirted with the NFL draft before deciding to return for one more season. He prepared for his final year by adopting a strict diet that he said helped increase his strength and quickness. "I've cheated a couple times, here and there," Lewan said. "I'm a sucker for ice cream."2. DUAL THREATS: Miller, Gardner and Martinez will grab all the headlines, but they aren't the only Big Ten quarterbacks who can score through the air or on the ground. Northwestern's Kain Kolter helped the Wildcats to a 10-3 record last season and their first bowl victory since 1949. Illinois' Nathan Scheelhaase rushed for 303 yards and four touchdowns last year.3. WHO'S THE NEW GUY: There are two new head coaches this year, with Andersen taking over at Wisconsin and Darrell Hazell going from Kent State to Purdue. The Badgers routed Nebraska in the Big Ten title game on Dec. 1, but Bret Bielema still decided to leave for Arkansas before Wisconsin's narrow loss to Stanford in the Rose Bowl. Enter Andersen, who left Utah State for quite the unusual transition with the Badgers. "There's going to be differences when you take over a program," Andersen said. "It's important to put your own stamp on it."4. SLEEPERS: Pat Fitzgerald has coached Northwestern to five consecutive bowl berths, culminating in the Wildcats' 34-20 victory over Mississippi State in the Gator Bowl in January. Ohio State, Michigan and Michigan State come to Evanston this year, where Northwestern doesn't enjoy much of a home-field advantage but could begin to build one with a couple victories. Indiana also could surprise people, with 19 starters back from last year's 4-8 team.5. GO DEEP: Penn State star Allen Robinson is the big name, but there are plenty of other solid receivers spread throughout the Big Ten. Kenny Bell (Nebraska), Jared Abbrederis (Wisconsin) and Jeremy Gallon (Michigan) each had over 800 yards receiving last season while averaging at least 16.9 yards per catch. Also keep a close eye on Cody Latimer (Indiana) and Corey Brown (Ohio State).
SAN DIEGO — Leaving behind the tranquillity and sunshine of Southern California, the Yankees headed east Sunday night for a wild spectacle in Chicago, where Alex Rodriguez was expected to make his season debut despite a looming suspension by Major League Baseball.All indications were that Rodriguez would be suspended Monday afternoon, along with other players — perhaps as many as 12. The other players were expected to agree to the suspensions, but it was unclear whether Rodriguez would do the same. The Yankees were scheduled to play the White Sox on Monday night.The Yankees were given informal notification Sunday that Major League Baseball intended to suspend Rodriguez through the end of the 2014 season for violations of the league's drug prevention program and the collective bargaining agreement. The Yankees were also told there was no indication that Rodriguez was prepared to make a deal that would end the matter quietly.There was still a slim possibility that Rodriguez would accept a last-minute deal for a lesser suspension, perhaps for 150 games, without an appeal. As of Sunday afternoon, however, neither baseball nor the Yankees were expecting that to happen.Instead, the expectation was that Rodriguez would immediately appeal the suspension and be allowed to play during that process, which could take more than a month. Rodriguez told a confidant Sunday that he would be at U.S. Cellular Field on Monday, ready to play, and Manager Joe Girardi said before the Yankees' 6-3 loss to the San Diego Padres that he had Rodriguez penciled into Monday's lineup."It should be a bit of a circus," Yankees outfielder Vernon Wells said.M.L.B. also told the Yankees on Sunday that Commissioner Bud Selig did not intend to invoke his special powers in the best interests of baseball, under Article 11 of the collective bargaining agreement, that would theoretically allow him to remove Rodriguez's case from the normal appeals procedure and prevent him from playing until the matter was resolved. The players union has dismissed the commissioner's right to do so and has vowed immediate action if he takes that step.Baseball, aware of the union's strong legal position and its recent cooperation with the joint drug program, is not interested in antagonizing the union. And ultimately, baseball thinks it has a solid case with stacks of evidence that will stand up to any appeal. The league accuses Rodriguez of using performance-enhancing drugs and trying to obstruct its investigation.However, Rodriguez's legal team is confident it can show that the entire proceeding is an attempt to allow the Yankees to shed their liability under his contract, which has roughly $95 million remaining on it through 2017.Rodriguez, the highest-profile player expected to be suspended, has not played this season as he rehabilitates from hip surgery and a quadriceps strain. Now he faces a suspension that could cover as many as 214 games, and he stands to lose as much as $36 million in salary.If he appeals and the expected suspension is upheld after a month or so, Rodriguez will serve the 214 games from that point, meaning his suspension will last into the 2015 season, when he will turn 40. If it is overturned, Rodriguez can continue to play as if nothing happened.Rodriguez, who has admitted using performance-enhancing drugs while he played for the Texas Rangers from 2001 to 2003, has been under investigation by baseball for his suspected involvement with a now-defunct South Florida anti-aging clinic known as Biogenesis, which has been accused of distributing performance-enhancing drugs to several players.Under that cloud, Rodriguez has been working to come back. He worked out Sunday in Trenton after playing two games for the Thunder, a Class AA Yankees affiliate, as part of his rehabilitation from the leg injury. He was then scheduled to fly to Chicago, check in at the team hotel and meet his teammates. Barring an 11th-hour deal, he will make his 2013 debut against the wishes of baseball, on the same day he is issued the longest P.E.D. suspension in history."There's so many rumors going on around it, I'm not sure anyone knows what's going on," Derek Jeter said. "But he's our teammate. If he's here tomorrow, we look forward to seeing him."As Rodriguez inched closer to returning from the hip injury last month, he complained of a quadriceps strain, and the Yankees told him to take more time to recover. Rodriguez said the Yankees were preventing him from coming back and voiced suspicion about their motivation.General Manager Brian Cashman has consistently said that the Yankees want Rodriguez back but that he needs to be healthy first. Yankees players also said they would welcome him back."If the guy comes back and he's healthy, he can help this team win," said Andy Pettitte, who admitted in 2007 to using human growth hormone before baseball tested for it. "I think he can help us. Everything that comes after that, we'll have to wait and see."If Rodriguez returns, the Yankees will have to make a move to create room on the roster. That could be a third assignment to the disabled list for Jeter, who was found to have a Grade 1 calf strain Sunday.Like Rodriguez, Jeter has missed much of the season. A broken ankle and a quadriceps injury have contributed to the most frustrating season of Jeter's career."The whole season has been a nightmare," he said.On Monday, the nightmare could look more like a circus.
NEW YORK — The New York Yankees have pledged to stand by embattled slugger Alex Rodriguez while he fights his 211-game suspension for alleged doping offences.Yankees General Manager Brian Cashman said Rodriguez, who has filed an appeal against the ban, would remain in the lineup as long as he was fit."If he's healthy, he's definitely going to be, by far, better than what we've been running out there," Cashman told reporters on Wednesday.For the second night in a row Rodriguez was back in the team and playing against the Chicago White Sox, though manager Joe Girardi picked him as designated hitter instead of at third base.Rodriguez, who made his first appearance of the season on Monday following a long injury, played in his traditional spot for his comeback but Girardi gave him a reduced workload on Tuesday."I didn't even ask him. He said he felt good today," Girardi said. "I didn't even ask him. I thought it was a good idea."Rodriguez was jeered every time he came to the plate and went 1-for-2, getting on base three times as the Yankees lost 3-2 and failed to make up ground in the American League East.He was also hit by a pitch from Chris Sale in the third inning, which was met with approval by the Chicago crowd.There was no let-up off the field either as Rodriguez came under renewed criticism following Major League Baseball's claims he had used steroids and human growth hormone purchased from the now-closed Biogenesis clinic in Florida.But he did get the support of closer Mariano Rivera, one of the game's most revered figures, playing his last season for the Yankees."Alex is my friend and definitely it's hard when you see all this stuff and when you see the fans booing a player because I'm a player," Rivera said."It's hard, but it is what it is. At the same time, he's a human being. Seeing the way they boo him is kind of hard to take and to see."Rodriguez was one of 13 players suspended by MLB on Monday but is the only one challenging his penalty. All the others accepted offers of 50-game bans but A-Rod got a stiffer punishment because he was accused of other offences, including lying to the investigators.The players association has vowed to support his appeal although executive director Michael Weiner said he would have advised Rodriguez to accept a ban if MLB had offered him a lower penalty."I don't want to give a number, but there was a number that I gave A-Rod and we advised him to take it," Weiner told a U.S. radio station. "He was never given that number."Pete Rose, who was banned for life for gambling on baseball while he was a player and manager of the Cincinnati Reds, urged Rodriguez to own up if he had used performance enhancing drugs.Rose denied the charges against him for years before finally confessing."We have to get these people to understand that if you make mistakes, people will forgive you if you come forward," Rose told USA Today."He's like the rest of us. He's made some major mistakes and he's trying to go on with his life. He's in a tough position, I think, with this appeal and with the lawyers telling him to do this and do that."
CHICAGO — Chris Sale allowed one run while outpitching Hiroki Kuroda in to the eighth inning, and the Chicago White Sox beat the New York Yankees 3-2 on Tuesday night.Alex Rodriguez singled, walked, was hit by a pitch and lined out to center field after going 1 for 4 in his season debut Monday. The Yankees lost for the 13th time in 19 games after scoring a run in the ninth against closer Addison Reed.A-Rod was on deck when Alfonso Soriano struck out to end it with a runner on first.Reed gave up a single to a pinch-hitter Ichiro Suzuki, who took second on defensive indifference and came around on Brett Gardner's two-out single. But Reed finished for his 27th save in 32 chances.Adam Dunn singled and scored tying run in the fourth, and Chicago took a 2-1 lead in the sixth when Paul Konerko beat the relay throw on a force to deep third, allowing Alexei Ramirez to score after he led off with a single.Doubles by Gordon Beckham and Alejandro De Aza in the seventh off Kuroda (10-7) made it a two-run game, sending the White Sox to their second straight win after dropping 10 in a row.Victimized by poor run support this season, Sale (7-11) got the win after going 1-9 over his previous 11 starts. He allowed five hits and left with one out in the eighth after Rodriguez led off with a single and Robinson Cano lined out.Nathan Jones struck out Curtis Granderson and Lyle Overbay before the Yankees rallied against Reed.Kuroda took the loss after going 3-0 in his previous five starts. He gave up three runs and nine hits, but the Yankees came out flat again after getting pounded 8-1 on Monday.They're hoping Rodriguez can provide a spark and boost their fading playoff hopes, but he's coming off hip surgery and has a long suspension hanging over him after Major League Baseball lowered the hammer on Monday.Rodriguez, who's appealing the 211-game punishment that stretches from Thursday through the 2014 season for violations of its drug agreement and labor contract. Hours after the suspension was handed out, he made his season debut and got booed every time his name was announced.It was the same way on Tuesday. The only time he heard cheers was when Sale hit him with a pitch near the belt in the third inning.NOTES: The White Sox held LF Dayan Viciedo out of the lineup after he jammed his left thumb on Monday. Manager Robin Ventura said he was available as a pinch hitter and expected Viciedo back in the lineup on Wednesday. ... Yankees closer Mariano Rivera insisted he's still retiring at the end of the season and will not reconsider. ... Manager Joe Girardi said C Francisco Cervelli, who was suspended 50 games on Monday, had surgery to remove hardware from his right hand. ... RHP David Phelps will likely be out a few more weeks after sustaining a different strain in his pitching forearm than the one that landed him on the disabled list last month. And RHP Michael Pineda will be shut down for a week to 10 days after he left his start with Triple-A Scranton/Wilkes-Barre on Friday because of shoulder stiffness.
Of all those penalized in baseball's biggest doping scandal, at least Nelson Cruz had a good story to tell.No, his drink wasn't spiked with testosterone in a bar one night by a Texas Rangers fan desperate for a World Series win. That would be a bit hard to believe now, wouldn't it?What really happened was he had this mysterious illness called helicobacter pylori, or something like that. Hard enough to spell, even harder to prove, but apparently the only known cure for it is to take performance enhancing drugs.Jhonny Peralta's story is a bit simpler. He made a mistake, he said, before heading out of Detroit to take the rest of the summer off.What's not to believe? After all, didn't we believe Peralta when he told us back in February: "I have never used performance-enhancing drugs. Period. Anybody who says otherwise is lying."No one, of course, believes anything Alex Rodriguez says. Not even when he went before the media Monday in Chicago in a performance that should be required viewing for any young actors looking to make their mark in Hollywood dramas."I'm a human being," Rodriguez said, in what may have been the only truthful thing to come out of his appearance. "I've had two hip surgeries. I've had two knee surgeries. I'm fighting for my life."Here's something you can believe. Barring further injury, A-Rod will be playing third base and batting in the middle of the lineup for the rest of the season, trying his best to help the Yankees make a run into the postseason.You haven't seen the last of Cruz and Peralta, either. Their teams are likely to make the playoffs and, if they do, both players are likely to join them when their 50-game suspensions conveniently end.Regrets, yes, they have a few. They'll miss out on some money while gone, and there's only so much time a guy can spend hanging around the food court at the local mall. But if you're going to miss some games, the dog days of summer have to be the best time to take an enforced break.So go ahead and cheer Bud Selig for finally coming to his senses and realizing what drugs have done to the game he's paid millions to protect. Applaud the players who have finally come to their senses and are speaking out against the cheaters who threaten both their jobs and their health.But don't call what went down Monday as one of the great days in the game. Don't believe for a minute that this was a defining moment in the fight against drug cheats.Not when the penalty for juicing is 50 games, or less than a third of a season. Not when the player Major League Baseball believes is the worst cheater of them all will still be playing third base for the Yankees in the heat of the pennant race.And certainly not when Cruz and Peralta become free agents at the end of the season and half the teams in the big leagues chase after them with more money than they've ever made in their careers.Baseball likes to tout its drug program as one of the best in sports and, to be fair, it has come a long way from a decade ago when players could load up on whatever they felt like and not worry about any penalties. But it remains a deeply flawed system that allows cheaters to remain ahead of the curve for the most part — and rewards them even after they've been caught.Blame the players and their union for a lot of it. They fought testing for years and were so powerful that owners didn't dare challenge them.But blame the owners, too. They made their money and got new stadiums while looking the other way as all those mammoth home runs soared out of the park. They keep throwing millions at players like Bartolo Colon and Melky Cabrera even after they've been busted for juicing.Nothing will totally to stop doping because the rewards are so great and there will always be those who try. That's true in many sports but especially baseball, where the money is so big.But here's a place to start if both owners and players want to show they're really serious about cracking down:—Make the penalty hurt. Fifty games is a joke, and clearly not a real deterrent. Make it a year's suspension for the first offense, and a lifetime ban if you're dumb enough to be caught twice.—Test more. The biggest hole in the baseball drug program is during the offseason, when players face just a one-in-six chance of being tested. With those odds, why not take the chance of bulking up during the offseason?—Void contracts. Ryan Braun is losing $3 million for sitting out 65 games this season. Think he would be doping if he thought the remainder of the $117 million on his contract could be voided for cheating?—Don't reward juicers. Limit new deals for players caught cheating to one-year contracts for the MLB minimum. If they play clean for that year, allow them to become free agents once again.It's all relatively easy stuff that could be settled over dinner between owners and players if the rhetoric you hear now about everyone wanting a clean game is really true. It won't be, because sometimes reality doesn't match the rhetoric.In the meantime, I know a story about helicobacter pylori that you'll really find interesting.
CHICAGO — Embroiled in a doping scandal that has sent shockwaves through Major League Baseball, New York Yankees slugger Alex Rodriguez was booed and jeered on his comeback from a lengthy hip injury against the Chicago White Sox at Cellular Field on Monday.Playing his first game of the season after recovering from surgery conducted in January, Rodriguez received little sympathy from fans of either team just hours after the third baseman was handed a 211-game ban for alleged doping offences."I'm a little disappointed that he's able to play tonight," said Jodi Rudd, 35, a New York Yankees fan, who had traveled from Arizona to watch his team lose 8-1.Rodriguez's ban runs until the end of the 2014 season and although the suspension does not start until Thursday, the 38-year-old can continue playing while appealing the decision.Los Angeles resident and Yankees fan Manuel Guerra felt the ban would signal an end to the slugger's career."Major League Baseball is using Alex Rodriguez as an example of what they will not allow," the 38-year-old said. "I'm his fan, but I think his career is over."White Sox fan and Chicago-area resident Rich Modelski, 59, said Rodriguez, the only one of 13 suspended players to challenge his ban, should have accepted the punishment."Everybody else took the suspension but this guy's hiding behind the fact that he had injuries and that he took these steroids and everything else to get back to playing," he said."Everybody else in baseball's got injuries and there's a lot of guys that don't take the performance-enhancing drugs."Modelski's 23-year-old son Jay said he was disappointed in the actions of a player he had grown up admiring."A-Rod has always been my favorite player and that's obviously been tarnished now," he said."It's kind of a shame that a guy making $30 million a year has to stoop to this level to try and show how good he is. His talent alone should have been enough."Bucking the trend of negative comments, New York manager Joe Girardi said the Yankees were glad to have Rodriguez back when he addressed the media before the game."I think guys were happy to see him. He's a team mate of ours. He's a friend of ours," Girardi said."For the players, this is business as usual in a sense. There are things that happen when you're in New York that some people are going to consider distractions, but the one thing that these guys understand is it's your team."You go out and play as a team, your goal is to try to win games and you deal with the stuff off the field after the game."
Rodriguez by the Numbers: From home runs to earnings, some facts about Alex Rodriguez's career in the wake of his suspension by Major League Baseball.CHICAGO — Alex Rodriguez always wanted to be the face of Major League Baseball. That desire consumed him from a very young age, when he embarked on a path of relentless achievement. Fame and money and records — he wanted it all.For much of the last two decades, he has gotten his wish, and now M.L.B. has told him to leave the stage. Baseball on Monday suspended Rodriguez for 211 games, starting Thursday and continuing through the 2014 season, for violating its drug program by using testosterone and human growth hormone and impeding its investigation into a Florida clinic identified as the source of performance-enhancing drugs.Twelve other players, including the All-Stars Everth Cabrera, Nelson Cruz and Jhonny Peralta, accepted 50-game suspensions on Monday. But because of his pledge to appeal before Thursday, Rodriguez was able to join the Yankees here as a member of the active roster for the first time all season.Rodriguez, who has had hip and leg injuries, played third base and batted cleanup against the Chicago White Sox. He was booed heavily in each of his four at-bats, singling once in an 8-1 loss.It made for an extraordinary scene, a player with 647 career home runs simultaneously arriving in person while being banished on paper.Major League Baseball has confronted its persistent doping problem more seriously than the other major American sports leagues, but Commissioner Bud Selig now faces a protracted legal battle with his top target."I'm fighting for my life," Rodriguez said. "I have to defend myself. If I don't defend myself, no one else will. There's a process. I'm happy there's a process. In due time, whatever happens, happens."Rodriguez, who admitted in 2009 to using steroids while playing for the Texas Rangers from 2001 to 2003, refused to answer whether he had used performance-enhancing drugs again. He said he wanted to let the process play out and "give the fans of baseball an opportunity to focus on all the great stories that have been happening."It was a typically tone-deaf response from Rodriguez, who is either oblivious to his role in the distraction that has consumed this baseball season or simply does not care. And baseball will not be rid of him soon — Michael Weiner, the executive director of the players union, said a ruling on Rodriguez's appeal was not likely before November.Weiner said he believed the length of Rodriguez's suspension was well out of line "for a player who may have used drugs." But Weiner acknowledged it was troubling to have so many members suspended for drug use, news that came two weeks after a former most valuable player, Ryan Braun of the Milwaukee Brewers, accepted a 65-game suspension for his role in the scandal.Interestingly, only four players from the investigation into the now-closed Florida clinic, Biogenesis, have tested positive: Braun, who won his appeal on a technicality in 2012, and Melky Cabrera, Bartolo Colon and Yasmani Grandal, who have already served 50-game punishments. That so many players did not test positive suggests that the testing system can be beaten. Baseball hopes that its investigation, and its aggressive tactics, will act as a deterrent.But it stands to reason that Biogenesis has not been the only source of illegal drugs for players, and history shows that athletes in all sports will do anything for an edge. At the union's executive board meeting last winter, Weiner said, some players advocated stricter penalties. For now, the penalties are 50 games for a first failed test, 100 for a second and a lifetime ban for a third.Weiner said that among the staff at the players union, there was little support for imposing a lifetime ban after a second offense instead of a third. But Weiner said the players would decide for themselves, and Lyle Overbay, the Yankees' veteran first baseman, said he believed players would want stricter penalties this off-season."When we first came out with the program, I thought 50 games was a lot of games," Overbay said. "Obviously, it's not. It's not working. I mean, it's not stiff enough, just the way it's come out."Overbay seems to have plenty of company around the major leagues. Jeff Francoeur of the San Francisco Giants said last week that he would support tougher penalties, because players have no excuse for failing a test.Baltimore Orioles outfielder Nick Markakis told The Baltimore Sun on Monday that he would support a lifetime ban for a first offense. Detroit pitcher Max Scherzer told reporters he would also support stiffer penalties."As players as a whole, we're tired of cheating," Scherzer said, according to The Detroit Free Press. "We're tired of guys who blatantly try to break the system. That's something that we have to find a way to shore up so this doesn't happen again, because the more days we have like this, the worse it is for our game and the worse it is for our fans."After Braun was suspended, Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said emphatically that he was tired of the cheating, imploring players to stop trying to beat the system. Girardi's job, however, is to try to win games for the Yankees, not to enforce baseball's drug policy or investigate possible cheating.So Girardi said he had never asked Rodriguez if he had, in fact, been using banned drugs again. He said it was not his place to judge another person, especially with the appeal process unresolved. Girardi could only hope that he had not written the name of a serial cheat on his lineup card."Obviously, you want to hope the resolution is that he's clean," Girardi said Monday. "That's the resolution that you hope for. I can't tell you what's going to happen in the appeal process."There are important consequences of the process for the Yankees, financially and on the field, where the team has been starving for offense. But whether he wins or loses his appeal is irrelevant to Rodriguez's place in history. He cherished his legacy even before he had one, but tarnished it long ago.He clings to a sport he says he loves, a sport desperate for him to go away.
CHICAGO — Alex Rodriguez sat in the far corner of the Yankees clubhouse Monday afternoon, staring at a computer screen displaying video images of Chicago White Sox pitcher Jose Quintana, whom he would soon be facing. A mere 30 minutes had passed since Major League Baseball had announced Rodriguez was being suspended for 211 games in connection with its months-long doping investigation, but Rodriguez, the 38-year-old third baseman, appeared unfazed.Behind him stood dozens of reporters, most sent specifically to observe and record Rodriguez's every move on a day when he was simultaneously handed the largest doping penalty in baseball history while incongruously preparing for his first game of the season.As Rodriguez casually chatted with a bystander hours before the Yankees' 8-1 loss to the White Sox, Derek Jeter walked past and said, "How's it going, man?" as if it were any other day.But it was far from that. It was one of the most unusual days in recent baseball history, even for a lightning-rod player like Rodriguez.He had spent the first four months of the baseball season recovering from hip surgery and watching while baseball investigated his ties to an anti-aging clinic in South Florida suspected of distributing performance-enhancing drugs. And then on Monday, baseball pounced, suspending Rodriguez and 12 other players as the result of its investigation but with only Rodriguez drawing more than a 50-game ban.In turn, only Rodriguez decided to appeal, a process that may allow him to play right through the end of the regular season and even into October, should the injury-battered Yankees somehow find a way to grab a playoff spot. That is fine with Rodriguez, who in a pregame news conference with more than 100 members of the news media declined to directly answer questions about drug use but said he was intent on sticking up for his rights and playing baseball."I'm fighting for my life," he said. "I have to defend myself. If I don't defend myself, no one will."Still, while he was composed in the clubhouse, there were times in his measured opening statement when he seemed to put on a display of emotions.He called the last seven months of his life, since reports first tied him to the clinic, a nightmare. And yet, in another part of the news conference, he said he felt like a teenager because of the sheer joy of being able to get back on the field."I am thrilled and humbled to have the opportunity to put this uniform on again and play major league baseball again," he said. "I feel like I was 18 years old, back in Fenway Park in 1994 when I went in to face the Red Sox for the very first time. It's been 20 years and I'm just very excited to have the opportunity to go out there and play baseball and help my team win."By the time Rodriguez stepped to the plate two and a half hours later for his first at-bat of the season, the Yankees needed help. It was the top of the second and they were already trailing, 3-0. Amid a backdrop of sustained booing — nothing Rodriguez hasn't heard before during the course of his controversial career — he hit a bloop single to left. He went 1 for 4, and by the time he came to bat in the eighth, the boos had transformed into chants of "A-Roid, A-Roid.""It's been crazy," Rodriguez said. "But from this point on, I'm going to do my very best to focus on baseball. Every game is very important. It was good to get the first one behind me, even though it wasn't a win."Rodriguez's debut began hours after the announcement he had been suspended through the 2014 season, beginning Thursday, on grounds he had both used performance enhancers and attempted to thwart baseball's inquiry.Rodriguez, with the full backing of the players union, is planning to appeal the ruling through baseball's arbitrator, a process that could take as long as three months or more to conclude, according to Michael Weiner, the union's executive director.Weiner said the penalty was "way out of line," and he said the union agreed with Rodriguez's decision to appeal.In 2009, Rodriguez admitted to using steroids years earlier when he was with the Texas Rangers. In this instance, he was less forthcoming. Asked if he had used performance enhancers in the much more recent period outlined in baseball's investigation, he declined to answer yes or no."We'll have a forum to discuss all of that and we'll talk about it then," he said, in an apparent reference to the appeals process.Rodriguez was also vague about his relationship with the Yankees, which has gone from cool to testy to outright combative in recent weeks. Rodriguez has made indirect accusations that the Yankees were involved in baseball's investigation as a way to escape their immense financial commitment to him. He is owed roughly $95 million through 2017.Rodriguez has also insinuated that he has not received adequate care from the Yankees' medical staff. Both charges have angered the Yankees, who issued a statement Monday challenging them."The New York Yankees in no way instituted and/or assisted M.L.B. in the direction of this investigation; or used the investigation as an attempt to avoid its responsibilities under a player contract; or did its medical staff fail to provide the appropriate standard of care to Alex Rodriguez," the statement read in part.But despite this mutual antagonism, the Yankees can use any help Rodriguez can provide. Even as he returned to the lineup, Jeter, the team captain, was going back on the disabled list for a third time with more leg troubles. He has been unable to stay on the field this season, and now he will watch as Rodriguez tries to play, one more twist in a bizarre and nightmarish season no Yankee could have anticipated.
Alex Rodriguez was among 13 players suspended by Major League Baseball on Monday for violating the league's antidoping rules, the biggest single-day drug action in the sport's history.Rodriguez is planning to appeal his ban, which would begin Thursday and would be for 211 games, through the 2014 season — by far the longest levied by the league for a doping violation. The league cited his "use and possession of numerous forms of prohibited, performance-enhancing substances" over many years.As baseball announced its sanctions, Rodriguez, the Yankees' high-profile third baseman, was preparing to make his 2013 major league debut Monday night against the Chicago White Sox. Rodriguez, who has been recovering from hip surgery and a quadriceps strain, is eligible to play until his appeal is heard by an arbitrator, meaning he can probably play out the season with a lengthy possible ban looming.In a news conference before the Yankees' game in Chicago, Rodriguez declined to discuss the suspension or accusations that he used banned substances, but he reiterated his intent to challenge the league's ruling.Once considered among the best players in the game, Rodriguez received a far stiffer penalty than the others cited by baseball on Monday, who all accepted 50-game suspensions, effectively ending their 2013 seasons. Among the others were three 2013 All-Stars — Nelson Cruz of the Texas Rangers, Everth Cabrera of the San Diego Padres and Jhonny Peralta of the Detroit Tigers — as well as Francisco Cervelli of the Yankees.Rodriguez is the only player planning to appeal, and the executive director of the players union, Michael Weiner, called his suspension "way too harsh.""We've never had a 200-plus penalty for a player who may have used drugs, and you know, among other things, I just think that is way out of line," Weiner said in a call with reporters.Commissioner Bud Selig, however, said the suspension was within the bounds of the league's antidoping rules, saying in a statement that baseball "conducted a thorough, aggressive investigation guided by facts so that we could justly enforce our rules."Weiner said a ruling on the appeal was not likely before November, which means Rodriguez can presumably play through the rest of the season.The suspensions issued Monday stem from the league's investigation into Biogenesis of America, a South Florida anti-aging clinic run by Anthony P. Bosch. With Bosch's cooperation, baseball claimed its biggest trophies in its fight against performance-enhancing drugs.For the past six months, since Miami New Times, a weekly newspaper, published its account of Bosch's providing drugs to professional athletes, including Rodriguez, baseball investigators have intensified their pursuit, going door to door in the Miami area hunting for information to build cases against some of the biggest names in the game.Major League Baseball was able to persuade almost all the players linked to Biogenesis to accept their punishments despite the apparent lack of a positive test for banned substances. Baseball's drug-testing program, agreed to by the players union, allows for suspensions based on nonanalytic positives when doping can be proved with other evidence. The league contends that its investigation yielded other convincing evidence — like documents and eyewitness accounts — that implicates the players.The first of the Biogenesis-related suspensions came last month, when the Milwaukee Brewers slugger Ryan Braun accepted a 65-game suspension without appealing. Braun, the National League's most valuable player in 2011, failed a drug test that season, but that suspension was overturned on appeal.Some of the players punished Monday issued statements acknowledging their mistakes, and their teams publicly stated their support for the league's doping program.The Yankees said in a statement they would have no comment on the Rodriguez case as it is appealed.Rodriguez, who was born in New York and grew up in the Dominican Republic and in Florida, has long been under suspicion for using performance-enhancing drugs, which he admitted using for a limited time earlier in his career.At the start of the 2009 season, Rodriguez was 33 and had 553 career home runs, putting him on track to break Barry Bonds's career record of 762 by the time Rodriguez reached 40.
CHICAGO — A day after a news media circus descended on U.S. Cellular Field to chronicle the dueling narratives of Alex Rodriguez's season debut and Major League Baseball's announcement that it had suspended him, the Yankees faced a decidedly less frenetic atmosphere on Tuesday.There was no news media stakeout of the players' parking lot awaiting Rodriguez's arrival, no dramatic pregame news conference and no deluge of questions about performance-enhancing drugs.There was, however, another loss.The Yankees turned to Hiroki Kuroda, who has become their most reliable starter, to lift a team plagued by injuries, off-the-field distractions and two consecutive losses. He was true to form, delivering another solid outing, allowing three runs over seven innings. But it was wasted, as a reeling Yankees offense struggled to put hits together in a 3-2 loss to the White Sox."You give up three runs in seven innings, usually you'll sign up for that," Manager Joe Girardi said.Rodriguez, who said he would appeal the 211-game suspension he received for violating the league's drug policy and interfering with its Biogenesis investigation, was again the target of a hostile crowd that booed him at every opportunity. He also hit the ball hard and reached base three times, finishing 1 for 2. After playing third in his debut, he was the designated hitter Tuesday.He walked in his first at-bat, and was cheered in the third when he was hit by a 93-mile-per-hour fastball from White Sox starter Chris Sale. He lined out to center with runners on first and second in the fifth and hit a sharp single into left leading off the eighth.The Yankees, who have now scored only 16 runs in their last seven games, were lucky to score at all Tuesday — their only run until the ninth would have been cause for comedy if not for the state of their bats. In the first inning, Alfonso Soriano scored from second on a wild pitch when White Sox catcher Josh Phegley could not find the ball after it caromed away from him.They had a chance to extend their lead in the third when Robinson Cano singled to center. Brett Gardner attempted to score from second, but did not slide and was thrown out on a close play.Girardi argued the call. Asked after the game if Gardner should have slid, he replied simply, "Yeah."The White Sox answered in the fourth on a run-scoring single by Conor Gillaspie that ended Kuroda's scoreless streak at 172/3 innings. Chicago went ahead in the sixth, scoring a run on a fielder's choice, and added another in the seventh on an R.B.I. double from Alejandro De Aza."I wanted to contribute to a win and I couldn't do that," Kuroda said.Sale, a fireballing 6-foot-10 left-hander, baffled the Yankees for seven and a third innings, allowing one run and five hits. He walked four and struck out six.The Yankees entered the game five games behind the Texas Rangers for the second American League wild-card berth, but are chasing four teams for that spot. With 50 games now remaining, their playoff chances are slowly slipping away.The Yankees mounted a mini-rally in the ninth, when Gardner drove in Ichiro Suzuki with two outs. But Soriano struck out to end the game. It was another opportunity lost."Hopefully we'll start scoring more runs and this will turn," Girardi said.
CHICAGO — With a nightmarish season lurching into its final two months, the Yankees were at a crossroad on Monday when Derek Jeter and Joe Girardi decided to address the team in a brief postgame meeting, according to several people in the room.The Yankees have been playing substandard baseball in recent weeks, the kind of baseball almost unrecognizable to Yankees fans for the last two decades. Girardi would not discuss details of the meeting, saying, "If we had wanted you in there, we would have invited you."But one person in the room said, "There were some things that needed to be said."There are many concerns facing the Yankees: the return of Alex Rodriguez despite his 211-game suspension for using performance-enhancing drugs, a struggling offense and ineffective pitching, mainly by C. C. Sabathia and Andy Pettitte.Lost amid the Rodriguez frenzy and his ban, which he is appealing, is a staggering, old team that is in danger of missing the playoffs for the first time in five years.Girardi acknowledged the Yankees' failures on Tuesday afternoon and issued a warning that may have echoed his thoughts to the team Monday."We need to start winning games or we're not going to be playing in October," he said, "so there is some concern."The Yankees have lost 16 of 25 games including Tuesday's 3-2 loss to the Chicago White Sox, a struggling second-tier team that had lost 10 straight games before beating the Yankees on Monday. At 57-55, the Yankees are buried in fourth place in the American League East. In the wild-card standings, there are four teams ahead of them for the second spot. One of those is the Kansas City Royals.When the Yankees did not make the playoffs in 2008, they won 89 games. This team is on pace to win 82."It's extremely weird," said Pettitte, who had another shaky outing Monday. "It's weird to struggle. It's weird for me personally to struggle as long as I have. It's weird for me to see this team not score like we usually do. It doesn't matter who is in this clubhouse. Usually, we figure out a way to get it done.""Nightmare" is another word that players have used the last couple of days to describe the last few months. Phil Hughes used it to illustrate his recurring problems, Jeter to encapsulate his succession of injuries and Rodriguez to describe his battle with Major League Baseball (and the Yankees) over his suspension.More than anything, the Yankees look decrepit. Jeter, who is 39, has been on the disabled list three separate times with three injuries and Rodriguez, 38, is coming off hip surgery and looks more stiff and immobile than ever. Pettitte, who turned 41 in June, is having the results of a 41-year-old. Lyle Overbay, Vernon Wells and Ichiro Suzuki are on the downside of their careers. Alfonso Soriano, acquired last month to fuel some offense, is 37 years 8 months old.General Manager Brian Cashman said he expected Rodriguez to be able to play the rest of the season while his suspension was being appealed, but there is no certainty about what production he will provide. After last year's disappointing season, Cashman called Rodriguez, a three-time most valuable player who was once considered the best player in baseball, an "above-average third baseman."Asked on Tuesday if he still considered him to be that good, Cashman could not say for sure."He's been above average in the past number of years, and we've been below average at that position this year," Cashman said, "so it would be good if we can get at least that. I don't know if he'll be better than what we've been running out there."The Yankees have had success with older players in the past, but not much when Jeter is not one of them. He has played in only 5 of the Yankees' 112 games."I've played for two other organizations and seen some pretty strange things," said Wells, who has played 15 years with the Blue Jays, the Angels and the Yankees. "When you come to this organization and put this uniform on, it's synonymous with legacy, tradition and No. 2. When you don't see No. 2 out there, you know things are not right."No. 2, of course, is Jeter's uniform number.Overbay, who came to the Yankees this season after 12 previous seasons in baseball, said he had never seen the kind of injuries to star players that the Yankees had sustained repeatedly this season."This is a year I'll remember for a long time," he said. "We haven't played well since April, really, but there's still time to turn it around."
CHICAGO — Michael Weiner, the chief of the baseball players union, said the players association had recommended that Alex Rodriguez accept a suspension from Major League Baseball if it were for a reasonable number of games. That perhaps suggests that evidence uncovered in baseball's investigation into Biogenesis, a defunct South Florida anti-aging clinic, demonstrated Rodriguez was guilty of something.But the penalty of 211 games that baseball levied on Rodriguez on Monday for using banned substances and then thwarting its investigation was excessive, in the opinion of the union and Rodriguez. In the end, the union agreed with Rodriguez's decision to appeal the suspension."Based on the evidence that we saw, we made a recommendation," Weiner said on host Chris Russo's Mad Dog Radio show on SiriusXM. "The commissioner's office didn't meet it. They were much higher. And therefore, we're at a hearing."Russo asked Weiner if Rodriguez would have accepted a 50-game ban."I don't want to give a number, but there was a number that I gave A-Rod and we advised him to take it," Weiner said. "He was never given that number."A dozen other players received 50-game suspensions Monday, consistent with the league's joint drug program that calls for a 50-game ban without pay for a first offense. Ryan Braun of the Milwaukee Brewers received a 65-game ban last month, both for using performance enhancers and for an undisclosed violation of the collective bargaining agreement.No player has ever been suspended 200 games for using performance enhancers.The suspension takes effect Thursday. Rodriguez can appeal it and has repeatedly said that he would. He can play during the appeal process. Weiner said Monday during a conference call that the appeal was not expected to be concluded until November at the earliest, meaning Rodriguez can almost certainly play the rest of the season.Weiner also said on the conference call that Rodriguez could still negotiate a deal to accept a lesser sentence, but he said that was highly unlikely.
CHICAGO — Paul Konerko is not a crusader. He never has been, and he is not comfortable being cast in the role. He is a ballplayer, studious about the art of hitting, professional in his demeanor, and he would prefer to leave it at that.But it is always good to be on the right side of history, whether or not you thought much about it at the time. And that is where Konerko was, a decade ago, when 16 members of the Chicago White Sox initially planned to boycott their drug tests to help ensure more meaningful tests in the future."I don't remember it being that big a deal," Konerko said on Tuesday by his locker before batting practice at U.S. Cellular Field. "If I remember anything about it, it's that it got made into something, which I guess is not a bad thing. But it was more like guys didn't care, and if they didn't have to do it, it went down as a positive, and that was fine."Konerko was at first base Monday when Alex Rodriguez arrived there safely with a single in his first at-bat of the season for the Yankees. It came on the day baseball suspended Rodriguez 211 games for violating its drug policy and obstructing its Biogenesis investigation, which has resulted in shorter suspensions for 13 others. Rodriguez is appealing the punishment.The players union first agreed to test for steroids in the labor negotiations of 2002, after Ken Caminiti, a former Most Valuable Player for the San Diego Padres, admitted his use to Sports Illustrated. Caminiti's admission put a face to a problem within baseball that was widely suspected but never confirmed. Cries for a testing program grew harder to ignore."It was a bargaining chip with ownership, and ownership had a vested interest in keeping the game clean," said Kelly Wunsch, a retired pitcher who was then the White Sox' player representative. "I know people say ownership turned a blind eye to it, and they probably did in some circumstances. But people were going to start losing interest in watching a bunch of clowns out there on drugs, doing things normal people couldn't even think about doing."They had always tried to get a little bit more testing with each collective bargaining agreement, and at that point, an incident like Caminiti's really put a lot of public pressure on both sides to at least give a nod to what was going on."That acknowledgment came in the form of anonymous survey testing, as it was called, to be done during spring training in 2003. If more than 5 percent of the players tested positive, mandatory random testing, with penalties, would begin in 2004. A refusal to take the test would have counted as a positive.That idea appealed to many of the White Sox because they wanted to reach the 5 percent threshold to ensure future testing. But when Wunsch spoke to union leaders in New York, they told him a boycott would be inconsistent with the agreement.The players took the tests, Wunsch said, "and, of course, it was much ado about nothing. We had plenty of positives to put us over the trigger."Years later, one of those positives was found to have belonged to Rodriguez, who admitted to using steroids from 2001 to 2003 while playing for the Texas Rangers. That season, essentially, was a bridge year for the users — a last chance to take steroids without risking discipline. As Wunsch recalled, the older generation was reluctant to let go."For some of the older players, the meat of their careers had been in that sort of Wild West," Wunsch said."They probably didn't want to see it end; it was fine for them. Like any kind of social change, it's the younger generation that pushes things, and that was very much in line with what we encountered 10 years ago. It was older players saying, 'Hey, what the hell do y'all think you're doing?' It was a don't-rock-the-boat mentality."Wunsch, now 41, played only six seasons in the majors. His best was his first, in 2000, when he led American League pitchers in appearances with 83 and had a 2.93 earned run average.By 2005, when he was 32, injuries had diminished Wunsch's effectiveness and his fastball had lost its zip. He understood the mentality so common just a few years before, how easy it would have been to get a chemical edge."Luckily, or unluckily, there was already drug testing at that point, so it was off the table for me," Wunsch said. "The thinking was that your career could have lasted longer, and therein lies the problem: you didn't feel you could leave it all on the field unless you used P.E.D.'s. The fact that there is testing in place has cleaned up the game, to a large extent, but we all know if people can dope in the Olympics or the Tour de France as much as they do, the odds of it being a fully clean sport are pretty low."That suspicion became a sobering reality with the Biogenesis suspensions. Wunsch, who runs a custom-home building company in Austin, Tex., coaches his sons in baseball but rarely watches major league games anymore. He still does not believe everything he sees."When I was young, it was a generational phenomenon to see a guy throwing 100 miles an hour," Wunsch said. "Now there's a half-dozen guys doing it. You get to the point where you think, 'Hmm — maybe.' It takes some of the awe and wonderment out of what these people can do."You hate to think that way, because there are some who are doing it clean, and God love 'em if they do; it's fantastic. But you can't help but be skeptical, and that's unfortunate. The better, the stricter and the more all-encompassing the testing can be, the more we can relax, sit back and enjoy these athletes."The union plans to revisit the drug program this winter, and stricter penalties will be discussed. Konerko, an advocate of fair play a decade ago, offered no opinion on that, saying smarter people would decide.But he is pleased with the direction of a testing program, and said it would continue to evolve from its simplistic beginnings."You have to look at it big picture," Konerko said. "What it looks like right now isn't what it looked like eight years ago, and it probably won't be what it looks like eight years from now. But if it's constantly getting better, it's good. That's all you can do."
On opening night, the cheat hit cleanup. Of course he did, as the center of a circus that Alex Rodriguez was widely accused of foisting upon the poor (ha!), victimized (ha! ha!) and — more tellingly — offensively undernourished (aha!) Yankees .The same Yankees who immediately ceded to Rodriguez the most glamorous position in their lineup only hours after Major League Baseball set the parameters for his exit from the sport.The same Yankees who made the snap, dubious judgment that Rodriguez was a better bet to deliver runs after major hip surgery and nine months absent from the major leagues than Alfonso Soriano, who had 18 homers and 55 runs batted in.Understand this: the Yankees didn't have to be so accommodating to Rodriguez on Monday night in Chicago or Tuesday night, when he moved up to third in the order. They didn't have to play him, much less fuel his fantastic notions of quasi normalcy days after he essentially accused them of complicity with baseball in seeking to bar him from the game.The Yankees didn't have to make Monday night a spectacle on steroids, so to speak. But they couldn't help themselves any more than baseball for years as it turned a blind collective eye while players made an institutional farce out of the sport.You could argue that making him sit a day or two or batting him sixth or seventh would have proved nothing, practically speaking. Symbolically, at least, it would have sent a message to A-Rod that he was no longer — and shouldn't count on again being — the man he once smooched in the mirror.Would he have even been rushed into the prestigious four hole or the lineup at all had Kevin Youkilis had a healthy and productive season as his replacement and the offense had remained formidable enough to keep the Yankees at the top of the American League East?One might also say they had to be sensitive to Rodriguez's allegations that had predictably gained traction in some news media outlets without a shred of evidence to support them. More cynically, and likely, the Yankees were doing what faltering entertainment businesses do: grabbing onto an increasingly rare promotable occasion.Much like A-Rod, they needed attention and a compelling new story line in an effort to reverse plummeting television ratings and attendance in a fast-deteriorating season. His debut Monday night brought the highest Yankees rating on YES this season. And they could certainly use a few extra base hits if he could provide them in their faltering pursuit of a wild-card playoff spot.Hence, Rodriguez's return, for however long it lasts, has become a microcosm of baseball's steroid era dating to the late 1990s. Like the drug-enhanced and now-disgraced blokes who pumped millions into the owners' pockets, it is a marriage based on self-interest and without much regard for overriding principle.Rodriguez has good reason to appeal Commissioner Bud Selig's 211-game suspension. It was arbitrary enough to make an arbitrator at least consider reducing it by about a third.Meanwhile, the Yankees find themselves in a no-lose position they don't really deserve to be in. If Rodriguez loses his appeal and is out all of next season, they will find themselves with a get-out-of-payroll-jail-free pass just when an owner-imposed $189 million cap was supposed to limit their options.If a ruling is delayed until after the season, the Yankees will have the A-Rod spectacle to sell in a season when Derek Jeter can't stay on the field and only Mariano Rivera's pending retirement will give fans reason to watch if their team is out of the race. In a bizarre derivative of the term, Rodriguez has become the Yankees' M.V.P. — most valuable product — for the immediate future.He and the other players suspended Monday for their involvement in the Biogenesis case remind us of how self-serving and hollow Selig's declarations have been about baseball's having moved past the steroid scourge. In the way terrorism is not an enemy, cheating is not any one player or generation of players. It's a concept that is not going away, especially with baseball so invested in developing talent in less-forbidding Latin American countries.Rodriguez is a symptom of the problem, but no greater a cheat or teller of untruths than others who came before him. As he dares to use the collectively bargained system in a calculated effort for a better deal, he becomes the easy piñata here, the target impossible to miss with a Louisville Slugger.But make no mistake: the Yankees will take what his bat can give them for however long they can get it. They will hit him in the middle of the order, make him the center of attention and squeeze every last dollar out of the antihero known as A-Rod.It has been that way for all of baseball's steroid era, from the owners on down. Do what you must, get what you can. Drug compensation for all.
In the end, the lasting feeling on baseball's big drug day was sadness. It was sad to read the apologies from the players caught, suspended and accepting their fate. It was sad that some were so obscure that they did not need to apologize. It was sad that people in Chicago bought tickets to a White Sox game only to jeer the saddest spectacle of all, the Yankees' Alex Rodriguez left on his own to tilt at the windmills of his imagination.Even baseball doing a victory lap felt kind of sad because the sport had let the drug culture sink deep roots into the game before it even tried to nip at the leaves. As Jayson Stark writes on ESPN.com, it's not that the sport won any kind of huge battle Monday by suspending 13 players including the nettlesome pinstriped No. 13, but that it's finally fighting the battle.Of course, the whole thing ended up spinning around the A-Rod axis, as it has from the beginning. He decided to fight his 211-game ban, which was unsurprising, and the union decided to back his fight, slightly more surprising, and so he made his season debut in a dismal Yankees loss to the even-more-dismal White Sox. The whole scene kicked off with a mob scene of a news conference, in which Rodriguez futilely attempted to spin his answers back toward him actually playing baseball, Joe Lemire writes on SI.com. At least he spared us vehement and ridiculous-sounding denials, which, Mike Vaccaro writes in The New York Post, means he may have stopped trying to play us all for fools, although this could change on a moment's notice with Rodriguez, depending on what questionable public-relations advice floats past his eardrums.The sight of Rodriguez desperately trying to extend his career was terribly sad and made it easy for everyone to start wondering if there was anything completely real about his career, whether, as Scott Miller writes on CBSSports.com, he'd ever played a clean game in the majors. It certainly highlights the searing insecurity at the heart of the player, Ian O'Connor writes on ESPN.com, who clearly was not confident enough to rely on his prodigious talent. That's what puts Rodriguez in the same crumpled up discard pile as track's Marion Jones and cycling's Lance Armstrong, the great athletes who might have been talented enough to triumph clean in dirty sports but never gave us the chance to find out. Maybe now, Mike Lupica writes in The Daily News, the next generation of would-be cheaters are paying attention and maybe some will choose a better path. Although, as Dave Zirin writes in The Nation, so many of those would-be cheaters come from the desperate streets of Latin America, where the risk is an entirely different equation.That is baseball's hope, of course, that this belated ride in on the white horse will scare the drug culture straight. It certainly felt like a seismic day, as Joel Sherman writes in The Post, despite Rodriguez's protests, because Rodriguez found himself on an island of his own creation. Everyone else gave up, said "I did it," and moved on.Among those was the Rangers' Nelson Cruz, who without the Rodriguez spectacle might be drawing more scorn for the particular way he left his team in a lurch, as Mac Engel writes in The Fort Worth Star-Telegram. Jhonny Peralta's ban caused fewer ripples with the Tigers, who were so prepared for this they traded for a shortstop at the deadline to replace him, but Mitch Albom of The Detroit Free Press still wishes fans cared more about the ethics of Peralta's doping than whether the Tigers will win in his absence.That, it seems, is another battle for another day. Perhaps after some of the sadness fades.
CHICAGO — For eight and two-thirds innings Wednesday night, the Yankees appeared to have regained some sense of normalcy. Alex Rodriguez, they found out, will likely be with them for the rest of the season after appealing his 211-game suspension for violating baseball's drug policy. The offense finally showed signs of stirring, and C. C. Sabathia delivered his best outing in a month. The Yankees had a one-run lead with the stalwart closer Mariano Rivera in to pitch the ninth inning.Whenever chaos has swirled around the Bronx for his nearly two decade career, Rivera has almost always remained a steady, calming presence — and something close to automatic with the game on the line.Yet after receiving a standing ovation from the U.S. Cellular Field crowd Wednesday when he was summoned to protect the Yankees' ninth-inning lead, he faltered, blowing the save in a game the Yankees would eventually lose, 6-5, in 12 innings. Rivera retired the first two batters he faced, but Gordon Beckham doubled to right-center field and Adam Dunn lined an 0-2 pitch for a single to left field to tie the score.Three innings later, after a Robinson Cano home run had given the Yankees a 5-4 lead, Adam Warren could not close out the White Sox. Alejandro De Aza lined a two-out, two-R.B.I. triple to right-center field capping another rally that began with two outs and the bases empty.It was the latest blow in a season that is suddenly very quickly slipping away from the Yankees."This one feels worse because we came out today playing hard, not that we weren't trying to do that, but we had a chance," Rivera said. "We had two chances, and we couldn't hold one of them. That's bad. We cannot do that. It's unacceptable."Before the game, Rodriguez did not want to talk about the new development in his ongoing saga. A ruling on his official appeal is not expected until after the season, ending the speculation over the length of his stay with the Yankees and offering at least some short-term clarity in what has been a murky and complex process."I have no reaction," Rodriguez said curtly.The Yankees began the day 10 ½ games behind the Boston Red Sox in the American League East and trailing the Texas Rangers by six games for the second wild card spot. Like Rodriguez, his teammates, too, pledged a renewed commitment to reviving a season teetering on the brink of irrelevance with 50 games left entering Wednesday. The team held a meeting after Monday's loss to address a lack of focus and urgency.They are now 0-2 since that meeting.For most of the night the Yankees, now losers of 14 of their last 20 games, followed a more hopeful script. Sabathia, the big, sturdy left-hander, turned in a much-improved start after entering the game leading the American League in two rather ignominious categories, having allowed 168 hits and 82 earned runs. He went seven and a third innings, struck out one, walked none and allowed three runs on five hits. He was in line to earn his first win since July 3.Alfonso Soriano provided the early support for Sabathia, crushing a two-run homer to left field in the first inning after Brett Gardner led off the game with a bunt single. It was Soriano's second home run with the Yankees since he was acquired from the Chicago Cubs last month.The Yankees added a run in the third inning when Vernon Wells blooped a single in front of right fielder Alex Rios after Soriano had walked and Rodriguez singled. Eduardo Nunez hit his first home run of the season an inning later.It was the first time the Yankees scored more than three runs since July 28, a stretch of seven games.As for Rodriguez, he was back at third base after receiving a rest at D.H. Tuesday. Boos again greeted him each time he stepped in the batter's box.He singled to left in the third, but finished 1 for 5, including a ground out to third with a runner on third in the 10th inning."It would have been great to get a hit there," he said, adding, "This one really hurts. That was unbelievable."Before the game, Manager Joe Girardi again expressed his displeasure with the U.S. Cellular Field crowd for cheering after Alex Rodriguez was hit by a pitch during Tuesday's game. "I had an issue with last night," he said. "That's a concern of mine. That's a societal thing." Rodriguez said he did not hear the cheers. ...With two hits Wednesday, Alfonso Soriano now has 1,999 in his career.
CHICAGO — Alex Rodriguez 's appeal of his 211-game suspension for violating baseball's drug policy was officially filed Wednesday, according to the players union. An arbiter will decide the case, and a decision is not expected until October or November.Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said having Rodriguez in the lineup for the final 50 games of the season would give a boost to an offense that had scored 16 total runs in the last seven games."I don't think any of us thought it was going to be anything different," Girardi said. "This is part of the process negotiated by M.L.B. and the players association, and we just have to let it play out. I expect to play him a lot; we need him to help us."Entering Wednesday's game against the Chicago White Sox, Rodriguez was 2 for 6 this season, with two singles, a walk and a hit-by-pitch. The Yankees had lost both games he had played in, and they entered Wednesday 10 ½ games behind Boston in the American League East. They trailed Texas by six games for the second wild-card spot.A HOSTILE CROWD The fan reaction to Alex Rodriguez at U.S. Cellular Field had mostly consisted of catcalls, jeers and boos — except during one moment on Tuesday night. After Rodriguez was grazed on the elbow by a pitch from Chris Sale in the third inning, the crowd cheered as Rodriguez trotted to first base.After the game, Rodriguez said he had not heard the cheers, but Joe Girardi said that he heard them and that the episode was disturbing."There's something wrong with that," Girardi said. "I often think that it starts from the adults. And if it was their child, would they want them to be hit? Because the kids will only repeat what the adults do."Girardi returned to the subject before Wednesday's game, still visibly bothered."I had an issue with last night," he said. "That's a concern of mine. That's a societal thing."Girardi also said he was curious to see what kind of reception Rodriguez would receive when he returned to Yankee Stadium on Friday."I don't really know what the appropriate response is," Girardi said, adding: "People are going to react the way they're going to react. We'll have to see on Friday."SABATHIA SEEKING TURNAROUND Losers of 13 of their last 19 and on a three-game losing streak, the Yankees turned to C. C. Sabathia on Wednesday. Sabathia, who signed an eight-year, $182 million contract in 2009, has not looked like the ace of past seasons.He entered Wednesday with a 4.78 earned run average, far higher than his 3.22 mark over his first four seasons with the Yankees. He had given up the most hits (168) and earned runs (81) in the American League.Joe Girardi acknowledged that as Sabathia's struggles persisted, doubts were bound to creep in."I think it's human nature to start wondering a little bit," he said. "I don't care who you are."But Girardi expressed confidence that Sabathia could salvage his season at a time the Yankees badly need him at his best."You have belief in a guy," Girardi said. "The sense that he really knows how to compete makes me believe that he can turn this around."
Chris Davis hit his major-league-best 41st homer in Baltimore's four-run eighth inning, helping the Orioles beat the Padres , 10-3, in San Diego on Wednesday.Davis belted a tiebreaking three-run shot into the bleachers in right-center field on the first pitch from Colt Hynes. Brian Roberts tacked on a sacrifice fly, and the Orioles broke it open with three more runs in the ninth.REDS 6, ATHLETICS 5 Jay Bruce hit a two-run homer and threw out a runner at the plate, helping Cincinnati win at home against Bartolo Colon and Oakland.Corky Miller added two run-scoring doubles for Cincinnati, which won consecutive games for the first time in nearly two weeks. Bruce also had a run-scoring grounder in the first. Oakland lost for the sixth time in seven games.MARINERS 9, BLUE JAYS 7 Humberto Quintero's two-run homer highlighted a six-run fifth inning, and Seattle rallied for a home victory over Toronto to spoil the return of the Blue Jays' J. A. Happ.Happ made his first start since May 7, when he sustained a skull fracture and a sprained right knee after being struck behind the left ear by a line drive from Tampa Bay's Desmond Jennings. Presented with a 7-2 lead by the third inning, Happ couldn't deny the fifth-inning rally, leaving with the bases loaded and no outs.ROYALS 5, TWINS 2 The Kansas City bullpen picked up starter Danny Duffy when he labored in his return from Tommy John surgery, keeping Minnesota guessing and sending host Kansas City to a victory. Duffy struck out seven in three and two-thirds innings in his first outing since May 2012, but he needed 93 pitches to get that far.BRAVES 6, NATIONALS 3 Jason Heyward singled and Justin Upton doubled in a three-run eighth inning in Atlanta's sweep-capping road win in Washington, a game played nicely by both sides one night after a fastball to Bryce Harper's thigh cleared both benches. The Braves won their 13th straight.PIRATES 4, MARLINS 2 Charlie Morton retired his final 11 batters over seven strong innings and Pittsburgh maintained the best record in the majors with a victory at home over Miami. Morton did not walk a batter and had five strikeouts in allowing two runs on six hits.CUBS 5, PHILLIES 2 Donnie Murphy hit a tiebreaking three-run shot in the ninth inning for his second homer of the game, lifting Chicago to a win in Philadelphia.Murphy drove a 3-1 pitch from Justin De Fratus deep into the left-field seats for his third homer in two games. He also had a solo shot in the third.VALVERDE RELEASED The Detroit Tigers have cut ties with closer Jose Valverde, maybe this time for good.The club released the colorful Valverde from his contract with Class AAA Toledo, ending a stay that included several highs and lows.The peak of Valverde's time in Detroit came in 2011, when he was 49 for 49 in save chances. He saved 35 games last season, but faltered in the playoffs and became a free agent.
CHICAGO — After the 2000 World Series, when Alex Rodriguez was a free agent and a pipe dream for Mets fans, Bobby Valentine, then the Mets' manager, made a more realistic request to the team's assistant general manager, Omar Minaya."He said, 'Get me Ichiro,' " Minaya said. "That's the one guy he really wanted."Thirteen years later, Rodriguez and Suzuki are teammates in New York, if not on the Mets, and Suzuki is once again proving his value.When the Yankees re-signed Rodriguez after the 2007 season, there was some hope that he would become baseball's career home run leader while wearing pinstripes, just as Babe Ruth once did. That sort of honor now seems impossible for Rodriguez.Instead, Suzuki, acquired in a trade last July, is the Yankee on the threshold of a benchmark as he closes in on 4,000 combined hits in Japan and Major League Baseball.Suzuki had 1,278 hits over nine seasons in Japan, and with a single Wednesday against the Chicago White Sox, he has 2,711 as a major leaguer. That total, 3,989, left him 11 hits from becoming the third player to reach 4,000. Only Ty Cobb (4,189) and Pete Rose (4,256) are ahead of him, and Suzuki said he thought he could catch them both.Suzuki turns 40 on Oct. 22, but he said Wednesday that he had no plans to retire."If I can play in games," he said through his interpreter, Alan Turner, "if I am able to play in enough games, I think I can do it."To match Rose's total, Suzuki will need 2,978 hits in the majors. At that point, he would need just 22 more to become the 29th player to reach 3,000 hits strictly in the United States. The last player to do so was Derek Jeter, in 2011.This season, Suzuki has 105 hits in 405 plate appearances, batting .278. Suzuki, who is signed through next season, is on pace to finish with 151 hits this year. If he winds up with 140 hits this year and 140 again next year, he will have 4,164 total hits and will be within striking distance of Rose's mark in 2015.When Yankees reliever Shawn Kelley played alongside Suzuki in Seattle, from 2009 to 2012, the Mariners would marvel at Suzuki's ability to rap out hits. They had a saying in the bullpen and on the bench that if a ball off Suzuki's bat bounced two times in the infield, he would reach first base safely. He was that fast. If the infielders could get to the ball on one bounce, at least they had a chance."You could pretty much count on it," Kelley said. "Two bounces, and he was on first base."Suzuki is no longer as swift and nimble, his reflexes and musculature dulled over time. But he still conditions his body to an almost freakish degree, stretching and working his limbs at almost every free moment, whether in the clubhouse or in the outfield between pitches.Although he is more of a platoon player now, there are still more hits left in his scientifically balanced and measured bats — not to mention his eyes, hands and legs."Mentally and physically, I feel like my abilities haven't changed," he said. "I feel like I can still do the things I did back then."Suzuki will not get credit for his hits in Japan in the major league record book. Still, the United States and Japan are recognized as having the best leagues in the world, and for many, 4,000 hits mean 4,000 hits."I believe that is true," said Hiroki Kuroda, who pitched for 11 years in Japan, although he never faced Suzuki there. "It is not easy to get more than 1,000 hits in Japan or any top professional league."In the fall of 2000, as the Mariners, the Dodgers and the Mets placed bids for the right to negotiate with Suzuki, Valentine called him one of the five best players in the world. After the 2001 season, in which Suzuki collected 242 hits and batted .350, Valentine made a rare admission that he was wrong: Suzuki, he said, was one of the two best players in baseball.In the coming days or weeks, Suzuki, saying that his career is far from over, can help take the attention away from Rodriguez and the Biogenesis scandal. With 4,000 combined hits, he can show that there still is a Yankee who can reach a milestone."But it's not like that's the goal, just to get there," he said. "I don't feel like that's the end. When I do get there, obviously, it will feel good. But it's not going to be this overwhelming feat that is going to change anything."
ST. LOUIS — Anthony Rizzo had a two-run single, Chris Rusin pitched around seven hits in six innings, and the Chicago Cubs recorded their first shutout in St. Louis in 16 years with a 3-0 victory over the Cardinals on Friday night.Rusin (2-1) twice worked out of bases-loaded jams and only set the Cardinals down in order in the first. He struck out a season-high five and issued two intentional walks.Kevin Gregg recorded his 24th save to complete the Cubs' first shutout in St. Louis since Jeremi Gonzalez tossed one on June 23, 1997.Lance Lynn (13-6), attempting to become the National League's first 14-game winner, labored over 6 2-3 innings despite giving up just three hits. He threw 115 pitches and was charged with all three runs. He struck out five, walked five and hit two.Chicago has won two of three, but only has three wins in its past 12.St. Louis has lost four of five and 12 of 16. The Cardinals have been shut out four times during that span and have scored three or fewer runs 10 times, despite getting 13 runs in two victories and 15 runs in a third.Lynn's night ended after he plunked Cole Gillespie to load the bases in the seventh with two outs. Lefty Randy Choate came in to face the left-handed Rizzo, who singled to center on a two-strike pitch to score Darwin Barney and Junior Lake and make it 3-0.The Cubs opened the scoring on Lake's two-out single that scored Welington Castillo, who walked to open the seventh.It could have been more. Starlin Castro was originally called safe by first base umpire Larry Vanover on a bunt that Lynn fielded and applied the tag. After a short argument from Cardinals manager Mike Matheny, the umpire crew gathered and reversed the call for the first out of the inning.Rusin twice intentionally walked Pete Kozma to load the bases with two outs and face Lynn. Lynn struck out in the second and ended the fourth with a grounder.Rusin was lifted for pinch-hitter Logan Watkins with runners at first and second with one out in the seventh. Watkins struck out.Jon Jay had three hits, including two doubles, for the Cardinals. Matt Holliday had two singles.Both managers tinkered with their lineups to try and boost their struggling teams.The Cubs used David DeJesus in the cleanup position for the first time in his career. DeJesus struck out to end the seventh with runners at first and third and finished 0 for 3, with a walk and a hit-by-pitch.The Cardinals moved David Freese to second in the order for the first time this season. He had a single in four at-bats.NOTES: St. Louis pinch-hitter Daniel Descalso was ejected soon after arguing about a called third strike. Matheny came out to argue the ejection and was also tossed. ... Cubs C Dioner Navarro, injured in a plate collision with Philadelphia's Chase Hudley on Wednesday, will not go on the disabled list. He was diagnosed with a mild Grade 1 right ankle sprain on Friday and is listed day-to-day. . P Michael Wacha will start Saturday's game in lieu of Adam Wainright who was pushed back to Tuesday against first-place Pittsburgh. . Chicago P Matt Guerrier, placed on the 60-day disabled list Thursday with right elbow soreness, is expected to have surgery on his right elbow for what GM Theo Epstein called flexor mass, though Epstein ruled out ulnar collateral ligament reconstruction or Tommy John surgery. ... St. Louis OF Shane Robinson played in his first rehab game Friday since he went on the 15-day disabled list July 31 with a right shoulder strain. He was the designated hitter for Double-A affiliate Springfield (Mo.) . Friday marked the 25th anniversary of the first night game at Wrigley Field. The Cubs defeated the New York Mets 6-4 on August 9, 1988.
The Bears forced three first-half turnovers and linebacker Jonathan Bostic returned an interception 51 yards for a touchdown, but the Carolina Panthers spoiled Marc Trestman's NFL head coaching debut by beating Chicago 24-17 Friday night.The Bears — who had four turnovers — picked up where they left off last season when they led the NFL with 44 takeaways and finished with nine defensive touchdowns, one shy of the league record.Problem was Chicago's offense couldn't do a thing for the better part of three quarters.Carolina's second-year cornerback Josh Norman had two interceptions, including a 60-yard return for a touchdown against Matt Blanchard.The Bears had three turnovers and allowed seven sacks."Certainly we didn't do what we wanted or up to our expectations," Trestman said of his offense. "... We've got work to do."Jay Cutler was intercepted on Chicago's first play from scrimmage by Norman, setting up a 3-yard touchdown pass from Cam Newton to Brandon LaFell.Cutler bounced back to complete 6 of 8 passes for 56 yards, but the Bears offense managed only a field goal in the first three quarters.Tight end Fendi Onobun dropped a wide open pass in the end zone from Josh McCown in the second quarter and the Bears turned the ball over on the next play at the Carolina 12.Matt Forte carried once and lost a yard and the Bears were held to 16 yards rushing on six carries and 85 total yards in the first half."Defensively, we just wanted to go out and establish ourselves," Panthers linebacker Thomas Davis said. "We didn't really know what to expect because everything is new in Chicago. So it was all about going out and executing what we do and we did a good job of that defensively."Carolina's third-year pro played three series and was 3 of 6 for 16 yards with the one touchdown to LaFell on a crossing route.But what had been a mostly positive night turned sour when Newton threw into double coverage and was intercepted near midfield by Bostic, who ran untouched to the end zone.Newton didn't return to the game after that."Cam got a little greedy and tried to force the ball in there," Panthers coach Ron Rivera said.Newton said he asked coaches to put him back in for one more series after what he described as a "disgusting" throw."It's something that you have to live with," Newton said. "You have to live and learn and it's keeping me anxious for our next preseason game."The Panthers tried to emphasize their push toward a "more traditional running game", but struggled to move the ball with DeAngelo Williams held to 10 yards on five carries.With running backs Jonathan Stewart and Mike Tolbert out with injuries, the Panthers got a long look at their three young running backs — Tauren Poole, Armond Smith and sixth-round pick Kenjon Barner from Oregon.Barner scored on a 5-yard touchdown run late in the first half to give Carolina a 14-10 lead at the break."That's unacceptable," Barner said of an earlier fumble in his NFL debut. "I can't have that. In no way, shape or form can you win games with turnovers. I've got to get that corrected."The Panthers have been waiting three years for Armanti Edwards to emerge and the former third-round pick is starting to show some flash as a potential No. 3 receiver.Edwards, who has been praised by Rivera for his play in training camp, caught two passes for 38 yards.Norman, entering his second season, started in the team's nickel defense and his interception of Cutler set up Carolina's first touchdown."I'm calmer this time around as opposed to my rookie year," Norman said.Cutler, who said the Bears didn't do much in terms of game planning, called it an unfortunate start."I have to put the ball on Alshon's (Jeffery) other shoulder," Cutler said. "We had some good stuff after that; we had some bad stuff. Typical preseason game."The Bears lost Brian Urlacher to retirement and are starting two new linebackers in D.J. Williams and former Panther James Anderson. But it seemed as if they didn't miss a beat early on, forcing three first-half turnovers."There were a lot of things we could do better," Bears linebacker Lance Briggs said. "There were some things we did well. When we put on the tape, we'll all evaluate the things to improve on. All in all, when you are getting turnovers in the game that's very big."NOTES: Prior to the game, the Panthers held a moment of silence for Jon Richardson, the son of Panthers owner Jerry Richardson, who died last month after a long battle with cancer. Jon Richardson had worked in previous years as the franchise's director of stadium operations.
NEW YORK — Alex Rodriguez got booed in pregame introductions, booed when his picture was put up on the video board and booed again when came to bat in the first inning.And when he struck out? Booed even more. Loudly, too.Same thing when he fanned the next time up.The crowd at Yankee Stadium had its say Friday night when Rodriguez played at home for the first time since last October. While some people stood to cheer, jeers mostly echoed around the ballpark as he went 0 for 4, striking out three times in a 4-3 win over Detroit in 10 innings.With his 211-game suspension on appeal, New York fans rendered their verdict on the man at the center of baseball's latest drug scandal. Rodriguez didn't have anything to say, leaving without speaking to the media."You're obviously going to have people that boo," said Brett Gardner, who got the game-ending hit. "I still don't understand people wearing the Yankees shirt pulling against one of their own guys.""Everybody's got the right to like somebody or not like somebody," he said. "But still pull for the team, at least. Right?"Made sense to Daniel Correa. He wanted to hear a big ovation for Rodriguez, rather than a Bronx cheer.A Yankees fan from Hartford, Conn., Correa stood in line to get into the stadium before the gates opened. Wearing a pinstriped No. 13 jersey, too."Hopefully, it's a positive reaction for him," Correa said. "But New York is a rough crowd."Correa said he also owns a Derek Jeter jersey, and decided to go to wear Rodriguez's number."I'm disappointed in him, but he plays for my team, the Yankees, and you've got to support him," he said.The game was delayed at the beginning by 47 minutes, and then it was time for Rodriguez's first home game since the AL championship series against the Tigers last fall.The three-time AL MVP was met with mixed boos and cheers when the lineups were read over the public-address system. The boos started to get louder when the Bleacher Creatures in right-center made their daily roll call, chanting each player's name.Batting fifth, Rodriguez came up in the first inning with two outs, a runner on second and the Yankees ahead 1-0. He struck out swinging against Rick Porcello, and the boobirds sounded off.Rodriguez came up with a runner on third base in the third inning and again swung and missed for strike three. He flied out with runners at second and third to end the fifth, struck out looking in the eighth and was pulled at third base for Jayson Nix in the ninth with the Yankees ahead 3-1."Alex has had to deal with stuff before. He's been booed before. He knows what he has to do and I expect him to do it," manager Joe Girardi said.Three hours before the scheduled start, Rodriguez stepped into the batting cage. A coaching assistant pitched to him, a bullpen catcher retrieved the balls.Other than that, he was all alone. Not a single teammate was on the field as A-Rod started to swing away. He was by himself, once again.Rodriguez didn't speak to the media before the game. He rearranged two boxes in his locker before heading out the clubhouse door, not pausing to talk with any of the Yankees, and quickly got to work.Rodriguez later kidded with star second baseman Robinson Cano near the indoor batting cage and stretched with the rest of the team in the outfield. Done his workout, he signed a couple dozen autographs, posed for pictures and chatted with fans.Out beyond the All-Star break while recovering from hip surgery, he made his season debut Monday night in Chicago against the White Sox, hours after Major League Baseball suspended him through the end of the 2014 season. He can play until there's a decision on his appeal — likely after the season.Rodriguez heard loud boos during his three games at U.S. Cellular Field. The 38-year-old hit three singles in 11 at-bats without driving in a run or scoring one for the wobbling Yankees.Rodriguez certainly was the star attraction in this game. He was the focus of a story on Detroit's clubhouse television, and a few players watched before warming up.He certainly was a lightning rod among fans. Michael King, a Yankees rooter from Knoxville, Tenn., said he'd gotten tickets to this game a couple of months ago. He came wearing a No. 3 jersey, honoring Babe Ruth."I wasn't planning on seeing Rodriguez, I thought he wouldn't be here," King said. "I think it'll be more boos than cheers for him tonight.""I think it'll be louder than in Chicago. The fact that he lied about it, that's why," King said. "Facts are facts."
Sometimes, the boos would come first, boiling up from within the Yankee Stadium stands, eliciting an immediate rejoinder of cheers and applause. Other times, the order was flipped — cheers, then boos. Whatever the exact sequence or proportion, the visceral responses to Alex Rodriguez on Friday were always loud, the dissonant noises intermingling.Rodriguez made his first appearance at the Stadium since Oct. 14, 2012, playing third base and batting fifth during the club's scintillating 4-3 extra-inning victory against the Detroit Tigers. For eight innings, Rodriguez, the embattled 38-year-old star, turned the crowd — announced at 46,545, the fourth sellout of the season — into a fractured, vociferous body."It was probably 50-50 tonight, maybe a little bit more cheers," Manager Joe Girardi said afterward about the reception toward Rodriguez, who never made himself available to reporters. "But, I mean, it's something that he has to be able to put out of his mind and just be a player for us."Rodriguez looked out of sorts in that regard, going hitless in four plate appearances, striking out three times and providing more fodder for the detractors. Rodriguez simply could not make contact with Rick Porcello's sinker, and he stranded runners in scoring position in his first three at-bats.His inefficiency was placed under a brief, glaring spotlight in the ninth inning, when Miguel Cabrera, the other hulking third baseman in the Stadium, rendered the loud fans mute in stirring fashion.Mariano Rivera was one strike from his 644th save. Instead he blew his second consecutive chance.Rivera got Cabrera to two strikes in painful fashion. Cabrera fouled two pitches off his leg, and it seemed as if he would need to leave the game. But he limped back to the plate each time, and on the seventh pitch of the at-bat, Cabrera sent a two-run homer to straightaway center field. He hobbled around the bases as he tied the score, 3-3.Noise and levity were restored to the park in the bottom of the 10th, though, when center fielder Brett Gardner came up against Al Alburquerque and rolled a two-out, bases-loaded single through the left side of the infield to score Jayson Nix."That doesn't happen often," Gardner said about Rivera's blown save, adding, "It was good to be able to pick him up like that."It was a wild finish on a day when the barnstorming circus and spectacle around Rodriguez, which seemed to grow more and more warped and compelling over the last month, finally arrived home.Earlier this week, Rodriguez received a 211-game suspension from Major League Baseball after the league's investigation into a South Florida anti-aging clinic that reportedly supplied performance-enhancing drugs to players. He appealed the punishment and will be able to play as that process unfolds over what could be several months.The news media horde and intense scrutiny — which trailed him to such locales as Charleston, S.C., Moosic, Pa., and Chicago, where he made his made his first major league appearance of the season this week — met him Friday on more familiar turf.Never mind that the Yankees entered the weekend series on a four-game losing streak or that they started the day 11 games behind the first-place Boston Red Sox in the American League East. Girardi's pregame news conference consisted almost entirely of questions about Rodriguez.The manager only halfheartedly tried to shift the narrative. "In my eyes, I am well aware of where we're at," he said about the team's slump, "and that is the story to me."Ivan Nova helped change the plot some, too, giving up only one run and striking out seven over seven strong innings to set the pace for the Yankees. It was another encouraging outing for Nova, who has gone sixth consecutive outings pitching at least seven innings.But all eyes Friday seemed to rest on one player.Before the game, Rodriguez seemed a paragon of good spirit. He bantered and laughed while stretching. He waved to the first fans inside the park when they called his name, and after he took batting practice, he signed autographs for the ones standing behind home plate.Derek Jeter, who was placed on the disabled list Monday with a strained right calf muscle, emerged from the dugout to play catch near home plate. He seemed amused as he waded through a crowd of reporters to get back into the clubhouse. He joked to them that he was playing a simulated game at the organization's Staten Island complex at 6 p.m. and suggested they come watch.But the focus was on Rodriguez. The word "steroids" could be heard in the stands, punctuating pejorative chants. Defiantly supportive fans held his jersey up in the air.Ten minutes before the first pitch, those jeering Rodriguez and those applauding him went to battle as his scowling face was displayed on the scoreboard during player introductions. The reaction was the same when the defensive alignment was announced minutes later, and the same again during the first-inning roll call from the right-field bleachers.The atmosphere heightened when Rodriguez came to the plate for his first at-bat during the first inning. About one-third of the crowd rose to give him a standing ovation. But boos dominated when he struck out swinging at an inside sinker from Porcello to end the inning. He came up again in the third, received the same response and produced the same result, swinging and missing on a low fastball. He popped out to right to end the fifth, and in the eighth, he struck out looking against Bruce Rondon.Even as chance after chance went wasted, Nova's early sharpness still made it seem as if Alfonso Soriano's run-scoring groundout in the first and Robinson Cano's two-run double in the second would suffice. But Cabrera — who also produced a run-scoring single in the seventh — ensured they would not.Despite the win, Girardi acknowledged the Yankees would have to do better to crawl back from the fringes of playoff competition. Rodriguez, in particularly, will have to do so amid hostile conditions."Alex has had to deal with stuff before," Girardi said. "He's been booed before. He knows what he has to do, and I expect him to do it."
In some instances, the boos would come first, boiling up from within the Yankee Stadium stands, eliciting an immediate rejoinder of cheers and applause. Other times, the order was flipped — cheers first, then boos. Whatever the exact sequence or proportion, the visceral responses to Alex Rodriguez on Friday were always loud, the dissonant noises intermingling.It went that way all night, as fans set on jeering Rodriguez and those supporting him seemed evenly split inside a packed ballpark. Rodriguez, the club's 38-year-old third baseman, was playing his first game at Yankee Stadium since Oct. 14, 2012. The circus and spectacle around Rodriguez, which grew more warped and compelling each day over the last month, finally arrived home.Earlier this week, Rodriguez received a 211-game suspension from Major League Baseball after the league's investigation into a South Florida anti-aging clinic that reportedly supplied performance-enhancing drugs to players. He appealed the punishment and will be able to play as that process unfolds over what could be several months. He played three games during the Yankees' series against the White Sox in Chicago.His first appearance at home, then, added another episode to the soap opera that is his baseball career. The intense scrutiny and thick news media horde — which trailed him to such locales as Charleston, S.C., and Moosic, Pa., as he made his way back from off-season hip surgery and dealt with the suspension hanging over him — finally met him on more familiar turf.Never mind that the Yankees entered the weekend series against the Detroit Tigers on a four-game losing streak or that they started the day 11 games behind the first-place Boston Red Sox in the American League East or that they seemed to be spiraling out of contention. Manager Joe Girardi's pregame news conference consisted almost entirely of questions about Rodriguez.The manager halfheartedly tried to shift the narrative. "In my eyes, I am well aware of where we're at," he said about the team's 57-56 record and continuing slump, "and that is the story to me."Before the game, Rodriguez seemed a paragon of good spirit. He bantered and laughed boisterously while stretching. When the first fans trickled into the right-field seats, they called out his name, and he waved to them while doing warm-up sprints. After he took batting practice, he signed autographs for fans standing behind home plate, while reporters and news cameras encircled him. He did not speak to reporters before the game.While Rodriguez went about his routine, Derek Jeter emerged from the dugout to play catch near home plate. Jeter on Monday was placed back on the 15-day disabled list with a strained right calf muscle. He stayed on the field for only a few minutes and seemed amused as he waded through a crowd of reporters to get back into the clubhouse. He joked to them that he was playing a simulated game at the organization's Staten Island complex at 6 p.m. and suggested they come watch.The Yankees used Jeter's departure on Monday to add Rodriguez to the roster. Asked about Rodriguez's performance on the field, Girardi said he was pleasantly surprised."Probably his swing has been a little bit more explosive than I thought it would be," Girardi said. "You never know how a guy's going to react off a second hip surgery. He's just missed a few balls. He's squared up some balls. But I'm pleased with how his lower half is working."After a 47-minute rain delay, the fans jeering Rodriguez and those applauding him went to battle 10 minutes before the first pitch, when Rodriguez's scowling face was displayed on the scoreboard during player introductions. The reaction was the same when the defensive alignment was announced minutes later, and the same during the first-inning roll call from the right-field bleachers.The atmosphere heightened when Rodriguez came to the plate for his first at-bat during the first inning. About one-third of the crowd rose to give him a standing ovation. But boos dominated when he struck out swinging at an inside fastball to end the inning, leaving a runner in scoring position.He came up again in the third, received the same response and produced the same result, swinging and missing on a low fastball. He popped out to right to end the fifth, leaving runners on second and third.
PITTSBURGH — It took only four plays to show how fragile the Giants' defensive line could be this season.They were already playing without both starting defensive ends, Justin Tuck and Jason Pierre-Paul, in Saturday's 18-13 preseason win over the Steelers when the starting defensive tackle Cullen Jenkins was slow to get up after a run through the middle.Jenkins spent several minutes with a knee on the ground and his head down while a cast of new Giants stood around him. The team has jettisoned many of the familiar faces on the defensive line, trying to improve a run defense that gave up 4.6 yards a carry last season.Gone are Osi Umenyiora, Chris Canty and Rocky Bernard, who spent a combined 16 seasons with the Giants. In are Jenkins and Shaun Rogers, two veterans surrounded by a collection of rookies and young players filling in the backup roles.Jenkins's injury was not serious — he was out for one play. After the game, he laughed and said that "they hit me a little bit below the belt." But the man who replaced him for that play, Adrian Tracy, was a sixth-round draft pick in 2010 who did not play a snap until last year. Without Tuck and Pierre-Paul, Mathias Kiwanuka was inserted into the starting lineup, so the Giants had to use a player with 12 career tackles as their primary backup.On Saturday, the starting defense gave up 47 yards on nine rushes to the Steelers — good for 5.2 yards a carry. That was without the Steelers' running back who was supposed to start, Le'Veon Bell, who watched the game from the sideline with a left knee bruise."They had some first downs and ran the ball on us right off the bat early on," said Giants Coach Tom Coughlin, who added: "We're going to have to be better. No question."Tuck has missed the last two practices, and Pierre-Paul had back surgery in early June and might not be ready for the season opener. The problems on the line are exacerbated by the questions facing the rest of the Giants' defense, which features inexperienced players in the linebacker corps and in the secondary."We looked at it more as an opportunity for a lot of players to be able to get a little bit more playing time," Jenkins said. "There are a lot of us defensive lineman right now, and some of those guys do need the extra snaps to make a statement."One of those guys who made a statement was the rookie Damontre Moore. A Texas A&M star who fell to the third round in the draft, he looked comfortable rotating in with the starting unit after being praised in training camp.Moore finished with three tackles, but his highlight came early in the first quarter, on the first punt of the game. He used a powerful inside speed move to get through the line, then stretched out to easily block a punt with his chest.On offense, Eli Manning threw five passes in limited action. He completed two of them, one a 57-yard touchdown throw to Victor Cruz, whose salsa celebration in the end zone looked halfhearted.Injuries, depth and questions aside, it is, after all, still the preseason.BENGAL COULD MISS OPENER Cincinnati receiver Andrew Hawkins will wear a cast for 10 days to try to heal his sprained left ankle, making him doubtful for the season opener.Coach Marvin Lewis said that Hawkins would be evaluated again when the cast was removed and the club would have a better idea how long he would be sidelined.If he is not ready for the opener Sept. 8 in Chicago, he could be placed on injured reserve with an opportunity to return during the season.Hawkins was Cincinnati's second-leading wide receiver last year with 51 catches for 533 yards and 4 touchdowns. He sprained the ankle while trying to make a catch during practice Aug. 1 and was carted off the field. (AP)TE'O OUT WITH INJURY The San Diego Chargers say linebacker Manti Te'o has a sprained foot and will sit out this week, including an exhibition game at Chicago on Thursday night. (AP)
CHICAGO — Kevin Correia pitched seven shutout innings, Brian Dozier and Joe Mauer backed him with home runs and the Minnesota Twins beat the Chicago White Sox 5-2 Sunday.The Twins took three of four games in the series and have won nine of 12 against the White Sox this season.Adam Dunn and Conor Gillaspie hit solo home runs off Casey Fien in the White Sox ninth.Dozier's three-run homer, his 11th of the season, gave the Twins a 3-0 lead in the fifth after Chris Colabello singled and Doug Bernier walked. After Jamey Carroll singled, Mauer hit his ninth homer.Mauer is hitting .351 in 64 career games at U.S. Cellular Field. The Twins hit 11 home runs in the series.Correia (8-8) struck out seven, tying a season high. He allowed five hits and one walk in his second scoreless outing of the season.Jose Quintana (6-4) gave up five runs in five innings. That's the most runs he's permitted since giving up six on April 5 against Seattle.Quintana is 0-2 with a 9.15 ERA in four career starts against the Twins. The White Sox have scored three runs or fewer in 17 of his 24 starts.Dunn hit his 27th homer and Gillaspie had his 10th.NOTES: The White Sox acquired INF Leury Garcia from Texas Rangers as the player to be named in the trade for OF Alex Rios. He'll report to Triple-A Charlotte. ... White Sox OF Dayan Viciedo, who's been in and out of the lineup with a sore left wrist, didn't play. ... The Twins started Carroll at third base, giving Trevor Plouffe a day off, and started Doug Bernier at shortstop, resting Pedro Florimon. Plouffe is batting .233, and Florimon is hitting .223. "Plouffe is not swinging good. Flori didn't swing good, and I'm using everybody anyway," manager Ron Gardenhire said. ... Twins C Ryan Doumit is eligible to come off the seven-day disabled list this week. He went on the DL on Thursday for concussion-like symptoms. "He'll get re-examined by our doctors when we get home to determine if he's ready to resume baseball activities," Twins assistant GM Rob Antony said.
CHICAGO — Chris Sale scattered nine hits in his fourth complete game of the season, and the Chicago White Sox overcame Miguel Cabrera's fourth homer in fourth games to beat the Detroit Tigers 6-2 on Monday night.Josh Phegley, Gordon Beckham and Alexei Ramirez singled in runs in a three-run fifth inning as Chicago handed AL Central-leading Detroit its third loss in four games.Beckham and Jeff Keppinger each had three hits. Phegley added a second RBI single and Alejandro De Aza hit a sacrifice fly in a two-run eighth that put away the game.Sale (8-11) struck out six and walked none, winning his second straight start after going 1-9 in his previous 11. He settled down after allowing runs in the first and second.Cabrera went 2 for 4 with a homer in the first. The AL leader in batting, RBIs and runs scored is second in homers with 37.Brayan Pena doubled in Detroit's other run. The Tigers still have won 17 of their last 21, and 26 of 36 dating to July 2.Tigers starter Doug Fister (10-6) gave up four runs on eight hits and three walks in six innings, after facing just nine hitters and allowing one hit through the first three.Fister lost following a run of five straight quality starts. He was 4-0 during that span and allowed just seven runs in 34 innings.The White Sox, in last place in the AL Central, enjoyed rare success against a division rival and snapped a three-game losing streak against Detroit. They are just 14-34 overall against the division this season and have lost 23 of 28 to AL Central opponents.After Sale retired the first two hitters, Cabrera lofted his next pitch just over the right-field fence.Pena doubled in Matt Tuiasosopo with two outs in the second to extend Detroit's lead to 2-0.Fister cruised through the first three innings, but control problems cost him a run in the fourth.With two outs, Fister walked Adam Dunn and Paul Konerko back-to-back to load the bases. With Avisail Garcia at the plate, Fister threw his second wild pitch of the inning, allowing Beckham to score from third.Garcia lined softly to first baseman Prince Fielder to end the threat.Chicago scored three times in the fifth to take a 4-2 lead. After Keppinger led off with a double, Phegley, Beckham and Ramirez all delivered RBI singles. Beckham's single deflected of Fister's foot.Detroit second baseman Omar Infante returned to the lineup and batted seventh after being on the disabled list for more than a month with sprained left ankle. To make room, the Tigers optioned infielder Hernan Perez to Triple-A Toledo before the game.Detroit's Jose Iglesias made a sensational barehanded play to throw out Phegley with one out in the sixth. Phegley's chopper appeared to deflect off Fister, but Iglesias dove and threw to first from midair.Notes: RHP Justin Verlander is slated to start the first game of the Tigers' doubleheader Friday against Kansas City. Manager Jim Leyland hasn't announced a starter for the second game, but said: "It's someone who's not here." . Detroit also announced the injury rehabilitation assignment of right-hander Octavio Dotel had been transferred from the Gulf Coast League Tigers to Class A Lakeland. "He's doing OK and he doesn't have pain," Leyland said. ... Following a deal last Friday that sent OF Alex Rios to Texas for cash and INF Leury Garcia, the possibility of the White Sox trading veteran players for younger talent dominated the pregame discussion with Chicago manager Robin Ventura "You see the way we're going: It's more younger guys than getting guys that are older," Ventura said. "It would be nice to have some guys who could play multiple positions and are a little bit quicker.". Batting practice was called off as thunderstorms moved through the area, but the game started on time under a blue sky at 7:10 CT.
CHICAGO — Former Iceland international Aron Johannsson is among 23 players called up for the U.S. soccer team's training camp in Sarajevo ahead of its exhibition against Bosnia-Herzegovina.Johannsson is awaiting completion of paperwork that would make him eligible to play for the U.S. The forward, who plays for AZ Alkmaar in the Netherlands, needs approval from FIFA to make the switch because he played for Iceland in eight qualifiers for the 2012 UEFA Under-21 Championship.The 22-year-old was born in Mobile, Ala., but moved back to his parents' native Iceland when he was 3.Most of the players called up for the three-day camp are based in Europe, though coach Jurgen Klinsmann did bring in Seattle's Brad Evans and Eddie Johnson. Mexico-based Edgar Castillo, Joe Corona and Michael Orozco Fiscal also were included on the roster. U.S. captain Clint Dempsey, who just completed a move from England's Tottenham Hotspur to Seattle, was not brought in.The Americans, who have a record 11-game winning streak, play Bosnia-Herzegovina on Wednesday in Sarajevo. It is their only game before World Cup qualifying resumes Sept. 6 in Costa Rica."Our European-based players are just getting started with their seasons and this gives them a chance to get going a couple weeks before our big World Cup qualifiers," Klinsmann said. "We're also excited to bring some new faces into the senior team and have them start to become part of the group."
ST. PETERSBURG, Fla. — Leadoff hitter Brad Miller homered twice to help the Seattle Mariners send the Tampa Bay Rays to their sixth straight loss with a 5-4 victory on Tuesday night.Miller has four home runs this season, which have come in a pair of two-homer games. He connected for his first two big league homers on July 19 at Houston.Tampa Bay also got two homers from its leadoff hitter, Ben Zobrist.According to the Rays, it is just the third time since 1916, when records are available, that both leadoff hitters had multihomer games. The others were June 5, 1994 (Minnesota's Chuck Knoblauch and Tony Phillips of Detroit) and July 8, 1965 (Houston's Joe Morgan and Felipe Alou of the Milwaukee Braves).After Justin Smoak ended Chris Archer's night with a leadoff single in the sixth, Dustin Ackley gave Seattle a 5-4 lead on a triple off Wesley Wright.Zobrist got the Rays even at 4 on his second homer of the game, a two-run shot in the fifth against Erasmo Ramirez (4-0), who allowed four runs and seven hits in 5 1-3 innings.Danny Farquhar pitched the ninth for his fifth save.Smoak had a two-run single through a defensive shift as the Mariners went ahead 3-2 in the fourth. Miller's second homer of the game, a fifth-inning shot, made it 4-2.Archer (6-5), who left his previous start last Wednesday at Arizona after 1 2-3 innings due to right forearm tightness, gave up five runs and nine hits over five-plus innings.Miller opened the game with his first leadoff homer and the Mariners' eighth this season, which extended the team record.Zobrist tied it at 1 in the bottom of the first on his first career leadoff homer and 100th overall in the majors. The Rays took a 2-1 lead later in the inning on James Loney's RBI single.It was the first major league game since Aug. 31, 2011, when St. Louis' Rafael Furcal and Milwaukee's Corey Hart did it, where both teams hit leadoff home runs, according to STATS.It last occurred in the AL on Aug. 17, 2006, in games between Baltimore (Brian Roberts) and New York (Johnny Damon), and Kansas City (David DeJesus) against Chicago (Pablo Ozuna).NOTES: Tampa Bay RHP Alex Cobb is expected to make his first big league start Thursday night since getting hit in the head by a liner on June 15. ... The Mariners plan to look at Ackley in center. "We're trying to see what we have out there with Ackley," acting Seattle manager Robby Thompson said. ... Rays CF Desmond Jennings (broken left middle finger) could start dry swings with a bat in the next few days. ... Tampa Bay optioned RHP Josh Lueke to Triple-A Durham.
Mariano Rivera does not share the public's sense of concern about his well-being despite his recent slump, in which he has blown three consecutive save opportunities for the first time in his career."I don't go and review film," Rivera said. "As a professional, you know what you're doing. That's why I have a pitching coach, that's why I have a bullpen coach. They tell you what you're doing wrong. They look at the film and they tell you and you do it."On Friday, Rivera allowed a game-tying, two-run homer to the Detroit Tigers slugger Miguel Cabrera. On Sunday, Rivera blew another save opportunity against the Tigers by allowing home runs to Cabrera and Victor Martinez. The Yankees won both those games, but they were not as fortunate in Chicago last Wednesday, when Rivera gave up a game-tying single in the ninth and the Yankees went on to lose in 12.Rivera entered Monday night's game against the Los Angeles Angels having blown five saves, a season total he reached in both 2010 and 2011. Rivera's 2.44 earned run average would be his highest since he posted a 3.15 E.R.A. in 2007. While still imposing, Rivera has not been his usual dominant self. His 9.1 hits per nine innings would be the highest mark of his career since his rookie season, when he started 10 games.Rivera, 43, insisted that he has not been fatigued, pointing out that his velocity has not changed much from recent seasons.The home run he gave up to Cabrera on Friday came on a two-seamer that floated over the plate, a common theme during this slump, Rivera said.Rivera said he believed his recent problem locating pitches comes from his release point."You want to make sure I stay where I need to stay, not leaving the ball up, and finishing," Rivera said. "I finish some pitches, but don't finish others. I have to get consistent finishing the others, because you can't afford that."Perhaps Rivera's other problem might be with his pitch selection. Rivera has allowed a home run on a two-seamer 3 percent of the time this season, according to BrooksBaseball.net, which tracks Pitchf/x data, or the velocity and location of pitches. Rivera had not given up a home run on a two-seamer since 2007, when Pitchf/x data became available to the public.Despite the jump in homers off two-seamers, Rivera has thrown the pitch less this season (9.5 percent of the time) than he did in his last full season in 2011 (11.83 percent)."Maybe it seems like I'm throwing more because I have to use it for a period of time more than other times," Rivera said. "Sometimes I go without throwing one for a month. It's how things happens. When it happens, everything is magnified. It's like I lost a leg. It's going to happen guys. That's the beauty of it. It always keeps you humble, knowing that you need to do work. No one can just sit there and figure it out."FIRST STEPS FOR JETER Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said that Derek Jeter, who has been on the disabled list with strained calf since Aug. 6, was expected to hit off a tee and take soft-toss pitches in the batting cage Monday, the first step toward facing live pitching. Barring a setback, Jeter could take batting practice by the end of the week.Jeter, who was seen playing catch on the field Monday, is expected to continue his rehabilitation in Tampa, Fla., when the Yankees head to Boston this weekend. Jeter has played only five games this season while trying to rehabilitate a twice fractured ankle, then a quadriceps strain and now a calf injury.
CHICAGO — Bronson Arroyo pitched seven crisp innings, Todd Frazier homered and the Cincinnati Reds beat the Chicago Cubs 5-0 on Wednesday to complete a three-game series sweep.Arroyo (11-9) allowed two hits, struck out seven and walked none in his second straight win. The crafty right-hander retired his first nine batters and faced the minimum through six innings.Frazier also had one of Cincinnati's four run-scoring doubles as the Reds (68-52) earned their fourth consecutive win to move a season-high 16 games over .500. They improved to 13-3 against the Cubs this year, including a 9-1 mark at Wrigley Field.The Cubs wasted a solid start by Chris Rusin (2-2) in their fourth straight loss. The left-hander allowed two runs and three hits while throwing just 76 pitches over six innings.With Chicago struggling to score against Arroyo, manager Dale Sveum had Starlin Castro hit for Rusin with two out and none on in the sixth. Castro flied out to left, and Zack Cozart hit an RBI double off Carlos Villanueva in the seventh to give Cincinnati a 3-0 lead.David DeJesus rolled a leadoff single into center field in the fourth for Chicago's first hit, but was promptly erased when Darnell McDonald bounced into a double play. McDonald singled off the glove of second baseman Brandon Phillips in the seventh and was stranded when Arroyo retired the next two batters.Alfredo Simon worked a perfect eighth and Jonathan Broxton finished the two-hitter for Cincinnati's 13th shutout of the season.Arroyo improved to 13-9 with a 2.92 ERA in 30 career games against the Cubs, including wins in each of his last four starts. He has been quite good at Chicago's cozy neighborhood ballpark, with an 8-3 record and a 2.83 ERA in 15 appearances.Frazier helped the Reds get off to a fast start when he drove Rusin's third pitch over the wall in left and onto Waveland Avenue. It was Frazier's first homer since July 1 against San Francisco and No. 11 on the year.Frazier and Joey Votto had consecutive RBI doubles in the eighth to cap the scoring.NOTES: Chicago has been shut out 10 times this season. It managed just six hits in a 2-0 loss in the series opener on Monday. ... Reds CF Shin-Soo Choo got the day off. Manager Dusty Baker said he wanted to give him some rest, and he's also dealing with a hand issue. Baker declined to specify which hand is bothering Choo. ... RHP Jake Arrieta will come up from Triple-A Iowa to start Chicago's game against St. Louis on Friday. The move put Villanueva in the bullpen. ... Baker said he's not counting on the return of LHP Sean Marshall, who went on the disabled list May 24 with a sore pitching shoulder. "You can't expect things, that way you're going to be disappointed," Baker said, "and if you get them back, then you're elated." ... The Cubs are off Thursday before beginning a three-game series against the Cardinals. ... The Reds send LHP Tony Cingrani (5-2, 2.87 ERA) to the mound on Thursday for the opener of a four-game series at Milwaukee. RHP Kyle Lohse (8-7, 3.26 ERA) is expected to start for the Brewers.
Miguel Cabrera hit a towering three-run homer, helping the Detroit Tigers end a three-game skid with a 6-4 win over the host Chicago White Sox on Wednesday.A year after winning the American League triple crown, Cabrera has 38 homers and 114 runs batted in and is hitting .360.The A.L. Central-leading Tigers had lost four of five after a 12-game winning streak.Despite surrendering a season-high 11 hits, Tigers starter Rick Porcello allowed just three runs in six innings.The White Sox closed to 6-4 in the eighth on an R.B.I. single by Alexei Ramirez.Taking no chances, Tigers Manager Jim Leyland brought in closer Joaquin Benoit with one out in the eighth. Benoit struck out Adam Dunn and Avisail Garcia, then worked out of another jam in the ninth inning for his 15th save in 15 chances.INDIANS 9, TWINS 8 Michael Brantley hit a sacrifice fly in the 12th inning, and Cleveland rallied to beat host Minnesota. Joe Mauer tied a career high with five hits for the Twins.Carlos Santana and Jason Giambi homered for the Indians, who won for just the third time in 10 games.BLUE JAYS 4, RED SOX 3 Brett Lawrie singled home the winning run in the 10th inning as host Toronto beat Boston, handing the A.L. East-leading Red Sox their fourth loss in six games.Rajai Davis doubled off Brandon Workman to begin the 10th and went to third on Jose Bautista's grounder. Edwin Encarnacion was intentionally walked to bring up Lawrie, who lined a two-strike pitch off the glove of shortstop Stephen Drew, bringing Davis home with the winning run.RAYS 5, MARINERS 4 Jason Bourgeois hit an R.B.I. single to cap host Tampa Bay's two-run rally in the ninth inning, and the Rays ended a six-game losing streak by beating Seattle.PIRATES 5, CARDINALS 1 Francisco Liriano was dominant, and Pittsburgh got home runs from Pedro Alvarez and Garrett Jones in a victory in St. Louis. The win snapped a season-worst four-game losing streak and gave Pittsburgh a three-game lead in the N.L. Central.NATIONALS 6, GIANTS 5 Denard Span made a diving catch in deep center field with two runners on base for the final out, and host Washington held off San Francisco for its fifth straight victory.Jordan Zimmermann increased his N.L.-leading win total to 14, allowing one run in seven innings and outpitching Tim Lincecum. The Nationals matched their longest winning streak of the season and moved within one victory of .500 for the first time since July 20.REDS 5, CUBS 0 Bronson Arroyo pitched seven crisp innings, Todd Frazier homered and Cincinnati beat Chicago at Wrigley Field to complete a three-game series sweep. Arroyo allowed two hits, struck out seven and walked none in his second straight win.ROCKIES 4, PADRES 2 Jorge De La Rose pitched seven solid innings as host Colorado hung on to beat San Diego. Corey Dickerson doubled twice, tripled and drove in two runs.DIAMONDBACKS 5, ORIOLES 4 Aaron Hill had a game-ending single with one out in the 14th inning to give host Arizona a victory over Baltimore and a three-game sweep of the Orioles.Hill forced extra innings with an R.B.I. single in the ninth off Jim Johnson in Johnson's ninth blown save of the season and second in two days.MARLINS 5, ROYALS 2 Miami took advantage of an error to score the go-ahead runs in the seventh inning, then turned to its bullpen to wrap up a victory in Kansas City.TORRE'S REPLAY PROPOSAL Joe Torre, Major League Baseball's executive vice president, has given his instant-replay proposal to the executive committee to consider as baseball officials huddled for two days of meetings in Cooperstown, N.Y.Commissioner Bud Selig was to address members of the news media Thursday morning to discuss what was on the table. Selig said the proposal was "very thoughtful and well done."Baseball is looking at an expansion of video review for the 2014 season and is examining whether all calls other than balls and strikes should be subject to instant replay.ROYALS ADD DEPTH The Royals acquired Emilio Bonifacio from the Blue Jays for cash or a player to be named later, giving them a versatile player capable of providing depth in their banged-up infield.A TRADE IN TEXAS The Houston Astros traded the left-handed pitcher Travis Blackley to the Texas Rangers for cash and a player to be named later. The 30-year-old Blackley went 1-1 with a 4.89 earned run average in 42 relief appearances for Houston this season before being designated for assignment Aug. 8.NEW ARM IN CUBS' ROTATION Jake Arrieta will join the Cubs' rotation on Friday, with Carlos Villanueva shifting to the bullpen. Manager Dale Sveum said the team wanted to take a closer look at Arrieta, whom the Cubs acquired in a July 2 trade with Baltimore.A right-hander, Arrieta has made one start with Chicago, pitching six effective innings in a 3-2 loss to Milwaukee on July 30. He is 2-2 with a 3.56 earned run average in seven starts with Class AAA Iowa.
MINNEAPOLIS — Adam Dunn hit his 28th home run and Jose Quintana tossed six sharp innings to lead the Chicago White Sox to a 5-2 win over the Minnesota Twins on Friday night.Quintana (7-4) scattered six hits over 6 2-3 innings, giving up two runs and striking out seven.Jeff Keppinger also homered to help Chicago snap its season-worst, 10-game road losing streak.Joe Mauer homered in the first for Minnesota, but Keppinger and Dunn both hit solo shots off Twins starter Kevin Correia (8-9) in the third to make it 4-1. Quintana breezed through Minnesota's lineup the rest of the way after losing his previous start against the Twins on Sunday in Chicago.Nate Jones pitched a scoreless eighth and Addison Reed worked the ninth for his 29th save in 34 chances.
CHICAGO — The Chicago Cubs have recalled right-hander Jake Arrieta from Triple-A Iowa before Friday's game against the St. Louis Cardinals.Arrieta makes his second start of the season for the Cubs as they begin a three-game series against the Cardinals at Wrigley Field. Right-hander Eduardo Sanchez was optioned to Triple-A to open a spot for Arrieta.Arrieta, acquired from the Orioles on July 2, went 2-2 with a 3.56 ERA in seven starts with Iowa. In his only other start with the Cubs against the Milwaukee Brewers on July 30, the 27-year-old Arrieta earned a no-decision after allowing one run and two hits in six innings.
CHICAGO — Jake Arrieta threw seven shutout innings and Nate Schierholtz drove in three runs to lead the Chicago Cubs to a 7-0 victory over the St. Louis Cardinals on Friday.Arrieta (1-0) allowed two hits and struck out seven for his first win with the Cubs.The hard-throwing right-hander was acquired from the Baltimore Orioles in a July 2 trade.Before Friday, his only other day on the Cubs' roster was as the 26th man for a doubleheader against Milwaukee on July 30.The Cubs snapped a four-game losing streak with the win and are 7-7 this season against the Cardinals. St. Louis has dropped six of nine overall.The Cubs had been shut out in four of their past five home games — a streak dating back to Aug. 3.Cardinals starter Jake Westbrook (7-8) walked the first three batters he faced in the bottom of the first inning.Schierholtz, the cleanup hitter, hit a two-run single to center to put the Cubs.After Welington Castillo grounded into a double play, Donnie Murphy followed with a run-scoring single to give the Cubs a 3-0 lead.Arrieta sailed through the Cardinals lineup. After allowing a single to Carlos Beltran in the second, he got Kolten Wong to ground into a double play in his major league debut.Those two outs started a streak of 13 straight outs (including five strikeouts) until he walked Westbrook with one in the sixth.The next batter, Matt Carpenter, also walked to give the Cardinals their first threat of the game, but Jon Jay grounded into a fielder's choice and Matt Holiday struck out looking to end the inning.The Cubs added a run in the fifth on Schierholtz's sacrifice fly and then scored two more in the sixth on a run-scoring double by Darwin Barney and a safety squeeze bunt by Arrieta.The final run in the seventh scored on a wild pitch.NOTES: With the addition of prospect Kolten Wong (who went 0-for-3 in his debut) to the Cardinals' roster and lineup on Friday, former World Series MVP David Freese was relegated to the bench with leadoff hitter Matt Carpenter (who had been playing second) moving to third base. "I would say it's a day-by-day situation," general manager John Mozeliak said. "I'm not saying (Wong) has to play every day — there are gonna be times when we want to get David back in the lineup — so I imagine there's gonna be some split playing opportunities." ... Cubs RHP Matt Guerrier was scheduled to have surgery on his throwing arm on Friday. The surgery, performed by Dr. Timothy Kremchek, is expected to sideline Guerrier six to eight months. ... The Cards' Joe Kelly (3-3) faces Travis Wood (7-9) in the second game of the series on Saturday.
CHICAGO — Yadier Molina hit a two-run homer, Joe Kelly threw six scoreless innings and the St. Louis Cardinals beat the Chicago Cubs 4-0 on Saturday.Cubs shortstop Starlin Castro was pulled shortly after making a mental mistake that let the Cardinals score in the fifth.The Cardinals led 1-0 and had the bases loaded with one out when Castro caught a popup by Matt Carpenter in short left field. Castro put his head down and hesitated to throw home, looking as if he thought the inning was over. Jon Jay scored from third base and the other runners advanced.Cubs manager Dale Sveum said something to Castro when he reached the dugout. Donnie Murphy switched from third base to shortstop to replace Castro in the sixth, and Cody Ransom came off the bench to play third.Kelly (4-3) hasn't lost since joining the Cardinals rotation on July 6. He allowed four hits, struck out six and walked three.A trio of St. Louis relievers combined to allow one hit. Both teams finished with five hits.The Cubs have lost 14 of their last 19 game. They have been shut out in five of their last seven at Wrigley Field.Molina homered off Travis Wood (7-10) for a 4-0 lead in the sixth after Matt Holliday was hit by a pitch. Molina's ninth homer was his first hit in eight at-bats since he came off the disabled list Thursday.Wood retired the first nine St. Louis batters. He gave up four runs and four hits in 5 1-3 innings.Carpenter hit a leadoff double in the fourth and scored on a double by Carlos Beltran for a 1-0 lead.The Cubs left the bases loaded in the third. Darwin Barney and Wood singled and Junior Lake drew a one-out walk, but Anthony Rizzo struck out and Nate Schierholtz grounded out.NOTES: The Cardinals recalled LHP Tyler Lyons from Triple-A Memphis before the game. He is 2-4 with a 5.35 ERA in seven starts. LHP Sam Freeman was optioned to Memphis after pitching four scoreless innings Friday against the Cubs. ... Cubs OF Brian Bogusevic, on the 15-day disabled list since July 15 for a strained left hamstring, will report to Triple-A Iowa to continue rehab. ... Cubs RHP Scott Baker, on the 60-day disabled list recovering from Tommy John surgery, will make his second rehab start Sunday with Single-A Dayton. ... Cubs RHP Edwin Jackson (7-12, 5.05 ERA) will face Cardinals RHP Adam Wainwright (13-7, 2.71) Sunday in the series finale.
CLEVELAND — Barkevious Mingo couldn't catch his breath and didn't think much of it. Then, the rookie linebacker coughed up blood and realized he needed help.The Browns are thankful he asked for it.Mingo was released from the hospital Saturday after a two-night stay at The Cleveland Clinic because of a bruised lung. After watching his teammates practice, the first-round pick discussed his ordeal and the unusual injury he believes happened on the opening kickoff in Thursday night's exhibition win over Detroit."I'm perfectly fine and my ribs are perfect," an upbeat Mingo said, flashing his usual smile. "I had no pain and no bruising, which kind of surprised the doctors, as well. Honestly, if it wasn't for the shortness of breath I was having, I probably would have still been out there playing."Following his release from the hospital, Mingo went to the Browns' training facility and visited with defensive coordinator Ray Horton and others at lunch. Later, he walked onto the practice field about 15 minutes into the workout and briefly met with Browns owner Jimmy Haslam and coach Rob Chudzinski.Mingo tried to downplay an injury that could have been worse."When I couldn't catch my breath, I went to my coach, who sent me to the trainers," the No. 6 overall pick said. "They made the decision, which was the right one, to be extra cautious and send me to the hospital. I appreciate that, obviously, but I'm fine. I'm really fine."Mingo said nothing happened on the opening kickoff to make him think he was hurt."I ran down and didn't feel right," he said. "I didn't feel like a hit was delivered that hard. I would think (a bruised lung) it'd be serious, but I feel fine. They told me to take it easy for a couple days, and when the coaches and doctors tell me I'm able to come back, I'll be out there."When he got to the hospital, Mingo said he was given precise instructions. He also coughed up blood after he was admitted."They gave me a bed and a TV, and they said, 'Watch this and don't move, and you'll be OK,'" he said. "All I have to do now is just rest up and let it heal."The former LSU standout likely will be kept out of practice for the next week, and it's possible he will sit out Cleveland's final two preseason games at Indianapolis (Aug. 24) and Chicago (Aug. 29)."For a young guy, he needs every rep he can get," Horton said. "He is very smart. He is on page. For us, it's just reps. It's seeing a different look. It's seeing (Colts QB) Andrew Luck. It's seeing different fronts, what they have and how they want to block him. It will retard a little bit, but he is pretty gifted in what he does and he picks things up fast. How much? I can't give you a quantitative answer, but it will hurt him a little bit."Mingo played only on the kickoff-coverage and punt-return teams against the Lions.The 6-foot-4, 240-pound Mingo has been primarily playing special teams and with Cleveland's second-string defense. However, Horton has been working the speedy Mingo into some of the Browns' pass-rushing packages in order to use his ability to pressure the quarterback from the edge.Fortunately, the Browns have others who can fill in while Mingo recovers."We have a lot of players at a lot of positions who can play for us," Horton said. "Depth is a key for us. We have quality players at a lot of quality positions. A lot of people use the mantra, 'Next man up.' We believe in that philosophy that it doesn't matter who the starters are, it is give me 11 guys who want to go out and play and can play."He is one of our 11, so will it hurt our team? Yeah, it will hurt our team because of our depth, but we will get him back soon and we will plug him right back in."Mingo was one of five Browns players to suffer a significant injury in the 24-6 win over the Lions.Running back Dion Lewis broke his left leg and is scheduled for surgery. It's not known how long Lewis will be sidelined, and Chudzinski said the team will wait until after the operation before deciding whether to put him on injured reserve.Lewis, acquired in a March trade from Philadelphia, has been a pleasant addition for the Browns, who were hoping to use him as a change-of-pace with starter Trent Richardson. Lewis' injury will further test Cleveland's depth in the backfield since Montario Hardesty is expected to miss at least one month after undergoing arthroscopic knee surgery Thursday.Starting right guard Jason Pinkston (high ankle sprain) left FirstEnergy Stadium in a walking boot and on crutches. Chudzinski said rookie Garrett Gilkey, a seventh-round pick, likely will move into the starting spot.Tight end Gary Barnidge (sprained shoulder) and rookie kicker Brandon Bogotay (groin) were also hurt in the preseason game but are not expected to be out long.
CHICAGO — Starlin Castro was back in the Cubs lineup a day after being pulled for making a mental mistake the day before.Manager Dale Sveum says Castro had atoned for his gaffe. On Saturday, the shortstop dawdled after catching a popup in shallow left field, allowing a run to score. He gloved a popup from Matt Carpenter, then put his head down, allowing Jon Jay to score from third and the runners on first and second to advance."The way I look at it is obviously he had enough punishment — whether or not punishment is the right word — to be embarrassed," Sveum said. "These kind of things happen from time to time.The 23-year-old infielder, one of the rebuilding Cubs' most prized young players, has looked lost for much of this season. He entered Sunday hitting .244 with seven homers and 32 RBIs, and was 0 for 16 in his last five games. He has only one error in his last 47 games.
(Reuters) - Teenager Matthew Fitzpatrick became the first Englishman to win the U.S. Amateur Championship in 102 years after he defeated Australian Oliver Goss in the 36-hole final on Sunday.The baby-faced 18-year-old from Sheffield, whose younger brother acted as his caddie, sunk a par putt on the 33rd hole to close out a 4&3 victory in the matchplay format tournament held at The Country Club in Brookline, Massachusetts."I mean, it's absolutely amazing," said Fitzpatrick, who won the title on the same course where amateur Francis Ouimet claimed his famous U.S. Open victory in a playoff against Harry Vardon and Ted Ray a century ago."I can't really describe how I'm feeling at the minute. That's sort of what everyone wants in golf, wants to achieve, and I'm pretty sure Justin Rose said that after his U.S. Open that it's nice to go down in the history books."Rose became the first Englishman in 43 years to win the U.S. Open when he won his first major at the Merion Golf Club in June.The amateur, who grabbed attention last month when he won the silver medal at the British Open as leading amateur, ended England's wait for a victory in the tournament since Harold Hilton lifted the trophy in 1911.The win earns Fitzpatrick, who is soon to begin a golf scholarship at Northwestern University in Chicago where former world number one and fellow Briton Luke Donald studied, an exemption into the 2014 U.S. Open provided he remains an amateur.He is also exempt from next year's British Open and is likely to receive an invitation to The U.S. Masters at Augusta.Fitzpatrick led the 19-year-old Goss by one after the morning round but the Australian tied the match on the opening hole of the second when his opponent missed a seven-foot par putt.The Englishman, who came into the event as the number two ranked amateur in the world, won the next two holes to take the lead for good."I'd probably say this week what's come out most is that my short game has just been really, really top drawer," Fitzpatrick said. "I'd say my weakest part of my game was into the greens."What's come out more than anything is I've just putted really well."
Miguel Cabrera and Max Scherzer have been so spectacularly successful this season that they are earning the right to be mentioned in the same breath with some of baseball's greats.Cabrera hit his 40th home run and had a run-scoring single on Sunday to help Scherzer become baseball's first 18-game winner this season as the Tigers beat the Kansas City Royals, 6-3, in the deciding game of a five-game series at Detroit.Cabrera became the third player since 1921 to have at least 40 homers and 120 runs batted in while batting .350 or better through 116 games, joining Babe Ruth and Jimmie Foxx, according to Stats L.L.C."That's nice," Cabrera said with a touch of awe as he looked at a list of the impressive company he had joined.Scherzer (18-1) gave up two runs and five hits in eight innings. Scherzer and Roger Clemens are the only pitchers since 1919 to have 18 wins in their first 19 decisions as starters, Stats said. Clemens did it with the Yankees in 2001, when he finished 20-3."The win-loss record is a little fluky," Scherzer said. "Every time I go out, the guys are putting up runs for me and are playing great defense."Cabrera, who last year won baseball's first triple crown in 45 years, leads the majors in batting (.360) and R.B.I. (120), and his 40 homers trail Baltimore's Chris Davis by five.RAYS 2, BLUE JAYS 1 Jose Lobaton ended the game with a solo home run in the 10th inning at Tampa Bay. On Friday night, Lobaton hit a game-ending triple in the ninth.ATHLETICS 7, INDIANS 3 Host Oakland broke a 3-3 tie in the fifth with solo home runs by Chris Young and Alberto Callaspo. The Athletics' third victory in four games cut first-place Texas' lead to a half-game in the American League West.MARINERS 4, RANGERS 3 A two-out, run-scoring double by Seattle's Kyle Seager broke a 3-3 tie in the ninth at Texas.WHITE SOX 5, TWINS 2 Chicago's Alexei Ramirez had three hits, including a home run, and three R.B.I, at Minnesota.ASTROS 7, ANGELS 5 Houston's Matt Dominguez had four hits, including a three-run homer that broke a 3-3 tie in the seventh against host Los Angeles.ORIOLES 7, ROCKIES 2 Chris Davis went 4 for 5 with his major-league-leading 45th home run, and Adam Jones had a two-run homer among his three hits for host Baltimore.PHILLIES 3, DODGERS 2 Casper Wells scored the game-ending run on Los Angeles shortstop Hanley Ramirez's second error of the ninth inning, and host Philadelphia ended the Dodgers' winning streak at 10 games. The victory was the first for the Phillies' interim manager, Ryne Sandberg, who took over when Charlie Manuel was fired Friday.Philadelphia starter Cole Hamels pitched seven innings, allowing two runs, in his ninth no-decision of the season. In his last seven starts, Hamels has allowed 13 runs in 51 innings, for an earned run average of 2.29, and yet has won once. For the season, he is 5-13 with a 3.61 E.R.A.D'BACKS 4, PIRATES 2 Adam Eaton's career-high fourth hit, a bloop double, drove in two runs and broke a 2-2 tie in the top of the 16th inning at Pittsburgh. Arizona remained five games behind Cincinnati in the race for the second National League wild-card spot. The Diamondbacks play their next four games in Cincinnati against the Reds.BRAVES 2, NATIONALS 1 Julio Teheran (10-6) pitched around trouble through six scoreless innings, allowing five hits and three walks, as host Atlanta extended its N.L. East lead over Washington to 15 ½ games.REDS 9, BREWERS 1 Cincinnati's Homer Bailey (8-10) allowed one run and three hits in eight innings at Milwaukee in his third straight victory.CARDINALS 6, CUBS 1 St. Louis's Adam Wainwright (14-7) struck out 11 and allowed one run in seven innings, and Jon Jay drove in four runs with a homer and a double at Chicago.MARLINS 6, GIANTS 5 Jeff Mathis homered in the third inning for host Miami, then broke a 5-5 tie in the eighth with a double that bounced off San Francisco center fielder Andres Torres.
ROSEMONT, Ill. — Chicago trailed the Minnesota Lynx by 3 points late in the fourth quarter on Aug. 11. The game clock ticked under 10 seconds. Elena Delle Donne, a 6-foot-5 do-it-all rookie for the Sky, rose and fired a 3-point shot over two pairs of outstretched hands. Swish.After she was mobbed by teammates, Delle Donne sneaked a quick glance toward the stands. She found perhaps her two biggest fans, five rows back, in their usual seats: Ernie, her father, and Gene, her brother. Like the rest of the crowd, they were fist-pumping and exchanging high-fives. "There you go!" Ernie shouted, pointing an outstretched arm at his daughter.After the Sky's overtime win, Delle Donne, who scored a career-high 32 points, had a wide smile in the locker room."It means a lot when I can look up and see them here," she said.Delle Donne, 23, has emerged as one of the top players in the W.N.B.A. She was fourth in the league in scoring entering Sunday, averaging 18.2 points, and she became the first rookie to lead the W.N.B.A. in the All-Star voting. The first-place Sky are in line for their first playoff berth in their eight-year history. Most of all, Delle Donne is clearly happy and comfortable in her new home.It was not long ago that this seemed impossible to imagine.In 2008, Delle Donne, the top recruit in the country, headed to Connecticut. But after two days of practice, she left Storrs in the middle of the night and drove home to Wilmington, Del. She quit basketball, saying she was burned out and could not be away from her family, including her older sister, Lizzie, who has cerebral palsy and is blind and deaf.She enrolled at Delaware and took a year off from basketball, playing volleyball instead. Delle Donne returned to basketball the next season and finished her college career fifth in women's Division I history in career points.But as April's W.N.B.A. draft approached, the prospect of once again moving far from home brought renewed scrutiny to Delle Donne's past. How committed was she to basketball? Could she handle being away from her family? And, more than anything, what was different now, five years later?The days leading to the draft were anxious ones for her family and uncertain ones for teams."After the UConn episode, obviously, we were watching this real closely," Ernie said.Delle Donne had hated everything about college recruiting — the mail, the phone calls, the pressure. The draft was different, she said, because this time, teams were forced to make the decision."I had no say," Delle Donne said. "Wherever I'm drafted, that's where I'm going. It was so much less stressful."A week before the draft, the Sky's owner, Michael Alter, met with Delle Donne for an hour. He knew he had his player."Given her background, we needed to know her motivations," Alter said. "I was really impressed with how direct she was about her past."The Sky took Delle Donne second, and she soon moved with Meghan McLean, her close friend and former teammate at Delaware, to a town house in the northwest suburbs of Chicago. The first few days, McLean said, it felt as if the whole world were e-mailing and texting her, checking on Delle Donne."Of course we were worried," Gene said. "That's my little sister."But Delle Donne clicked with her new team and her new city. She bought a Great Dane puppy and named him Wrigley, after Wrigley Field. She took trips downtown and to Lake Michigan and ate deep-dish pizza."I don't know what else to say other than I've grown up," Delle Donne said.Chicago turned out to be a stroke of luck geographically, too. An Eastern Conference team, the Sky play near Wilmington in Connecticut, New York and Washington, which has allowed Delle Donne to visit Lizzie during the season. And because of the short flight, Gene and Ernie, a real estate developer, have missed only a few Sky games this year.Then there is the close-knit operation that surrounds Delle Donne like a cocoon. McLean doubles as her personal assistant, and Gene, who played college football at Duke and Middle Tennessee State, is her agent."She has this tremendous support system around her," Gene said. "We're happy to be here for her, and it works as a great security blanket."Delle Donne said she did not think about the past anymore. She once needed to find herself, and she did."The Connecticut question always resurfaces," she said. "I'm like, You got to be kidding me; this is over with. I'm playing in the W.N.B.A., loving life. Let's move on."Delle Donne sprained her left foot against Los Angeles on Tuesday, and she could miss the next two weeks. That still leaves her plenty of time to return for a potential playoff run.Her family, of course, will be there every step of the way."It's like now I need to be here more for me than for her," Ernie said. "But that's a good thing."
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — Dayan Viciedo hit his second career grand slam to highlight a five-run inning for the White Sox, and Andre Rienzo picked up his first career win for Chicago by shutting down the punchless Kansas City Royals in a 5-2 victory Wednesday night.Rienzo (1-0) allowed only a sacrifice fly to Mike Moustakas while cruising through six innings to win for the first time in five starts. The Brazilian right-hander allowed just five hits and two walks in helping the White Sox win their season-best fifth straight game.Addison Reed worked the ninth for his second save of the series and 33rd on the year.Viciedo's grand slam off Jeremy Guthrie (12-10) in the fourth followed an RBI single by Adam Dunn that had given the White Sox the lead. Their five runs in the frame matched the number of runs the Royals' woeful offense had mustered in the previous 22 innings.
CHICAGO — Denard Span scored the go-ahead run on pinch-hitter Chad Tracy's grounder in the 13th inning, and the Washington Nationals beat the Chicago Cubs 5-4 on Thursday after Stephen Strasburg blew a three-run lead in the ninth.Span doubled leading off the 13th against Michael Bowden (1-3). He moved up on a sacrifice bunt by Steve Lombardozzi and came around on Tracy's roller to the first-base side of the mound.That made a winner of Craig Stammen (7-5), who worked two innings.Drew Storen earned his third save in eight chances. Storen deflected Dioner Navarro's liner toward Lombardozzi to start a game-ending double play after Anthony Rizzo reached on a throwing error by the second baseman with one out.After a two-hour rain delay at the start, Strasburg was one out away from a complete game with a 4-1 lead before Chicago rallied to tie it.Junior Lake had an RBI single, and Donnie Murphy hit a two-run homer to make it 4-4. Rafael Soriano gave up a double to Brian Bogusevic before Darwin Barney lined to left, sending the game to extra innings.Before the late rally, Strasburg and the Nationals were sailing along.Ryan Zimmerman and Steve Lombardozzi homered, and Strasburg added two hits, including an RBI single, as Washington built a 4-0 lead.Strasburg was aiming for his second shutout in three starts when Chicago's Brian Bogusevic homered leading off the eighth. When the Cubs struck again in the ninth, Chicago spoiled the ace's dominant outing.Strasburg gave up seven hits, struck out eight and walked two after the shortest start of his career. He was ejected in the second inning at Atlanta last week for throwing two consecutive pitches behind Andrelton Simmons' back.Travis Wood allowed four runs and seven hits in 6 2-3 innings for Chicago.NOTES: Cubs OF Ryan Sweeney, on the 60-day DL because of a broken left rib, is scheduled to start a rehab assignment in the Rookie Arizona League on Saturday. 3B Luis Valbuena (strained muscle on right side) will head to Arizona to take batting practice from the minor league coaching staff. RHP Scott Baker, recovering from Tommy John surgery, is scheduled to start Friday for Class A Kane County. ... Cubs manager Dale Sveum said he doesn't envision SS Javier Baez being called up in September, although he has been impressed with his play. Baez is hitting a combined .286 with 33 homers and 100 RBIs for Class A Daytona and Double-A Tennessee. ... RHP Edwin Jackson (7-13, 4.89 ERA) starts Friday for the Cubs at San Diego, with RHP Edinson Volquez (9-10, 5.72) going for the Padres. Washington visits Kansas City, with LHP Gio Gonzalez (7-6, 3.38) starting for the Nationals and LHP Bruce Chen (5-1, 2.20) pitching for the Royals.
With less than two weeks before rosters must be cut to no more than 53 players, the N.F.L. and its players union continued trading barbs Thursday about the league's drug-testing regimen and the implementation of a preliminary test for human growth hormone.This summer, players in training camp were supposed to have blood samples taken to help create a benchmark for testing them for H.G.H. The samples were to be used as part of a population study to create the standards of a test to be introduced in the future.The league has not signed off on the study because the union wants an independent arbitrator to hear all appeals under the league's drug policy, not just cases involving a positive test result, which make up the vast majority of disputes. The league's commissioner has for many years had final say over all appeals except for those involving positive drug test results, and the league insists the commissioner should maintain those powers.In a statement, Adolpho Birch, the N.F.L.'s senior vice president for labor policy and government affairs, accused the union of delaying tactics."The union's latest demand has nothing to do with appeals from positive drug tests, nothing to do with ensuring a level playing field and nothing to do with keeping players safe from dangerous substances," Birch said. "It is simply a case of buyer's remorse and an effort to renegotiate part of a long-term agreement that they have now decided they don't like."George Atallah, a spokesman for the union, responded on Twitter, noting that while the union's chief, DeMaurice Smith, had signed a letter authorizing the population study to begin, Commissioner Roger Goodell had not."The only case of buyer's remorse is the attached letter that the N.F.L. agreed to weeks ago," Atallah said, adding, "Your refusal to sign it confirms that the only thing you care about is power."Representative Elijah Cummings of Maryland, the top Democrat on the House Committee on Oversight and Government Reform, told The Associated Press on Thursday that the union was "holding H.G.H. testing hostage" and warned that Congress could get involved.The league and the union agreed that they would introduce testing for H.G.H. in 2011 when they signed the latest collective bargaining agreement. It has taken more than two years, and pressure from Congress, for the sides to agree on procedures for the testing.The union recently sent its members a memo outlining the proposed protocols for the H.G.H. study. In it, the union said that only an independent scientist would have access to the test results. The union said it was likely to agree that each week during the season, five players from eight teams would be randomly chosen for additional blood tests.The league and the union have also sparred over whether retired players should be included in the population study.MISTAKE-PRONE RAVENS FALL Ted Ginn Jr. returned a punt 74 yards for a touchdown, and Carolina's defense scored three times in a 34-27 preseason victory at Baltimore.Carolina had only 67 yards in offense at halftime yet reeled off 24 straight points after Baltimore scored on its first possession.Ravens quarterback Joe Flacco played into the third quarter and went 18 for 24 for 169 yards and a touchdown. In three preseason games, he has two touchdown passes and three interceptions. (AP)PATRIOTS STRUGGLE ON OFFENSE Reggie Bush ran for 1 yard on six carries, but he had five catches for 103 yards to help Detroit rout visiting New England, 40-9.The Patriots' first-team offense, precise and efficient in the first two games of the preseason, was anything but. Tight end Zach Sudfeld and running backs Brandon Bolden and Shane Vereen lost fumbles, and Tom Brady threw an interception in four of New England's first five possessions. The other possession was a three-and-out. (AP)JETS ADD MASSAQUOI The Jets signed the veteran wide receiver Mohamed Massaquoi, who was cut by Jacksonville on Monday after signing a two-year deal in April. He had two catches for 15 yards in the Jaguars' preseason loss to the Jets on Saturday night."A tough guy who has been in this system just a little bit," the Jets' offensive coordinator, Marty Mornhinweg, said. "I think he's quite familiar with at least some of our terminology, so that will be a good thing for him." (AP)DOLPHIN MAY MISS OPENER After sitting out most of practice for a second consecutive week, Dion Jordan, Miami's first-round pick, said he might not be ready for the start of the regular season.Jordan, who had surgery for a torn labrum in his right shoulder Feb. 28 and began training camp on the nonfootball injury list, has not taken part in a full practice since Miami's 27-3 preseason victory at Jacksonville on Aug. 9. Jordan did noncontact work early in practice Thursday before doing side work with a trainer. (AP)STEELERS ROOKIE ON THE MEND Steelers running back Le'Veon Bell will sit out Pittsburgh's exhibition against Kansas City on Saturday night with a sprained right foot, but Bell, a second-round draft pick, said he was not worried the injury would extend well into the regular season."I've already been healing real quick," Bell said. "As long as the process keeps going the way it is, I should be back pretty quick."Coach Mike Tomlin declined to put an exact timetable on Bell's return but said it was encouraging that surgery would not be required. Less than 72 hours after he went down in the first quarter of a loss to Washington, Bell could already put weight on the foot, although he wore a walking boot into the locker room as a precaution. (AP)BUCCANEERS HAVE INFECTIONS Tampa Bay guard Carl Nicks and kicker Lawrence Tynes are being treated for methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus infections.General Manager Mark Dominik confirmed that Nicks had an infected blister on the side of his left foot and that Tynes had an infected toe on his right foot. MRSA is a staph infection that is resistant to some antibiotics.The infections were diagnosed last week. The Buccaneers hired a company to sanitize One Buccaneer Place, the team's training complex, last week. A second cleaning has been scheduled as a precaution.The Buccaneers said they did not know where Nicks and Tynes were exposed to MRSA. Both players are responding to treatment, and the club said no other MRSA infections had been discovered among its players. (AP)RAIDER HITTING THE FIELD D. J. Hayden, drafted 12th over all in April, will make his exhibition debut for Oakland on Friday night against Chicago, his first game action of any kind since a near-fatal practice collision ended his college career in November.Hayden, who had abdominal surgery in May to heal scarring from the original injury, has been limited for most of training camp. He was not cleared for any contact until last Friday and has had just one padded practice.Hayden will wear an extra flap over his chest for added protection despite his complaints that it makes him look as if he has a beer belly. (AP)BRONCO MAKING WAY BACK Denver defensive lineman Derek Wolfe put in a full upper-body workout in the weight room and then thanked his teammates and fans for their prayers and well wishes after he was taken by ambulance from CenturyLink Field in Seattle last weekend.Wolfe said he hoped to be back in the lineup by Denver's Sept. 5 opener against Baltimore, which will be less than three weeks after he was feared to have sustained a cervical spine injury."It's amazing how much you don't like to practice until you can't do it anymore," Wolfe said. "And it's real humbling whenever you can't really feel your extremities for a while. I get a little emotional about it because this is what I love to do and I couldn't imagine myself doing anything but this game." (AP)AROUND THE LEAGUE San Francisco added another quarterback to the competition to be Colin Kaepernick's backup, signing the veteran Seneca Wallace to a one-year contract. ... Injuries will keep Indianapolis's top two tight ends, Coby Fleener (knee) and Dwayne Allen (foot), out of Saturday's game against Cleveland, but safety LaRon Landry is expected to make his preseason debut. ... Seattle Coach Pete Carroll said defensive tackle Jordan Hill strained his biceps during practice Tuesday; Hill will not play against Green Bay on Friday night. ... Running back Ryan Williams and tight end Jeff King, each of whom had been out since the early days of training camp with knee problems, returned to practice in the final workout of camp for Arizona. ... The N.F.L. fined Washington quarterback Robert Griffin III $10,000 for wearing unauthorized apparel Monday night, a T-shirt with "Operation Patience" on it. (AP)
CHICAGO — Jordan Danks homered after replacing the injured Avisail Garcia, backing a solid start by his brother John and helping the surging Chicago White Sox beat the Texas Rangers 5-2 on Sunday.The White Sox took two of three from the AL West leaders, giving them eight victories in their last nine games.Josh Phegley went deep after hitting the winning single in the ninth inning the previous night. John Danks (4-10) outpitched Matt Garza (3-2), allowing two runs over six innings for his second straight win.Garcia, a bright spot in a miserable season for Chicago, crashed into the right-field fence while trying to bring in a tying two-run homer by Jeff Baker that barely cleared the wall in the fourth.Acquired from Detroit in last month's three-team deal that sent Jake Peavy to Boston, Garcia banged his head and shoulder. He stayed down for a few moments and was tended to by a trainer and manager Robin Ventura before walking gingerly off the field.Jordan Danks replaced him and gave the White Sox a 3-2 lead with a solo drive to right in the bottom half. According to information supplied to the White Sox by the Elias Sports Bureau, it was the first time a player has supported his brother with a homer since the Kansas City Athletics' Billy Shantz did it for Bobby Shantz on June 3, 1955.Third baseman Jeff Keppinger preserved the lead in the fifth when he lunged to snag Adrian Beltre's liner and stepped on the bag with runners on the corners to end the threat.Adam Dunn made it 4-2 in the sixth with an RBI single after Alexei Ramirez doubled, and Phegley bumped the lead to three with his drive in the seventh after Matt Lindstrom escaped a bases-loaded jam.Lindstrom got Beltre to hit into a double play after Ramirez booted Ian Kinsler's grounder to shortstop for his career-high 21st error.Nate Jones pitched a pitched a scoreless eighth and Addison Reed finished for his 35th save in 40 chances.After pitching eight scoreless innings against Kansas City last week, John Danks gave up eight hits and struck out five while walking one in this one.Garza had another shaky outing for the Rangers, allowing five runs — four earned — and seven hits over seven innings. He's allowed at least four runs in five straight starts.NOTES: The Rangers held OF Leonys Martin out of the lineup after he sprained his right ankle the previous night. He was injured in a collision with left fielder David Murphy chasing Paul Konerko's fly to center and left that game, but he was optimistic he would be able to play Monday at Seattle. ... Rangers manager Ron Washington said RHP Yu Darvish was fine after experiencing cramps in his calves during the seventh inning the previous night. Washington attributed the symptoms to dehydration. ... Garcia struck out in his lone at-bat, bringing his 11-game hitting streak to an end. ... White Sox bench coach Mark Parent was ejected during the pregame lineup exchange by crew chief and second base umpire Jerry Layne. ... The White Sox open a three-game series against Houston on Monday, with RHP Andre Rienzo (1-0, 3.56 ERA) starting for Chicago against LHP Brett Oberholtzer (3-1, 2.91 ERA). The Rangers are at Seattle, with LHP Travis Blackley (1-1, 4.85 ERA) going against Mariners LHP Joe Saunders (10-12, 4.91 ERA).
KANSAS CITY, Mo. — Salvador Perez homered early, then drove in the tiebreaking run in the eighth and the Kansas City Royals ended their seven-game losing streak on Sunday, rebounding for a 6-4 victory after blowing a 4-0 lead against Washington.With two out and a runner on first and the game tied 4-all in the eighth, Billy Butler hit a hard grounder that first baseman Adam LaRoche knocked down. The ball rolled several feet to his right and when Stammen was late to cover the bag, the slow-running Butler kept the inning going by chugging to first with an infield single. Stammen then walked Mike Moustakas on fourth pitches and Perez hit a hard grounder to shortstop Ian Desmond. He bobbled momentarily and his throw to third was late, allowing the tiebreaking run to cross the plate on what was first ruled a fielder's choice and then changed to an infield single before David Lough's RBI single made it 6-4.Kelvin Herrera (5-6) pitched 1 1-3 innings of relief for only the Royals' third victory in 13 games. Craig Stammen (7-6) took the loss and was part of a shaky defense that led to the Nationals' first loss in six road outings.Greg Holland pitched the ninth for his 35th save in 37 opportunities, giving up two singles but striking out the side. Stammen went one inning, gave up three hits and two earned runs.Royals starter Ervin Santana was handed a 4-0 lead after the first inning but gave up three home runs, including Bryce Harper's two-run shot with two out in the seventh that tied it 4-all.Santana had a 4-1 lead and two out in the seventh when Denard Span's third hit of the day went for his third home run of the year. Ryan Zimmerman followed with a single, bringing a visit to the mound by Royals pitching coach Dave Eiland. Harper then hit Santana's next pitch over the fence in left-center, bringing Herrera in from the bullpen.Washington starter Dan Haren entered the game 4-0 in six career starts in Kauffman Stadium and had never allowed more than two earned runs in KC, But that quickly changed.On Haren's third pitch, Gordon hit the 11th leadoff home run of his career. After Emilio Bonifacio walked, Eric Hosmer hit an RBI single. Hosmer was out trying to steal, then Mike Moustakas singled and Perez homered for a 4-0 lead against Haren, who had been 4-2 since coming back from the DL on July 8.Haren was in danger again in the second and saved only by a standout double play started by LaRoche, who dove to his right to spear a line smash off Gordon's bat. From his knees, LaRoche threw to second base to double off Alcides Escobar.After that, Haren allowed only two singles while going seven innings. He was charged with four runs on eight hits.In the Nationals fourth, Desmond homered for the second time in two games. The ball bounced off the facade of the Royals hall of fame behind left field and was estimated at 431 feet.Span drilled a ball off Santana's right hip with one out in the third, the ball bounding all the way into foul territory behind third base while Anthony Rendon went from second to third. But after testing the leg and visiting with the Royals trainer on the mound, Santana stayed in to strike out Zimmerman and retire Harper on a shallow fly.Santana was charged with four runs on 11 hits in 6 2-3 innings, with seven strikeouts and no walks.NOTES: Jayson Werth was back in the Nationals lineup at DH after sitting out one game with an infection in his right foot. ... Royals had a fifth straight losing season in interleague competition. ... The Royals face Tampa Bay on Monday to make up a game that was snowed out in May. ... The Nationals finished a 10-game trip to Chicago, Atlanta and Kansas City.
CHICAGO — White Sox bench coach Mark Parent was ejected from Sunday's game against the Texas Rangers.Parent was tossed during the pregame lineup exchange by crew chief and second base umpire Jerry Layne.It was his second ejection this season.
(Reuters) - Another sports team owner is eyeing the possibility of becoming a newspaper publisher.Mark Walter, the controlling partner of the group that owns the Los Angeles Dodgers, said he could be interested in buying the Los Angeles Times and the Chicago Tribune for the right price."The Los Angeles Times says something," Walter told the Los Angeles Times late on Friday. "It means something. It's a brand. I think people have undervalued that. If the price were right, I would buy it."Walter, who lives in Chicago, is also the chief executive of Guggenheim Partners, an investment banking company.He told the newspaper he could be interested in buying Los Angeles Times and the Chicago Tribune because he wants to improve the quality of information.The Tribune Co., which owns both newspapers, declined to comment.Walter made the comments during a Dodgers game against the Boston Red Sox, a team that has newspaper ties. The owner of the Red Sox, John Henry, agreed to buy The Boston Globe newspaper from The New York Times Co. for $70 million.The Dodgers are owned by Guggenheim Baseball Management, a group of investors that includes Walter, Earvin "Magic" Johnson and one-time Hollywood studio executive Peter Guber.Tribune plans to spin out its eight newspapers, including the Los Angeles Times and the Chicago Tribune, in order to concentrate on its faster-growing broadcast businesses. The CEO of Guggenheim Digital Media, Ross Levinsohn, is a Tribune board director.As big chains put their newspapers on the block, local owners are lining up to snap up their hometown dailies. "Oracle of Omaha" Warren Buffett bought the Omaha World-Herald and local San Diego businessman Doug Manchester acquired the U-T San Diego.
LOS ANGELES — Former Chicago Bulls basketball star Scottie Pippen will not be prosecuted over an altercation with a man at a Malibu restaurant in June, prosecutors said on Tuesday, citing insufficient evidence.Pippen, 47, was questioned by police following a scuffle with the man outside the Nobu eatery in the oceanfront community of Malibu in June.Camran Shafighi told police that Pippen refused to take a photograph with him while the former NBA star was dining in the restaurant with his family, according to a report by the Los Angeles County District Attorney's Office.Shafighi said that when he later approached Pippen in the parking lot, the former athlete spit in his face, punched him in the mouth, knocked him down and kicked him in the face, causing him to lose consciousness, the report from prosecutors said.Shafighi later sued Pippen over the confrontation.Pippen, a seven-time NBA All-Star, told police that Shafighi spit at him first and he spit back, and that he then pushed Shafighi, who fell back and started kicking at him, according to the prosecutors' report. Pippen told police he raised his foot to block the blows from Shafighi.There is "insufficient evidence to prove beyond a reasonable doubt" that Pippen is guilty of committing a crime against Shafighi, the District Attorney's Office report said.Shafighi, who was hospitalized after the scuffle, had a blood alcohol content of 0.18, which was more than twice the legal limit for driving, according to the report.There was also an "absolute lack of physical injuries" that one would expect from the blows Shafighi told investigators that Pippen inflicted on him, and his behavior at the hospital was described by a physician as "feigning non-existent injuries inflicted by a celebrity suspect," the prosecutors report said.Pippen won six National Basketball Association championships with the Chicago Bulls in the 1990s, playing alongside basketball great Michael Jordan. He also played for the Houston Rockets and Portland Trail Blazers before ending his career back in Chicago in the 2003-04 season.He was inducted into the Basketball Hall of Fame in 2010.
CHICAGO — Chris Sale struck out 12 over eight-plus dominant innings and Avisail Garcia hit a three-run homer to lead the Chicago White Sox to a 6-1 win over the Houston Astros on Wednesday night.Garcia finished with three hits for the White Sox, who have won 10 of their last 12 games.Sale (10-12) bounced back from an embarrassing start Friday night against Texas in which he allowed a career-worst four home runs. Against Houston, he gave up only one run on four hits and left to standing ovation after allowing his second walk of the game.Sale had his 22 2-3 scoreless innings streak snapped when Chris Carter hit a two-out solo shot in the seventh to tie it 1-all.Jeff Keppinger broke the tie in the seventh with a sacrifice fly off Lucas Harrell (6-15).
If this story seems all too familiar for Matt Flynn, well, it is.While Flynn sits on the bench and rests a sore elbow Thursday night, Terrelle Pryor will help Oakland close out the preseason against Seattle and get an opportunity to earn the Raiders' starting quarterback job.It is almost the same situation for Flynn as last year, when Russell Wilson nabbed the Seahawks' starting job even though Flynn had entered training camp expected to be their No. 1. Now, Pryor, who has had an impressive preseason, can solidify his case that he should be the starter when the Raiders open the season at Indianapolis."I'm going to keep showing the coaches what I can do good and keep getting better at the things that I'm not doing so good at," Pryor said, adding: "I'm definitely not all the way there in terms of the playbook and in terms of just being a quarterback out there. I'm learning still. Don't get me wrong: I can lead if I was called upon to do it. I'm just out there getting better and trying to get in sync with the guys."Flynn, who was traded to Oakland during the off-season, was slowed during the 2012 preseason by a sore elbow, and the same problem could give Pryor a chance.Flynn completed 70 percent of his passes during the preseason, but he was sacked seven times, and last week against Chicago he threw two awful interceptions.JETS SIGN A PASSER The Jets signed the former Green Bay backup Graham Harrell, adding some depth at quarterback.Harrell passed his physical Wednesday, in time to join the Jets for their preseason finale, against Philadelphia on Thursday night. Harrell, who starred at Texas Tech, spent the last three seasons as a backup to Aaron Rodgers, completing 2 of 4 passes for 20 yards in four regular-season appearances.PATRIOTS CUT CORNERBACK New England released cornerback Ras-I Dowling, two years after drafting him in the second round. Dowling played only nine games for the Patriots after he was taken with the 33rd overall pick in 2011 out of Virginia.GROIN, NOT HAMSTRING, IS ISSUE Dallas defensive tackle Jay Ratliff said there was no problem with his hamstring, meaning the setback that will keep him out of at least the first six games of the season is related to a groin muscle that was surgically repaired eight months ago.Ratliff spoke at a Cowboys luncheon, a day after he was put on the physically unable to perform list. Coach Jason Garrett had said Ratliff was sidelined during training camp by a hamstring injury sustained in the pre-camp conditioning test and by lingering issues with his groin.Ratliff, who turns 32 on Thursday and cannot play until Oct. 20, had sports hernia surgery in December.JAGUARS ADD CORNERBACK Jacksonville signed the veteran cornerback Will Blackmon, who has played in 43 games over six seasons with the Green Bay Packers and the Giants.BROWNS ROOKIE LIFTS WEIGHTS The Browns said the rookie linebacker Barkevious Mingo worked out with weights. Mingo, a first-round draft pick, did some running Tuesday but has not practiced since he bruised his lung Aug. 15 against Detroit and was hospitalized for two days.Cleveland Coach Rob Chudzinski said there was no timetable for Mingo's return, and it is not yet known if he will play in the season opener.
CHICAGO — With Landon Donovan back in the fold, the U.S. resumes World Cup qualifying next week with its deepest team yet.Donovan was among 23 players selected Thursday by coach Jurgen Klinsmann for upcoming qualifiers against Costa Rica and Mexico. Klinsmann snubbed the Americans' career scoring leader for the last round of qualifiers, saying Donovan needed to work his way back onto the team following his offseason sabbatical.But Donovan redeemed himself — and then some — with his play in last month's Gold Cup, scoring five goals as the Americans won the title. He has continued his dazzling play with four goals in three games for the Los Angeles Galaxy, which on Wednesday rewarded him with a new, long-term contract."He got himself back into the team during the Gold Cup," Klinsmann said. "He did a wonderful job there."While it's hard to imagine a starting lineup without Donovan when the Americans resume qualifying at Costa Rica on Sept. 6, Klinsmann now has multiple options at almost every position. He used two almost completely different rosters for the last round of qualifiers and the Gold Cup, and the Americans responded with a record 12 straight wins.It is the longest streak in the world currently, and three shy of the record set by Spain in 2009.The winning streak, and the depth behind it, has given the Americans a swagger normally reserved for European and South American teams."We have a lot of respect for Costa Rica. (We) can expect a really very, very intense game, high-energy game," Klinsmann said. "But I think we have the quality and the mindset to be confident enough to say, 'We're going to go there for three points.'"This is what we're trying to build," Klinsmann added. "More and more, this belief is getting bigger. It's growing throughout the entire group. We've got a deeper roster now than ever before. Hopefully, we can take that mindset down to San Jose and win there for first time ever in World Cup qualifying."In addition to Donovan, Klinsmann selected 11 players who were part of the Gold Cup winning squad: DaMarcus Beasley, Kyle Beckerman, Alejandro Bedoya, Matt Besler, Edgar Castillo, Mix Diskerud, Omar Gonzalez, Eddie Johnson, Michael Orozco and Nick Rimando. He passed over Joe Corona and Sacha Kljestan, who were part of the squad for a come-from-behind victory over Bosnia-Herzegovina earlier this month."It was not easy to make those decisions," Klinsmann said.After playing at Costa Rica, the Americans return home to face archrival Mexico on Sept. 10 in Columbus, Ohio. The U.S. is atop the qualifying group from North and Central America and the Caribbean region, leading Costa Rica by two points with Mexico five points back.The top three teams advance to next year's World Cup in Brazil, with the fourth-place team going to a playoff with New Zealand, the Oceania winner."If we're able to get three points in San Jose next Friday, we're almost there. We're almost in Brazil," Klinsmann said. "I don't want players to think, even for one second, about Mexico in Columbus. I want them to tune in to Costa Rica and give everything they have."
CHICAGO — The Philadelphia Phillies and Cuban pitcher Miguel Alfredo Gonzalez have agreed to a $12 million, three-year contract.General manager Ruben Amaro announced the deal during Philadelphia's game at the Chicago Cubs on Friday. The team says it includes an option for 2017, a signing bonus and performance bonuses.The 26-year-old Gonzalez defected to Mexico this year and worked out for scouts in Tijuana. The hard-throwing right-hander has a fastball that reaches the upper 90s.Gonzalez will report to Philly's spring training complex in Clearwater, Fla. Amaro says the team is hopeful he will be in Philadelphia's rotation beginning next year.Left-hander John Lannan was moved to the 60-day disabled list to open a spot on the 40-man roster for Gonzalez.
NORTON, Mass. — Phil Mickelson keeps saying how much he loves playing with Tiger Woods. He shot 63 at the Deutsche Bank Championship to prove it.In a feature grouping of the top three players in the world ranking, Mickelson turned in the star performance Friday morning with a 28 that allowed him to consider — but only briefly — another shot at 59.By the end of the day, when he played a risky shot from deep in the trees on his final hole to salvage bogey, he was happy to have a share of the lead. Mickelson was tied with Brian Davis, who made a 25-foot birdie putt on the last hole to join him at 8-under 63."What Phil did today was pretty impressive," Woods said after a 68 that only seemed worse considering the company he kept.Masters champion Adam Scott, rounding out the 1-2-3 pairing, struggled to a 73 and joked later that he rolled out of the wrong side of the bed. "I wish could have gotten in their jet stream," Scott said.Mickelson did everything right.He started his round on the TPC Boston by making birdie putts of 20 feet on No. 10 and 30 feet on No. 11. He ended the front nine with five straight birdies, only the second nine-hole score of 28 on the PGA Tour this year. And even after a bogey from the bunker on No. 1, he hit a 6-iron from 213 yards that settled just more than a foot away for eagle on the next hole. That put him at 8 under for his round with seven holes to play."It was a good start," Mickelson said. "I got off to a great front nine and somewhat stalled on the back. But after shooting 7 under the first nine, it was going to be a good round as long as I didn't mess it up."He tried. Mickelson ended his brilliant round with two words: "Oh, no." He hit a snap-hook off the ninth tee, so far right that it missed the fairway by some 40 yards and went so deep in the woods that fans could barely see Mickelson ducking and weaving through the branches to find his ball.He decided against a one-shot penalty drop out of the lateral hazard, fearing the slope would roll the ball too close to the branches and restrict his swing."Just give me an 8- or a 9-iron," he told his caddie, Jim "Bones" Mackay. He was ready to hack away when his caddie reminded him the gallery was still in the way. Choking well up the grip, flattening the swing to avoid limbs, Mickelson chopped it out to the rough and still had 210 yards left. He knocked that one on the green and two-putted for his bogey and a 63.Kevin Stadler birdied his last four holes for a 64.Sergio Garcia, Hunter Mahan and Roberto Castro were in the group at 65. Garcia tends to skip the Deutsche Bank, but he is No. 55 in the FedEx Cup, no guarantee of being among the top 70 who advance to the third playoff event outside Chicago. Instead, the Spaniard is playing his fifth straight week.Rory McIlroy opened with a 70, which he said was the worst score he could have shot.It was at the Deutsche Bank Championship in 2007 when Mickelson first got over the mental hurdle of playing with Woods, his longtime nemesis. He said swing coach Butch Harmon, who formerly worked with Woods, gave him a few tips about playing with the world's No. 1 player that relaxed Mickelson.In the 15 rounds they have played together since, Mickelson has a 9-5-1 advantage in posting the lower score. He has shot the better score all five times in the final round, three of those leading to wins.Mickelson had said Woods "brings out the best in me" on Thursday after his pro-am round. When asked about that again after his 63, Lefty smiled and said, "After today, it's hard to think any differently."Woods referred to the course as "gettable," the same description he gave of Muirfield when Mickelson shot 66 on the final day to win the British Open, considered one of the great closing rounds in a major. That was the case, though. The TPC Boston was soft enough — and the fairways wide enough — to allow some low numbers.Woods said his back felt fine, and there were no outward indications he was in any pain. The only thing that hurt was not hitting enough shots close for birdie chances, and missing a few at the end. Woods had a 6-foot birdie putt on the seventh and a downhill birdie putt from about 12 feet on his last hole, missing both of them."The back is good," Woods said. "Unfortunately, I didn't give myself a whole lot of looks."Even though the majors are over, and Mickelson added a big one at the British Open, the next month is a great chance for him. For all his greatness over the last two decades — 42 career wins on the PGA Tour, five majors and a spot in the Hall of Fame — he came along at the wrong time. Mickelson has never been player of the year, No. 1 in the world or tops on the PGA Tour money list. And he hasn't won the FedEx Cup, now in its seventh year.This might be his best chance. Mickelson feels great, though at 43 he was reminded he wasn't getting any younger when he went home to San Diego last week to take his oldest daughter to high school.With two wins — one a major — and a runner-up in the U.S. Open, another win at a FedEx Cup playoff event might be enough to get voted PGA Tour player of the year. Woods has five wins, all of them strong, but failed to win a major."If I finish off with one or two wins this year, and win the FedEx Cup, I think that would be enough to get the player of the year," he said. "My game clicked again last week, and I feel like these next three weeks I'm going to play very well. I can just feel it. You can just tell sometimes. The game feels sharp. And mentally, I have a lot of energy and I'm able to focus clearly. And that's usually when you play well."
NORTON, Mass. — Steve Stricker sent a text message Friday morning to captain Fred Couples that he wants to make his Presidents Cup team without being a pick.Then, he shot a 66 in the Deutsche Bank Championship to show he was serious.Stricker is No. 11 in the U.S. standings, which is based on PGA Tour earnings, and this is the final week for the top 10 players to qualify for the Presidents Cup. He likely would need to finish in the top 10 to have any chance of passing Zach Johnson for the final spot.That also depends on what Dustin Johnson and Jim Furyk, who are behind Stricker on the list.It's a situation Stricker wasn't expecting when he announced his semi-retirement at the start of the year. Wanting to spend more time at home in Wisconsin with his wife and two children, the 46-year-old Stricker planned to play no more than a dozen tournaments.He has had five top 10s, including a pair of runner-up finishes, and now has a reasonable chance to qualify. Any other year, he might be a logical choice as one of Couples' two captain's picks. But this is where Stricker is uneasy.He skipped The Barclays last week to take his daughter, Bobbi Maria, to the U.S. Open tennis championship in New York. He already has made plans to go elk hunting with his friends during the week of the Tour Championship.As for the BMW Championship in two weeks? That depends on his Presidents Cup status."I have mixed emotions," he said. "I'd love to part of the team. I told Freddie I want to make this team on my own merit. I'm not going to play the Tour Championship for sure. I don't want to make anybody feel uncomfortable that I'm not playing a lot if I make the team or I'm a pick. I don't know. I'm not really quite sure of my feelings. I feel like I can help. I feel like I can be part of the team."But a lack of play ... I don't know. I'm struggling with that," he said. "I don't want to put any pressure on Freddie or anyone else."Stricker, considered one of the best putters in golf, has been part of every U.S. team since 2007. Two years ago, he had a neck injury that affected the strength in his left arm. He didn't play for two months leading to the matches at Royal Melbourne, and went 2-2 in another American victory."No one knew what to expect, and I didn't know what to expect," he said. "I had question marks on my side. I don't want to put anyone in that position, nor do I want to be in that position. I'm struggling with it."Stricker said if he makes the team, he would play the BMW Championship at Conway Farms just north of Chicago.He also is recovering from a torn hamstring in his right leg from a water skiing accident in July, though he said it's getting stronger and only occasionally affects his swing.And how did Couples respond to the text message."He said, 'Don't worry about it, go play, you're fine, you're consistent, you're great' ... you know how he goes," Stricker said.
CHICAGO — Michael Young had four hits, including a tiebreaking RBI single in the ninth inning, and the Philadelphia Phillies rallied for a 6-5 victory over the Chicago Cubs on Friday in Ryne Sandberg's return to Wrigley Field.Kevin Frandsen had two hits and scored two runs after entering in the sixth, helping Philadelphia bounce back from Thursday's 11-3 loss to the New York Mets. Chase Utley added a key two-run triple.The Phillies improved to 9-6 since Sandberg was promoted to interim manager when Charlie Manuel was fired on Aug. 16. The Hall of Fame second baseman spent most of his playing career with the Cubs and was cheered all day long in his first trip to Chicago since he was elevated to the top spot in Philadelphia.Anthony Rizzo and Nate Schierholtz homered for the Cubs, who blew a 5-0 lead. Starlin Castro had two hits and two RBIs in Chicago's fourth loss in five games.Roger Bernadina used his speed to set up Young's winning hit. He was hit by a pitch from Kevin Gregg (2-4) with one out, swiped second and raced home when Young's blooper landed in front of Schierholtz in right field.B.J. Rosenberg (1-0) pitched a scoreless inning for the win and Jonathan Papelbon got three outs for his 23rd save. Utley made a great diving stop and throw on Schierholtz's grounder to second to end the game.Philadelphia won for the third time in four games this season against last-place Chicago, but left fielder Domonic Brown had to leave early due to a sore right Achilles. The team said he's day to day.The Cubs built a 5-0 lead against Roy Halladay, putting Jeff Samardzija in position for his third consecutive victory. The right-hander was 2-0 with a 1.59 ERA in his previous two starts.Samardzija retired 11 in a row and was working on a two-hitter before Frandsen led off the sixth with a sinking liner that got past center fielder Junior Lake's diving attempt and rolled to the wall for a pinch-hit triple. That seemed to wake up the Phillies, who got right back in the game with a four-run rally.Young drove in Frandsen with a base hit to right, and Utley's big swing trimmed Chicago's lead to 5-3. Utley came home on Domonic Brown's groundout.Samardzija finally got out of the inning when Darin Ruf grounded into a double play, but he was unable to hold onto the lead. Frandsen lined an 0-1 pitch into the bleachers in left with two out in the seventh, tying it at 5.James Russell came on with two on and two out and got Utley to fly out to left, closing Samardzija's line. He gave up eight hits and walked two in his worst start since he lasted just 3 1-3 innings in a 12-1 loss at Philadelphia on Aug. 8.Chicago had a chance to go back in front in the bottom half, but Dioner Navarro was thrown out when he tried to score from second on Darnell McDonald's pinch-hit single. John Mayberry's throw from right field bounced several times and still beat the lumbering catcher to the plate, drawing groans from the crowd of 27,753.Halladay made his second start since he had right shoulder surgery in May. The two-time Cy Young Award winner pitched six effective innings in a 9-5 victory over Arizona on Sunday, but he struggled right from the beginning against the Cubs, perhaps bothered by the muggy conditions.Rizzo connected for his 21st homer in the first inning, and Halladay hit consecutive batters in the second. He threw a ball behind Lake at one point, drawing a stare from the rookie outfielder.Chicago used Halladay's wildness and a misplay by Bernardina to score three times in the fourth. After Schierholtz led off with his 20th homer, Bernardina lost Donnie Murphy's routine fly ball to center in the sun, letting it fall for a double. Brian Bogusevic then walked to put runners on first and second.Castro cashed in with two out, lining a two-run double into the gap in right-center to give the Cubs a 4-0 lead.Bogusevic added a run-scoring single on Halladay's final pitch of the game. The right-hander allowed five runs and seven hits with two walks while throwing only 77 pitches.NOTES: Philadelphia announced during the game that it had reached a $12 million, three-year contract with Cuban pitcher Miguel Alfredo Gonzalez. It includes an option for 2017, a signing bonus and performance bonuses. Gonzalez will report to Philly's spring training complex in Clearwater, Fla. ... Phillies 3B Cody Asche rested for the second straight day after he left Wednesday's 6-2 victory at the New York Mets with a cramp and a mild right hamstring strain. Sandberg said he's doing better and remains day to day. ... Cubs manager Dale Sveum said INF Luis Valbuena (right oblique strain) and OF Ryan Sweeney (broken rib) will be activated from the disabled list when the active rosters expand on Sunday. He declined to identify any other potential additions. ... Cubs RHP Scott Baker will make another rehab start for Class A Kane County on Monday. Baker is recovering from Tommy John surgery.
NORTON, Mass. — Sergio Garcia opened with five birdies in seven holes, closed with an eagle, and wound up as the guy everyone was chasing Saturday at the Deutsche Bank Championship.By everyone, that means 28 players within six shots of his lead with 36 holes to play.And somehow, that includes Phil Mickelson.On another day of soft conditions and plenty of birdies on the TPC Boston, Garcia had a 7-under 64 during a cool, cloudy morning that stood up for the 36-hole lead when the long and wild afternoon was over. The Spaniard was at 13-under 129, one short of the tournament record. He had a one-shot lead over Roberto Castro and Henrik Stenson.Tiger Woods, in the 1-2-3 grouping with Mickelson and Adam Scott that attracted a massive crowd standing three-deep in spots, made a 35-foot birdie putt on the 18th hole for a 67 and was among those within six shots of the lead.Mickelson, however, managed to steal the show with a 71.And this was no ordinary 71."I was playing terrible, and I shot even par," Mickelson said. "I could easily have shot myself out of the tournament. I got it in the hazard I don't know how many times. If I go on and play the way I believe I'm going to this weekend, I'm going to look back at those nine holes as the key to the entire tournament."Lefty went on some kind of crazy ride, completely losing his swing during one stretch when he looked closer to hitting Rhode Island than hitting a fairway. He drove left into the hazard on No. 9, way right into the hazard on No. 10 and would have found another hazard on the par-3 11th except for hitting a tree.He hit into the gallery to the left on No. 12 and into the gallery to the right on No. 13. His tee shot on the par-3 16th came up short and into the water for double bogey. Mickelson closed with two birdies for a 71 and was five shots behind."It's embarrassing to hit shots like that, and to have a bunch of people out there, playing with Tiger and having every shot exposed on TV ... you know, it's embarrassing," Mickelson said. "But we all have our moments like that. And you just have to deal with it."His recovery shot on the 11th was so good that Mickelson didn't bother explaining it. From a patchy lie, just inside 100 feet from the flag, the pin close to the edge, he took a full, hard swing with a wedge and hit it with so much spin that it rolled back to a few feet of the cup."To go ahead and try to play that shot with that much speed, and (he) didn't have a whole lot of room up there ... but he pulled it off," Woods said. "And then he was struggling through that little stretch there. But he held the round together, and had a nice finish at the end."Asked about the shot at No. 11, Mickelson replied, "I could describe it, but nobody is going to understand that. It was a really good shot."He later tried. He mentioned the angle of attack and the angle of the face on the wedge and the weight ... and then he gave up on the explanation."It's not a very high percentage shot," he said.And just think — the second event in the FedEx Cup playoffs is not even half over.Stenson often refers to tournaments as three-and-a-half days of a marathon just to get to the back nine for a chance to win. If that's the case, this is starting to feel like a marathon with a 4-minute mile pace.The cut was at 1-under 141, ending the season for some players who have no chance of being in the top 70 in the FedEx Cup to advance to the third playoff event in two weeks north of Chicago.Woods didn't feel as though he got much out of his round, and a radio reporter suggested he might be capable of a round lower than 65 if he puts it all together."There's going to have to be to get back into this thing," Woods said. "There's so many guys up there that are 9-under par or better. There's a ton of guys up there. It's going to take a couple of low rounds."Stenson had eight birdies and a clean card in his round of 63. Castro was 7 under for his round at the turn and had to settle for a 65 after a rough patch in the middle of his back nine. Matt Kuchar and PGA champion Jason Dufner each had 66 and were three shots behind. Justin Rose had a 63 and was another shot back, along with Jordan Spieth, who had a 66.Garcia is not a regular at the second FedEx Cup playoff event. He prefers to take this week off to rest, but he couldn't guarantee that he would be among the top 70 in the standings after the Deutsche Bank Championship who will advance to the third event.So far, it looks like a good move."Unfortunately, I didn't play well enough and it was touch-and-go if I was going to make the BMW without playing here," said Garcia, who is at No. 55. "Sixteen guys could easily pass me if they played well. So we decided to come here and make a little bit of an extra effort of playing five weeks in a row, which I don't usually enjoy very much."Garcia looked as if he would be much higher in the FedEx Cup standings earlier this year, when he had top 10s in a World Golf Championship, the Masters and The Players Championship. But his year took a bad turn off the course. During a two-week spat with Woods that began at The Players Championship, Garcia jokingly said during a Q-and-A at an awards dinner in London that he would invite Woods over during for dinner during the U.S. Open and serve fried chicken.He apologized the next day, though he was clearly rattled. Garcia hasn't finished in the top 20 since."Everything has been kind of a little difficult, but it's good," Garcia said. "It's been a good learning experience. So I think that you always have to try to take the positives out of all those things and learn from your mistakes. And hopefully, (they) make you a better player, a better person."
Ryan Dempster returned from his suspension for hitting Alex Rodriguez and pitched into the seventh inning to lead the Boston Red Sox over the visiting Chicago White Sox , 4-3, on Friday night for their fifth win in six games.David Ortiz snapped an 0-for-23 slump with a two-run single for Boston, which leads the American League East by three games over Tampa Bay. Dempster (7-9), suspended for five games, held Chicago hitless through the first four innings. He allowed three runs and five hits in six and a third innings. Koji Uehara struck out two in the ninth for his 15th save in 18 opportunities. He worked one and a third innings in his 20th straight scoreless appearance.PIRATES 5, CARDINALS 0 Garrett Jones hit his 100th career homer and drove in four runs as host Pittsburgh moved into a tie with St. Louis for the National League Central lead.Russell Martin added his 12th homer of the season. Francisco Liriano (15-7) allowed just two hits over eight innings, walking two and striking out six.BRAVES 2, MARLINS 1 Freddie Freeman hit a two-run homer in the first inning and Julio Teheran topped Jose Fernandez in a matchup of young right-handers as host Atlanta Braves won its fifth straight game. Fernandez (10-6) took his first loss since July 7 but allowed only one hit after Freeman's homer. He gave up three hits in six innings.PHILLIES 6, CUBS 5 Michael Young had four hits, including a tiebreaking single in the ninth inning, as Philadelphia rallied for a victory in Ryne Sandberg's return to Wrigley Field. Kevin Frandsen had two hits and scored two runs, and Chase Utley added a key two-run triple.Anthony Rizzo and Nate Schierholtz homered for the Cubs, who blew a 5-0 lead. Chicago lost its fourth game of the last five.BLUE JAYS 3, ROYALS 2 Mark Buehrle pitched seven shutout innings to win his sixth straight decision as host Toronto ended Kansas City's winning streak at five games.ANGELS 5, BREWERS 0 Jared Weaver pitched six scoreless innings and Grant Green hit a three-run double to lead visiting Los Angeles.TIGERS 7, INDIANS 2 Detroit beat visiting Cleveland in a game stopped after seven innings because of rain. Victor Martinez doubled twice and drove in two runs for the American League Central-leading Tigers. Miguel Cabrera was pulled from a second straight game, this time after two innings because of irritation in his abdominal area. He struck out in his only at-bat.PHILLIES SIGN CUBAN PITCHER The Phillies and the Cuban pitcher Miguel Alfredo Gonzalez agreed to a three-year contract for $12 million. General Manager Ruben Amaro announced the deal, which includes an option for 2017, a signing bonus and performance bonuses.
Martina Hingis smashed nearly a dozen backhand volleys for winners, traded deft short shots and jumped high to crush overheads in her return to the United States Open on Friday. But none of that mattered in a loss with her doubles partner, Daniela Hantuchova of Slovakia, against the Open's top-seeded doubles team, Sara Errani and Roberta Vinci of Italy.Nearly 3,000 fans packed Court 17 to watch the match, many clapping and cheering after Hingis's shots.But in a crucial moment, serving to pull her doubles partner into a crucial third set, Hingis double-faulted twice to lose the two final points of the match, resulting in a 6-3, 7-5 loss."My calf was killing me," Hingis said of her double faults. "I couldn't get up on my serve anymore."But there was another reason: nerves. "Not playing at a Grand Slam for six years doesn't really, you know, help either," she said.For most of the match, Hingis delivered a strong performance, often hitting the clutch shots that kept her and Hantuchova within striking distance. At 5-5 in the second set, Hingis hit five consecutive shots at near-point-blank range to force Errani into hitting wide. A seven-stroke rally between Errani and Hantuchova drew another wide shot by Errani.But Vinci and Errani, who rank No. 1 in the world, took the lead at 6-5.Shouts of "Come on, Martina!" filled the small stadium, and clapping began as Hingis stepped to the service line.On the first point, she charged the net and feathered a superb drop volley crosscourt to take a 15-0 lead. Then she hit a forehand into the net to make it 15-15; double-faulted to trail by 15-30; and, moments later, double-faulted twice to lose the match."I thought they did well," said Tony Duncan of Brattleboro, Vt., who said Hantuchova and Hingis were his two favorite players. "I just wished they played not the very best doubles team first."In a night mixed-doubles match that drew about 1,400 spectators, Hingis and Mahesh Bhupathi of India lost, 7-6 (5), 7-6 (5), to Yung-Jan Chan of Taiwan and Robert Lindstedt of Sweden."She's a genius on court," Lindstedt said of Hingis. "I've never had a girl who can control pace on the serve like she does."Hingis responded: "I like the compliment. I still didn't like his kick serve up there. Felt like I need a ladder to get up there."Hingis, 32, who plans to play in tournaments in Tokyo and Beijing in the coming months, said, "It would help to win some matches for confidence, I guess, especially those big points."She added: "Some of the shots I feel like, you know, I haven't been away, but there's some things really, the game has improved. Not patterns, but it's faster."Hingis has won five Grand Slam singles titles along with nine major doubles titles. In 1998, she won all four doubles titles in the calendar year. Hingis first retired in 2003 because of foot and ankle injuries. She returned to competition sporadically in later years but retired again in 2007 after losing in the third round of the United States Open.Hingis's afternoon match Friday drew long lines of spectators as the sun was setting."She was fun to watch when she played," Shauna Eiffef of Chicago said before the match. "I expect her to win. Errani and Vinci are No. 1, but it's kind of fun to see the underdog."Joseph O'Connor of Providence, R.I., added, "She's coming back in a serious way; that's why we're all waiting here to get a seat."
Johnson has struggled for much of the season, yet the Orioles, fighting for survival in a tight American League wild-card race, continue to rely on him with games on the line. Johnson has compiled an American League-leading 41 saves, becoming a prime example of the save statistic's flaws.The roots of the problem can be traced to 1960. Holtzman, a sportswriter in Chicago, was trying to prove the flaws inherent in another statistic: wins.Holtzman wanted to demonstrate for readers that Roy Face, a Pittsburgh reliever who won 18 games in 1959, was actually less effective in that heavily publicized season than he was in 1958, when he won only five games.Borrowing a seldom-used term, the save, which at the time was awarded to any relief pitcher who got the final out in a victory, Holtzman redefined it for The Sporting News to resemble the way it is used now. By Holtzman's count, Face saved 20 games in 1958 but only 10 in 1959.Unfortunately for Holtzman, who was renowned in the business and who went on to become baseball's official historian, the save statistic has proved every bit as problematic as wins, with Johnson's numbers creating one of the bigger arguments against its validity.If saves are removed from the equation, Johnson becomes something less than spectacular. Through Thursday, his adjusted earned run average, which takes into account a pitcher's league and home park, was 97th in the majors among pitchers with 50 or more innings. Johnson had allowed an overall batting average of .276, which was 216th best among pitchers. He had also allowed the 11th-most base runners of any full-time reliever.In terms of a modern metric like wins above replacement, Johnson was more effective in 2011, the year before he became a full-time closer, than he has been in either of the last two seasons despite his major-league-leading 92 saves. As his salary has increased, along with his profile, Johnson's WAR has gone from 2.7 to 2.4 to 0.6. He has nine blown saves and seven losses this season, and one of his three wins came after a blown save.On the basis of his prodigious save totals, though, he is likely to receive a hefty raise for next season, his last year of arbitration.Baltimore's bullpen in general has struggled, one year after being one of the team's primary strengths. It has blown an American League-leading 22 saves.The two bright spots have been Darren O'Day and Tommy Hunter, who have surpassed Johnson in terms of effectiveness. Yet Johnson, carrying the label of closer, continues to get the plush assignment of pitching to start the ninth inning. On Thursday he came through, protecting a one-run lead against Boston.On Friday at Yankee Stadium, the Orioles began a three-game series that could greatly affect their postseason chances.With the redefined save statistic, the flaw that Holtzman could not see coming was that it would lead managers to pick a reliever — not always the best reliever — and have him pitch almost always in save situations. It creates a self-sustaining cycle in which a pitcher is rarely asked to pitch in difficult situations and often piles up saves regardless of how well he is performing.In 61 games this season, Johnson has been asked to pitch more than one inning just once and has entered with a lead 52 times. All of his blown saves were his own creation: he was not asked to deal with an inherited runner in any of the nine games in which he gave away the lead. In all, he has dealt with only 11 inherited runners and allowed four of them to score.Compare Johnson's season with that of the far less known Paco Rodriguez of the Los Angeles Dodgers. Rodriguez, earning a salary roughly 7.6 percent of Johnson's, had inherited a major-league-leading 61 runners through Thursday's games. He let only 14 of them score, a percentage that easily trumped Johnson's. Along the way, Rodriguez outperformed Johnson in adjusted E.R.A., WAR and virtually every other meaningful statistic.For his deft maneuvering in a continual high-wire act, Rodriguez had been awarded two saves.It would be ridiculous to suggest that teams do not benefit from having an ace reliever. Anyone who has watched the Yankees in the postseason over the last two decades understands the value of Mariano Rivera. But Rivera's value has been measured not only by his save totals but also by his overall ability to shut down the other team in any given situation.With Johnson, there is little to point to other than a high number of saves, which in his case is misleading.
By August 1968, the dream described so eloquently by the Rev. Dr. Martin Luther King Jr. five years earlier had been punctured.Dr. King, our prince of peace, had been murdered in April, Robert F. Kennedy in June. When I left Chicago that summer to begin my college football career at Morgan State in Baltimore, the Democratic National Convention was about to get under way. In the wake of the madness that surrounded us, including the war in Vietnam, the draft and widespread poverty, many of us — black and white, young and idealistic — were being guided by Malcolm X when he said in a speech, "We don't see any American dream; we've experienced only the American nightmare."For me, a 17-year-old freshman, social upheaval was trumped by the anticipation of participating in a huge football game that September: Morgan State vs. Grambling, at Yankee Stadium.This would be a game for the ages in black college football, and we knew it. Our coach, Earl Banks, made sure we knew it. Eddie Robinson made sure his Grambling players knew it, too. Years later, Frank Lewis, Grambling's wing back then and later a star with the Pittsburgh Steelers and the Buffalo Bills, said, "I didn't focus on the city and the stadium, just that two black universities had sold out that stadium."Morgan was undefeated in three consecutive seasons, and it had not lost since the final game of the 1964 season. Grambling and Morgan State had been crowned black national co-champions by The Pittsburgh Courier the previous year. Morgan won the game in New York, 9-7.At West Point on Friday night, Morgan State will open its new season with a game against Army. It will be the first time Army has played one of the nation's historically black colleges in football, and the stakes are as different as the times.Morgan State and Army are coming off losing seasons, and neither program is what it once was. Army was a powerhouse in the 1940s and '50s, when it produced three Heisman Trophy winners. Morgan, a power in the 1960s, produced three members of the Pro Football Hall of Fame. One of them, Willie Lanier, will be at Michie Stadium on Friday.In 1968, Morgan vs. Grambling was a big game because of the coaches leading the teams and because the programs were known for attracting some of the country's best talent and sending it on to the N.F.L. Now, in an era when football at historically black colleges and at Army is sometimes an afterthought, Morgan's trip north is important for different reasons.The arc from 1968 to 2013 is populated by drastic change, positive and negative. In the 1960s, football was king at Morgan, especially when the team brought positive attention to other parts of the college. In 2013, Morgan, like many universities, is reassessing the role of intercollegiate athletics on campus, especially costly programs like football."Morgan-Army is important because of the intersection of the academic missions of the two institutions," David Wilson, the Morgan president, said, mentioning his university's engineering program as a point of pride. "Today it is less about the football competitiveness between Army and Morgan than it was about football competitiveness in 1968 between Morgan and Grambling."Back then, football programs were glamorous centerpieces at historically black colleges, a result of the rigid segregation patterns and quotas that either excluded or limited the presence of black athletes at larger universities."H.B.C.U.'s had the best talent, and those programs were winning," Wilson said. "Enthusiasm was off the charts. You could see it at homecoming, when thousands of alumni would come back. It was nirvana."The push for equal and open access resulted in wider opportunities for some, but it has devastated black college football and raised the question of who, ultimately, was the big winner in the integration sweepstakes.Integration opened opportunities for first- and second-tier black football and basketball players to attend predominately white programs, which had long been closed to them. But at a time of a widening gap between rich and poor, and shrinking opportunities, Wilson said the role of historically black colleges and universities like Morgan in challenging elite students and finding diamonds in the rough was more important than ever. He should know; he was one of those diamonds.At the time of the Morgan-Grambling game in 1968, Wilson was 13 and living in rural McKinley, Ala.
(Reuters) - The Stanley Cup champion Chicago Blackhawks have agreed to a six-year contract extension with goaltender Corey Crawford, the National Hockey League team said on Monday.Crawford, 28, went 16-7 with a league-best 1.84 goals-against average during the 2013 postseason to help the Blackhawks clinch their second Stanley Cup title in four seasons.He registered a 19-5-5 record with three shutouts, a 1.94 goals-against average and a .926 save percentage in 30 regular-season appearances last season for Chicago.Selected by the Blackhawks in the second round of the 2003 draft, Crawford has gone 83-43-19 with eight shutouts, a 2.40 goals-against average and a .913 save percentage in 152 career games for the team.
CHICAGO — Corey Crawford is having one great summer.First, he was in net when the Chicago Blackhawks stormed to their second NHL title in four seasons. Then he welcomed the Stanley Cup to his hometown of Montreal on Monday, and joined the team for the announcement of a six-year contract extension that officially stamps his arrival as one of the league's top goaltenders."It's amazing," said Crawford, who recently got engaged and is in the mix to play for Canada in next year's Winter Olympics. "I want to be in Chicago for my whole career and so this is amazing to be able to do this and get this deal done."Crawford went 16-7 with an NHL-best 1.84 goals-against average while starting every playoff game for Chicago this year. The breakout performance came after he went 19-5 with three shutouts in the regular season, helping the Blackhawks to the best record in the league.The extension is reportedly worth $36 million and runs through the 2019-20 season. Coupled with the upcoming megadeals for captain Jonathan Toews and Conn Smythe Trophy winner Patrick Kane, general manager Stan Bowman could be looking at a sticky salary-cap issue in the coming years, but he didn't sound too concerned while announcing the contract for Crawford."A lot changes year to year. We don't have all the knowledge of where the cap will be in two years or three years, but the one thing I do know is we're going to have a great goaltender," Bowman said. "That's why this was an easy decision for us."The 28-year-old Crawford was selected by Chicago in the second round of the 2003 draft. Crawford, who made his NHL debut in January 2006, is 83-43 with eight shutouts, a 2.40 goals-against average and a .913 save percentage in 152 career games with the Blackhawks.He was thought to be on shaky ground after Chicago was eliminated by Phoenix in the first round of the 2012 playoffs, but there are no such questions now. He stepped up repeatedly in this year's run to the title, including a 51-save performance in a 4-3 triple-overtime victory over Boston in Game 1 of the Stanley Cup finals.The Blackhawks open training camp for next season on Sept. 12 at Notre Dame, and Crawford said he's hungry for more success."The last couple months have been great, but I said it before at one point, you've just got to shut it all off and go back to work," he said. "I'm looking forward to that, too."
NEW YORK — Derek Jeter ended a slump with two hits and two RBIs, Alex Rodriguez reached base twice in an eight-run fourth inning and the New York Yankees battered the Chicago White Sox 9-1 on Monday in a game interrupted nearly two hours by rain.A day after giving up seven runs in the seventh inning in a loss to wild card-rival Baltimore, the Yankees rocked reliever Dylan Axelrod and took advantage of the sloppy White Sox for their most productive inning since Oct. 1 to help end a six-game skid against Chicago.With thunder clapping in the first inning, Jeter had a run-scoring single off Jose Quintana (7-5) to stop an 0-for-14 slide. The Yankees bats then made all the noise after a 1-hour, 53-minute delay.Alfonso Soriano, Mark Reynolds Austin Romine, Vernon Wells, Brett Gardner and Jeter all drove in runs during the fourth-inning barrage to make it easy on David Huff (2-0), who entered for Phil Hughes with one out in the second when play resumed.The Yankees looked as if they were eager to wipe out the memory of a sweep at the reeling White Sox from Aug. 5-7. New York, which entered Monday 3½ back for the second AL wild card, follows this series with 11 straight games against East rivals Boston and Baltimore.Chicago ended a 10-game losing streak with the win Aug. 5 — the night of A-Rod's season debut — and then went on a nice run for the AL Central's last place team, going 16-7 until being swept by Boston last weekend. Paul Konerko hit his 432nd homer for the White Sox, passing Cal Ripken to take sole possession of 44th place on the home run list.Rodriguez led off the fourth with an opposite-field double to right. The next six batters reached — and five runs scored — before Robinson Cano popped to second base for the first out.The Yankees had help in running up their biggest inning since scoring nine against Boston during the final weekend of the regular season.Wells followed with a one-hop single that Axelrod deflected with his glove, allowing Wells to reach. Granderson walked on a full-count pitch and Reynolds then hit a sharp grounder that diving third baseman Conor Gillaspie fielded only to have the ball squirt out of his glove. A-Rod scored and Reynolds had a hit.Romine laced a two-run single to center field that made it 4-0, Gardner had an RBI double to right and Jeter slapped a ball up the middle that hit Axelrod and bounced away for another fortunate hit, and another run. After Cano popped to second base, Rodriguez popped a ball directly behind home plate that catcher Josh Phegley dropped for an error. With a second chance, Rodriguez walked to load the bases.Jake Petricka relieved and didn't get much help from his defense, either.Wells grounded to first baseman Adam Dunn, who went for the force at second but was off-target with his throw for an error as two runs scored to make it 9-0. Granderson and Reynolds, the 12th and 13th batters off the inning, each grounded into fielder's choices.Axelrod gave up eight runs — six earned — and eight hits in 2 1-3 innings. Huff gave up a run and five hits.NOTES: White Sox C Tyler Flowers will have surgery Thursday on his right shoulder. The operation will determine whether his labrum is damaged. Recovery time should take three to six months. ... Chicago pushed back LHP Hector Santiago's next start back a day to Thursday. The starter for Wednesday's series finale in New York is being listed as TBA but could be top prospect Erik Johnson, an RHP. ... Yankees LHP Cesar Cabral made his big league debut and got a souvenir with his first strikeout — the ball was taken out of play. He pitched a scoreless eighth. ... J.R. Murphy singled in his big league debut, a pinch-hit appearance in the eighth. Murphy became the 52nd player used by the Yankees, breaking the team mark set in 2005 and tied in 2008.
NEW YORK — Down by three against an All-Star pitcher who's had their number in the past, the New York Yankees put together a vintage comeback that kept them on track in the playoff chase.Eduardo Nunez's two-run double capped a five-run eighth inning that rallied New York past the Chicago White Sox 6-4 on Tuesday night for its 12th victory in 14 home games.Derek Jeter got the Yankees started — just like old times — and pinch-hitter Curtis Granderson tied the score with an RBI single. New York, which began the day 2½ games out of an AL wild-card spot, has won 16 of 23 overall."It's a great win for us," manager Joe Girardi said. "We're trying to gain ground on teams, and every game is important."Alexei Ramirez hit a two-run triple and Alejandro De Aza homered to build a three-run lead for ace Chris Sale, but the last-place White Sox couldn't hold it. They dropped their fifth straight to start a 10-game trip against AL East contenders.Sale was cruising along with a 4-1 cushion until Jeter singled with one out in the eighth. Robinson Cano drove a 1-2 pitch off the left-field fence for a double — the third extra-base hit off Sale by a left-handed batter all season."Just left a bad pitch to a great hitter and that's what happens," Sale said. "I'm honestly lucky that the ball didn't leave the park, as hard as he hit it."That got the crowd back in it and took Sale out of the game — which was great news for the Yankees. The left-hander entered 2-0 with a 0.49 ERA and 24 strikeouts in two career starts against them, and was working on another gem until the eighth.Alfonso Soriano grounded an 0-2 delivery from Nate Jones (4-5) up the middle for a two-run single that cut it to 4-3. Alex Rodriguez's single put runners at the corners, and Granderson lined a tying single off left-hander Donnie Veal."I think the big thing was, let's just see if we can get a couple on and go from there," Granderson said. "Things just slowly started to chip away, and we were able to get Nunez up there to get a big hit and put us on top."Mark Reynolds struck out before Nunez roped a double off Matt Lindstrom into the left-field corner, putting New York ahead 6-4 in a half-inning that lasted 32 minutes."It was a 95 mph two-seam fastball that was 3 inches off the inside corner. I don't know how he kept it fair. He swung the bat vertically," Lindstrom said. "I don't know if they were picking up our signs or what. ... It didn't go our way to say the least, but I made my pitch and it makes you wonder sometimes."Four of New York's six hits in the inning came from players who spent long stretches on the disabled list this season: Jeter, Rodriguez, Granderson and Nunez.Boone Logan (5-2) pitched a perfect eighth, and Mariano Rivera struck out two of his three batters to reach 40 saves for the ninth time. That ties Trevor Hoffman for the major league record.Jeter had two hits, giving him 3,315 to move ahead of Eddie Collins (3,313) for ninth on the career list."It's pretty amazing what he's accomplished," Girardi said.De Aza hit his 15th homer in the seventh, making it 4-1 and chasing Hiroki Kuroda.The 38-year-old righty, who had been hit hard in three straight losses on the road, gave up seven hits in 6 1-3 innings against the American League's lowest-scoring team. He struck out seven and walked two.Gordon Beckham doubled in the first inning and scored on Adam Dunn's single. Chicago was set up with the bases loaded and one out, but Kuroda fanned Avisail Garcia and got Conor Gillaspie to chase a full-count fastball that was up around his eyes.New York tied it with an unearned run in the second after a pair of White Sox errors.Vernon Wells reached on an infield single and scored on the front end of a double steal. With runners at the corners and two outs, Nunez took off for second and stopped in the middle of the basepath when catcher Josh Phegley threw down.Wells slid in feet first ahead of a wide return throw from Beckham.NOTES: After the game, Girardi said struggling RHP Phil Hughes will be moved to the bullpen. LHP David Huff will start Saturday against Boston. ... White Sox RHP Erik Johnson will start Wednesday night at Yankee Stadium, his major league debut. CC Sabathia (12-11, 4.91 ERA) pitches for New York. ... Jeter was hit by a pitch in the lower left leg his first time up but waved off trainer Steve Donohue. ... Granderson and Ichiro Suzuki were rested against Sale. Coming into the game, he had held left-handed hitters to a .140 average with 42 strikeouts in 129 at-bats this season.
LOS ANGELES — Presidents Cup captains Fred Couples and Nick Price face very different challenges as they mull over the various options for their two wild card picks to be announced on Wednesday for the biennial team competition.While U.S. captain Couples is spoiled for choice with an impressive array of former major winners and emerging talent, his International counterpart Price is likely to opt for form given the relative lack of experience among his candidates.The top-10 players in the Cup points standings automatically earned selection after the Deutsche Bank Championship finished in Norton, Massachusetts on Monday, leaving Couples and Price to round out their 12-man lineups with their additional picks.Webb Simpson (11th), Dustin Johnson (12th), Jim Furyk (13th) and Bubba Watson (14th) narrowly missed out on gaining automatic places on the U.S. team and Couples will be looking closely at that quartet, with red-hot Jordan Spieth also in the frame.Though PGA Tour rookie Spieth finished 22nd in the final standings, he had no status on the U.S. circuit before this season and has certainly captured Couples' attention with a sizzling run of form over the past two months.The 20-year-old won his maiden PGA Tour title at the John Deere Classic in July, lost out in a playoff for last month's Wyndham Championship and rocketed into a tie for fourth at the Deutsche Bank Championship after closing with a superb 62.However, Couples has only two captain's pick available to him for the October 3-6 Presidents Cup and former major winners Simpson, Furyk and Watson all boast impressive credentials, as does big-hitting Johnson, a seven-times winner on the PGA Tour."We have guys on the outside that are top players," Couples told reporters after the automatic top-10 spots on his team had been finalized following the Deutsche Bank Championship."We have two picks and we have four guys that we are looking at really, really hard."Asked to give more detail on which four players were being scrutinized, Couples replied: "It would be, you know, Webb who got bumped out (of the top 10), and then it would be the next guy is Dustin Johnson and the next guy would be Jim Furyk."And then Jordan Spieth who, I don't know if I'm going on a limb, probably has had as good or better a year than those guys. Those were the four guys. It's pretty obvious."While Couples has to wrestle with the possibility of omitting 2012 Masters champion Watson from his 12-man lineup to take on the Internationals in Dublin, Ohio, Price is casting his eye mainly on in-form players for his two wild card selections."I'm going to look at potential match-ups, who is going to play with who and who I think would be best suited to play with who," said Zimbabwean Price, a former world number one and three-times major winner."Those two picks are going to be a huge part of that decision as to who I think will complement the team for all. I'm down to five, maybe six guys at the most, but I'm going to be looking at the guys who are in form harder than the other guys."Price already has five Presidents Cup rookies on his International team and that number could rise to seven once his two captain's picks are announced.His selections are almost certain to come from Thailand's Thongchai Jaidee, Australian Marc Leishman, South African Tim Clark, Zimbabwe's Brendon de Jonge and South African George Coetzee, and only Clark has previously played in the Cup."I'm very happy with our team," said Price, a veteran of five Presidents Cups as a player. "It's a team made up of quite a few rookies, but what they lack in experience I think they will make up for with enthusiasm."We have potentially six or seven rookies on our team; do we go for the experienced guys, or go for the youth and inexperience?"Price then went on to enthuse over how well both Leishman and de Jonge had played at the Deutsche Bank Championship, where they finished respectively joint 16th and tied for ninth.If Price wants form players, then he needs to look no further. Leishman and de Jonge have both qualified for the elite 70-man field at next week's BMW Championship outside Chicago, the penultimate event in the PGA Tour's FedExCup playoffs.
NORTON, Mass. — Henrik Stenson didn't need a big trophy to prove himself that he belonged among the elite in golf.After enduring the second slump of his career — the latest a product of bad play more than a lost swing — he began to turn the corner late last year by winning the South African Open. He was back in all the majors again for the first time since 2010. And he was playing better than anyone in the summer.A runner-up to Phil Mickelson in the British Open and to Tiger Woods in a World Golf Championship. A tie for third in the PGA Championship.The 37-year-old Swede broke through on Labor Day with his best performance of the year to win the Deutsche Bank Championship."It's been long, hard work getting back to this place," Stenson said. "Playing as well as I've done in these last couple of months, there's no magic, no quick fix. It's just hard work. It's been a good four months, and I hope I can keep it going."He started the final round two shots behind Sergio Garcia, surged ahead with three straight birdies, came out even sharper after a two-hour rain delay, and put away Steve Stricker by holing a bunker shot on the 17th hole.Stenson closed with a 5-under 66 for a two-shot victory over Stricker. He didn't refer to it so much as validation as "icing on the cake.""I was longing for a win, and I got it," said Stenson, who tied a tournament record at 22-under 262 on the rain-softened TPC Boston.He wasn't the only guy who felt like a winner, nor was he the only player who felt the nerves.The Deutsche Bank Championship, the second of four FedEx Cup playoff events, had a little something for everyone on a wild and rainy Monday. It starts with Stenson, who moved to No. 1 in the FedEx Cup and is assured a clear shot at the $10 million prize at the Tour Championship.Coming out of the rain delay, the focus shifted to the top 70 players in the FedEx Cup standings who would advance to the third playoff event at Conway Farms north of Chicago in two weeks.Brendan Steele thought his season was over until he birdied his last four holes, the last one with a 2-iron onto the green at the par-5 18th. Steele knew his only chance was to tie with Ernie Els — he was three points ahead in the standings going into the weeks — and they were in the same group."I did everything that I can do, especially on a day that wasn't going my way for a long time," Steele said.Els made par on the 18th and both finished at 12-under 272. Els figured he would be the odd man out with so many players still on the golf course, all of whom in position to drop him lower in the standings."It feels like I just missed the cut," Els said when he finished.But the Big Easy was given a big reprieve. K.J. Choi made a bogey on the par-5 18th. Charley Hoffman made bogey on the 17th. Kevin Chappell missed an 8-foot birdie putt on the last hole. That combination was enough for Els to grab the 70th spot by a fraction of a point.Stricker's third runner-up finish this year allowed him to move into the top 10 and qualify for the Presidents Cup team, despite playing a part-time schedule. That put the 10th spot up for grabs between Webb Simpson and Zach Johnson, who were playing together on the other side of the course.They were tied at 8 under — big advantage to Simpson — until the former U.S. Open champion dropped two shots on the last four holes. Johnson faced a 25-foot birdie putt on his last hole that determined whether he made the team, and he poured it in the middle.Johnson last week gave up a chance to earn points by skipping The Barclays to be in his brother's wedding.Lost in all this commotion was Jordan Spieth, the 20-year-old Texan dressed in a shirt with the Dallas Cowboys' silver-and-blue colors. He went birdie-birdie-birdie-eagle at the end of his round for a 62 right before the rain delay.With such soft conditions, his 17-under 267 was never going to hold up. Spieth wound up tied for fourth, and is No. 10 in the FedEx Cup standings. He is assured of becoming the first player since Woods in 1996 to start a season with no status and reach the Tour Championship. Woods, however, did it in seven tournaments.Whether it was enough to make the Presidents Cup as a captain's pick won't be decided until Fred Couples announces his selections on Wednesday.Stenson's win was only part of the high drama Monday, so much that Woods became an afterthought. He closed with a 73 and tied for 65th. The best image of him all day was walking back out to the course after a rain delay with he and his 6-year-old daughter dressed in matching red.All that mattered to Stenson was the trophy.It looked like it might go down to the last hole when Stricker, two shots behind, reached the par-5 18th in two and faced a long eagle putt. Behind him, Stenson finally blinked and pulled his approach into a bunker on the 17th.Right when the tournament was in doubt, Stenson holed the bunker shot to effectively wrap up the win. Stricker could hear the roar."I just kind of rolled my eyes," Stricker said. "But I told my caddie that he's been knocking at the door for a couple of months. And he's been playing some great golf. ... Good for him. Great shot. Like I say, he's been knocking at the door for quite some time and finally got his win."Stenson got his win. Stricker made the Presidents Cup team. Els got a reprieve.Garcia, meanwhile, fell to 3-8 when having at least a share of the 54-hole lead on the PGA Tour. He closed with a 73 and tied for fourth.Stenson was outside the top 200 in the world at the start of last season, and this win took him up to No. 6 — almost where he was when he captured the Match Play Championship six years ago. Back where to he felt like he belonged the whole time.
Labor Day typically makes for a nice line of demarcation to signal the end of summer (for beachgoers) and the start of the most serious phase of the postseason hunt (for baseball players).In New York, it rained. The Yankees did not need the calendar or the cloud cover to remind them that the sun will quickly set on their season if they do not win games. But the reinforcement never hurts.Neither does an eight-run, error-aided inning, like the one that helped the Yankees to a runaway win over the last-place Chicago White Sox, 9-1, at Yankee Stadium on Monday. The Yankees welcomed the chance to coast to a drama-less victory, understanding that such opportunities will not come around often."This time of year you want to get some games like this," Manager Joe Girardi said. "You can not use some guys in the bullpen and you can get some guys out a little bit early and maybe get them some rest. But you just want to keep tacking on runs, and that's what they did."The outburst came in the fourth inning, after a rain delay of 1 hour 53 minutes in the second knocked out both starters, Phil Hughes for the Yankees and Jose Quintana for the White Sox. Quintana's replacement, Dylan Axelrod, imploded, allowing the first seven batters in the fourth to reach base. Mark Reynolds, Austin Romine, Brett Gardner, Derek Jeter and Alfonso Soriano drove in runs with base hits.The inning reached almost comical levels when Alex Rodriguez skied a foul pop-up straight up behind home plate and catcher Josh Phegley dropped it. Rodriguez wound up walking.The Yankees added another run on an error by first baseman Adam Dunn, who threw a potential double-play ball into left field. By then, the score was 9-0, and White Sox Manager Robin Ventura looked understandably steamed.The cushion helped Yankees reliever David Huff, but he pitched as if he did not need it. As the delay eclipsed 90 minutes, Girardi tabbed Huff to replace Hughes — a move that would have been applauded in some fan circles if it had happened in the Yankees' rotation.Hughes has a short leash in the Yankees' rotation; heading into the game, he had a 5.64 earned run average and an 0-6 record in his last nine starts. But Girardi has steadfastly supported him, almost to a fault. He shuffled the rotation this weekend to allow Hughes to face Chicago, a team he has pitched well against throughout his career.In the end, nature intervened. Hughes's day was cut short and Huff's performance — five and two-third innings, five hits and one run — only raised more questions about Huff's future role."He did a really nice job," Girardi said. "He's pitched well for us. Those are big innings for us. We didn't have to use like four or five guys in the bullpen, and that helps."Girardi said he had yet not made a decision regarding the rotation, and at the moment Hughes would still be lined up to face the Boston Red Sox on Saturday. Huff said he has not broached the subject of starting with Girardi."I know my role right now is being in the bullpen," he said. "I'm going to keep being ready."The Yankees (73-64) are two and a half games behind the Tampa Bay Rays for the second American League wild-card spot. They trail the Baltimore Orioles by a half-game and lead the Cleveland Indians by a game in a muddled race that only promises to get more complex as the month unfolds.Girardi said the Yankees are undoubtedly playing better than they were when they were swept by the White Sox in Chicago a month ago, a series that is perhaps better remembered for Rodriguez's return to the lineup — and all the fuss that came with it.But since then, the Yankees have won 16 of 24 games, with recent additions like Rodriguez, Soriano, Reynolds and Curtis Granderson playing key roles.Monday's game also represented a positive step forward for Jeter, who ended an 0-for-14 skid with a run-scoring single in the first inning. After hustling to second base when left fielder Alejandro De Aza bobbled the ball, Jeter scampered to third on a flyout by Robinson Cano.Jeter was peppered with questions after the game about how he felt after all that running, a query to be expected after the snake-bitten season he has had so far. He smiled and shrugged and said that this was not a time to play cautiously."I don't really have a choice," Jeter said. "We only have 20-something games to go. Our job is to go out and win as many games as possible. It's hard to play games when you're thinking about not trying to hurt yourself."Jeter's single in the fourth was his 3,313th hit, tying him with Eddie Collins for ninth on the career list.Catcher J. R. Murphy made his major league debut for the Yankees, pinch-hitting in the eighth. Murphy, 22, reached base on an infield single. He became the 52nd Yankee used this season, setting a franchise record.
Yankees Manager Joe Girardi reasoned Tuesday that during the course of a season there are games that teams lose in painful fashion and others that they win that perhaps they should not have.These things even themselves out, Girardi said, which was why he had not dwelled too much on Sunday's loss to the Baltimore Orioles — when the Yankees' bullpen imploded in the seventh inning — even though the game seemed to have added significance with the season dwindling and the team's playoff chances hinging on almost every pitch.On Tuesday night, the Yankees had been stymied for most of the night by Chris Sale, the Chicago White Sox's stick-figured ace, and appeared headed for defeat. But then the Yankees put together a five-run comeback in the eighth inning to defeat the White Sox, 6-4, in a game they appeared close to squandering.With the win, the Yankees jumped ahead of the Baltimore Orioles and now stand directly behind the Tampa Bay Rays in the race for the American League's second wild-card spot. They entered Tuesday two and a half games back of the Rays, who played the Los Angeles Angels on Tuesday night in Anaheim, Calif."It's a great win for us," Girardi said. "You think about what we're fighting to do, trying to gain ground, every game is important."Sale held a 4-1 lead with one out in the eighth — the Yankees' lone run to that point coming on a delayed steal of home, an indication Girardi sensed his team would struggle to score against Sale — before stumbling. After he struck out Brett Gardner, Sale allowed a single to Derek Jeter and a double to Robinson Cano before Manager Robin Ventura pulled Sale in favor of Nate Jones.Almost immediately, the attitude in the Yankees' dugout changed. "It was good to see him leave," Girardi said of Sale.The first batter Jones faced, Alfonso Soriano, singled to drive in Jeter and Cano to narrow the gap to 4-3. Alex Rodriguez followed with another single, putting runners at the corners.Ventura came out for another switch, this time bringing in the left-handed reliever Donnie Veal to face the pinch-hitter Curtis Granderson. The move did not work as Granderson poked a run-scoring single to shallow center to tie the score at 4-4.After Veal struck out Mark Reynolds, Ventura made a third trip to the mound in the inning to bring in Matt Lindstrom to face Eduardo Nunez. Lindstrom gave up a two-run double to Nunez that pushed the Yankees ahead, 6-4.As he stood on second base, Nunez raised his hands and pounded his chest. It has been a difficult season for Nunez, who spent almost two months on the disabled list with an abdominal strain."It was important for all of us," Nunez said when asked what the moment had meant to him. "Every day is like the playoffs for us. Today was an important step. But now that this game has passed we need to start looking at taking another step tomorrow."Mariano Rivera pitched a 1-2-3 ninth to seal the win and earn his 40th save.The Yankees tied the score, 1-1, in the second when Vernon Wells singled and advanced to second on an error by Gordon Beckham. He moved to third when third baseman Conor Gillaspie flubbed Nunez's grounder. The Yankees then scored on a bit of trickery. With Chris Stewart at the plate, Nunez took off for second base. Catcher Josh Phegley threw to second base. As soon as the throw was made, Wells rushed toward home plate. The throw back to the plate was not in time, and the Yankees had perfectly executed a delayed steal of home.But Hiroki Kuroda's outing — six and a third innings, four runs — was troubling. It was the fourth consecutive start in which he had allowed four or more runs, pushing his earned run average, which once led the league, to 2.99. Kuroda's E.R.A. has not been above 3.00 since his second start of the year on April 8.There are no indications that he is injured, but even Girardi has admitted that perhaps the 38-year-old Kuroda is fatigued.To keep Kuroda strong, the Yankees had him skip his scheduled bullpen session in between his starts. Their day off Aug. 29 also allowed him an extra day of rest."I don't really think about it," Kuroda said through an interpreter when asked if he was tired. "I pitched through a whole season last year."During the week, the pitching coach Larry Rothschild suggested to Kuroda that he should change his arm angle. Kuroda did, and Girardi said he saw some positives on Tuesday, despite the scoreline."For me, it's most important that the team won in a game that I pitched," Kuroda said.It was a win that the Yankees and Kuroda, who avoided a fourth consecutive loss, were fortunate to escape with.Joe Girardi said that David Huff would start on Saturday against the Boston Red Sox, taking Phil Hughes's spot. ... With an infield single in the third, Derek Jeter collected his 3,314 hit, which moved him ahead of Eddie Collins for ninth on the career list. ... Mariano Rivera reiterated his decision to retire after the season. Rivera's status became an issue after ESPN New York reported that Girardi planned to speak to Rivera after the season to try to change his mind.
A series against the Chicago White Sox , sandwiched between games against playoff contenders, was to serve as a bit of a breather for the Yankees. The White Sox, with nothing to play for but a better draft pick, cannot hit, pitch or field very well these days, so an unexpected stumble by the Yankees in these three games could have proved catastrophic at a time when every game matters.But as expected, the Yankees, behind C. C. Sabathia's best outing in nearly three months, disposed of the White Sox, 6-5, on Wednesday to complete a three-game sweep.It was not always easy, with a four-run rally in the eighth by Chicago livening up what had been a blowout. But the Yankees got a four-out save from Mariano Rivera and will happily move on after the win.Now that the task of pushing aside the White Sox is complete, the Yankees can concentrate on the next 11 games, which will go a long way in deciding whether they make the playoffs.On Thursday, the Yankees begin a four-game home series against the American League East-leading Boston Red Sox. Afterward, the Yankees will travel to Baltimore to face the Orioles in another four-game series before wrapping up the critical run with three games in Boston."It could determine a lot of where we're going to be at," Yankees Manager Joe Girardi said. "You're playing teams in the division and teams right next to you or ahead of you in the standings. It's real important."It is a treacherous stretch of games, but luckily for the Yankees, they are playing some of their best baseball of the season: they have won five of six games in this homestand. Perhaps most encouraging Wednesday night was Sabathia's performance (seven and one-third innings, three runs). It was the first time he had pitched more than seven innings since Aug. 7."I feel good about the game," Sabathia said. "Early in the year, when my command was off, things would get out of hand."Sabathia entered the game with a 4.91 earned run average, even higher than Phil Hughes's 4.86, which got him demoted from the rotation. Obviously, the Yankees were never going to consider taking Sabathia, their high-priced ace, out of the rotation. The Yankees simply hoped he would pitch better.He did so on Wednesday.The Yankees' bullpen remained quiet after Sabathia finished the seventh having thrown 99 pitches. Five days earlier, Girardi, feeling a game slipping away against the Orioles, had removed Sabathia in the sixth. Girardi's early appearance that night, after Sabathia had thrown only 86 pitches, surprised Sabathia, but even he had to admit that his performances this season had hardly merited much confidence from his manager.Perhaps Wednesday was the night Sabathia regained Girardi's trust, even if he was facing one of the league's worst offenses.Sabathia exited the game in the eighth with a 6-1 lead, after he had allowed two runners to reach base and had thrown his 111th pitch. He left to a standing ovation.Yankees reliever David Robertson replaced Sabathia and allowed run-scoring singles to Avisail Garcia, Josh Phegley and Marcus Semien, which narrowed the Yankees' lead to 6-5 and led Girardi to bring in Rivera."It was a tough inning, and I couldn't get anything to work," Robertson said. "I stunk out there and needed Mo to come out and pick me up."Rivera had pitched more than one inning only once this year, in that Aug. 7 game against the White Sox that featured Sabathia. In that game, Rivera blew the save and pitched two innings.This time, Rivera got the third out in the eighth with two runners on and pitched a perfect ninth for his 41st save of the season.It is certainly not ideal for Girardi to have to ask Rivera, 43, to pitch more than one inning. But in the final few weeks of the season, Girardi will call on Rivera for a longer save, he said. "As much as I need and as much as he's capable of doing it," Girardi said.Rivera, who is set to retire after the season, seemed to have no problem with the extra work."We need to do whatever it takes," Rivera said, "if that's two outs, three outs or four outs."Chicago starter Erik Johnson, in his major league debut, allowed a first-inning home run to Robinson Cano and gave up four runs in the fourth. The Yankees added a sixth run in the seventh inning on Alfonso Soriano's sacrifice fly.But they needed every one of them after the late Chicago rally.Phil Hughes spoke for the first time since he was removed from the rotation. "I wouldn't say I was blindsided, no," he said. "I was disappointed and surprised, but it certainly wasn't like: 'How could they do this? I've been pitching well all year.' " ... Robinson Cano's home run in the first was the 203rd of his career, which moved him past Bill Dickey for 15th on the Yankees' list.
Buffalo Coach Doug Marrone announced Wednesday that the rookie quarterback E. J. Manuel had fully recovered from a left knee injury and would start against New England on Sunday.Manuel, the 16th overall pick in April, was hurt scrambling during a preseason win over Minnesota on Aug. 16.Manuel took part in individual drills Sunday, his first practice since he had what the Bills called a minor procedure on Aug. 18.Manuel showed little sign of a limp despite wearing a small brace during Wednesday's practice. He said he had not determined whether he would wear the brace against the Patriots.49ER NAMED IN LAWSUIT San Francisco linebacker Aldon Smith has been named in a lawsuit by a man who said he was shot during a party at Smith's house. In the suit, filed Tuesday in Santa Clara County Superior Court, Ronndale Esporlas said Smith and Smith's former teammate Delanie Walker illegally fired weapons during the party, in June 2012. Neither Walker nor Smith has been charged. Walker now plays for Tennessee.RAMS CUT LINEBACKER St. Louis waived outside linebacker Jo-Lonn Dunbar rather than wait for Dunbar, the Rams' second-leading tackler last season, to serve a four-game suspension to open the season. Still, Coach Jeff Fisher said after practice Wednesday that there was a chance the Rams could re-sign Dunbar.BENGALS TACKLE MAY NOT PLAY Cincinnati left tackle Andrew Whitworth has not fully recovered from an off-season operation on his left knee, jeopardizing his chances of playing in the Bengals' season opener, at Chicago. Whitworth has started 67 straight games for the Bengals, who drafted him in 2006.Quarterback Greg McElroy, who was recently waived with an injury settlement by the Jets, was added to the Bengals' practice squad.COLTS READY TO GO Indianapolis tight ends Dwayne Allen and Coby Fleener, running back Ahmad Bradshaw and right guard Mike McGlynn practiced, and left tackle Anthony Castonzo was expected to return to practice Thursday. That means the Colts should presumably have all of their projected starters on the field Sunday against Oakland.The Colts may still face a surprise: Raiders Coach Dennis Allen is refusing to name his starting quarterback for "competitive" reasons, even though all signs point to Terrelle Pryor getting that call over Matt Flynn on Sunday in Indianapolis.GABBERT'S STATUS UP IN THE AIR Jacksonville Coach Gus Bradley said he might wait to decide on a quarterback until Sunday. Blaine Gabbert, who is returning from a broken thumb, was limited in practice Wednesday. Tight end Marcedes Lewis left practice after reinjuring his left calf.GOODELL DEFENDS SETTLEMENT N.F.L. Commissioner Roger Goodell took issue with the notion that the league's $765 million settlement with former players over concussions was a paltry sum compared with its revenue."This is a significant amount of money," Goodell said in his first public comments since the settlement was announced last week. "The plaintiffs also agreed it was an appropriate amount. The mediator felt it was an appropriate amount."AROUND THE LEAGUE Cornerback Champ Bailey will not play in Denver's opener, against Baltimore, on Thursday night because of a sprained left foot, but he plans to play against the Giants in Week 2. ... New England tight end Rob Gronkowski said he was making steady progress from forearm and back operations but would not say if he expected to play Sunday. ... Linebacker Brian Cushing signed a six-year, $55.6 million contract extension with Houston, with $21 million guaranteed.
Todd Frazier hit two home runs, including the first of Cincinnati's three off Lance Lynn, and the host Reds recovered from a 16-inning loss by overpowering the St. Louis Cardinals, 6-2, on Thursday night, taking three of four in the teams' final series against each other.Jay Bruce and Shin-Soo Choo also hit solo homers off Lynn (13-10), who lasted five innings and gave up three homers for only the second time in his career. Frazier also connected off Seth Maness for the third multihomer game of his career.The Reds tightened the N.L. Central race and ended the Cardinals' dominance against them. St. Louis had won the last seven series between the teams.The Cardinals got some encouraging news before the game: Allen Craig has a sprained left foot, but nothing is broken. Craig, the team's cleanup hitter, was injured while rounding first base Wednesday.ORIOLES 3, WHITE SOX 1 Miguel Gonzalez allowed one run in seven innings, and Baltimore hit three solo home runs to beat visiting Chicago.Adam Jones, J. J. Hardy and Brian Roberts homered off Jose Quintana (7-6) to provide Baltimore with a much-needed win. The Orioles were coming off a 3-6 trip that dropped them four games off the pace in the American League wild-card hunt.ROYALS 7, MARINERS 6 Mike Moustakas homered to lead off the 13th inning, lifting host Kansas City over Seattle. Moustakas homered to right on an 0-2 pitch from Chance Ruffin (0-1), who had not pitched in the majors since 2011.Kansas City rallied from five runs down and led by 6-5 in the ninth before Raul Ibanez homered off Greg Holland with two outs to tie it. It was Holland's first blown save since May 6, ending his streak of 31 consecutive saves.
CHICAGO — Johnny Hellweg pitched six innings for his first career major league victory and Logan Schafer hit a three-run triple to help the Milwaukee Brewers beat the Chicago Cubs 5-3 on Saturday.Hellweg (1-3) allowed three runs on four hits. He struck out one and pitched around three walks to finally earn his first victory after flourishing in the minors.Brewers relievers Rob Wooten and Brandon Kintzler each pitched a scoreless inning then Jim Henderson pitched a perfect ninth for his 23rd save in 27 opportunities.Hellweg was the Pacific Coast League's pitcher of the year after going 12-5 with a 3.15 ERA in 23 starts at Triple-A Nashville.The 24 year-old made his major league debut on June 28 in Pittsburgh. The 6-foot-9 right-hander was knocked out after giving up seven runs — five earned — and six hits while walking two in 1 2-3 innings of a 10-3 loss. He was also roughed up in a relief appearance and another two starts before being sent back to the minors.The Cubs got solo shots from Luis Valbuena and Brian Bogusevic who fell to 16 games under .500 at Wrigley Field. With the loss, the Cubs dropped behind the Brewers for last place in the NL Central.Cubs starter Jake Arrieta (2-2) pitched five innings and allowed four runs on three hits. He also gave up three walks and hit one batter. The 27 year-old right-hander was done in by a four-run fourth inning. Arrieta, who is trying to compete for a spot on the 2014 roster, gave up all three hits in the fourth.After Starlin Castro committed his 18th error at shortstop in the ninth, Milwaukee got an insurance run on Jonathan Lucroy's RBI triple.Trailing 2-0 in the fourth, Scooter Gennett drove in a run on a single and Schafer cleared the bases with a triple to right-center to put Milwaukee ahead 4-2.Valbuena hit a two-run homer into the right-field basket in the second inning. It was his 10th of the season and first home run since July 20th. Bogusevic added a solo homer off Hellweg in the sixth to cut the Brewers lead to 4-3. It was his fourth of the season.NOTES: Cubs manager Dale Sveum said 2B Darwin Barney deserves to repeat as a Gold Glove winner. Barney had four errors and a .993 fielding percentage entering Saturday. "He hasn't done anything for anybody to take it away from him," Sveum said. "He's had a heck of a year defensively again." ... RHP Scott Baker (Tommy John surgery) will not be limited in his first outing since Sept. 24, 2011 on Sunday against the Brewers, but he likely won't throw more than 100 pitches, Sveum said. ... Brewers CF Carlos Gomez was out of the starting lineup, but came in as a pinch-hitter in the eighth and stayed in the game. Gomez has been slowed with a sore knee. ... Despite both teams competing to stay out of the cellar in the NL Central, the announced crowd was 34, 929. ... Cubs RHP Chang-Yong Lim made his major league debut in a relief appearance in the seventh. He became the 32nd player to make his Cubs debut this season, a franchise record.
BALTIMORE — Matt Wieters hit a two-run single in the 10th inning to give the Baltimore Orioles a 4-3 victory over the Chicago White Sox on Saturday.Pinch-hitter Henry Urrutia started the winning rally with a one-out infield single against closer Addison Reed (5-3). Pinch-runner Chris Dickerson then went all the way to third on Nick Markakis' base hit.Reed bounced back with a strikeout of Nate McLouth, but Markakis stole second and both runners scored when Wieters lined a single into right field.It was the ninth consecutive loss for the White Sox, who grabbed a 3-2 lead on Conor Gillaspie's pinch-hit homer against Tommy Hunter (4-3) in the top half of the inning.Danny Valencia had three hits and Brian Roberts homered for the Orioles, who have won three straight. They began the day two games behind Tampa Bay for the final AL wild-card slot.Baltimore was 1 for 17 with runners in scoring position before Wieters' hit. The Orioles improved to 7-5 in extra-inning games while the White Sox fell to 9-14.Dayan Viciedo also homered for last-place Chicago, and Paul Konerko had two hits.After scoring in the third inning of Thursday's series opener, Chicago went 18 innings without a run until Konerko singled in Alexei Ramirez in the fourth.Viciedo connected in the fifth, giving the White Sox a 2-1 lead, but Roberts went deep in the bottom half, tying the game with Baltimore's major league-leading 192nd homer.Each team then had its chances to move in front, but couldn't come up with a clutch hit.Baltimore left Adam Jones at third with two outs in the seventh inning. The Orioles had runners on the corners in the eighth, but pinch-hitter Wieters struck out and Roberts grounded out.Hector Santiago threw five solid innings for the White Sox, allowing two runs and seven hits. The left-hander is 1-3 with a 3.80 ERA in his last 13 starts.Baltimore left-hander Wei-Yin Chen gave up two runs and six hits in six innings. He struck out eight and walked none.The Orioles grabbed the lead when Chris Davis doubled into the gap in left-center in the first, driving in Manny Machado from first. The hit lifted Davis' total to 124 RBIs, second-most in the majors behind Detroit's Miguel Cabrera.NOTES: White Sox pitching coach Don Cooper missed the game after a reoccurrence of diverticulitis led to him being hospitalized. Cooper also missed time in April due to the ailment. ... Chicago lost three at Boston and three at Yankee Stadium before arriving in Baltimore. ...Orioles starter Bud Norris (10-10, 4.01 ERA) opposes fellow RHP Andre Rienzo (1-1, 5.03 ERA) in Sunday's series finale.
CHICAGO — Yovani Gallardo tossed seven strong innings and Jeff Bianchi delivered a key pinch-hit single, leading the Milwaukee Brewers over the Chicago Cubs 3-1 Sunday.Gallardo (11-9) allowed one run and three hits. He is 3-0 with a 1.35 ERA in five starts since coming back from a hamstring injury that put him on the disabled list.Bianchi keyed a three-run seventh with a two-run single. Gallardo also contributed an RBI single.Jim Henderson worked a perfect ninth for his 24th save in 28 chances.Scott Baker pitched five shutout innings for the Cubs in his first start of the season following Tommy John surgery last year.Junior Lake homered for the Cubs, who dropped to 29-46 at Wrigley Field.The game was scoreless until the fifth when Lake homered into the left-field bleachers. It was his sixth homer since being called up from the minors in July.One batter later, Logan Watkins pinch-hit for Baker, who had thrown 55 pitches. Baker allowed only two hits, struck out one and walked one.Former Cubs star Aramis Ramirez started the Brewers' rally with a one-out double in the seventh off reliever Justin Grimm (0-1). Carlos Gomez followed with a single to right field. Ramirez was held at third base, but the throw from Nate Schierholtz missed the cut-off man, allowing Gomez to take second.Bianchi's singled up the middle against James Russell gave Milwaukee a 2-1 lead. Gallardo singled with two outs to score Bianchi.NOTES: To make room for Baker on the 40-man roster, the Cubs designated INF Cody Ransom for assignment. "Unfortunately, Ransom's been here all year and it's kind of a weird time to designate someone on Sept. 8," manager Dale Sveum said. "It's an unfortunate thing, but it's part of the business." Ransom, 37, made 38 starts at 3B. He hit .189 with nine home runs and 20 RBIs. ... Brewers OF Khris Davis (left wrist) hasn't played since Wednesday. With Monday's off-day, manager Ron Roenicke said he hopes Davis can return on Tuesday in St. Louis. ... The Cubs are at Cincinnati on Monday with Travis Wood (8-11) facing Bronson Arroyo (13-10). ... The Brewers are off until Tuesday when they begin a series in St. Louis with Wily Peralta (9-14) going against Shelby Miller (12-9).
BALTIMORE — Pinch-runner Chris Dickerson got lost on the bases and was doubled up for the final out, and the Chicago White Sox ended a nine-game losing streak by holding off the Baltimore Orioles 4-2 Sunday.Down 4-1, Baltimore loaded the bases with no outs in the ninth against Addison Reed. After Ryan Flaherty grounded into a forceout at second base that scored a run, Dickerson ran for him.Dickerson tried to steal second on a pitch to Brian Roberts, who hit a foul pop near first base. Dickerson didn't know where the ball went, and the baserunning blunder made him an easy out at first.Rookie Andre Rienzo pitched three-hit ball into the seventh inning and Adam Dunn homered for the White Sox. Reed wound up with his 37th save.Adam Jones hit his 31st home run for the Orioles, who went 0 for 11 with runners in scoring position and stranded eight. Baltimore began the day one game behind Tampa Bay in the race for the final AL wild-card slot.Dayan Viciedo had two hits and an RBI for the White Sox, who averted a four-game sweep and put a positive finish on a terrible that included three defeats apiece in Boston and Yankee Stadium. Only eight teams in major league history have gone winless on a road trip of at least 10 games.Chicago (57-85) also avoided falling 30 games under .500 for the first time since ending the 1976 season at 64-97.Making his eighth big league start, Rienzo (2-1) gave up one run and four hits in 6 2-3 innings. The Brazilian native walked two and struck out four in the second-longest outing since being summoned from the minors on July 30.Rienzo left after giving up a two-out single to J.J. Hardy in the seventh. Flaherty followed with a double off Matt Lindstrom, who struck out Roberts to end the threat.Bud Norris (10-11) allowed four runs and nine hits in 4 1-3 innings. He was 4-0 as a starter for Baltimore since being acquired in a trade with Houston on July 31.The White Sox were clinging to a 2-1 lead in the fifth inning when Dunn hit his 31st homer after Alexei Ramirez led off with a single. The drive snapped Dunn's 7-for-65 skid and traveled an estimated 424 feet before landing on Eutaw Street, far beyond the right-field wall.The four runs the White Sox scored matched their total in the previous three games of the series.NOTES: The Orioles open a four-game series against the New York Yankees on Monday night at Camden Yards. Chris Tillman starts for the O's against CC Sabathia. ... Chicago hosts the Detroit Tigers. "That's the good news. We're going home," manager Robin Ventura said before Sunday's game. ... Baltimore manager Buck Showalter said OF Henry Urrutia, a Cuban defector, will not be allowed to accompany the team to Toronto next weekend because of visa issues. ... Chicago went 3-4 against Baltimore this year and hasn't won the season series since 2008. ... Urrutia and RHP Mike Wright were chosen as the Orioles' minor league players of the year. ... Dunn struck out three times around his home run.
CINCINNATI — Left-hander Travis Wood beat Cincinnati for the first time in his career, repeatedly pitching out of threats for seven innings, and the Chicago Cubs stalled the Reds' week-long surge with a 2-0 victory Monday night.Wood (9-11) finally beat the team that traded him after the 2011 season. He was 0-4 in his career, including three losses this season. He allowed six hits and fanned seven.Kevin Gregg gave up a double in the ninth while earning his 31st save in 35 chances.Ryan Sweeney and Luis Valbuena homered off Bronson Arroyo (13-11), who had won his last four starts against the Cubs.The Reds were coming off a refreshing week — six wins in seven games against the rival Cardinals and the NL West-leading Dodgers, leaving Cincinnati only 1½ games out in the NL Central. And with St. Louis idle Monday, the Reds had a chance to gain a half-game on first place.Cincinnati hasn't been within a game of first place since May 25. The Reds have won a lot of close games and made up a lot of ground since falling a season-high 7 games out on Aug. 8.Facing a team they have dominated, they wasted a chance to move closer.Cincinnati is 13-4 against the Cubs this season. Overall, Cincinnati has won 12 of its last 15 and 22 of its last 27 against Chicago.The last-place Cubs started their longest trip since the 2004 season, 11 games in 11 days. They also go to Pittsburgh and Milwaukee.Sweeney hit his sixth homer in the second inning and Valbuena hit his 11th in the third. Valbuena's homer left him 6 for 12 career against Arroyo with two homers — one of the few Chicago hitters with good results against the right-hander.Arroyo allowed seven hits over seven innings, striking out six.Wood was traded to the Cubs for left-handed reliever Sean Marshall after the 2011 season. He had pitched well against the Reds, allowing only two runs in three of his four starts against them this season. The problem was a lack of offense.Didn't need it this time.Wood forced Cincinnati to strand a runner at second base in the first, third, fourth, fifth and sixth innings. After Shin-Soo Choo doubled with one out in the fifth, Wood got Brandon Phillips and Joey Votto on called third strikes.The Reds stranded seven runners in scoring position in seven innings.Choo was hit in the back with the pitch in the third inning, the 25th time the leadoff hitter has been plunked this season. With that, Choo surpassed Jason LaRue for the club record.Notes: It was the Cubs' sixth shutout this season. ... Reds SS Zack Cozart had two doubles, extending his hitting streak to a career-high 14 games. ... RHP Johnny Cueto continues to throw without pain. Cueto is on the DL for the third time this season with shoulder problems. The Reds haven't decided when he could pitch in a game or what role he might have. "You don't want to force him in there and end up hurting his shoulder," manager Dusty Baker said. "It's great to have him as a possibility." ... LHP Tony Cingrani (7-3) starts for the Reds on Tuesday, his second appearance since returning from back spasms. The Cubs go with Edwin Jackson (7-15), who leads the NL in losses.
As much as he credited the players and staff for the Chicago Bears' season-opening win over the Cincinnati Bengals, he couldn't help but acknowledge his own personal satisfaction.After all, it was his first game as a head coach in the league.It came after a long run as an NFL and college assistant before spending the past five seasons in Canada, leading the CFL's Montreal Alouettes. And in his debut, the Bears took out a team many expect to contend in the AFC.Even better, his 85-year-old father was on hand for it."I was glad he was there to see the day, but that wasn't what the day was about," Trestman said Monday. "The day was about the Bears and the city of Chicago and the fans. We had a chance to rejoice, no doubt about it. I'm not going to step aside and say we didn't but it wasn't the most important part of the day."The most important part was what happened on the field, and for the Bears it was a promising start.They rallied from 11 down in the third quarter to beat the Bengals 24-21, and although they hardly looked like a finished product, there were certainly plenty of positives they could take from that game.Their offense got going in the second half. They kept their poise down the stretch. The offensive line held its ground against Geno Atkins and a fierce defensive front and did not allow a sack, even with two rookies on the right side and four new starters in all.A defense that led the league with 44 takeaways last season showed it hasn't lost its ball-hawking ways under a new coaching staff, getting two interceptions from Charles Tillman and forcing three turnovers in all. It also contained the run, holding BenJarvus Green-Ellis to 25 yards, although it did give up two touchdowns drives of more than 90 yards in the first half."We had to make some adjustments, just play better overall," said linebacker James Anderson, who made his Bears debut. "When you give up long plays, that kills your defense so we've got to cut those out."It would be nice, too, if the Bears got their running game going. Matt Forte had just 50 yards rushing on 19 attempts and caught four passes for 41 yards."Our productivity running the football wasn't where we wanted it to be," Trestman said. "We didn't get any explosive plays. Matt touched the ball approximately 25 times and not the productivity that we'd expect him to have. There were no explosive plays. We've got to do a better job for Matt of running the football and we think we can."Even so, it wasn't a bad start for an offense that had its difficulties in recent years.The Bears brought in Trestman to replace the fired Lovie Smith, hoping he could change that and get the most out of quarterback Jay Cutler. They also added a key piece on offense in tight end Martellus Bennett to go with an overhauled line that now includes Jermon Bushrod at left tackle along with two rookies in guard Kyle Long and tackle Jordan Mills on the right side.How it will all come together remains to be seen, although they did pass the first test.Still, Cutler acknowledged afterward there are "a lot of question marks."Bennett also said players were nervous, and that might have shown early on, with the Bears managing 97 yards in the first half. They finished the game with 323 after Trestman opened it up a little more in the third and fourth quarters, after seeing that blockers were doing their part."You want to do the best you can to show the city what we're going to be about this year," Bennett said. "I think we brought a little excitement to the city. You got the Bulls, who win. And then you have the Blackhawks that just won a championship. And it's our time of year right now. I think everybody had pressure just to be great. When you've got that type of pressure from one another, everyone is nervous. If you go out there and you're not nervous, then something's wrong with you. We're not Navy Seals. I think those are probably the only people who aren't nervous, for the most part.
CINCINNATI — Welington Castillo drove in three runs with two home runs, Donnie Murphy added a two-run shot and even pitcher Edwin Jackson smacked one as the Chicago Cubs rolled to a 9-1 victory over the suddenly punchless Cincinnati Reds on Tuesday night.Jackson hit his second career home run in the seventh inning on his way to his first win in seven starts since July 31. The Reds — who went into the game third in the NL Central, two games behind first-place St. Louis — saw their streak of consecutive scoreless innings reach 15 since a walkoff win over Los Angeles on Sunday. Then Zack Cozart and pinch-hitter Corky Miller hit consecutive doubles with one out in the seventh.Jackson (8-15) allowed nine hits and one run with four strikeouts in seven innings.The Cubs earned consecutive wins over Cincinnati for the first time since 2011, when they won on Sept. 7 in Chicago and Sept. 12 in Cincinnati — a span of 36 games. They clinched their first series win at Great American Ball Park since Aug. 3-5, 2009Reds starter Tony Cingrani, in his second start since coming off the disabled list on Thursday, left the game two outs into the second inning with back spasms. He had been sidelined since August 25 with a lower back strain.Junior Lake led off the second with a double, giving him a seven-game hitting streak and his fourth streak of seven or more games since he was called up from Triple-A Iowa on July 19. Castillo followed one out later with a 470-foot homer into the upper deck in left field on a full-count pitch. Castillo's fifth homer of the season was his first since Aug. 10. Cingrani (7-4) left the game one out later.Murphy added his 377-foot, two-run homer down the left field line on the first pitch he saw from Greg Reynolds in the third inning. Lake singled to right and went to second on right fielder Jay Bruce's error, and Darnell McDonald drove him in with a soft single to center field that Shin-Soo Choo appeared to midjudge.Barney drove in Jackson with a sacrifice fly in the fourth and Murphy added an RBI double in the sixth before Castillo hit his second homer in the seventh — the first multi-homer game of his career.NOTES: The Cubs will use a six-man rotation for the 12-game stretch that started on Monday, allowing RHP Scott Baker to get two more starts as he continues his comeback from Tommy John surgery. They will go back to a five-man rotation for the remaining eight games. "Everybody will get their same amount of starts," manager Dale Sveum said. "Everybody will just get a little bit extra rest. It works out where (LHP Travis) Wood and (RHP Jeff) Samardzija will pitch against the Cardinals (in the season's last series)." ... Reds LHP Sean Marshall said he felt good after throwing 23 pitches off the mound to live batters in simulated game action before Tuesday's game. Marshall has been on the disabled list since May 24 with shoulder tendinitis. ... Reds RHP Johnny Cueto is scheduled to throw about 45 pitches in another set of simulated innings before Wednesday's game. Cueto threw 30 on Sunday as he continues his comeback from a strained muscle below his right shoulder. He's been on the DL since June 29.
CLEVELAND — Jeremy Guthrie got a major assist from his defense in pitching six innings, Alcides Escobar hit a rare home run and the Kansas City Royals snapped a six-game losing streak in Cleveland, 6-3 on Tuesday night to close on the Indians and two others in the AL's cramped wild-card scramble.Guthrie (14-10) allowed just one run and nine hits, but was helped by three double plays.With the win and Tampa Bay's loss, Kansas City pulled within three games of a wild-card spot. The Royals also got a game tighter to the Indians, who dropped to 6-3 in September.Mike Moustakas hit a two-run double in the sixth off Zach McAllister (7-9) and the won't-go-away Royals won for the 12th time in 17 games.Kansas City had lost seven in a row before this stretch and was on the verge of falling from the race.But the Royals are still hanging around in the wide-open playoff chase, and could still have a say in the AL Central with three games later this week at first-place Detroit.Royals reliever Luke Hochevar struck out all five batters he faced, and closer Greg Holland worked a perfect ninth for his 41st save.Guthrie wasn't overpowering, but he didn't allow a walk and let his defense get him out of trouble. Kansas City's infield turned double plays in the third, fourth and sixth innings to back the right-hander, who won for just the second time in seven starts.Michael Bourn had two RBIs for Cleveland.Of the six current teams in the wild-card chase, the Indians have the most favorable schedule. Kansas City is the only team with a winning record that Cleveland will face the rest of the way.Moustakas' two-run double highlighted a three-run sixth, when the Royals chased McAllister and opened a 4-1 lead.Eric Hosmer walked and Billy Butler doubled into the left-field corner. Moustakas then snapped an 0-for-16 slide by pulling his double to right. Salvador Perez followed with an RBI single to give the Royals a three-run lead and finish McAllister, who allowed four runs and six hits in five-plus innings.Butler's sacrifice fly made it 5-1 in the seventh before the Indians rallied with two in their half on Bourn's two-run double. However, Hochevar came on and fanned Nick Swisher looking and whiffed All-Star Jason Kipnis to preserve the two-run lead. He struck out the side in the eighth.Escobar's RBI single in the eighth put Kansas City up 6-3.The Royals hit several long flies that were caught for outs through the first four innings before Escobar ended a long homerless drought to tie it 1-all in the fifth.With one out, Escobar connected on a full-count pitch from McAllister, driving it onto the pedestrian patio in left for his fourth homer and first since April 28, a span of 467 at-bats. Escobar's previous homer also came against the Indians, a shot off right-hander Justin Masterson.With left-handed hitters batting .328 this season against Guthrie, Indians manager Terry Francona loaded his lineup with eight lefties.Cleveland strung together three two-out hits in the first off Guthrie to take a 1-0 lead.Kipnis and Santana singled to right before Brantley, who came in batting just .125 (2 for 16) in his career against Kansas City's starter, grounded an RBI hit to center.Guthrie got out of the third with a double play and again in the fourth, when he also got a nice play by right fielder David Lough, who raced back and robbed Jason Kubel before crashing into the padded wall for the final out.NOTES: The Indians will open the 2014 season in Oakland on March 31 and play their home opener April 4 against Minnesota. Cleveland will play the NL West in interleague play and continue their rivalry with Cincinnati. ... The Royals had two steals and lead the league with 136. ... Indians RHP Carlos Carrasco is not with the team because of a family matter. He's expected to rejoin the club on the road in Chicago. ... On Wednesday, the Royals conclude a stretch of 44 games in 44 days. "We've done really well through it," Royals manager Ned Yost said. "I'm very pleased. That's a very grueling, grinding stretch. It started in dad-gum August and ends in September." ... The series finale — a 12:05 matinee — will match Kansas City's James Shields (10-9) against Scott Kazmir (8-7).
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Henrik Stenson has been so busy contending in big tournaments that he never stopped to realize what kind of season he was having.Only when he was doing an interview last week with Swedish radio did it hit him."Yeah, it probably is my best season," Stenson said Tuesday.He won a World Golf Championship in 2007 and moved to No. 5 in the world, but Stenson didn't really do much the rest of the year. He won The Players Championship, possibly his biggest win, yet didn't really feature much the rest of the way.His only win this year was the Deutsche Bank Championship, but it's what preceded it that has put the Swede at No. 6 in the world.He tied for third at the Scottish Open and was runner-up in the British Open. He tied for second in the Bridgestone Invitational (by seven shots to Tiger Woods) and tied for third in the PGA Championship.Stenson also tied for second in the Houston Open, which put him into the Masters and was a turning point in his season."From there on it's just kind of been heading more and more in the right direction," he said. "Unbelievable summer. And I guess if I stopped now — looking at the results and the tournaments where I've had those good results — it's the best season of my career so far."ROOKIE SENSATION: While it's easy to get caught up in Jordan Spieth and his amazing rookie season, it would be hard to consider the best by a pure rookie in recent times. Only two years ago, Keegan Bradley won the Byron Nelson Championship and the PGA Championship, and probably should have been selected for the Presidents Cup team.And then there's Tiger Woods.Spieth is assured of becoming the first player since Woods in 1996 to start a season with no status on any tour and reach the Tour Championship. The 20-year-old Texan secured special temporary membership with a runner-up finish in Puerto Rico and a tie for seventh at the Tampa Bay Championship, giving him unlimited exemptions the rest of the year. He became a full member by winning the John Deere Classic.The surge continued with a playoff loss at the Wyndham Championship, and his tie for fourth in the Deutsche Bank Championship.Woods was 20 when he turned pro in late August, fresh off his third straight U.S. Amateur title. He had seven exemptions to earn his card, and during that stretch he tied for fifth in what is now the John Deere Classic (losing a 54-hole lead to Ed Fiori), tied for third in the B.C. Open that was cut short to 54 holes by rain, and then won twice. He beat Davis Love III in a playoff in Las Vegas, and beat the late Payne Stewart at Disney. In between, Woods was third at the Texas Open.Going from nowhere to the Tour Championship in seven events? Woods still considers that one of his finest achievements.MONEY TITLE: Henrik Stenson will have a clear shot at winning the FedEx Cup. He has no chance of catching Tiger Woods for the PGA Tour money title.But the Swede still has his eyes on another money title.Stenson is leading the European Tour money list by 425,573 euros (about $565,000) over Graeme McDowell with a stretch of big tournaments on the horizon — the BMW Masters, the HSBC Champions, Turkey and the season finale at Dubai. U.S. Open champion Justin Rose is right behind."That would be huge for me," Stenson said. "In all my years, this would be as good of a chance as I've ever given myself to do it."Stenson only has two top 10s in regular European Tour events, compared with two wins for McDowell, but he has scored big with his runner-up finish in the British Open, tie for second in the World Golf Championship at Firestone and tie for third in the PGA Championship."When you put all the records down, winning a major would be the most important. And then it would be winning a money title — or FedEx — here or there," Stenson said. "It's a big achievement to be the best on a tour for the year."NEW MEMBERS: Four international players have indicated they will join the PGA Tour next year, including a familiar face. Darren Clarke returns, exempt through 2016 from his British Open title in 2011. Hideki Matsuyama of Japan, Gonzalo Fernandez-Castano of Spain and Thorbjorn Olesen of Denmark also will join based on having enough money or FedEx Cup points equal to the top 125.Meanwhile, former Masters champion Mike Weir, Stephen Ames, Fred Funk and Mark Calcavecchia are using their one-time exemption from being in the top 50 in career money. Robert Allenby and Scott Verplank are using one-time exemptions from the top 25 in career money.Vijay Singh and Davis Love III will be exempt as life members — at least 20 PGA Tour wins in their careers.BEV NORWOOD: Golf lost one of its great historians, publicists and story tellers when Bev Norwood, who spent more than 30 years with IMG, died in Cleveland last week of cancer at age 66. He did almost all of his work behind the scenes, yet his passing touched every important figure in golf, including the original "Big Three" of Arnold Palmer, Jack Nicklaus and Gary Player.Norwood was a sports writer at the Winston-Salem (N.C.) Journal when he paid his own way to the British Open, and through networking, joined IMG. He went from London to New York before settling at headquarters in Cleveland and specialized in publications.He was responsible for the World of Professional Golf, the most comprehensive annual review in the sport, and published annuals from the U.S. Open, PGA Championship and Ryder Cup. He also put together a biographical booklet on Tiger Woods that was updated for every tournament.Norwood complained of back pain at the U.S. Open at Merion. That turned out to be his last major."He confronted his battle with cancer in recent weeks with a strength and fortitude that belied his small frame," IMG vice chairman Alastair Johnston said. "His wit and whimsical sense of humor, that were always so appealing to his friends and colleagues, never left him."One such example of his wit and endless information was when a company signed Woods to a five-year deal worth about $10 million, in which Woods gave a testimonial for the product and little else — no commercials, corporate days or logos he displayed on his bag. Someone told Norwood that it seemed like a lot of money for doing next to nil."Actually, it's closer to nil," Norwood replied. "If it were 'next to nil,' it would have been more."DIVOTS: About the only thing keeping Tiger Woods from winning the Vardon Trophy for the first time since 2009 would be withdrawing in the middle of a round. Woods has a 68.86 adjusted scoring average for a comfortable lead over Steve Stricker (69.08). ... San Diego Country Club in Chula Vista, Calif., has been selected to hose the 2017 U.S. Women's Amateur ... Sergio Garcia and Luke Donald have pledged $1,000 for every birdie and $2,000 for every eagle at the BMW Championship toward The First Tee of Greater Chicago. Garcia this year has contributed $78,000 to The First Tee chapters from PGA Tour events he has played since August.STAT OF THE WEEK: Hunter Mahan is the only player to compete in every playoff event since the FedEx Cup began in 2007. He has only finished in the top 10 in the final FedEx Cup one time.FINAL WORD: "I've still got eight tournaments left. I've got a Steve Stricker season left to play." — Rory McIlroy, on the rest of his schedule this year.
CONCORD, N.C. — The Sprint Cup driver Martin Truex Jr. was kicked out of the field for Nascar's annual 10-race playoff after officials ruled his team deliberately manipulated the results of Saturday night's race at Richmond International Raceway to help him qualify.Nascar handed down a 50-point penalty to Truex and his Michael Waltrip Racing teammates Clint Bowyer and Brian Vickers for their actions during the race. In addition, the team received a $300,000 fine — the largest in Nascar history — and General Manager Ty Norris was suspended indefinitely. Crew chiefs for all three drivers were placed on probation.The penalty drops Truex to 17th in the standings and out of the playoff field. Ryan Newman, who was one of the victims of the manipulation, moved up one place in the standings because of the Truex penalty and qualified for the playoff in Truex's place. It was the first time Nascar has moved to alter the field for the Chase."Nascar has always taken very serious its responsibility to maintain for the most part its credibility," the Nascar president, Mike Helton, said Monday night. "That's why we're sitting here tonight explaining why we made the decision that we made."Officials reviewed audio and video from the race, notably a conversation between Norris and Vickers, the driver of the No. 55 Toyota. Norris clearly ordered Vickers to go to pit road in the closing laps, a move that helped Joey Logano advance in the field and gain an extra point. Though Logano is not a teammate, the point helped bump Jeff Gordon out of a playoff slot, aiding Truex.Nascar officials met with Norris and the team owner Michael Waltrip before making the announcement.In a statement released by the team, Waltrip said: "What occurred on the No. 55 radio at the end of Saturday night's race in Richmond was a split-second decision made by team spotter Ty Norris to bring the No. 55 to pit lane and help a teammate earn a place in the Chase. We regret the decision and its impact. We apologize to Nascar, our fellow competitors, partners and fans who were disappointed in our actions. We will learn from this and move on."The team will not appeal the penalties.Newman was on his way to winning the race and securing a berth in the playoff before Bowyer spun out with seven laps to go, bringing a caution. Newman wound up finishing third and did not make the Chase field.Bowyer and Vickers later deliberately dropped back in the field, moving Logano up to 10th and Jeff Gordon to 11th, aiding Truex in making the playoff."I am proud that Nascar took a stand with respect to what went on Saturday night at Richmond," Newman said in a statement released by his Stewart-Haas Racing team Monday night. He had been livid about the Bowyer spin, calling it the "toughest thing" he had gone through in racing.Gordon, who was also a victim of the manipulation, did not get his spot in the Chase back through Nascar's ruling.Despite his penalty, Bowyer remains in the Chase field and is able to compete for the championship with the points reset for the start of the playoff Sunday at Chicagoland Speedway. Helton said there was not clear evidence that Bowyer deliberately spun."Feel bad for Truex," Gordon wrote on Twitter. "He got in under controversy, now out due to it. But the guy who started all of this not affected at all? Don't agree!"
CHICAGO — The Detroit Tigers are giving Jhonny Peralta a chance to earn a spot on their roster.That's about all general manager Dave Dombrowski would promise when he discussed the suspended infielder's future Tuesday. Peralta, who accepted a 50-game suspension from Major League Baseball on Aug. 5, will work out with the Tigers before Wednesday's game in Chicago against the White Sox."From our perspective, there really is an obligation with giving him a chance to come back," Dombrowski said. "We'll make a baseball decision at some point, as we get closer, whether to activate him."Peralta was suspended as part of baseball's investigation into Biogenesis of America, a Florida anti-aging clinic accused of distributing banned performance-enhancing drugs.Dombrowski said even if Peralta returns, he would not be the team's everyday shortstop. Shortly before his suspension, the Tigers traded for a replacement, acquiring slick-fielding infielder Jose Iglesias from Boston.Dombrowski said Peralta will do some hitting Wednesday and also take groundballs and flyballs.The 31-year-old Peralta has never played the outfield in the major leagues. He's only played shortstop, third base and first base, and the latter two positions are occupied on the Tigers by sluggers Miguel Cabrera and Prince Fielder.AL Central-leading Detroit is trying to hold off Cleveland for its third straight division title after winning the American League pennant in 2012. Peralta was having a fine season before he was suspended, hitting .305 with 11 home runs.Peralta, a free agent after this season, is eligible to return on Sept. 27 for the Tigers' final three regular-season games at Miami. Dombrowski said at some point between now and then, Peralta will join Detroit's instructional league team."He's been in the Dominican Republic, so he's been working out," Dombrowski said. "We've got enough time for him to take batting practice to get ready, so there really was nothing to be gained by bringing him in earlier than this. Now, at this time, to properly get him ready for the season — if we do decide to activate him — this is about the right time."Last year, All-Star game MVP Melky Cabrera served a 50-game suspension that ended in October. The San Francisco Giants kept him off the roster on their way to winning the World Series.The Tigers aren't the only team facing a similar dilemma this time around, trying to figure out how effective a key player can be after a long suspension. Texas slugger Nelson Cruz was back with the Rangers toward the end of last month, hoping to come back for the postseason after his suspension ends.Dombrowski said giving Peralta another look is the right thing to do."Really you are under some obligation to attempt to try to give him the opportunity to try to come back, because it's a negotiated settlement of a 50-day suspension that the commissioner's office and the players' association have agreed upon," Dombrowski said. "Are you told that you have to? No. But you also are told that there is some obligation. I think really where we fall at this time, too: You pay the punishment, you pay the price — which he has — and you sit back and we can see how he is."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Down to his last chance, Rory McIlroy knew this was no time to be riding the brakes."I have to be aggressive," he said Tuesday.McIlroy wasn't gripping a golf club. He was behind the wheel of an electric BMW i3 in a vacant parking lot at an amusement park north of Chicago, racing against the clock and against Gary Woodland in a charity event.They each had four attempts around a makeshift track of straightaways and hairpin turns. McIlroy needed to shave 4 seconds off his best time for a $100,000 scholarship to be awarded in his name through the Evans Scholars Foundation. Hitting a cone added 2 seconds to the time.Dust kicked up when he took the car down the straightaway. Tires screeched around the turns."I lost track of how many I hit," McIlroy said with a laugh when he got out of the car.It wasn't much different from how his golf has gone this year.McIlroy left the racing behind and drove at a more reasonable speed to Conway Farms Golf Club to get ready for the BMW Championship, the third FedEx Cup playoff event and perhaps the last tournament. That's surprising for a guy who started the year at No. 1 in the world.He is No. 41 in the FedEx Cup standings. McIlroy figures he needs to finish among the top seven against a 70-man field to be among the 30 players who advance to the Tour Championship with a shot at the $10 million prize. That doesn't sound so hard, except it would be his best finish in five months.McIlroy doesn't have the market cornered in disappointment.Luke Donald was still No. 1 in the world just over a year ago, and he was No. 2 when the season began. He has made it to the Tour Championship every year since 2009, so often that going to East Lake should be an afterthought. Donald, however, is No. 54 in the FedEx Cup."I think someone who was at the pinnacle of the game not too long ago and is now 54th on the FedEx Cup, it's been disappointing," Donald said. "It's been very hard this year. It's been frustrating at times, and I've had to make some tough decisions in terms of changing swing coaches. But I feel good about where things are headed, and I'm excited about the future. This year, I still have time to rescue it."McIlroy isn't about to give up on his year, either.His issues stem from the short game, though there have been plenty of distractions off the golf course that are subject to speculation — swapping out his entire set of golf equipment by signing a big endorsement contract with Nike, and then deciding to leave management companies for the second time in 18 months. That situation still has not been resolved, and it can be awkward to have two managers around him at the same time.There are signs McIlroy is getting closer. He has been held back the last two tournaments by making eight double bogeys, which have kept him from at least having a sniff of contention going into the final day. What really troubles him, though, is losing shots around the green.McIlroy went to the Bahamas during the week away from golf, comparing statistics from last year to this year, and reaching some clear conclusions.He was mildly surprised to see that two ball-striking statistics were about the same — 60th this year and last in greens hit in regulation, 145th in driving accuracy this year, compared with 156th a year ago. Then again, statistics don't tell the whole story. McIlroy went from missing fairways by inches to missing them by a mile earlier in the year."I'm driving the ball better. I'm hitting a few more greens. That isn't the issue," he said. "I'm just not getting up-and-down as much as I used to. All I did for the last four days was practice those things."A few numbers he crunched left him mystified."Here's a stat for you," he said. "I was 169th in putts per round in the first round. And I'm first in the second round. That's a strange one. ... But that's the whole thing. It's the short game. That's where I'm throwing shots away, taking four shots to get down. I've just got to cut out the mistakes."The sooner the better or his season will be over. McIlroy said he would be more surprised if the year ended without going to East Lake for the Tour Championship than failing to win a major. The latter is far more important, to be clear, but let him explain."You have to play really good golf in that one week, four weeks a year," he said. "Everything has to come together, and you need to get a few breaks. But over the course of the season, I feel like I should play well enough to get to East Lake. I didn't expect to be in this position."Now he's down to his last chance. Play well. Drive hard. Try not to hit the cones.
CHICAGO — Anibal Sanchez struck out 10 in a terrific performance, helping the Detroit Tigers top the Chicago White Sox 1-0 on Wednesday night.Sanchez (14-7) allowed five hits and walked four in 7 1-3 innings while lowering his AL-best ERA to 2.50. Joaquin Benoit got three outs for his 18th save in 18 opportunities, completing a five-hitter for Detroit's 11th shutout of the season.Omar Infante drove in the game's only run with a two-out single against Matt Lindstrom (2-4) in the eighth inning.White Sox left-hander Jose Quintana pitched seven innings of five-hit ball. But he remained winless over his last five starts despite a 3.03 ERA.AL Central-leading Detroit loaded the bases with one out in the first, but Quintana got Victor Martinez to foul out and struck out Nick Castellanos to end the inning.The Tigers' next solid opportunity occurred when Infante led off the seventh with a hustle double to left and advanced to third on a groundout. Quintana then struck out Jose Iglesias, hit Austin Jackson with a pitch and got Torii Hunter to ground out to end the threat.Prince Fielder and Martinez hit consecutive one-out singles in the eighth to set up Infante's run-scoring single to left.The White Sox put two runners on with one out in the bottom half, chasing Sanchez from the game. Jose Veras came in and struck out Paul Konerko before he was replaced by Drew Smyly, who struck out Adam Dunn for the final out.NOTES: Suspended Tigers SS Jhonny Peralta said he understands why he won't regain his position if he is activated when his penalty is over. The shortstop job now belongs to Iglesias. Peralta said: "Iglesias is a really good player. He's settled to be the shortstop every day. I'm here to help the team in whatever position I can." ... White Sox rookie INF Marcus Semien got his third career start, replacing Conor Gillaspie at third base. Gillaspie made three errors on Tuesday, but manager Robin Ventura sounded understanding of what happened during Chicago's 9-1 loss. "I've had a night like that and totally understand it," he said. "You don't sleep well because you care." ... The White Sox continue their homestand when they host Cleveland on Thursday, with LHP John Danks (4-12) facing Indians RHP Corey Kluber (8-5). ... The Tigers are off Thursday before beginning a home series against the Kansas City on Friday, with RHP Justin Verlander (12-11) going against Royals LHP Bruce Chen (7-2).
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — It was a chance first meeting on Wednesday between two of the hottest players on the PGA Tour, a 46-year-old and a 20-year-old who will both represent the United States at the Presidents Cup next month.Rookie sensation Jordan Spieth had just finished his pre-tournament news conference for this week's BMW Championship at Conway Farms Golf Club when he came face-to-face with tour veteran Steve Stricker who had just arrived in the media center.The players shook hands and Stricker, who has competed part-time on the U.S. circuit this year to spend more time with his family, immediately set up a practice round with Spieth before next week's season-ending Tour Championship in Atlanta."It's remarkable what he's accomplished at 20," Stricker, a 12-times winner on the PGA Tour, told reporters after his own news conference began a few minutes later. "I would have been just finishing my sophomore year in college."I can't even imagine doing what he's doing at that time ... so it's cool to see. I'm excited to get to know him a little bit. He seems like a great kid."Going from no (PGA Tour) status to playing on the Presidents Cup in one year. His head has got to be spinning. You know, he's been playing great all year long."Spieth has enjoyed a sensational 2013 campaign, winning his maiden PGA Tour title at the John Deere Classic in July to secure full membership status before losing out in a playoff for last month's Wyndham Championship.Nine days ago, he recorded his eighth top-10 of the year with a tie for fourth at the Deutsche Bank Championship, then earned one of two wildcard picks for the Presidents Cup by U.S. captain Fred Couples less than 48 hours later."It's been phenomenal. It's been the best year of my life," said Spieth, who became the youngest winner on the PGA Tour since 1931 with his playoff victory at the John Deere Classic."I've had to sit back and readjust goals this year a couple of different times. If I keep looking forward, I think that's the way to stay grounded and to stay focused and working as hard as I ever have."Being told by Couples last week that he had made the U.S. Presidents Cup team has been one of Spieth's biggest highlights."Cool phone call, one of the best ones I've ever received," Spieth said of that chat. "That was a big goal of mine when I started to realize it might be possible about a month ago, and ever since then I've been grinding to try and get that call."It was pretty cool, and I'm looking forward to maybe playing some rounds with guys on the team and seeing how we can best shape the pairings."Spieth's first opportunity will come at Atlanta's East Lake next Tuesday when he will enjoy nine holes of practice with Stricker, who locked up an automatic place on the Presidents Cup team by finishing second at the Deutsche Bank Championship.Stricker has produced surprisingly consistent golf this season despite his truncated playing schedule, and has decided to cancel a long-planned hunting trip next week so that he can compete in the elite field of 30 at the Tour Championship."I had a good talk with (wife) Nicki on the way home right after Boston and thought it was pretty important for me to go and play and not go hunting instead," said Stricker, who sits 10th in the FedExCup points standings going into the penultimate playoff event this week."I still have the opportunity and the chance to win (FedExCup honors), and I didn't think I'd be in this position starting the year with the limited playing schedule. I'm excited about playing and excited about the position I'm in."It's our marquee event," he said of the Tour Championship. "It's the Super Bowl of our year, and for me to just kind of say, 'You know what, I'm in the top 10, I'm not coming,' to walk away from that, I think, would have been foolish."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Steve Stricker will play in what he calls the "Super Bowl" of the PGA Tour season instead of hunting for elk in Colorado.Stricker said Wednesday he has canceled his hunting trip to play in the Tour Championship, for reasons that go beyond a shot at winning the FedEx Cup and its $10 million prize. He never thought he'd have a chance at the FedEx Cup when he announced his reduced schedule this year, and he thinks it would be wrong for him to shun the 30-man field at East Lake next year."It's our marquee event. It's the Super Bowl of our year," Stricker said.Stricker said at the start of the season that he was going to play a reduced schedule of about 10 to 12 tournaments. He collected his third runner-up finish at the Deutsche Bank Championship, pushing him to No. 8 in the FedEx Cup standings. It also was enough for him to play his way onto the Presidents Cup team for the Oct. 3-6 matches.The decision to play East Lake means Stricker will play 13 events this year, still not a full schedule. Even though he had planned the elk hunting trip all year, a talk with his wife on the way home from the TPC Boston changed his mind."I had a good talk with Nicki on the way home right after Boston and thought it was pretty important for me to go and play and not go hunting," he said. "Even though I'd rather go hunting, I think it's pretty important, being in the position I'm in. I still have the opportunity to win. I didn't think I'd be in this position starting the year with the limited playing schedule. Yeah, looking forward to next week."Stricker also figured that pulling out of East Lake would mean the 30th player would have to play alone the first two rounds. And part of him thought it would be disrespectful to take off a tournament where so many players strive to be."For me to just shun that and walk away from that I think would have been wrong," he said.As for the hunting trip with his buddies?"I'm catching a lot of grief," he said. "They were actually rooting against me in Boston, if you can believe it. No, it's all in good fun. I told them going into the playoffs, 'Something really strange is going to have to happen for me not to go on this hunting trip.'"Like finishing second in Boston? That's not strange. Stricker has 11 top 10s in the FedEx Cup playoffs, tied with Jim Furyk for the most since it began in 2007.ADJUSTING GOALS: Jordan Spieth keeps raising his own bar.The 20-year-old Texan began the season with a primary goal of getting into the Web.com Tour Finals, a four-tournament series with the top 75 from the Web.com money list and the players from No. 126 to 200 in the FedEx Cup starting from scratch. The top 25 in that special money list not already eligible would get PGA Tour cards.That changed when Spieth was runner-up in the Puerto Rico Open and tied for seventh in the Tampa Bay Championship to earn special temporary membership on the PGA Tour, giving him unlimited exemptions.Then, his goal was to earn enough money — equal to No. 125 on the PGA Tour list — to earn a full card for 2013-14. He accomplished that with a tie for ninth at Hilton Head. But he still couldn't be part of the FedEx Cup without being a full member this year, and there was only one way to do that."I kind of sat back and said, 'You know what? We can win. We can win this year,'" he said.And he did just that at the John Deere Classic.Next, the bar was raised to the Tour Championship, which was no longer a long shot when he lost in a playoff at the Wyndham Championship to start the FedEx Cup at No. 8."And then from there, I guess the Presidents Cup came onto my mind, and that was the most significant goal that was on my mind the whole year," he said.Spieth tied for fourth at the Deutsche Bank with a closing 62, enough for Fred Couples to make him a captain's pick.Well, there is that $10 million prize for winning the FedEx Cup. And that's not out of reach.MOVING UP: Most amazing to Steve Stricker about the rookie year of Jordan Spieth is that the Texan started the year with no status and ends it in the Presidents Cup."Has anybody ever come out on their rookie year and made any team?" Stricker asked.Rickie Fowler in 2010 became the first PGA Tour rookie to make the Ryder Cup team. Fowler, however, had made it through Q-school the year before and had a full season of status on tour.Tiger Woods didn't make the 1996 Presidents Cup team, even though he won twice and reached the Tour Championship. That was when the Tour Championship was held in the fall. In fact, the Presidents Cup was played the same week that Woods first had a chance to win, holding the 54-hole lead at the Quad City Classic. Most of the national golf writers left the Presidents Cup and flew to Illinois to watch Woods try to win. He closed with a 72 and tied for fifth.Stricker had only past champion status in 2006 and played so well that Tom Lehman considered — but did not take him — as a Ryder Cup pick.DIVOTS: Tiger Woods and Rory McIlroy will be playing an 18-hole exhibition at Mission Hills in China on Oct. 28, the Monday before the HSBC Champions in Shanghai. ... Phil Mickelson opted out of the pro-am at the BMW Championship because of personal reasons. He was not expected to arrive until Wednesday evening. ... The last time the BMW Championship (previously Western Open) was in the Chicago area and held somewhere other than Cog Hill was in 1990 at Butler National, which fell off the schedule because it has no female members.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — With his ailing back much improved after a one-week break from the PGA Tour, an upbeat Tiger Woods will tee off in Thursday's opening round of the BMW Championship in pursuit of his sixth win this season.Though the American world number one will be competing for the first time on the par-71 layout at Conway Farms Golf Club, he boasts an impressive record in the Chicago area.Not only has Woods twice clinched the PGA Championship at nearby Medinah, but he has also visited the winner's circle on five occasions at Cog Hill, twice in the BMW Championship and three times in its predecessor, the Western Open."Obviously it's very different compared to Cog Hill and Medinah, but it is a nice track," Woods said of Conway Farms after playing there in the pro-am competition on a muggy Wednesday."It's a little confined in the sense that it's going to be interesting to see how they're going to get the gallery around here, especially on the front nine, the bottlenecks over on (holes) five and six."All the times I've been in Chicago, it's a great sporting town. They come out and support their events. This will be a fun crowd."Asked by a reporter what he considered as his single greatest moment in the Chicago area, Woods replied: "Probably Medinah, winning there twice."When twice pressed to narrow that 'moment' down to just one, Woods grinned while replying each time: "Winning there twice."Woods heads into the third of the PGA Tour's four lucrative FedExCup playoff events ranked second in the points standings, behind Swede Henrik Stenson who took over at the top by winning the Deutsche Bank Championship nine days ago.While Woods finished a lowly 65th at the Deutsche Bank after closing with a two-over 73 in low-scoring conditions, he was especially pleased to have the next week off to work on his problem back."That was nice," the 14-times major champion smiled. "It was nice to have that week of treatment and strengthening, so that was all good. And I was practicing towards the end of the week."Woods had collapsed to his knees in pain with a back spasm on the 13th hole during the final round of The Barclays in New Jersey, the opening playoff event, forcing him to limit his practice time at the Deutsche Bank Championship.With his caddie, Joe LaCava, having scouted out the Conway Farms layout earlier this week, Woods likes the look of a relatively short course where birdies should be plentiful."We know we've got some easier holes out there, and if you drive the ball well here, you're going to have a lot of eight-irons on down, and those are some scoring clubs," Woods said."There's a lot of funneling where you can get to some of these pins. You don't have to fire right at the flag, you can funnel it in there. You can get the ball pretty stiff. The scores are going to be low."Woods, who has triumphed a season-high five times on the 2013 PGA Tour, has been grouped with Stenson and Masters champion Adam Scott for the first two rounds at Conway Farms.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Tiger Woods and Chicago used to be a great recipe for winning, or at least coming close.He won two PGA Championships at Medinah. He won the Western Open three times and the BMW Championship twice, all at Cog Hill. Woods has finished out of the top 20 only one time in 15 tournaments in the Chicago area, including the 2003 U.S. Open at Olympia Fields.But he has played the Windy City just twice since his last win (by eight shots) in 2009, and neither time was particularly memorable — a tie for 15th in 2010 that kept him from qualifying for the Tour Championship for the first time in his career, and an 0-3-1 record at Medinah last year in the Ryder Cup.His next shot is at Conway Farms, a course Woods had never seen until the pro-am Wednesday at the BMW Championship."I normally don't work this hard in a pro-am, but I had to do a little bit of work because I wasn't out here yesterday," Woods said.Conway Farms, a Tom Fazio design north of Chicago, becomes the third course in as many years to host the second-oldest golf tournament in America. At a time when 70 players are trying to qualify for the 30-man field at the Tour Championship, some introductions are in order.Luke Donald is a member and knows the course better than anyone in the field. Zach Johnson is among the few who played Conway Farms when it hosted the NCAA Championship in 1997. Steve Stricker drove down from Wisconsin on Sunday to see the course for the first time. A Western Golf Association official said about half the field was practicing Monday, a large number compared with other events, especially this late in the season.He sent out his caddie, Joe LaCava, to scout the course ahead of him."It helps that Joey has been out here a couple days getting the lines, and we were discussing a lot of it today," Woods said.Woods said it was different from Cog Hill and Medinah but a "nice track." He mostly remembered how confined the layout is on the front nine, restricting gallery movement on a couple of holes. And the closing stretch of holes — a reachable par 4 with water down the entire left side, a strong par 4 at No. 16, a downhill par 3 framed by mounds, and a par 5 closing hole at 570 yards with water in front of the green.Adding a wrinkle to a new course is that blistering hot conditions earlier in the week were supposed to yield to cooler temperatures — the low 50s in the morning — the rest of the week and a wind out of a different direction."That's where I have to rely on Joey a little bit, and we were discussing the weather forecast and how it's going to change a little bit, and discussing the different lines and different options," Woods said. "As I said, we did a little bit of work today, more so than we normally do."Woods has won five times this year, bringing his PGA Tour career total to 79 as he closes in on Sam Snead's record of 82. Woods doesn't stray much from his schedule, and because he wins so often, he tends to win at the same courses. The last time he won on a golf course he had never played was at The Grove outside London for the 2006 American Express Championship.The BMW Championship is the third FedEx Cup playoff event, and the hardest to get some separation. The field has been reduced to 70 players, so for the first time during golf's version of the postseason, there is no cut.The goal is to get into the top 30 for the FedEx Cup finale at the Tour Championship, where everyone will have a shot at the $10 million prize, and they are guaranteed a spot in at least three of the major championships next year.Better yet is getting into the top five in the FedEx Cup standings — those players only have to win at East Lake to capture the FedEx Cup.Henrik Stenson, coming off a win at the Deutsche Bank Championship, is No. 1 by a small margin. Masters champion Adam Scott is right behind. The onus is on Rory McIlroy, who is No. 41 and figures a seventh-place finish is needed to get into the Tour Championship, a consolation prize for a season gone wrong. Donald, meanwhile, is No. 54 and faces a tougher task to avoid missing the Tour Championship for the first time in five years."I guess if there was ever a year to struggle, to coming into an event needing a big week, this is a good one to come to," Donald said.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Former European Footballer of the Year Andriy Shevchenko struggled on his professional golf debut in Ukraine but Ernie Els gave him 10 out of 10 for effort in what was always going to be a tough task.Shevchenko, the former AC Milan and Chelsea striker who has a handicap of two and plays left-handed, plunged to a 12-over-par 84 in the opening round of the Kharkov Superior Cup in his native Ukraine on Thursday."He must have had a lot of pressure going in there but he loves the game," former world number one Els, a four-times major champion, told Reuters after carding a level-par 71 in the opening round of the PGA Tour's BMW Championship."He's a great student of the game, he asks lot of questions and he wants to get better. Golf is his passion. Good for him."South African Els got to know Shevchenko well after playing several practice rounds with the former Ukrainian international, especially at Queenwood Golf Club in Surrey, when they both lived in England.Though Shevchenko ended the day 20 strokes behind his pacesetting compatriot Victor Riu in the second-tier European Challenge Tour event, Els felt the ex-football player could flourish in an appropriate golfing environment."It depends on the golf course," Els said after finishing his own round at Conway Farms Golf Club outside Chicago eight shots behind leader Brandt Snedeker."If Andriy has a course where he can reach the par-fives with not too much rough, where it's benign, he can shoot par or better than par."He has shot a lot of low rounds around Queenwood, in London, so he can play. But doing it on weekends with the guys and doing it in a tournament is completely different. But you've got to give him 10 out of 10 for effort."Asked to assess the strengths in Shevchenko's golf game, Els replied: "He's got a great head. He never gives up. He is always fighting. He hits it quite well. He can hit it very straight."He hasn't got too many really bad things in his game but obviously it's a long way going from the amateur game to the pro (game)."Shevchenko, 36, himself agreed that he had succumbed to pressure in the opening round of the Kharkov Superior Cup."It's a completely different game when you are under pressure," the 2004 European Footballer of the Year said on the European Tour's website.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Three late birdies gave Phil Mickelson a welcome boost at the BMW Championship on Thursday after he came into the penultimate FedExCup playoff event unprepared and effectively flying blind.The American left-hander had not seen the par-71 layout at Conway Farms Golf Club until he teed off in the opening round, and had to rely a great deal on his experienced caddie, Jim "Bones" Mackay, as he fired a one-under-par 70."Yeah, it wasn't the way I wanted to prepare for an event, having not seen a course," Mickelson told reporters after birdies at the 14th, 15th and 16th helped him cover the back nine in two-under 34."I wanted to get in here and play a practice round Tuesday and Wednesday, and obviously I wasn't able to do that. But Bones guided me around here. I'll feel more comfortable tomorrow."I'll have to get a little bit more aggressive. I think I was a little cautious today not knowing what to expect. But the golf course is in wonderful shape. The greens are spectacular."Mickelson, who ended the round tied for 18th, seven shots off the lead, was reluctant to give any specific reason for his failure to arrive at Conway Farms for the tournament build-up.Asked to explain why he had arrived only in time for Thursday's opening round, the world number three replied: "Not really, I can't. I got in last night."Asked whether a family matter had caused his late arrival, Mickelson replied: "Everything is fine. I'm here now, I'm ready to play. But I just needed to be a little cautious this first round before I attack it tomorrow."Mickelson, who clinched his fifth major title at the British Open in July, had been expecting to produce better form in the PGA Tour's playoff events after finishing the series opener, The Barclays, in a tie for sixth after closing with a 65."I didn't play like I thought I was going to at (the) Deutsche Bank (Championship) after that final round at Barclays," he said. "And I didn't have a good practice session today, and it hasn't quite clicked."But it started to come in the last nine. I started to hit some good shots, but I don't feel like I'm sharp. I don't feel like I'm prepared, and I'm going to have to kind of play my way into this tournament."Mickelson said his frame of mind standing on the first tee had not been affected by failure to play any practice rounds on the course."That wasn't the issue," he explained. "I actually had a warm-up session that wasn't great, and I was more nervous because of that. But I was able to kind of get it turned around."My swing and my game does not feel far off from the levels that I was playing at this summer, but it is still a fraction off. It just needs to kind of click. I'm optimistic that (on) back nine, that it may have done that."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Brandt Snedeker was making so many birdies that even an 18-foot putt looked like a mere tap-in.When he finished his amazing run Thursday in the BMW Championship, he had seven straight birdies on his card and an 8-under 63 at blustery Conway Farms."You get on runs like that, you get excited for the next hole because you know something good is going to happen, because you're in such a good frame of mind and everything is going in the right direction," Snedeker said.In this case, everything was going in — a 15-foot putt from the fringe on the 13th, another 15-footer on the next hole when he used the blade of his sand wedge to bump the ball out of the short rough, and a 40-footer from the fringe on the 17th stood out to him.That gave him a one-shot lead over Zach Johnson in the third FedEx Cup playoff event. Tiger Woods sounded disgusted with his round of 66, mainly because he had a pair of three-putt bogeys and missed a 4-foot birdie putt over his last five holes."I'm not exactly real happy," Woods said. "I played well, and I just didn't get much out of that round. I missed three little short ones in there and then played the par 5s even par. That's just not very good."Steve Stricker, Charl Schwartzel and Kevin Streelman also were at 66.The opening round was mainly about the debut of Conway Farms, a Tom Fazio design north of Chicago which has a blend of strong holes and plenty of birdie opportunities on par 4s where players hit wedge for their second shot. Low scoring was predicted, and Snedeker's round was proof of that.But as the wind picked up and shifted directions, the course was far from a pushover.Rickie Fowler opened with a pair of double bogeys, followed by a pair of bogeys. He rallied for a 77. Rory McIlroy made a double bogey — his ninth of the FedEx Cup playoffs — on his second hole, and then three-putted from 4 feet for a triple bogey and staggered to a 78. Lee Westwood, fighting severe pain in his back and ribs, had an 80."There's a good mixture of really hard holes and really good birdie opportunities. I think that makes for exciting golf," Phil Mickelson said after opening with a 70. "That's why we have such a discrepancy in scores."The top 30 players in the FedEx Cup after the BMW Championship advance to the Tour Championship next week and a shot at the $10 million prize.Westwood is at No. 30 and likely played himself out of a trip to East Lake, though he didn't appear to be healthy enough to play. McIlroy is at No. 41 and all but took himself out of the Tour Championship. He needs to finish somewhere around seventh in the 70-man field. His 78 put him in a tie for 66th."It's going to be a very uphill task," McIlroy said. "I'll try to get to even par as quickly as I can."That still might not be enough the way Snedeker is playing.Snedeker is at No. 9 in the FedEx Cup and assured of being the first defending FedEx Cup champion to make it to the Tour Championship. He is trying to move into the top five, for those players have a clear shot at the $10 million bonus — all they have to do is win at East Lake no matter what anyone else does.He wouldn't have imagined this kind of round at the start of the day. He didn't warm up well and didn't feel good with the putter. Snedeker missed the 10th fairway to start his round and had to make an 18-footer for par. He missed the 11th green and had to scramble for par. He missed a good look at birdie from the 12 feet on the next hole.The next hour was a blur."When I get going good, I realize it doesn't happen all the time, so I instantly become more aggressive," he said. "I think being a good putter helps, too, because I don't really have to hit it three feet eight times in a row. Just got to hit the green sometimes and it's going to happen. I realize these runs are few and far between, so when I get on one, I try to run as hard as I can for as long as I can."The blustery conditions kept scoring from getting out of hand, and the average score was at 71.3.No one had less experience on the course than Mickelson, who had some personal issues earlier in the week that kept him from playing the pro-am. He didn't arrive in Chicago until Wednesday night and had never seen the course until he stood on the first tee Thursday.Mickelson did not want to talk about what kept him away. When asked if it was a family matter, he said, "Everything is fine. I'm here now, I'm ready to play. But I just needed to be a little cautious this first round before I attack it tomorrow."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — The PGA Tour is a place where unlucky breaks and honest reckoning intersect. If players could coast on their accomplishments, Rory McIlroy would be coming into the BMW Championship with wind at his back instead of his back against the wall.At No. 41 in the FedEx Cup standings, McIlroy probably needs a top-eight finish in the field of 70 at Conway Farms Golf Club this week to qualify for the 30-man Tour Championship next week in Atlanta. Last year, he entered the BMW Championship ranked first in the standings, his game so grooved he spoke of "just trying to hit it in the fairway, hit it on the green, hole the putt, go to the next hole and do it all over again."Those were the days when McIlroy's sky-high self-belief created a mind-set in which "you're seeing every putt go in," he said.That was then. Now McIlroy, 24, is speaking of shoring up his short game, especially his putting. In 2012, on his way to topping the PGA Tour money list, McIlroy was 82nd in the tour putting statistic. He is No. 121 this year."I'm just not getting up and down as much as I used to," McIlroy told reporters Tuesday, adding, "That's where I'm throwing shots away."It was more of the same during McIlroy's pro-am round Wednesday as he struck his irons well but putted erratically. Joe Macchione, an Evans scholar and recent Illinois graduate who replaced J. P. Fitzgerald as McIlroy's caddie for the day, was impressed by how well McIlroy hit the ball off the tee."Inside 100 yards he's all right," Macchione said. "I'd say if anything, that's what he could be improving on."McIlroy, who is No. 4 in the world after starting the year at No. 1, has not had a top-three finish since placing second at the Valero Texas Open in April, the week before the Masters. In 10 starts since, McIlroy's highest finish has been a tie for eighth at the Players Championship and the P.G.A. Championship.By this time last year, McIlroy had four tour victories. His off-season switch to Nike equipment, worth at least $20 million a year, has borne the brunt of the blame for the performance drop-off, but McIlroy will not point a finger at his clubs."I'm really happy with everything that I've got in my bag, and I've had the best part of eight or nine months to play with it," he said before the P.G.A. Championship last month. "Yeah, it could have been a valid point in maybe January, February, but I don't think it is now."The simplest way to explain McIlroy's troubles is that he developed a couple of bad swing habits that eroded his confidence. The only way for McIlroy to regain his confidence is to play his way into contention, which creates this conundrum: which comes first, self-belief or results?"I think the two go hand in hand," he said. "It's much easier to have that positive attitude and that bounce in your step when you're playing well and making birdies and the game comes a little easier to you."McIlroy is not the only former world No. 1 outside the top 30 in the FedEx Cup standings. The transplanted Englishman Luke Donald, whose home course is Conway Farms, led the PGA and European Tours in 2011, a year before McIlroy matched his feat. Donald is No. 54 in the standings, which means he probably needs a top-four finish to qualify for the Tour Championship.Donald described the year as "disappointing" and said, "It's been frustrating at times."Like McIlroy, who abruptly changed management teams in May, Donald has shaken up his world in an effort to regain mastery over it. He recently switched instructors, parting with his longtime swing coach Pat Goss last month to work with Chuck Cook, whose students include the P.G.A. Championship winner Jason Dufner."Outside of telling my brother I didn't want him to caddie for me anymore, it was probably the second-toughest decision I've ever had to make on the golf course," Donald said, adding: "It's just one of those things that was very tough but I felt like I had do to. I felt like if I didn't at least try something different, I would have regrets."If athletes are compulsive tinkerers, it is because there is no such thing as standing still in sports. If you are not moving forward, you are backtracking. McIlroy played in four tour events the first three months of the year; in retrospect, that was not enough, he said.In his continuing effort to regain his groove, McIlroy said he planned to play in eight tournaments around the world in the next three months. "I've got a Steve Stricker season left to play," he joked.The 46-year-old Stricker, in his first year of what he described as semiretirement, has five top-eight finishes, including three seconds, in 11 starts. At eighth in the FedEx Cup standings, Stricker is a lock to make the Tour Championship, which means the only event he will miss next week is a planned elk-hunting trip with friends.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Brandt Snedeker wielded a red-hot putter to pile up a PGA Tour season-best seven consecutive birdies on the way to a one-shot lead in Thursday's opening round of the BMW Championship.The fast-talking American fired a flawless eight-under-par 63 despite tricky, gusting conditions at Conway Farms Golf Club to seize control of the third of the PGA Tour's four lucrative FedExCup playoff events.Helped by a 40-foot putt which he sank from the back fringe of the green at the par-three 17th, his eighth hole of the day, Snedeker reeled off seven consecutive birdies from the 13th to rocket to the top of the leaderboard.Compatriot Zach Johnson opened with a seven-birdie 64 and world number one Tiger Woods shot a 66 to end the day level with fellow Americans Steve Stricker and Kevin Streelman, and South African Charl Schwartzel, but Snedeker commanded the spotlight."It was one of those days where everything seemed to go right in the middle of the round," Snedeker, the reigning FedExCup champion, told reporters after totaling only 22 putts in an eight-birdie display."Got off to kind of a slow start and made a great birdie from off the green on 13 that got everything moving in the right direction. To roll off seven birdies in a row kind of came out of nowhere. I wasn't expecting it."When I get going good, I realize it doesn't happen all the time, so I instantly become more aggressive. I think being a good putter helps, too, because I don't really have to hit it (to) three feet eight times in a row."Snedeker, a six-times winner on the PGA Tour who has triumphed twice this season, was a little disappointed he did not end up with a lower score."I made that putt on one (for seven straight birdies) and really felt like 61 or 60 was very doable," he said."I had a really good chance of doing it, and just didn't make any putts coming in after that. But I'm in a great frame of mind, looking forward to the rest of the week."Excited I got my one low one in me out of the way early and now I can go out and play some solid golf the rest of the week."PGA Tour veteran Stricker, long known as one of the best putters on the U.S. circuit, played in the same group as Snedeker and was mightily impressed with his form."Watching Snedeker pouring it in from all over the place is always fun," said Stricker, who moved into contention with a round that included six birdies and a lone bogey."He's probably the best putter I've ever seen. The guy makes it, or looks like he's going to make it, from just about anywhere. He hit it great, gave himself a lot of putts and made a lot of putts."Woods, seeking his sixth PGA Tour victory this season, was not in the best of moods after failing to birdie any of the three par-fives On the par-71 layout."I'm not exactly real happy," said the 14-times major winner, who mixed seven birdies with two bogeys. "I certainly wasted a lot of shots out there today. I missed three short ones (putts) and played the par-fives stupendously."One of those days. I played well, and I just didn't get much out of that round."The day's average score was 71.31 and several of the game's biggest names finished much higher than that.Northern Irish world number four Rory McIlroy, the defending champion, battled to a 78 while former world number one Lee Westwood fared even worse, carding a nine-over 80.Seventy players have qualified for the elite BMW Championship, the PGA Tour's penultimate playoff event, and any improvement in the overall FedExCup points standings after Sunday's final round could be crucial.Of the 30 who advance to next week's season-ending Tour Championship, any of the top five would automatically clinch FedExCup honors and a staggering $10 million bonus with victory in Atlanta.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Rory McIlroy's dwindling hopes of qualifying for next week's season-ending Tour Championship in Atlanta all but disappeared on Friday after he struggled once again at the BMW Championship.The Northern Irish world number four, winner here last year during a storming finish to his 2012 campaign, battled to a six-over-par 77 to end the second round at Conway Farms Golf Club stone last in the elite field of 70.Only 30 players will advance to the Tour Championship at East Lake after this week's FedExCup playoff event and McIlroy is now projected to wind up 53rd in the points standings, leaving him with a likely four-week break from competition."I'm just not scoring well," the 24-year-old told reporters after finishing a staggering 24 strokes off the pace at 13-over 155, having mixed two birdies with six bogeys and a double at the drivable par-four seventh."I missed it on the wrong side, I'm missing greens with wedges, and just don't have my scoring hat on. I feel like I'm hitting the ball pretty well, I'm just not scoring."McIlroy had been encouraged by "glimpses" of good form in the first two playoff events but has since regressed after the PGA Tour took a week's break following the Deutsche Bank Championship."I didn't play any competitive golf, but you come back and you get a card in your hand again, it's a lot different just practicing than being out there," said the mop-haired Northern Irishman, who had won two major titles by the age of 23."Just not scoring as well as I need to. I felt really good after the PGA (Championship). When I've actually had a little bit of pressure, that's when I've played my best, so that's a good sign."The bad sign is that I'm not in contention too much. It's frustrating, but I'm trying to stay as patient as I can."McIlroy has endured a frustrating 2013 campaign after moving to the top of the world rankings last year and claiming the order of merit titles on both sides of the Atlantic.In 15 starts on the PGA Tour this season, he has recorded just five top-10s, including a missed cut at the British Open in July."Everything sort of came easy last year," said McIlroy. "Now I'm working harder, hitting more balls, spending more time on the range because I'm searching for it (consistent form)."And that's what's frustrating. But the fact that I'm working hard and I'm not really getting much out of it, if I can keep patient and keep working hard, I'm sure it'll turn around."Asked how he tried to stay patient, McIlroy replied: "I'm 24. I've got a lot of time in this game still. I've got obviously a few tournaments left this year."I'm sort of looking forward to getting to December and drawing a line under the season and start fresh in '14."As for next week's Tour Championship, that has already been inked out by McIlroy."No chance," he smiled. "Yeah, four weeks off. I'll take a little bit of time off and just get my head sharp a little bit, get refreshed and practice and get ready for the last sort of stint of the season."It's nice to get a few weeks off, a little bit of a rest and a bit of time to work on my game, and get ready for that Asian trip."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Jim Furyk crouched to study the 3 feet of green between his ball and the cup, a short distance with such large implications.He thought back to a similar putt — slightly downhill, sliding to the right — that he made the last time he won a tournament three long years ago. That one at the Tour Championship was worth $10 million. Friday at the BMW Championship, it was for a piece of golf history.Furyk capped off a magical day at Conway Farms with a birdie on his last hole to become the sixth player in PGA Tour history to shoot 59.And with a bogey on his card, no less."I guess the moment kind of struck me the most at No. 9 when I hit the wedge shot in there close, and the crowd erupted and I started looking around and it just hit me how many people had come over to that side to see the finish and how excited the crowd was," Furyk said. "It was kind of like winning a golf tournament, to be honest with you. It made it that much more fun."It was a day he won't forget, in the same town — the Chicago suburbs, anyway — where he won his lone major at the U.S. Open in 2003.After starting his round on No. 10, Furyk stood in the ninth fairway, 103 yards away and a gap wedge in his hand, and realized what was at stake."I said, 'How many opportunities are you going to have in life to do this again?'" he said. "Got to take advantage of it. Tried to knock it in there tight and make it as easy on yourself as you can."The gallery lined both sides of the fairway about 150 yards down from the green and gave him a huge ovation when he walked onto the green. One fan screamed out, "Jimmy, I'll give it to you!" Furyk smiled and waved at him as if he were more than willing to pick it up.He rolled it in and repeatedly pumped his fist, turning for the gallery in the grandstands to see, and then he hugged caddie Mike "Fluff" Cowan and tapped him on the head. It looked like a Sunday afternoon, and had the occasion of a winning putt.There's work left for the trophy. Furyk was tied for the lead with Brandt Snedeker, who was nine shots clear of Furyk at the start of the second round and shot 68.Snedeker knew Furyk was closing in on the lead; he just didn't realize Furyk had opened with a 1-over 72 and was on his way to a piece of history. That changed when Snedeker saw a video board as he was finishing on No. 18 that Furyk needed a birdie on No. 9 for a 59."I thought, 'What the heck? Are you serious? There's no way," Snedeker said. "On a day like this when the wind is blowing 20 mph out of the north, I don't think anybody out here saw that score coming."The next best score in the second round was a 65 by Jordan Spieth and Jimmy Walker. Zach Johnson was alone in third after a 70, three shots behind. No one else was closer than five shots.Tiger Woods thought he finished with a 70 to be five back, only to be given a two-shot penalty when video showed his ball moved while he was removing twigs around it on the first hole. That gave him a quadruple-bogey 8 on the opening hole and a 72, leaving him seven shots behind — and paired with Sergio Garcia in the third round.It was the first 59 on the PGA Tour since Stuart Appleby in the final round of The Greenbrier Classic in 2010. The others with a 59 were Al Geiberger in the 1977 Memphis Classic; Chip Beck in the 1991 Las Vegas Invitational; David Duval in the 1999 Bob Hope Classic; and Paul Goydos in the 2010 John Deere Classic."There's not much I could have improved on today," Furyk said.For a change, everything went right at the end. Furyk has been haunted in the last two years with a bogey on the 16th hole that cost him a shot at the 2012 U.S. Open; a double bogey at Firestone last year that kept him from winning a World Golf Championship; a bogey-bogey finish in the Ryder Cup to lose a key match to Garcia last year in Chicago; and a one-shot lead he failed to hold just last month at the PGA Championship.Making it worse, he was left off a U.S. team for the first time in 15 years when Presidents Cup captain Fred Couples did not make him a wild-card selection. On this day, Furyk gave Couples 59 reasons to reconsider.Furyk described himself as "grouchy" on Thursday after having breakfast with two friends, Steve Stricker and Johnson, who were talking about the Presidents Cup."But I felt like last night I kind of kicked myself in the rear end and said, 'You know, it's done with. It's over with. There's nothing I can do to change it now. It's over and let's just focus on this week.'"Furyk was striking the ball so well in the windy conditions — he hit every fairway and missed only one green — that he made only three putts longer than 12 feet, including a 15-foot par putt on the 16th hole. He opened with three straight birdies, holed out from the fairway on the 15th for an eagle, finished with two birdies and had a 28 on his card.Furyk realized a 4 under on the front nine would give him golf's magic number. It looked promising when he rolled in a 25-foot birdie on the third, and his 4-iron on the fourth hole bounced toward the flag and settled 5 feet away. He was 11 under through 13 holes, needing one more birdie.And then he three-putted for bogey from 30 feet.The key to his round might have come at No. 7, when he holed a birdie putt from just inside 12 feet to get back to 11 under.Two holes, one birdie, and a 59. Even in the FedEx Cup playoffs, the math was that simple. And he knew with a par 5 at the eighth and a front pin on the ninth, he would have two good chances. He came up short of the green on No. 8 and made par, and then played the ninth to perfection.Brian Davis, who had finished an hour earlier, came back to the ninth green to watch Furyk finish. Johnson finished when Furyk still had two holes to play and was told about his bid for 59."He's on No. 8 to go to 59? I don't have anything to say about that. That is ridiculous," Johnson said.Furyk signed his glove with "59" and put the date beneath his signature for the World Golf Hall of Fame. He signed leftover golf balls for the volunteers helping his group. And then, he reached into his pocket and pulled out another golf ball."That's the one that went in on 9," he said with a grin. "And it's staying with me."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Tiger Woods was involved in another rules violation Friday in the BMW Championship, this time getting the two-shot penalty before he left the golf course.Video evidence indicated that his golf ball moved ever so slightly as Woods was removing a twig from an area under the trees behind the first green at Conway Farms. What made this case unusual is that the video was taken by a videographer working for PGA Tour Entertainment, and the infraction was noticed by someone editing the film.Slugger White, vice president of competition at the PGA Tour, stopped Woods before he signed for a 70. Woods didn't believe the ball moved out of its position, and White said the world's No. 1 player still wasn't convinced after watching the video."He said he didn't feel he could see that," White said. "I felt like that was OK, but the ball did move."That turned a double bogey on No. 1 into a quadruple-bogey 8. It turned his 70 into a 72. Instead of being five shots behind Brandt Snedeker and Jim Furyk — the sixth player in PGA Tour history with a 59 — Woods was seven shots back going into the weekend.And then it got even worse. Those two shots put him in the same pairing Saturday with Sergio Garcia, who got into a verbal battle with Woods at The Players Championship this year that ended badly when the Spaniard jokingly said he would have Woods over for dinner at the U.S. Open and serve him fried chicken.They have not played together since that dispute.Woods did not stop for comment after reviewing the tape.At the Masters this year, Woods was tied for the lead late in the second round when his wedge to the par-5 15th hole hit the flag and caromed into the water. He dropped a yard or so behind his original position to avoid hitting the flag and escaped with bogey. Only later was it discovered that he took the wrong drop option and should have been penalized two shots.Augusta National issued the penalty, but allowed him to stay in the tournament even though Woods signed for the wrong score. Augusta National cited Rule 33-7 that allows a committee to waive disqualification for an incorrect scorecard, which led to passionate debate whether he was getting special treatment. The club said it was aware of the violation, but chose not to have Woods review it before he signed his card.Unlike the incident at the Masters, a television viewer did not call in the possible infraction. White said a freelance camera man working for the tour captured it on video. An editor at headquarters going over the footage thought there was movement of the ball and notified the PGA Tour.The film was sent over to tour officials on site at Conway Farms, and it was reviewed at the tournament before bringing in Woods for consultation.The movement was slight, though it appears to have moved down when Woods touches a small branch to the right of the golf ball, and it doesn't appear to return to its original position. White said Woods could not have seen that from his position looking down at the top of the ball.Woods accepted his two-shot penalty at the Masters when he became aware of his bad drop. Friday was different. Even after looking at the video, Woods wasn't convinced the ball moved from its position."He knew there was movement there, but it's like (he) was very adamant that it oscillated — it stayed there," White said. "But this video was at the site, and the ball did in fact move."Asked to describe Woods' reaction, White said, "He was a little disbelieving. How's that?'"It was the third time this year Woods was given a two-shot penalty for a rules violation. At his first event of the season in Abu Dhabi, he took relief from an imbedded lie in a sandy area covered with vines. It was determined that relief was not allowed in the sand. He was docked two shots before signing his card, and it caused him to miss the cut.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — As he exited the scoring area at Conway Farms Golf Club, Jason Kokrak came upon a group of autograph seekers. He had no illusions about whose signature they coveted."Waiting for Rory?" he said, referring to the former world No. 1 Rory McIlroy, who played in the group behind Kokrak in the first round of the BMW Championship. "That's O.K.," Kokrak said. "I'll sign."The spectators were thrilled to get his autograph, even if a few had to look at it afterward to see who he was. Kokrak may not have the same name recognition as McIlroy, but on Thursday he produced the better score, carding a one-under 70 to McIlroy's 78.Like McIlroy, Kokrak got off to a sluggish start this season, with one top-70 finish and four missed cuts in his first eight starts. Kokrak managed to turn it around this summer while McIlroy, the defending champion, continues to search in the tall grass and the sand for his game.In March, Kokrak said, he was consumed with worry over making the cut (and keeping his PGA Tour card). How he finds himself six months later contending for a spot in the 30-player Tour Championship next week is one of the vagaries of golf, in which a player's fortunes can change with a single highly calibrated swing or stroke.The fortunes of the first-round leader, Brandt Snedeker, turned on the 13th hole, his third of the day, when he sank a 14-foot putt for birdie. Snedeker, a two-time winner on the tour this year, has been uncharacteristically inconsistent on the greens, but suddenly he could not miss. He made six more birdies in succession by draining putts from inside 6 feet and from outside 37 feet on his way to a 63.After months of attempts by Snedeker to iron out his stroke on the greens, something clicked. As described by the players, it is a mystical process, somewhat similar to searching for hours for a missing piece to a puzzle and then discovering it right under your nose. "Putting has finally got where I want it to," Snedeker said. "Now I've got to get the ball-striking back where it was at the beginning of the year. It's always a constant struggle."Phil Mickelson knows what Snedeker means. He won the British Open with a closing 66 and came up 40 places short at the Deutsche Bank Championship after opening with a 63. A personal matter that he did not wish to discuss forced him out of the pro-am here, which meant he did not see the course for the first time until Thursday.He was two-over after 13, then made three consecutive birdies to shoot a 70 and stay in range of Snedeker, who is one stroke ahead of Zach Johnson and three in front of a group that includes Tiger Woods.On one of his swings on the back nine, Mickelson said, he hit it exactly the way he wanted to "and it clicked."First comes the click, then comes the confidence, said Kokrak, whose season turned around on the final day of March, after a five-event stretch that saw him miss four cuts and place 79th, when he finished ninth at the Houston Open."Just putting yourself in a position where you're making a run at a tournament, like I did in Houston, you're going to get more confidence," Kokrak said.Kokrak's golf spurt came like his growth spurt — without warning and over a few heady months. Kokrak, who was born in Canada but reared in Ohio, was 5 feet 4 inches at the start of his junior year of high school and 6 feet by the end. His eight extra inches added significant length to his drives. No longer was he a player who had to rely on his short game to shoot a low score.Kokrak did not lose his touch around the greens and this year he is sixth in driving distance. After playing his way this year out of a wilderness of missed cuts, he is confident that if he stays the course he will score is first victory on tour. In the meantime, his friends who are accountants have informed him that according to their math he needs to finish in the top four this week to qualify for the playoff finale in Atlanta."I believe in my game and I believe in what I'm doing," Kokrak said.If he was not so resolute about his Midwestern upbringing, Kokrak probably could be representing the International team at next month's President's Cup. He started out with a Canadian passport after his Canadian-born mother gave birth to him while visiting her family in Ontario.Kokrak was a teenager when he obtained his United States passport. After that, something just clicked. "Everything I know is from northeastern Ohio," he said, adding, "I don't think I could ever renounce my U.S. citizenship."
CHICAGO — The Chase for the Sprint Cup championship begins Sunday at Chicagoland Speedway, with the first of 10 races that will cap Nascar's season and determine its champion. The lead-up to the race, though, has been marred by cheating allegations and questions about the integrity of the 12-driver field.Drivers met reporters at a Navy Pier ballroom Thursday morning, a day after a report was published by The Associated Press that detailed questionable radio transmissions between the teams of two drivers whose cars have the same manufacturer, Ford. The communications seemed to indicate that David Gilliland of Front Row Motorsports allowed Joey Logano of Penske Racing to pass him at the end of Saturday's race at Richmond International Raceway. Logano finished 22nd, one place ahead of Gilliland, and earned a spot in the Chase."Hopefully, we'll get something out of that," Gilliland's spotter said on the radio, according to the report.Logano on Thursday denied cheating and said he believed his place in the Chase was secure."That is stuff that happens week in and week out with spotters," he said. "They are up there communicating back and forth trying to work deals out."Nascar said it was still considering whether it would punish Gilliland and Logano. On Monday, Nascar decided to penalize other drivers for manipulating Saturday's race based on their actions and radio discussions.Ryan Newman was leading when Clint Bowyer spun out. After the restart, Martin Truex Jr., Bowyer's teammate at Michael Waltrip Racing, gained ground and claimed a place in the Chase. Newman lost both his lead and his spot in the Chase until Nascar's penalties returned him to the Chase field and removed Truex.Bowyer declined to discuss the spin and would not definitively say that it was not on purpose."I've had a rough few days, probably rougher than I've ever had," he said.The outrage has put Nascar's unwritten rules on trial. Drivers have long allowed teammates to pass them, or even take the lead for a number of laps, to earn points in the standings. The difference with the reaction to Saturday's race appeared to be a combination of the stakes of the Chase, the overwhelming evidence and the fact that the outcome of the race was affected."It's been a part of our sport for a long time, but manipulating the race to change the outcome is an entirely different perspective, an entirely different situation," Newman said.Jimmie Johnson said, "If you're bold enough to make that direct an admission on the radio, then you're going to pay the price."There was discussion, in response to the growing controversy, of adding Truex and Jeff Gordon, who also lost his position after Bowyer's spin, to the Chase field. That now looks unlikely."You realize that people all want to do things for their teammates to help them, but you also know there's certain lines that have to be drawn," a frustrated Gordon told reporters Wednesday.So although the Chase is set to begin, there has been little time to talk about racing."I think our sport, TV ratings, attendance, things are all trending the right direction," Johnson said. "This is the last thing any of us want."
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Jim Furyk became only the sixth player to shoot a magical 59 on the PGA Tour with a sizzling display of near flawless shot-making in Friday's second round of the BMW Championship at Conway Farms Golf Club.Despite breezy conditions on the outskirts of Chicago, the American piled up 11 birdies, one bogey and an eagle at the par-four 15th to fire a course record 12-under 59 that left him in a tie for the lead after 36 holes with compatriot Brandt Snedeker.Needing to birdie his final hole, the par-four ninth, for the magical number, Furyk split the fairway off the tee, struck a superb gap wedge from 103 yards to three feet and calmly rolled in the putt before pumping his right fist in delight."It'll sink in later," Furyk told reporters after rebounding in stunning fashion from his opening 72."I'm excited ... but I'll have to calm down later on tonight and realize that I've got myself in contention in a golf tournament where I was, whatever, nine back starting the day."I still have a good weekend ahead of me. I'm excited for that. But no, I'll enjoy these next few hours at least and have fun with it."Furyk's electrifying score lowered the course record of 63, set by fellow American Snedeker the previous day, and left him with an 11-under total of 131 in the third of the PGA Tour's four FedExCup playoff events.He hit 14 of 14 fairways, reached 17 of 18 greens in regulation and totaled only 23 putts."I've played a couple of good ones (rounds) throughout my career," said the 16-times PGA Tour winner whose only major victory came at the 2003 U.S. Open. "I remember a 62 at Doral once where I think the next best score was 67."That kind of defines really good rounds is a guy goes out and shoots four or five shots better than the rest of the field."But that magic number, it's hard to get under 30 on (one) nine, and then it's really hard to get under 60 for a day. It definitely played some tricks with my head on the way in."Furyk set up his astonishing round with an explosive outward nine of eight-under 28 that included his eagle at the 15th where he holed out from 115 yards in the fairway.Further birdies at the second, third, and fourth raised hopes of a possible first 58 on the U.S. circuit but the 43-year-old American made his only mistake of the day with a three-putt bogey at the fifth.However, he immediately recovered by sinking an 11-foot birdie putt at the seventh and, despite failing to birdie the par-five eighth, signed off in style with another birdie at the ninth."A little hectic down the stretch," Furyk smiled. "Just told myself on nine, 'How many opportunities are you going to have in your life to do this? Got to take advantage of it.'"I tried to knock it in there tight and make it as easy on yourself as you can. There's not much I could have improved on today, so I think I'll sleep well."The five players who have shot 59s on the PGA Tour are Americans Al Geiberger (1977 Memphis Classic), Chip Beck (1991 Las Vegas Invitational), David Duval (1999 Bob Hope Classic) and Paul Goydos (2010 John Deere Classic) as well as Australian Stuart Appleby (2010 Greenbrier Classic).
PITTSBURGH — Gerrit Cole pitched seven strong innings and got home run help from Marlon Byrd and Jose Tabata, leading the Pittsburgh Pirates past the Chicago Cubs 2-1 Saturday night.The Pirates have won five of six. They began the day one game behind St. Louis for the NL Central lead.Cole (8-7) gave up one run and five hits. The rookie struck out seven and walked three.Tony Watson pitched the eighth and Mark Melancon worked the ninth to finish off the five-hitter and earn his 15th save in 17 chances.Byrd hit a solo home run off James Russell (1-6) in the seventh to put Pittsburgh ahead 2-1.It was Byrd's 23rd home run of the season and second in 17 games since being acquired Aug. 27 from the New York Mets in a trade. He is hitting .323 for the Pirates.The Pirates, looking for their first postseason berth since 1992, got a tying home from Tabata in the sixth. Pittsburgh maintained a 2½-game lead over Cincinnati in the NL wild-card race.Chicago got its run on Nate Schierholtz's RBI double to right-center in the first inning. Anthony Rizzo also tried to score on the hit from first base, but was thrown out on a strong relay from Byrd to second baseman Neil Walker to the plate.The 23-year-old Cole has been outstanding in his last six starts, going 3-2 with a 2.29 ERA with 35 strikeouts and nine walks. He won for just the second time in his last eight home starts.Scott Baker pitched well again in his second start with the Cubs since recovering from reconstructive elbow surgery, allowing one run and three hits in six innings with four strikeouts and no walks.Last Sunday, in his first major league outing since Sept. 22, 2011, with Minnesota, Baker pitched five scoreless innings against Milwaukee.NOTES: Pittsburgh LHP Wandy Rodriguez will not pitch again this season because of continuing pain in his left arm. Rodriguez, who has been on the disabled list since June 6 with forearm tightness, continued to feel pain Saturday, two days after pitching a five-inning simulated game. ... Pirates LF Starling Marte had six plate appearances Saturday in a simulated game, facing LHP Kris Johnson. Though Marte continues to feel pain in his bruised right hand, the Pirates are hopeful he may be able to return to the lineup as soon as Monday. ... OF Brian Bogusevic started in left field for Chicago in place of OF Junior Lake for the third time in four games. Bogusevic entered the day hitting .357 with three home runs in nine September games. ... The four-game series concludes Sunday with Cubs LHP Travis Wood (9-11, 3.05) facing Pittsburgh LHP Francisco Liriano (16-7, 2.92).
CHICAGO — Keith Price threw for 342 yards and two touchdowns, Bishop Sankey ran for a career-high 208 yards and No. 19 Washington got a rare road win, beating Illinois 34-24 at Soldier Field on Saturday.Josh Shirley added three sacks, and the Huskies came out on top after dropping seven of nine away from home. They hadn't won on the road outside the Pac-12 since beating Syracuse in 2007.Washington (2-0) had a tougher time in this one after keeping high-powered Boise State without a touchdown and racking up 592 yards in a 38-6 win two weeks ago. The Huskies built a 21-point lead in the third quarter and hung on after it dwindled to seven in the fourth, sending Illinois (2-1) to its sixth straight loss against ranked opponents.The Illini cut it to 31-24 on Aaron Bailey's 10-yard run with 9:10 remaining, but Washington's Travis Coons kicked a 32-yard field goal to make it a 10-point game with 4:44 left. Gregory Ducre then picked off a deep pass by Nathan Scheelhaase, sealing the win for the Huskies.Price completed 28 of 35 passes. Kevin Smith caught five passes for 104 yards, and Sankey came up big again after running for 161 yards in the opener. He scored a 31-yard touchdown on a screen in the first half and on a 1-yard run early in the third quarter.The defense got to Scheelhaase with Shirley leading the way, and the Huskies won despite committing 12 penalties for 104 yards.Illinois couldn't keep the momentum going after blowing out Cincinnati last weekend.With Hall of Famer and Chicago native Dick Butkus watching his alma mater play in the stadium where he starred for the Bears, the Illini couldn't get much going. Scheelhaase, off to his best start in four years as the No. 1 quarterback, was just 9 of 25 with 156 yards. He did connect on a 72-yard touchdown to Ryan Lankford right when the Huskies looked like they were ready to pull away, but that was the lone bright spot for him.That happened on the next play from scrimmage after Jaydon Mickens scored on a 9-yard pass to boost Washington's lead to 31-10. Instead of a blowout, Scheelhaase then hit Lankford for that TD, and things got real interesting after a trick play by Illinois in the fourth.Bailey took the snap and faked a handoff before pitching to Miles Osei, who then hit Matt LaCosse for a 35-yard pass. That led to a 10-yard touchdown run by Bailey, cutting it to 31-24 with 9:10 remaining only to have Coons kick an insurance score for the Huskies a few minutes later.
LAKE FOREST, Illinois — Having shot a magical 59 the previous day, Jim Furyk knew he faced a near-impossible task to follow that up with another low score in Saturday's third round of the BMW Championship.Though he finished up 10 strokes worse by carding a two-under-par 69 at Conway Farms Golf Club, the veteran American was delighted to end a challenging day on a fast, firming layout with a one-stroke lead."Even if you go out and fire a 62 or a 63, it's always difficult to kind of follow that up with a low number," Furyk told reporters after posting a 13-under total of 200 in the penultimate FedExCup playoff event of the PGA Tour season."It probably took me a few holes to really get in the flow out there and feel good. Made a couple mental errors I felt on the front nine with shots, hitting shots in the front places, short-sided myself a couple times."But felt like I played a very, very good nine holes of golf on the way in and was happy how I played on the back nine," said the American, who is renowned for his unorthodox loopy swing.Furyk collected three birdies after the turn to separate himself from the field and, even with a three-putt bogey at the last, he ended the day a stroke in front of fellow American Steve Stricker, who fired a 64.Throughout his round, the 43-year-old was warmly applauded by huge galleries at Conway Farms after becoming only the sixth player ever on the PGA Tour to shoot a 59, 24 hours earlier."It kind of felt like a victory lap," smiled Furyk, who is bidding to win his first PGA Tour title since the 2010 Tour Championship. "People kept cheering for me all the way around."It was a good day, a lot of positive fans, the occasional one that likes to give me a hard time, but 99.9 percent were very positive. It was fun."Asked what made it so hard to follow up a low score with another one, Furyk replied: "You just don't see a lot of guys go shoot 61-62. You see a lot of 61-68s, 61-69s."I felt good with my swing today. I felt like I played a solid round of golf. I hit the ball well. I had a lot more opportunities yesterday. I hit the ball better yesterday."But you're not going to have many days like I played yesterday. You know, I've done it. I've shot low numbers back-to-back. It seems to be a mental battle more than a physical."A 16-times champion on the PGA Tour whose only major victory came at the 2003 U.S. Open, Furyk has failed to add to his career tally over the past three years despite several close calls.At last year's U.S. Open, he squandered a golden opportunity to win a second major title when he bogeyed three of his last six holes to wind up in a five-way tie for fourth, two shots behind winner Webb Simpson.Last month, Furyk led by one shot going into the final round of the PGA Championship at Oak Hill Country Club but was outplayed by compatriot Jason Dufner, who carded a two-under-par 68 to claim his first major title by two strokes.Asked whether he felt any added pressure to triumph at Conway Farms on Sunday because of those near-misses, along with a few others, Furyk replied: "There's always pressure to win."And I'm going to put pressure on myself because I expect myself to play well, and I expect more of myself than anyone else. It's been three years. No one has to remind me of the Tour Championship in '10."That'll be part of the mental game and the mental aspect of it tomorrow, to go out there and stay in the moment and just play golf and not really worry about it. I'll play my best if I'm focused on the task at hand, not on the results."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Ten days after finding out in a text message that he was being left off the U.S. Presidents Cup team, Jim Furyk transmitted his reply in 59 strokes.Furyk became the sixth golfer to break 60 in a competitive round, and the first to pull off the feat with a bogey on his scorecard, when he posted a 12-under 59 on Friday in the second round of the BMW Championship, the third event of the FedEx Cup playoffs, at Conway Farms Golf Club.Furyk came to his final hole, the 405-yard par-4 ninth, needing a birdie to match the PGA Tour 18-hole scoring record set by Al Geiberger and matched by Chip Beck, David Duval, Paul Goydos and Stuart Appleby.He was coming off a disappointing par at the par-5 eighth, the third-easiest hole in the first two days with 24 scores of birdie or better. After making small talk about his beloved Pittsburgh Steelers with his playing partner Gary Woodland, Furyk hit the fairway, as he had done on every other hole. As he walked to his ball, he gave himself a pep talk."I just told myself, 'How many opportunities are you going to have in your life to do this?' " Furyk said. "Got to take advantage of it."There are days when the conditions are perfect for a record run: when the air is still, the weather warm, the greens receptive and the pin placements inviting. And then there was Friday, when there were 15 mile-an-hour gusts and the greens were riddles.The Englishman Luke Donald, a former No. 1 who is a member at Conway Farms, estimated that he has played the course "a couple hundred times." After recording his second 70, Donald marveled at the masterpiece Furyk was creating. "What Jim's doing today is pretty amazing," he said, adding, "I shot 62 in the pro-am, and it felt pretty easy, but it was warm — there wasn't much wind. This is a different animal when it's under the gun, under pressure, in these conditions."Rory McIlroy, the defending champion and former world No. 1, recorded a 77 in the same conditions. The next-best score of the day was a 65, recorded by Jimmy Walker and Jordan Spieth. Brandt Snedeker, who carded a 63 to take the first-round lead, posted a 68 and remained atop the leader board, with Furyk, at 11-under 131.Tiger Woods shot a 72 that included a two-stroke penalty after his ball moved behind the first green while he was removing a twig from the area.Upon learning that Furyk was trying to break 60 with a bogey on his card, Snedeker, the reigning FedEx Cup champion and a two-time winner this year, shook his head and said: "That makes me depressed about my round. I was actually feeling pretty good about it walking up here."The gallery following Furyk's group, which numbered in the dozens at the start of the round, had ballooned into the hundreds by the end. When Furyk stuck his approach shot, the crowd erupted as if he had just secured a major championship. Coincidentally, Furyk won his lone major, the 2003 United States Open, 62 miles away at Olympia Fields.As Furyk got ready to hit his putt, Snedeker cut off his interview session so he could watch Furyk's putt on a television monitor. "Come on, Jim," he said to the screen.When Furyk's putt disappeared in the cup, Snedeker clenched his fist and clapped.Furyk reacted by pumping his fist a few times and collapsing into the arms of his longtime caddie, Mike Cowan. Woodland, who carded a 72, expressed pleasure at having had the best vantage point, along with Jason Dufner, the third member of the group."It's the greatest round I've ever seen," Woodland said.At his news conference, Furyk, 43, glanced at his scorecard. "Actually a very cool card," he said. Then, referring to his opening round, he said, "It's too bad it goes with a 72."Before teeing up Thursday, Furyk had breakfast with Steve Stricker and Zach Johnson, who made the Presidents Cup squad. The event came up in conversation, which put Furyk in a funk."I kind of had to go through those emotions again a little bit," he said. "So yesterday I was a little grouchy."He spoke Thursday night with his father, who reminded him to stay patient. After all, he had three more rounds to go low. On Friday, Furyk said, "I did it all in one day." If Furyk were a spiteful person, the giggle that then escaped his lips could have been construed as the last laugh.
Cheating accusations, an unprecedented penalty to a race team and a reshuffling of the field for Nascar's Sprint Cup playoff turned the past week into one of the most bizarre in the sport's history.And that was before Friday, when Nascar added Jeff Gordon to the Chase for the Sprint Cup championship two days before the playoff was to begin at Chicagoland Speedway. Three teams may have manipulated the finish at Richmond International Raceway on Sept. 7, the final race of the regular season, and Gordon appeared to be a victim."There were too many things that altered the event and gave an unfair disadvantage to Jeff," said Brian France, the Nascar chairman, in announcing the decision to add a 13th car to the Chase. "We believe this was the right outcome to protect the integrity, which is our No. 1 goal, of Nascar."Gordon said he was "very thankful to be in." He added, "And I know it's under the most unbelievable circumstances I've ever been a part of in my racing career."Gordon wrote on Twitter: "Wow, we just gained 1250 points!"With seven laps left at Richmond and Ryan Newman on his way to a victory that would have qualified him for the playoff, Clint Bowyer's car inexplicably spun and caused a caution.Newman wound up third and out of the playoff field. The spin also affected Gordon, who would have made the Chase in the 10th spot in points but ultimately finished 11th.After the spin, Bowyer and his teammate Brian Vickers made unusual pit stops in the closing laps, allowing Joey Logano to pass them. That helped Logano finish 10th in the standings and automatically qualify for the playoff.Logano's move up in the standings bumped Gordon out of the field and allowed a teammate, Martin Truex Jr., to clinch the final wild-card playoff berth.On Monday, Nascar fined Michael Waltrip Racing $300,000 and penalized Bowyer and two other drivers 50 points. That took Truex out of the playoff field and gave the berth to Newman."Do I think it's fair?" Truex said Friday. "You know, I don't know. I don't run the sport, so we'll just have to deal with it."An Associated Press review of communications during the Richmond race determined that there was collusion between Logano's Penske Racing team and Front Row Motorsports to allow Logano to pass David Gilliland and gain another point.It was that report that led Nascar to revisit the Richmond finish and add Gordon to the Chase. Nascar officials made clear they did not believe that Logano worked with Gilliland, only that their teams discussed it. Penske Racing and Front Row Motorsports were placed on probation for the rest of the season.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Even after watching video evidence, Tiger Woods still doesn't think he deserved a two-shot penalty at the BMW Championship.Woods was docked two shots at the end of his second round when his ball moved ever so slightly behind the first green. Video from a camera man hired by PGA Tour Entertainment showed the golf ball dip down as Woods was removing a twig before playing a shot from the trees.Woods argued that it only oscillated, returning to its original position. The chief rules official at the PGA Tour determined otherwise."As I said, from my vantage point, I thought it just oscillated and that was it," Woods said Saturday after shooting a 5-under 66 at Conway Farms. "They replayed it again and again and again. And I felt the same way."Slugger White, vice president of competition for the PGA Tour, said Woods did not take the penalty easily."He was a little disbelieving. How's that?" White said Friday.Woods did not argue with that description."I was pretty hot because I felt like nothing happened," Woods said. "I felt like the ball oscillated and that was it. I played the rest of the round grinding my tail off to get myself back in the tournament, and then go from five to seven behind. That was tough.""We had a very good discussion," he said. "I'll end it at that."The only thing that moved in the third round was Woods' name up the leaderboard, though not as much as he had hoped. He ran off six birdies in seven holes in the middle of his round and got within two shots of the lead at one point before his momentum stalled. He still moved up eight spots into fifth place, four shots behind Jim Furyk going into the final round of a tournament he has won five times.And he did it with Sergio Garcia along for the ride.It was the first time Woods and Garcia played together since their verbal sparring at The Players Championship, won by Woods. Their public spat ended when Garcia jokingly said at a European Tour awards dinner that he would have Woods over for dinner during the U.S. Open and serve fried chicken.Garcia apologized, though the Spaniard was heckled at the U.S. Open. On that front, it was fairly tame in the suburbs north of Chicago before a loud and large crowd, most of them interested in Woods. There were a few comments, though nothing much different from other golf tournaments in America.Garcia appeared irritated at someone in the gallery on the 18th hole. Then again, he is developing a reputation for hearing just about everything. Garcia rallied for a 69.Even as Woods made his move, there were lingering questions about his two-shot penalty.Woods made double bogey on the first hole Friday. It became a quadruple-bogey 8 with the penalty. It was the third time this year Woods was given a two-shot penalty for a rules violation.At his first event of the season in Abu Dhabi, he took relief from an imbedded lie in a sandy area covered with vines. It was determined that relief was not allowed in the sand. He was docked two shots before signing his card, and it caused him to miss the cut.More famous was the incident at the Masters, where he took an improper drop after his shot on the 15th hole in the second round hit the flag and went into the water. Word reached Augusta National from a television viewer — who turned out to be rules expert David Eger — but the club did not bring it to Woods' attention. It was only after later review, and Woods' comments that indicated he took an illegal drop, that he was penalized.He was allowed to stay in the tournament despite signing a wrong scorecard because Augusta National felt it should have asked him before allowing him to sign his card. That decision to waive disqualification is covered under the Rules of Golf."The one at Augusta after going through it on Saturday morning, yeah, I did take the wrong drop," Woods said. "But yesterday I didn't feel like I did anything. And as I said, I described it in there and I said I moved the pine cone right behind my ball. I feel like the ball oscillated, and I just left it. Evidently, it wasn't enough."Still, this has become a year of rulings for Woods."It's unfortunate that he's been at the center of this about three times, I think, this year," Steve Stricker said. "I don't know why, if it's just because all the TV is on him all the time or what."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — The first clue that Jim Furyk would follow his Friday birdie binge at the BMW Championship with a more muted performance surfaced during his news conference after his PGA Tour record-tying 59.In trying to make sense of how every break seemed to go his way during the round, Furyk said: "If you sat me down 10 feet from the hole 18 times today, I wasn't going to make 12 out of the 18, more than likely. So I always scratch my head and try to figure out how you get to 59."Furyk's two-under-par 69 at Conway Farms Golf Club on Saturday, which left him at 13-under 200, one stroke ahead of Steve Stricker, was a case of mind over magic. The moment he stopped to consider how he had shot a sub-60 score, he doomed himself to not coming close to repeating it. Rob Polishook, a mental coach who does not work with Furyk, said a common trap golfers fall into after a career-low score is thinking: "Great round. How did I do that?""They immediately think about what they did to make the score, and just this process alone takes them out of the present moment and into the past," said Polishook, the founder and director of Inside the Zone Sports Performance Group. "On the flip side, by scoring low, they now have a set of expectations and thoughts on the outcome, again taking them out of the moment and into the future. Both are recipes for failure."During Sunday's final round of the BMW Championship, the third leg of the FedEx Cup playoffs, it will be Matt Kuchar's challenge not to look back or ahead. Kuchar, fourth in the playoff standings at the week's start, followed the pixie-dust path forged by Brandt Snedeker (a 63 in the first round) and Furyk with a bogey-free 61 on Saturday to move to five under for the tournament and into a tie for 16th.Kuchar birdied the first two holes, causing a few in his gallery to start chanting, "Fifty-eight today." A sub-60 score crossed his mind when he made the turn in 30 strokes, and again when he went for the green in two on the par-5 18th."I got off to a good start and then had a thought on the last hole of, Gosh, if I hole this out from the fairway, it's a 59," Kuchar said.His second shot came to rest 26 feet from the pin and he two-putted for the last of his 10 birdies. As Kuchar knows only too well, the hard part comes next. He carded a 63 in the second round of the Sony Open and followed it with a 70. He opened with a 64 at the Northern Trust Open and shot a 73 in the next round. He chased a third-round 64 at the Canadian Open with a closing 71."Seems like it's difficult to follow up any kind of low round," Kuchar said. "I've never quite understood why, exactly."He added, "There shouldn't be a reason why a guy playing good golf shouldn't keep playing good golf."Furyk did his best to focus on the round, and the shot, at hand, but it was difficult with fans shouting, "Hey, Mr. 59."The front nine, he said, "kind of felt like a victory lap.""People kept cheering for me all the way around," Furyk said. "It took me a few holes to really get in the flow out there."The challenge of posting back-to-back low scores, he said, "seems to be a mental battle more than a physical."The mental game, as Furyk described it, is not unlike what a player experiences when trying to close out a victory."I'll play my best if I'm focused on the task at hand, not on the results," he said.Furyk, who is winless in the last five tournaments in which he has had a 54-hole lead, will need to be focused to hold off a group of contenders that includes Stricker, a three-time runner-up this year who carded a 64; Snedeker, the reigning FedEx Cup champion, who was two strokes back after a 71; and Tiger Woods, who posted a 66 and was four shots back.Woods, a five-time winner this year, would be within two strokes of the lead if not for the penalty he was assessed after the second round for moving a twig near his ball behind the first green, causing the ball to move. It is a one-stroke infraction, but because Woods did not replace the ball, he was penalized two strokes."It's one of those things where I thought the ball oscillated, and I thought that was that," Woods said. "I played the shot, played the round, and then they replayed it and gave me two."He added, "I was pretty hot because I felt like, as I said, nothing happened."Woods put the penalty behind him and concentrated on the next round, the next shot, as Furyk also tried to do Saturday."Following a 59 is a breeze, man," Furyk joked. "How upset are you going to get today?"
After beginning with the arrival of three heralded rookies , the W.N.B.A.'s 17th season ends with the departure of its top two scoring leaders.Tina Thompson and Katie Smith have combined for nearly 14,000 points and close to a thousand W.N.B.A. games, but they have only a few contests left before retiring.Thompson, the W.N.B.A.'s career scoring leader with 7,466 points entering her final regular-season game Saturday night, can look forward to the Western Conference playoffs with the Seattle Storm, who face the Minnesota Lynx in the first round. Smith, who is second in career scoring with 6,439 points, will retire after the Liberty end their season Sunday on the road against the Washington Mystics.The cumulative physical effects of their careers have taken a toll."I feel old," Thompson, 37, said with a laugh. "My knees hurt. My legs hurt. My knees are swollen. I get out of bed and I'm walking on my heels because my Achilles' tendons are tired."Smith, 39, said: "During the off-season, I kind of knew this was probably it for me. It's just so hard to make sure your body is ready to go through that grueling season, to get your mind to that level."A 5-11 guard out of Ohio State, Smith joined the W.N.B.A. in 1999 after spending three years with the Columbus Quest in the rival American Basketball League. She led the Quest to two A.B.L. titles while scoring 1,433 points. Add those to her W.N.B.A. totals and two championships with the Detroit Shock, and Smith retires with more points and championships than any other woman who has played professional basketball in the United States.She acknowledged approaching her decision to retire with some trepidation."I think it's a little scary to speak it into fruition," said Smith, who announced her retirement informally in a Twitter conversation. "Am I really ready? Am I making the right decision? That made me a little nervous."Thompson, a 6-foot-2 forward, was the first player chosen in the first W.N.B.A. draft in 1997, taken by the Houston Comets. She is the last of the original W.N.B.A. players to retire. Thompson was studying at Southern California to enter law school when she received a call from Renee Brown, the league's director of player personnel, offering her a spot in a new league being created by the N.B.A."I didn't believe it at first," Thompson said. "I was kind of shocked. I played the message probably six or seven times to make sure she was saying what she said.""I was excited but, at the same time, very apprehensive," she said. "I wasn't sure if it was something I wanted to do. The initial offer wasn't very good at all. I think it was a couple of thousand dollars above the poverty line in California at that time."But the opportunity to make history was enticing."It's not something that happens often, to be a part of the first wave that sets the foundation for something that could be amazing," Thompson said.She joined Cynthia Cooper-Dyke and Sheryl Swoopes in leading the Comets to four championships in the W.N.B.A.'s first four seasons while transforming the power forward position."I thought we were getting a post player," Cooper-Dyke, now the coach of the women's basketball team at U.S.C., said of Thompson. "What we got was this incredibly gifted and versatile forward who just gave me so many more options when we played the pick-and-roll."She added: "When I passed her the ball and she let that 3-point shot go, I was, like: 'Wow. That's rainbow.' "Scoring from the perimeter made Thompson and the Comets tougher to beat."A lot of post players aren't comfortable guarding somebody that far out," said Smith, who played with Thompson on the Storm last season and on two Olympic teams. "They're not always guarding shooters."Watching Thompson during the W.N.B.A.'s earliest years was a young girl in Chicago, Candace Parker, who became Thompson's teammate with the Los Angeles Sparks for three seasons."I watched her as a child when she first got into the league," said Parker, who incorporated parts of Thompson's style into her own when they played together."We'd have closed sessions where she showed me certain moves — you know, her patented shimmy that she does with her shoulders," Parker said. "I've taken that, made it something that's my own and used that effectively."With retirement beckoning, Thompson anticipates less pain and more time for her 8-year-old son, Dyllan, whom she raises as a single mother and schools at home."I'm literally looking forward to waking up and the only schedule that I have to stick to is Dyllan's," Thompson said.For Smith, retirement means nurturing a desire to coach by serving as a graduate assistant at Ohio State while pursuing a master's degree to become a dietitian."I just want to have some options just in case I'm not very good at coaching," Smith said, laughing. "But I would love to coach professionally or in college."Retirement will also give Smith a chance to reflect on "the sorority that we've had of fellow W.N.B.A. players, the pride that we took in playing in the States," she said."Really, when you look at it, it's a small, small group in the big scheme."Smith and Thompson make up an even smaller one.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — In this year of the endless midsummer in Sweden, the country's populace is dancing around the human maypole that is Henrik Stenson, reveling in the international golf success of a few of its own.Led by Stenson, first in the European Tour's Race to Dubai and the PGA Tour's FedEx Cup standings, Swedish golfers have won two PGA Tour events and have starred in the women's Solheim Cup.Jonas Blixt started the blue-and-yellow tide rolling with a victory, his second on tour, in the Greenbrier Classic the first week in July.In August, his compatriot Liselotte Neumann, a 13-time winner and a major champion on the L.P.G.A. Tour, guided the European team to its first Solheim Cup victory on United States soil, with a huge assist from her countrywoman Caroline Hedwall, 24, who became the first player in the event's history to compile a 5-0 record.Stenson has been shining as long and as bright as Sweden's midnight sun. In his last six starts, he has one victory and one finish outside the top three. With Sweden basking in his success, Stenson has found himself pulled in several directions."A lot of texts and phone calls and e-mails and some media," he said.Intellectually, he understands the attention. After all, Stenson, 37, is in the midst of what he described as "an unbelievable summer.""I guess, looking at the results and the tournaments where I've had these good results, so far it's the best season of my career," he said.The spotlight is an affront to his nature. Like many Swedes, Stenson was not conditioned to stand out, to be celebrated for individual achievements.Paired with Tiger Woods, the world No. 1, and Adam Scott, the reigning Masters champion and golf's matinee idol, Stenson was enervated by the experience of playing his first two rounds of the BMW Championship, the third FedEx Cup playoffs event, in front of thousands of fans.Success, it seems, has made Stenson's dry sense of humor downright parched."I'm too much of a nice guy," joked a weary Stenson, who opened with scores of 72 and 70, putting him 11 strokes behind the leader. "I haven't told enough people, 'No.' "Humor is the rescue club in Stenson's bag of traits, deployed to bridge the gaps between life's successes. His first fallow period on the course followed his victory in the Benson & Hedges International Invitational on the European Tour in 2001. He did not have a top-30 finish in 2002 and did not win again until September 2004.After Stenson worked his way up to fourth in the world rankings in 2009, his game went dormant for another stretch beginning in 2011. Playing on the PGA Tour, he missed six cuts in 15 starts and finished 180th on the money list. The next year, he had one top-10 finish, a third at the Puerto Rico Open, in 15 tour events.Along the way he weathered a financial crisis, losing a large portion of his life savings and investments. Stenson was a victim of the $7 billion Ponzi scheme that led to the conviction last year of R. Allen Stanford, who ran the Stanford Financial Group, one of Stenson's sponsors.Stenson, who won the 2009 Players Championship a month before Stanford's indictment, said, "It's obviously not great for anyone to be part of the whole Stanford Financial thing."He added: "Of course, it's not fun, or something you wish on anybody. But I wouldn't have put that down as an issue for playing poorly if I can win Sawgrass three months after that was revealed."He said his game had been hurt more by swing issues and bad health, including a lingering gastrointestinal disorder caused, he said, by a waterborne parasite he picked up during a holiday diving trip to the Maldives."There's no magical potions or anything like that," he said. "It's just hard work on the right things that eventually pays off."At the P.G.A. Championship in August, Stenson and Blixt, 29, were in the next-to-last pairing, each trying to become the first male player from Sweden to win a major. Stenson finished third, one spot ahead of Blixt, who said: "I didn't expect to have so much publicity after finishing fourth. A lot more people know who I am here after that fourth place than after the win at the Greenbrier."Blixt left Sweden to attend Florida State, where his game blossomed. After earning a degree in international business, he turned pro in 2008. Three Swedes won on the PGA Tour that year: Carl Pettersson, Daniel Chopra and Richard Johnson.Having grown comfortable in the United States, Blixt polished his game on what is now the Web.com circuit rather than take the path followed by other Swedes who used the European Tour as a springboard to the PGA Tour."People encourage you to be better here," Blixt said. "At home they encourage you to not stick out."Asked about the Swedes' summer of success, Blixt joked, "That's the way it's supposed to be, isn't it?"He added, "It's more of a coincidence, I think, than anything."He said it had not been all sunshine and loving cups. On the European Tour, Stenson, at No. 1, is the only Swede in the top 35 in the standings. Alex Noren is 38th, and Blixt is 42nd.Perhaps Stenson provided the best perspective, saying, "Life is ups and downs — stock market, golf; everything kind of goes in cycles."He added, "It's going to be highs, it's going to be lows, and we move on."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Jim Furyk will have to wait one more day to try to end three years without a PGA Tour victory.The final round of the BMW Championship was suspended Sunday because of steady rain that left too much water on Conway Farms. Furyk, who has a one-shot lead over Steve Stricker, was still about two hours away from even teeing off."The bad news — obviously, I'm anxious to get out there and play, as is everyone else," Furyk said. "But the good news is no one wants to go out and play in this and slop it around in bad weather on a golf course where we're playing the ball down and it's probably a little too wet out there."Rory McIlroy found one small consolation to the end of his PGA Tour season — he was one of six players who finished. McIlroy had yet another double bogey — that's 12 double bogeys and a triple bogey in three FedEx Cup playoff events — but holed out from 164 yards for eagle on the 12th hole and had his second straight 68.It was the first time he had back-to-back rounds in the 60s in the same tournament this year on the PGA Tour.Furyk was at 13-under 200 and in the final group with Stricker. Brandt Snedeker was two shots behind at 202, followed by Zach Johnson at 203 and Tiger Woods at 204. Woods was penalized two shots on Friday when his ball moved as he was removing a small branch next to it behind the first green.Dustin Johnson closed with a 72 and had to wait to make sure no one bumped him out of the top 30 in the FedEx Cup, which would keep him from the Tour Championship. Johnson tried to hit 3-wood into the par-5 18th green and produced two splashes — one from water getting between the club face and the ball, the other when the ball came down well short and into a creek."It just came out dead," he said.Everyone else was to return to Conway Farms on Monday morning and act like Sunday never happened."I think we got the better end of the deal by not even playing in it," Stricker said.Slugger White, the vice president of rules and competition for the PGA Tour, said the forecast was for a half-inch of rain over six hours, which would not have been enough for water to accumulate. Instead, there was an inch of rain and so much water that there would have been no place to take relief from casual water. The problem holes were Nos. 3, 9, 10 and 12."Casual water was going to take us to where we couldn't play," White said.The tour chose to play the ball down, meaning players could not lift, clean and replace their golf balls through the green. Play was stopped for 3½ hours in the late morning, and then it was called again for good after the round resumed for just under an hour.Of the 48 players who at least teed off, none were within 10 shots of the lead when they started.Even so, the conditions were difficult for those who still had something at stake. Charles Howell III started the week at No. 31 in the FedEx Cup standings. He was 1 over through four holes. Rickie Fowler had a chance to get into the top 30 and advance to the Tour Championship. He shot 77 in the first round and bounced back with a pair of 68s. Fowler was 2 under through four holes Sunday.The final round was to resume at 8 a.m. with a reasonable forecast.It will be the fourth time this year that a PGA Tour event had to go an extra day. The Farmers Insurance Open (fog) and Arnold Palmer Invitational (storms) ended on a Monday. The Tournament of Champions had a Tuesday finish after being shortened to 54 holes because of high wind.
(Reuters) - For PGA Tour veteran Jim Furyk, it was once again a case of so close and yet so far as he relinquished the 54-hole lead to finish alone in third place at the weather-delayed BMW Championship Lake Forest, Illinois on Monday.After spectacularly becoming only the sixth player to shoot a 59 on the U.S. circuit in Friday's second round at Conway Farms Golf Club, Furyk led by two shots with eight holes to play before recording three bogeys over the closing stretch.It was the sixth time since his last PGA Tour victory at the 2010 Tour Championship that he had failed to triumph after holding the 54-hole lead of an event and the American was left to dwell on the positives and the negatives of his week."It'll be a little of both," Furyk told reporters after closing with a level-par 71 to finish at 13-under 271, three strokes behind winner Zach Johnson who stormed home with a 65."I never looked at it as I have to hold on to the lead," he said of the one-stroke advantage he enjoyed over fellow American Steve Stricker going into the final round. "It would have been like being 12 under on Friday and just trying to hold on."That's a definite bogey waiting to happen. I really felt like today the idea was to go out aggressive, hit the ball at the pins, try to shoot four or five under, make the rest of the field chase me."Though Furyk played well enough over the front nine and sank a 12-foot birdie putt at the 10th to forge two ahead, bogeys at the 11th, 13th and 16th cost him dearly."I just wasn't able to do it," said the 43-year-old, who has now won only nine times out of 23 when holding at least a share of the 54-hole lead on the PGA Tour."When I look back, the long three-putt at 11 and missing that four or five footer for par on 13, those two holes kind of hit me in the tail."I hit the ball plenty good enough, but I didn't make the putts when I needed to. I don't know if I used them all up on Friday and knocked them all in or what, but I just wasn't able to get the putts to go."A 16-times champion on the PGA Tour whose only major victory came at the 2003 U.S. Open, Furyk has failed to add to his career tally over the past three years despite several close calls.At last year's U.S. Open, he squandered a golden opportunity to win a second major title when he bogeyed three of his last six holes to wind up in a five-way tie for fourth, two shots behind winner Webb Simpson.Last month, Furyk led by one shot going into the final round of the PGA Championship at Oak Hill Country Club but was outplayed by compatriot Jason Dufner, who carded a two-under-par 68 to claim his first major title by two strokes.However, he has booked his place in the elite field of 30 for the season-ending Tour Championship in Atlanta, starting at East Lake on Thursday, and knows that he is playing good golf overall."I'll be disappointed I didn't win (at Conway Farms), but I've got some positives," said Furyk, who has recorded seven top-10s in 21 starts on the 2013 PGA Tour."I'm playing really well on a golf course I like in Atlanta, and a win there could do some damage."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Zach Johnson is having a September to remember, and there's still one very big week to go.In one tournament, he made a 25-foot birdie putt on his final hole to earn the last spot on the Presidents Cup team. In the next one, Johnson made a bunch of big putts in the final round of the rain-delayed BMW Championship for a 6-under 65 for a two-shot victory over Nick Watney.His win Monday at Conway Farms gave Johnson the No. 4 seed going into Tour Championship, giving him a clear shot at the FedEx Cup and its $10 million prize."It's hard to grasp the last two weeks of golf," Johnson said. "It's not like you have to win every week to win that FedEx Cup. You've just got to win at the right times, or play well at the right times. And I like the momentum I have for next week."Johnson's 10th career win came at the expense of Jim Furyk, who endured another dose of final-round disappointment. Furyk, who had a one-shot lead, has failed to win the last six times he had at least a share of the lead going into the last round. He holed a 12-foot birdie putt at No. 10 to build a two-shot lead, but played the last eight holes in 2-over and wound up with a 71 to finish alone in third.Furyk had to settle for slice of history Friday as the sixth player in PGA Tour history with a 59. Only three players in that exclusive club went on to win — Al Geiberger is the only player to win when the 59 was not in the final round."I don't know if I used them all up on Friday and knocked them all in or what, but I just wasn't able to get the putts to go," Furyk said.Johnson wasn't the only player who felt like a winner Monday.Luke Donald, a member at Conway Farms, was No. 54 in the FedEx Cup and was on the verge of being left out of the top 30 players who advanced to the Tour Championship. He ran off four straight birdies on the back nine, atoned for a bogey on No. 16 with a birdie on the 17th, and then saved par from a bunker on the 18th hole for a 66 to tie for fourth. That moved him up to No. 29 to get him into East Lake.Watney was at No. 34, and he went from playing his way into the top 30 to nearly winning the tournament. Watney closed with a 64 and was tied for the lead until Johnson made an 18-foot birdie putt out of the first cut on the 16th hole, and a 12-footer for birdie on the next hole."The guys ahead of me were ahead of me for a reason — they've been playing well all year," Watney said. "Luckily for me, I kind of pulled everything together."The FedEx Cup points will be reset, meaning the top five only have to win the Tour Championship to capture the cup.Tiger Woods will be the No. 1 seed, though he doesn't go there with much momentum. Woods started the final round in cool, breezy conditions just four shots behind and was never a factor after missing a short par putt on the opening hole. He closed with a 71 and tied for 11th, seven shots behind."It was not a very good putting week," Woods said, who was coming off a tie for 65th on the TPC Boston. "It's just one of those weeks where I just didn't have it."Henrik Stenson, a winner in Boston and angry enough in Chicago that he snapped off the head of his driver during the final round, will be the No. 2 seed at East Lake, followed by Masters champion Adam Scott, Johnson and Matt Kuchar.Steve Stricker, who played in the final group with Johnson, was one shot off the lead when he started the back nine bogey-double bogey. He closed with a 72, a round that cost him one of the top five seeds.Furyk had company in his misery.Matt Jones of Australia had a chance to get to the Tour Championship — which, in effect, would have put him in the four majors next year — but his 8-foot birdie putt on the last hole hit the lip. That cost him a spot in the top 30.Harris English was at No. 28 and might have caught the worst break of them all. In a driving rain Sunday, he lost the grip on his tee shot and pulled it into grass so thick the ball was never found. The horn to stop play sounded a minute later, and English went back out Monday morning to No. 8 to play his third shot on the par 5. He wound up with a double bogey, never found momentum and fell out of the top 30 by two shots.Lee Westwood also fell out of the Tour Championship with a poor week.Johnson put his postseason in jeopardy by skipping the opening FedEx Cup playoff event to attend his brother's wedding. He was at No. 27 before he arrived for the BMW Championship and started the week just wanting to make sure he was in Atlanta.He did that and more, giving him 10 wins in his 10 years on the PGA Tour."I'm going to have to forget about this week, take Atlanta for Atlanta and just play," Johnson said. "East Lake is not Conway Farms. It's a beast. I'm just going to keep doing what I'm doing and just be thankful."Johnson finished at 16-under 268 and earned $1.44 million, pushing his career earnings just past $30 million.
JOLIET, Ill. — For the week leading up to the first race of the Chase for the Sprint Cup championship, Nascar ducked, dodged and answered questions about the sport's integrity. The field for the Chase, a 10-race playoff, was changed twice after investigations into race manipulation by several teams during last weekend's race in Richmond, Va.On Sunday, with the focus back on racing in the Geico 400 at the Chicagoland Speedway, cars and drivers faced a different challenge, this one more meteorological.Dark and ominous clouds hovered over the track all day, and rain delayed the scheduled 2 p.m. local start of the race for more than an hour. Then, after 109 laps — or 25 laps from an official race — the skies opened again. Cars did not return to the track for another 5 hours 10 minutes.Finally, more than nine hours after the race's scheduled afternoon start, and after waiting out two delays that totaled 6:30, Matt Kenseth claimed the checkered flag around 11 p.m. local time.Kenseth, the top seed entering the Chase, passed Kyle Busch on a restart with 27 laps remaining to earn his sixth victory of the season and stake out the inside position for the Chase championship. Busch, Kenseth's Joe Gibbs Racing teammate, finished second and is 8 points behind Kenseth in the Chase standings. Kevin Harvick was third."Man, it's been a long week for everybody," Kenseth said. "So it feels great to finally race and be here in victory lane." Of the restart, he added, "You let the leader go, and once he goes, you go."Perhaps best of all for Nascar, it was a clean race.The unusual circumstances of the Chase — along with its credibility — dominated discussion last week. The Chase is in its 10th season, and this year's field includes an unprecedented 13 drivers after Jeff Gordon was added late Friday. He was deprived of a place in the original 12-driver field after what Nascar deemed a curiously timed spin by Clint Bowyer, which helped teammate Martin Truex Jr. and influenced the outcome of last week's race. Earlier this week, Ryan Newman, who was leading that race when Bowyer spun, replaced Truex in the Chase field.Drivers joked about the number of official pictures taken for the Chase as cars were added and subtracted. The first was taken last Saturday, another during the week. And then a third including Gordon was needed over the weekend."It was probably one of the most up-and-down weeks," Rick Hendrick, the owner of Hendrick Motorsports, said Sunday morning. "I've been doing this 30 years and I've never been to the hauler at the end of the race and had any decision reversed for jumping the start or whatever."The race began during the day under heavy cloud cover, but for the first 100 laps it looked as if it might beat the rain in the forecast. Then on Lap 109, Cole Whitt skidded and spun out, and the cars were called to pit row as the rain began to fall — heavily and with little interruption."The most rain we have had so far," Kasey Kahne said during the delay.When the green flag was waved more than five hours later, the lights were on and most of the fans were gone, creating a somewhat eerie scene. Before the rain delay, the race ran smoothly with only one caution, but it crawled for the next 100 laps under six cautions. The race included 25 lead changes among 16 drivers, both series records at Chicagoland Speedway.Eight of the 13 Chase drivers finished in the top 10. Joey Logano and Dale Earnhardt Jr. did not finish because of car trouble. Logano ran 175 laps and Earnhardt 224 of the race's 267. Logano said the change in conditions after the rain delay made for a difficult adjustment."When the temps outside go down and you are making more horsepower, you are going a lot faster on the racetrack," he said.The Chase continues next week at the New Hampshire Motor Speedway with the Sylvania 300. On Sunday, after a long week and a very long day, Nascar again had a race and a winning driver to talk about.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Rory McIlroy's 2013 PGA Tour finale was a microcosm of his year. In defense of his title at the BMW Championship, McIlroy opened with his worst 36-hole score of the season and closed with his first back-to-back rounds under 70.McIlroy's Sunday round at Conway Farms Golf Club, his second straight 68, was forged in sweater-and-galoshes weather. He played in showers that grew heavy toward the end of his round. The rain led to two lengthy suspensions and set up a Monday finish after only six players completed their rounds and the leaders did not tee off before play was called for the day in the late afternoon.McIlroy and his playing partner, Kevin Chappell, were on the 18th hole when play was suspended for the first time because of water pooling on the course.McIlroy and Chappell had the option of finishing the hole. With the rain pounding, McIlroy rebounded from an errant drive to salvage a par and finish at seven-over 291, not nearly good enough to qualify him for the 30-man Tour Championship beginning this week in Atlanta.Instead of being one of the weekend's best players, McIlroy settled for being among the fastest. He played Saturday's round in 2 hours 35 minutes, and on Sunday, he and Chappell finished in 2:40.It was not lost on McIlroy that when the pressure was on, he opened with scores of 78 and 77, and when he had nothing left to play for but pride — and did not pause much to think — he performed closer to the level he expects of himself."You're going out there with no real goal," he said. "You're just trying to get in quick. You're just trying to play fast, and you end up shooting a decent score. So maybe it is a case of I'm maybe just trying a bit too hard out there and not just letting it all sort of go."McIlroy had a similar epiphany outside Miami in March when he rallied to make his first cut of the year and then closed with what ended up being his second-lowest round of the year on the tour, a 65, to finish tied for eighth. It was one of five top-10 finishes he posted in 16 starts.If it has been hard for the 24-year-old McIlroy to play as if he has nothing to lose, it is understandable. He started the year trying to maintain his grasp on the No. 1 world ranking while getting the feel for a new set of clubs. Since January, he has let go his management team and dropped to fourth in the global rankings.In 2012, when McIlroy sat atop the money rankings and earned player of the year honors, he shot four rounds in the 60s in three of his four tour wins. With his back-to-back 68s at Conway Farms, McIlroy left with something to build on when he resumes play overseas after a four-week break."I'm hitting it really well, and I'm hitting it long as well," said McIlroy, whose drive Saturday on the par-4 18th measured 346 yards, setting up the first of two eagles he carded for the week."Tee to green, I'm there," he said. "My stats would suggest I'm as good if not a little better than last year."Where he is stubbing his toe is with his wedges and putter, as he showed when he landed in a greenside bunker on his second shot on the par-4 13th on Saturday and walked off the green with a double bogey."I've always thought of myself as a really good bunker player, and this year, it just hasn't been up to the same standard," McIlroy said. "This week, I worked on it. That's a part of the game that I've got to work on a lot."He added, "That's the one area of the game I feel if I can get it back to the level I know it can be at, I'll be contending for tournament titles again and I'll be back at the level where I'm contending to win golf tournaments week in and week out."On Sunday, McIlroy extended his streak of rounds with a double bogey to seven. He has not gone an entire week without carding a double bogey since the Players Championship in May. He has not had a bogey-free round since his 66 in the first round at T.P.C. Sawgrass on May 9."A round isn't complete without a double bogey these days," McIlroy said Saturday with a laugh.Sixteen winless weeks this year on the tour, and McIlroy has not lost his sense of humor. That may be the best indicator that he will be back in the victory circle in 2013-14.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Zach Johnson keeps going one day at a time, and it's taking him all the places he wanted to be.He arrived in the suburbs north of Chicago at No. 27 in the FedEx Cup, wanting only to make sure he held down his spot in the top 30 so he could advance to the Tour Championship this week in Atlanta.Johnson played the final 31 holes of the rain-delayed BMW Championship without a bogey. By making more putts than he can remember for a final round, he motored into the lead with two late birdies Monday and closed with a 6-under 65 for a two-shot win over Nick Watney.Not only was he going to East Lake, he was headed there as the No. 4 seed, meaning he had a clear shot at the FedEx Cup and its $10 million prize.Just two weeks ago, in the most recent FedEx Cup playoff event, he knew he was on the bubble for the Presidents Cup team. He wound up making a 25-foot birdie putt on the final hole of the tournament to earn the 10th spot on the team.How did he get there? By thinking more about each round of golf instead of what the outcome might mean.Now there are 10 million ways his September can get even better."It's hard to grasp the last two weeks of golf because I was trying to make that Presidents Cup team without trying to make it," Johnson said. "I was trying to get in the top 30 this week without trying to make it. ... I've got to remember it and try to utilize some of the things I've learned over the last three weeks — not trying too hard in certain instances when you're trying to make certain things. That's hard to do. I've failed at it many times."But if there's any pride, it's the fact that I was able to get the job done on those two occasions."Watney can appreciate that.After a mediocre season, he started the FedEx Cup playoffs at No. 63, assured of playing only the first two events. But he tied for ninth at The Barclays, finished in the middle of the pack at the Deutsche Bank Championship, and moved up to No. 34 going into the BMW Championship.Needing a solid final round to get into the top 30, he nearly won the tournament. Watney opened with three straight birdies, made three straight birdies on the back nine and finished with a 7-under 64 that gave him hope of winning until Johnson made an 18-foot birdie putt out of the first cut of rough on the 16th green, and then took on another flag at the 17th and made a 12-foot birdie putt that essentially wrapped up Johnson's first win of the year."After I birdied the 13th hole, I kind of thought that I was going to make it to Atlanta," Watney said. "And then it was just about trying to make as many as I could to see if I could put a little pressure on these guys."Jim Furyk left Chicago able to celebrate only his 59 on Friday. Of the six players who have shot 59, only three went on to win. Al Geiberger remains the only one in that group who shot 59 in an earlier round and still won (1977 Memphis Classic). Furyk now has failed to win the last six times he had at least a share of the lead going into the final round. He had a two-shot lead after a birdie on the 10th, but played the last eight holes in 2-over and finished third with a 71."I don't know if I used them all up on Friday and knocked them all in or what, but I just wasn't able to get the putts to go," Furyk said.There was more than just one winner at Conway Farms.Johnson, who finished at 16-under 268, won for the 10th time in his underappreciated career and went over the $30 million mark in career earnings. For a guy who just wanted to make sure he got to East Lake, it took him awhile to remember the significance of being the No. 4 seed.The FedEx Cup points will be reset, meaning the top five only have to win the Tour Championship to capture the cup.Tiger Woods will be the No. 1 seed, though he doesn't go there with much momentum. Woods started the final round in cool, breezy conditions just four shots behind and was never a factor after missing a short par putt on the opening hole. He closed with a 71 and tied for 11th, seven shots behind."It was not a very good putting week," said Woods, who was coming off a tie for 65th on the TPC Boston. "It's just one of those weeks where I just didn't have it."Henrik Stenson, a winner in Boston and angry enough in Chicago that he snapped off the head of his driver during the final round, will be the No. 2 seed at East Lake, followed by Masters champion Adam Scott, Johnson and Matt Kuchar.The other big winner was Luke Donald, who came through with a clutch performance on his home course.He was No. 54 in the FedEx Cup and was on the verge of being left out of the top 30 players who advanced to the Tour Championship. He ran off four straight birdies on the back nine, atoned for a bogey on No. 16 with a birdie on the 17th, and then saved par from a bunker on the 18th hole for a 66 to tie for fourth. That moved him up to No. 29 to get him into East Lake."I was hoping that being a member here would help me, and I think it did a little bit," Donald said.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — When he tied a PGA Tour record by shooting a 59 on Friday, Jim Furyk had difficulty explaining how he had managed such a feat, caught among luck, skill and sheer happenstance. After he let his latest final-round lead slip away at the BMW Championship at Conway Farms on Monday, there was no mystery."From tee to green, it was plenty good enough," Furyk said. "But from Holes 6 through 18, I just didn't putt well enough."A downpour wiped out most of Sunday's scheduled final round, and Furyk began Monday with a one-stroke lead. After a birdie on the 10th hole, he had a two-shot lead at 15 under par.But Zach Johnson shot a six-under 65 and birdied three of the last seven holes to finish 16 under, his furious comeback snatching victory from Furyk, who shot a 71 and finished 13 under. Nick Watney was second after a seven-under 64 that left him 14 under."A phenomenal day," Johnson said. "One of the best final rounds I probably have come up with in a while, especially coming down the stretch."For Furyk, it was an all-too-familiar scene, as he was unable to deliver crucial putts with victory within his grasp. It has been three years since he won the Tour Championship. He has flirted with the top of the leader board since, but he has not won a tournament. Monday made it the sixth consecutive time he failed to convert at least a share of the lead after 54 holes into a win.Furyk lost the lead to Johnson on the 13th hole when his 5-foot par putt lipped out. On the 16th hole, Johnson nailed an 18-foot birdie putt from just off the green. He pumped his fist as the ball rolled into the cup. Furyk bogeyed the 16th — his third bogey of the back nine — and Johnson birdied the 17th."The wrong way to ever think about a lead is holding on," Furyk said. "I felt like the idea today was to go out, be aggressive and hit the ball at the pin — try to shoot four or five under and make the rest of the field chase me. I just wasn't able to do it."Furyk, though, will be part of next week's Tour Championship field in Atlanta, which will feature the top 30 golfers in the FedEx Cup standings. The winner of the Cup wins a $10 million prize.Watney's strong finish earned him a spot after he entered the weekend ranked 34th, and Johnson's win ensured him the Cup championship with another victory next week.The biggest mover was Luke Donald, a graduate of nearby Northwestern University and a member of Conway Farms. Donald shot a 66 and finished 11 under. He began the day 54th in the standings but after five birdies in his last seven holes, he squeaked into the top 30 at No. 29.Tiger Woods, who shot a 71 and finished nine under, leads the point standings.Lee Westwood and Harris English fell out of the top 30. Westwood is one of several prominent players who will not compete for the FedEx Cup, including Rory McIlroy, who entered the season ranked No. 1 in the world. Other notable absences are Bubba Watson and Rickie Fowler.The suburbs in this area have provided Furyk some of his greatest triumphs and worst defeats.He won his only major, the 2003 United States Open, at Olympia Fields about 60 miles away, and the 2005 Western Open at nearby Cog Hill.But he also bogeyed the final two holes at Medinah last year to lose a duel with Sergio García on the final day of the Ryder Cup. The loss helped Europe stage a comeback to beat the United States.After another difficult finish, Furyk seemed content to take the good with the bad."I'll be disappointed I didn't win," Furyk said. "But we got some positives. I am playing really well and going to a golf course I really like next week in Atlanta."
ATLANTA — Tiger Woods was asked twice about his position on television viewers able to call in possible rules infractions. He never answered that question directly.That's not to suggest he had nothing to say about the role of TV.Woods, who met with PGA Tour commissioner Tim Finchem before his news conference Wednesday at the Tour Championship, said there needs to be a time limit on calling in potential infractions. He also stated the obvious — that he's on TV a lot more than anyone else."I think with HDTV, I think that's been a huge transition," Woods said. "I think that there are certainly a lot more viewer call-ins, and I think what people don't realize is that our rules staff gets quite a few calls every week. A lot of them never see the light of day, but they're handled with the players."It's a new age in which there is a lot of cameras that are around — well, around my group and then some of the top players," he said. "I think the commissioner was right. We're going to have to have more discussions about it in the future. I think that's actually happening right now."Finchem had said Tuesday that one of the issues is determining when it would be reasonable to accept outside information, and he raised the notion of a time limit. Finchem said the tour will "probably be taking another harder look" after the season, though he might have been talking about the impact of television more than the viewer calling in."You've got to start with disqualification and then work our way back from there," Woods said. "What's going to happen over a course of time? Is every player going to be mandated to have a camera follow them around everywhere they go — all 156 players for every shot? Or is there a certain time limit when we're going to have to do it? The digital age, is it going to change?"These are all questions and answers that need to be resolved in the near future."There are discussions about television across golf, though not necessarily a fan's ability to report what he sees.Thomas Pagel, the USGA's senior director of rules and competition, spoke in vague terms about this Tuesday when he said the USGA and R&A are looking at issues they should tackle and that "certainly, HDTV has been on the forefront for the last several years."STENSON DRIVER: Henrik Stenson has a new driver for the Tour Championship.That's not all by choice.Stenson lost his temper on the final hole of the BMW Championship and snapped the head off his driver. He has upgraded to a new model that he had been working with since July but never felt he had enough time to put it into play.Now is a good time, which might explain why he got rid of the old driver the way he did. Or maybe not."Yeah, absolutely," Stenson said as his dry humor began to emerge. "That was the main focus. Get something with a little bit less spin. Let's finish the old one off right here and now in front of everybody on 18. Perfect."MICKELSON GAME: Phil Mickelson had planned to bring Jordan Spieth into his money game last week at the BMW Championship. Mickelson wants younger players involved to get them ready for matches that really matter, like the Presidents Cup in two weeks.Mickelson didn't get to Chicago until that Wednesday night because of personal reasons, so they played Wednesday at East Lake.Spieth did great. Or at least, he had a great partner.Word is that Spieth and Steve Stricker won the match and every press against Mickelson and Keegan Bradley, with Stricker doing most of the damage. Butch Harmon, who walked most of the day with them, had Stricker down for seven birdies and an eagle. Asked if that was the case, Stricker smiled and said, "I didn't keep track."Mickelson and Bradley were a tough team at the Ryder Cup. Could a partnership of the 46-year-old Stricker and 20-year-old Spieth make its debut at Muirfield Village?HAVE JACKET, WILL TRAVEL: Masters champion Adam Scott talked earlier this year about the joy of waking up in The Bahamas and having a green jacket in his closet.Scott says he packs golf's most famous jacket for just about every trip, including the Tour Championship."It's here with me," Scott said with a smile. "It comes pretty much everywhere. I wear it in my hotel room all the time just by myself."He was kidding about the last part — maybe.Scott said sometimes he packs the green jacket in his luggage, "but I don't mind carrying it around."LAST CHANCE: Steve Stricker (No. 6 seed) could finish second at the Tour Championship and still win the FedEx Cup if Tiger Woods is 16th or worse and the next four seeds finish out of the top 10. That would mean Stricker could capture the $10 million prize without ever winning a tournament this year.It almost happened in 2010 with Paul Casey.In the six previous FedEx Cups, only twice has a player won the cup without winning the Tour Championship — Woods in 2009 (Phil Mickelson won the tournament) and Vijay Singh in 2008, when the points system was so messed up that Singh only had to complete four rounds at East Lake that week.Stricker, meanwhile, is among 13 players at East Lake who are still searching for their first win. And three of those players — Graham DeLaet, Robert Castro and Brendon de Jonge — have never won on tour in their careers.
ATLANTA — Swede Henrik Stenson holds one of the coveted top-five positions in the FedExCup points standings going into this week's season-ending Tour Championship but has growing concern over tendinitis in his left wrist.Stenson, who won his third PGA Tour title at the Deutsche Bank Championship earlier this month, initially realized he had a problem with his wrist during last week's weather-delayed BMW Championship in Chicago and says the pain has since intensified."It isn't great," Stenson told reporters at East Lake on Wednesday. "It's pretty painful. But hopefully, we can stick it out another four days and still play good."It started last week at BMW. I thought I'd slept funny on my hand on the Saturday morning. It hasn't really been affecting my shots that much but it's gradually getting more and more painful kind of overnight before I get going in the morning."So I'll try to rest it a little bit today and probably come out earlier tomorrow and do a bit more."With the BMW Championship finishing on Monday due to torrential rain in Sunday's scheduled final round, Stenson has had limited time to prepare for East Lake where has never previously competed."The Monday finish in Chicago wasn't ideal for preparations when you're coming into a new venue, but I've done whatever I can here," said the 37-year-old, who sits second in the FedExCup standings."I played nine holes yesterday evening, the front nine, and then I just walked the back nine now to have a look at them."Stenson, who surged to a two-stroke victory in the Deutsche Bank Championship after closing with a five-under-par round of 66 at the TPC Boston, likes the look of the par-70 layout at East Lake."It's a course that should suit my game pretty well," said the Swede. "So far this year, part of my success has been hitting a lot of fairways and a lot of greens, and I think that's going to pay off if I can do that out here."It's got some real long holes, some tough holes. The greens are really slick if you're coming down the hill, so it's key to keep the ball underneath the hole. Good approach play is going to pay off for sure."Every player in the elite field of 30 has a mathematical chance of claiming both the Tour Championship and FedExCup honors but only Stenson and four others are automatically guaranteed the overall playoff prize by winning the tournament."I'm in a good spot, but I still need a lot of good things to happen to be able to pull off the win," said the Swede, a seven-times winner on the European Tour.The other four players who could complete the double this week with victory at the Tour Championship are FedExCup points leader Tiger Woods, Australian Adam Scott and Americans Zach Johnson and Matt Kuchar.
ATLANTA — Henrik Stenson changed his attitude and chose a different target at the Tour Championship.Instead of smashing a driver and a locker, he demolished the front nine at East Lake on Thursday with a five birdies over a six-hole stretch that carried him to a 6-under 64 and a one-shot lead over Masters champion Adam Scott.It was a big turnaround from Monday at Conway Farms, not only on his scorecard but between the ears."I just needed to realize the world is a good place again," Stenson said.Stenson was playing his seventh tournament in 10 weeks when the BMW Championship was extended a day by rain. He slammed his driver so hard into the ground on the final hole that the head snapped off, and then he took out his frustrations on his wooden locker at Conway Farms.Playing all 18 holes at East Lake for the first time, it looked like he couldn't miss. On the opening seven holes, he had only one iron shot outside 10 feet, and he converted five of them for birdie."I really knew I had to be in a good frame of mind coming out there if I wanted to play good golf this week," he said. "As some of you noticed, I wasn't that on Monday when I finished up in Chicago. So it was a good turnaround mentally. I stayed very level-headed — kept the head on, both myself and drivers, and played a great round of golf."Woods missed a short birdie putt on his opening hole that set the tone for the day. He was the only player in the 30-man field to go without a birdie. On the par 5s, Woods three-putted for par on No. 9 and missed a putt just inside 10 feet on No. 15.It was only the seventh time in his PGA Tour career — and third time at East Lake — that he went an entire round without a birdie. Woods shot a 73, matching his highest opening round of the year. He walked past reporters without comment.Scott did his damage on the back nine, making six birdies in seven holes for a 29 that had him tied for the lead until Stenson finished off his remarkable round with a 5-iron from 223 yards to 4 feet for birdie on the par-3 closing hold."It was a tale of two nines, there's no doubt," Scott said. "I missed three greens with wedges on the front nine and wasted all my chances to score. I hit two good shots into 10 and rolled a putt in, which calmed me down. And then I just went and played, and played the way I felt I could."Stenson, the No. 2 seed and the hottest player in golf over the last three months, and Scott (No. 3) only have to win the Tour Championship to capture the FedEx Cup and the $10 million prize. Even more is at stake for Scott, who would be a strong candidate for PGA Tour player of the year if he were to win this week. That would give him three wins, compared with five wins for Woods, though Scott would have a major and the FedEx Cup."There haven't been too many guys who have been in the position the last 12 years to even warrant thinking about it," Scott said. "So it's an opportunity that might not come along too often. I'm going to be working hard to try and make my case for it."More than feeling better about his attitude, Stenson was helped by feeling no pain in his left wrist.He suspects he slept it on wrong last weekend, and it reached a point where it hurt to hold a toothbrush. He played only nine holes of practice — the front nine — on Tuesday and iced his wrist and took anti-inflammatories. It seemed to have worked.The biggest change was his attitude.Stenson is known for public displays of frustrations — remember that poor tee marker at Carnoustie in 2007? — but this was peculiar because he had just won the Deutsche Bank Championship in his previous tournament. That capped off an amazing summer that began with four straight tournaments in the top 3, including two majors and a World Golf Championship. He said he apologized to the club and told the locker room attendants to keep in contact, presumably so he can pay for the repairs.Why so much anger so soon?"I can tell you don't have much experience with Swedes, do you?" Stenson said, handling it with his dry humor. "No, I'll tell you I've always been a bit of a hot-head, and I just haven't been able to get any rest. I was looking forward to that Monday back home and lying on the couch — the kids in school and me just doing nothing, and I ended up playing golf again on that Monday. I was just tired, and I pushed myself over the edge there."That's not the best place to be and not the best frame of mind to play good golf," he said. "I'm really delighted with the change I made to today."In his Tour Championship debut, his head was in the right place, his wrist felt fine and Stenson was on top of his game like never before. He had one stretch of three birdies all within 4 feet, capped off by a 6-iron from 207 yards over water to a right pin that settled a foot away.And he did it all in the presence of Woods, the No. 1 player in the world."It's a nice feeling to hit those kind of shots playing with the world's best player," Stenson said. "Normally, it's him who does it to everyone else. But it was kind of nice to throw a couple at him."
ATLANTA — In-form Swede Henrik Stenson, boosted by a red-hot front nine, totally upstaged his playing partner Tiger Woods as he surged into a one-shot lead in Thursday's opening round of the elite Tour Championship.In glorious sunshine with barely a breath of wind at East Lake Golf Club in the PGA Tour's season finale, Stenson piled up five birdies in six holes with a superb exhibition of pinpoint approach play on the way to a six-under-par 64.Though he dropped his only shot of the day at the par-four 16th, where he found a poor lie in the right rough off the tee and missed the green with his approach, he signed off in style with a four-foot birdie putt at the last."When it's your day, you're hitting good shots and getting them as close as I got them," Stenson, ranked second in the FedExCup standings, said after mixing seven birdies with a lone bogey on the long, challenging East Lake layout."It's a golf course that it's hard to play well out of the rough, that's for sure, and I definitely hit a lot of fairways and greens."Just a very good round of golf but it's still very early in the tournament. One day down, got another three to go."It was not a day to remember, though, for FedExCup points leader Woods who failed to register a single birdie while making three bogeys on the way to a 73, ending the round in 29th place with only PGA Championship winner Jason Dufner (74) below him.It was the first time Woods had completed a round on the PGA Tour without a birdie since his opening round at the 2010 U.S. Open, and only the eighth time during his career on the U.S. circuit.Masters champion Adam Scott of Australia, who reeled off six birdies in seven holes from the 10th, was alone in second after firing a 65, finishing a stroke in front of Americans Billy Horschel and Steve Stricker.Another American, Roberto Castro, opened with a 67 at East Lake where FedExCup playoff honours and the eye-popping $10 million bonus are also on the line, offering huge added incentive to the 30-man field.U.S. Open champion Justin Rose of England, South African Charl Schwartzel, Spaniard Sergio Garcia and Australian Jason Day were among a group of eight players knotted on 68.Woods, seeking a sixth PGA Tour victory this year, missed a six-foot birdie putt at the par-four first, then bogeyed the tricky par-four fifth after hitting his approach into a greenside bunker to reach the turn in one over.He also dropped shots at the 10th, where his tee shot sailed way right, and at the 14th, where he missed the fairway to the left and overshot the green with his second, to slide further down the leaderboard.Woods only hit eight of 14 fairways and 12 greens in regulation, while totalling 34 putts after missing four birdie attempts from inside 10 feet."We know he didn't have the best of days, and he's going to fight hard to try to come back into the tournament," Stenson said of the world number one."It's still a long way to go, but it's always nice to perform the way I did when you're playing with the world's best player."While Woods struggled, the Swede commanded the spotlight after his electrifying start, despite having come into this event with concern over tendinitis in his left wrist which developed during last week's BMW Championship in Chicago.He launched his birdie blitz by hitting his tee shot to six feet at the par-three second and knocking in the putt, then picked up another stroke at the fourth where his approach finished just eight inches from the cup.Stenson, who won the Deutsche Bank Championship earlier this month, struck his second shot to four feet at the fifth, his tee shot to within two feet at the sixth and sank his longest birdie putt of the round at the seventh, a nine-footer."First seven holes is probably as good a proximity to the hole as I've ever had on seven iron shots and I made five birdies out of that," Stenson said.Out in a sizzling five-under 30, Stenson also birdied the 15th before offsetting his bogey on 16 with a birdie at the last.The Swede was also delighted his tendinitis appeared to be on the mend."My wrist didn't feel bad this morning when I woke up," he said. "It's been a pretty heavy regime there, icing it, a couple of anti-inflammatories and treatment on it."That seemed to have done the trick. We're happy with that, and I hope I continue the recovery."Stenson put himself in prime position to land FedExCup honours as only he and the other members of the top five in the standings - Woods, Scott, Zach Johnson and Matt Kuchar - would automatically secure the playoff trophy with victory on Sunday.
CLEVELAND — Zach McAllister lasted five innings and the Cleveland Indians got two gift runs from Houston in a 2-1, rain-shortened victory over the Astros on Friday night to remain near the top of the AL wild-card standings.The game was delayed for 1 hour, 9 minutes before the umpires decided to call it after 6 1-2 innings.The Indians, who entered the night trailing both Tampa Bay and Texas by one-half game for a wild-card spot, scored an unearned run in the second and fourth innings off Brett Oberholtzer (4-4).McAllister (9-9) allowed just one run and got a key double play in the fifth. Bryan Shaw went 1 1-3 innings for his first save.Brandon Laird homered for the inept Astros, who committed three errors, lost their seventh straight and fell to 51-103 — four losses shy of matching the club record set last season.The win improved Cleveland's record to 48-18 against teams currently below .500 — the majors' best mark — and perhaps the biggest reason the Indians have a chance to make the playoffs for the first time since 2007.With a very favorable schedule down the stretch, the Indians were hoping to capitalize on a four-game series against baseball's worst team to stay in the wild-card fray. They needed 11 innings on Thursday night to finally beat Houston 2-1, and then got a major assist from the awful Astros — and Mother Nature — to win again.As they waited out the delay, fans kept tabs on the Tampa Bay-Baltimore and Texas-Kansas City games on Progressive Field's giant scoreboard.McAllister worked in and out of trouble in the fifth, when his slim lead seemed about to vanish.The Astros loaded the bases on a single, walk and single, but the right-hander got leadoff hitter Jonathan Villar to bounce into a 4-6-3 double play to preserve Cleveland's 2-1 lead.McAllister threw four straight balls to Jose Altuve leading off the sixth and was immediately lifted by Indians manager Terry Francona, who wasn't going to wait for the situation to worsen and went to his bullpen. Marc Rzepczynski came on and got two outs — one when catcher Carlos Santana threw out Altuve trying to steal — before Shaw struck out Chris Carter.Shaw worked a 1-2-3 seventh before the game was halted by umpires.With the heavy rain approaching, and the weather forecast looking bleak, the Indians took a 2-1 lead in the fourth thanks to two errors by the Astros on one play.Ryan Raburn hit a one-out single and Asdrubal Cabrera walked. Michael Brantley then hit a grounder to first baseman Carter, who tried to get a forceout at second but threw wildly into left field, allowing Raburn to score. Both runners advanced when a throw to the plate by left fielder Marc Krauss hit a sliding Raburn in the shoulder and the ball skipped to the backstop, a sequence more suited to a Little League field than a major league ballpark.After walking Drew Stubbs to load the bases, Oberholtzer retired Michael Bourn on a grounder to second to keep the Astros within a run.McAllister, who had to endure a lengthy rain delay before his previous start at Chicago, needed just seven pitches to get out of the first inning.He got two quick outs in the second before Laird's fourth homer gave the Astros a 1-0 lead. Laird lined a 1-1 pitch into the left-field seats, his second homer in his last six at-bats.But Laird helped give the run back to the Indians in the second, when with a runner at first, he couldn't handle Cabrera's grounder for an error. Brantley singled and Mike Aviles followed with a hard shot to Laird, who stopped it but dropped it, allowing Carlos Santana to score.NOTES: Indians RHP Justin Masterson (oblique) threw a 33-pitch bullpen session, and it's possible the All-Star could pitch if the Indians make the postseason. Masterson, who has been out since Sept. 2, will be re-evaluated Saturday and could throw a simulated game as soon as Monday. ... The Indians have spread around the walk-off wealth. They have had 10 wins in their final at-bat with nine different players getting the game-winning hit. Jason Kipnis is the only player with two walk-off hits. ... Astros 3B Matt Dominguez was out of the lineup after being hit on the left hand by closer Chris Perez on Thursday. Manager Bo Porter said Dominguez's hand was sore, but X-rays were negative. Dominguez is second on the team with 20 homers and 75 RBIs. "Dominguez is one tough guy," Porter said. "We'll give him a day and let him get treatment and hopefully tomorrow he'll be ready to go." ... Aviles snapped an 0-for-23 slid with a double in the sixth.
ROSEMONT, Ill. — Shavonte Zellous scored 20 points to lead the defending-champion Indiana Fever in an 85-72 victory over the Chicago Sky in the opener of their Eastern Conference semifinal series Friday night.Briann January and Karima Christmas had 16 points each, Erlana Larkins added 12 points and 11 rebounds, and Tamika Catchings scored 11 points for the Fever.Elena Delle Donne scored 20 points to lead Chicago after receiving the league's Rookie of the Year award before the game. Epiphanny Prince had 19 points and Sylvia Fowles, selected as the Defensive Player of the Year, added 16 points and 10 rebounds.Indiana, the only playoff team with a losing record in the regular season, was in control for most of the night against the conference's top seed. Catchings' basket with 5:36 left in the third quarter gave the Fever a 19-point lead, and the Sky got no closer than 12 the rest of the way against a defense that allowed a league-low 70.5 points per game.Game 2 in the best-of-three series is Sunday in Indianapolis.The Fever had the league's lowest shooting percentage at 39.3, but made 51 percent of their shots and had five players score at least 11 points.For Chicago, it was a disappointing start to the franchise's first playoff appearance. In their eighth season, the Sky had a team-record 24 wins and led the East by seven games. However, they lost to Indiana for the fourth time in five meetings this year.The Fever, who lost nine players to injury during the season and four for at least 16 games, were once again without forward Katie Douglas. After appearing in just four regular season games because of a back injury, Douglas did not play after aggravating the injury earlier this week.The Fever took their first double-digit lead with 6:29 left in the first half when Layshia Clarendon hit a 3-pointer from the right corner, giving Indiana a 37-26 lead. The Fever eventually went up by 15 and held a 50-37 advantage at halftime.Indiana shot 56.7 percent from the floor during the first half, including 66.7 percent on 3-pointers.
(Reuters) - A lawyer for pro football Hall of Famer Gale Sayers said on Saturday he would drop a federal lawsuit filed on the former player's behalf that accuses the National Football League of failing to warn him about and protect him against head injuries.Attorney John Winters told Reuters he would voluntarily withdraw the lawsuit, filed on Friday in United States District Court in Chicago, after hearing from the Sayers' family that the Chicago Bears great no longer wanted to pursue the matter.Attempts by Reuters to get comment from Sayers were unsuccessful.The lawsuit came three weeks after the league agreed to pay $765 million to settle a lawsuit brought by thousands of former players, many suffering from dementia and health problems, who accused the league of hiding the dangers of brain injuries.Winters said Sayers, 70, contacted him earlier in the week, wanting to know about the concussion lawsuit against the NFL."After that conversation, he instructed me to file a lawsuit and then today I found out through family members he no longer wants to pursue it," Winters told Reuters on Saturday.The lawsuit also accused helmet maker Riddell of failing to warn him of the risks of concussions, and of not disclosing that the helmets would not prevent concussions.Sayers, known as the Kansas Comet, played running back for Chicago from 1965 to 1972, when he retired in the preseason. Sayers led the league twice in rushing and was a four-time Pro Bowler during his career that was cut short by knee injuries.Sayers was inducted into the Pro Football Hall of Fame in 1977.In 1970, he published a memoir, "I am Third," describing his rise to football glory and his friendship with Chicago Bears teammate Brian Piccolo, who died of cancer. The autobiography was the basis for the 1971 film "Brian's Song."
EVANSTON, Ill. — Linebacker Damien Proby and defensive end Dean Lowry each had an interception return for a touchdown to lead No. 18 Northwestern to a 35-21 win over Maine on Saturday.Northwestern improved to 4-0 as it wrapped up its non-conference slate, but this was not the consistent, steady performance coach Pat Fitzgerald was looking for heading into the Big Ten season. If not for the interception returns for scores, Maine (3-1) very well could have been shooting for an upset down the stretch.Running back Mike Trumpy and quarterback Kain Colter each had rushing touchdowns for Northwestern.Marcus Wasilewski was 25-for-40 for 237 yards with two touchdowns and two interceptions for Maine, which had a 379 to 373 edge over the Wildcats in total yards. Northwestern had posted better than 500 yards of offense in each of its first two games against California and Syracuse.Northwestern scored on its first offensive possession as Colter and receiver Tony Jones hooked up on a 27-yard scoring pass to cap a nine-play, 76-yard drive with 10:18 left in the opening quarter. That was the Wildcats last offensive score until the fourth quarter. Fortunately for Northwestern, the defense came through.Proby had a 49-yard interception return for a touchdown in the final minute of the second quarter to give Northwestern a 14-0 lead. On the play, Wasilewski's pass was tipped by receiver Derrick Johnson and Proby snatched it out of the air and headed the other way with a convey of blockers along for the ride.Less than five minutes into the second half, the defense made another huge play. Proby pressured Wasilewski caused the quarterback to lose control of the pass as he attempted to throw on the run. Lowry scooped the floating pass and returned it 19 yards for the score to make it 21-0.Maine finally got on the board with 3:02 left in the third as Wasilewski found tight end Justin Perillo for an 11-yard scoring pass to make it 21-7.Northwestern, though, dashed hopes of a Maine comeback on the ensuing possession when the offense produced an 8-play, 74-yard scoring drive capped by Trumpy's 7-yard run that made it 28-7 five seconds into the fourth quarter.
PITTSBURGH — James Neal scored in the shootout to give the Penguins a 3-2 preseason win over the Blackhawks after Chicago's Bryan Bickell and Pittsburgh's Kris Letang scored two goals apiece in regulation on Monday night.Letang pulled the Penguins within 2-1 at 9:23 of the third with an unassisted breakaway goal and then pulled the Penguins even at 17:44 with a power-play goal via a slapper from the point.Bickell scored a short-handed goal from the slot 1:09 into the second when he batted in the puck out of midair. He added a power-play goal by tipping in Jeremy Morin's shot from the point at the 14:00 mark of the middle frame.Jeff Zatkoff stopped 30 shots for Pittsburgh and Nikolai Khabibulin made 31 saves for Chicago.
CHICAGO — Jose Quintana pitched into the eighth inning and rookie Marcus Semien hit his first homer to lead the Chicago White Sox to a 3-2 victory over the Toronto Blue Jays on Monday night.Quintana (9-6), who entered the game with the most no-decisions in the American League at 17, allowed two runs on five hits in 7 1-3 innings. Addison Reed pitched the ninth inning to record his 39th save of the season.Toronto starter J.A. Happ (4-7) threw 110 pitches in his five innings, allowing three runs and eight hits.Semien's homer in the second inning opened the scoring. With Dayan Viciedo on first, Semien hit an 0-2 pitch from Happ down the line and well over the fence for a 2-0 lead. Semien was called up on Sept. 4.The Blue Jays cut the lead in half as catcher J.P. Arencibia led off the fifth inning with his 21st homer, but the White Sox got the run back in the bottom of the inning when Avisail Garcia led off with a solo shot to make it 3-1.The Blue Jays closed the gap to 3-2 on a run-scoring single by Ryan Goins in the eighth inning, but that was as close as they got.NOTES: Adam Dunn was not in the starting lineup for the third straight game on Monday. White Sox manager Robin Ventura said his playing time has been limited lately in part to get some younger guys in the lineup. Although Dunn is hitting .218 this season, he is batting .130 in September with 27 strikeouts in 17 games. "Some people have to sit and watch, but I understand and it's good to kind of evaluate the kids, too," Dunn said. ... This game was a makeup of a rain out on June 12. The White Sox flew in from Detroit on their way to Cleveland, while the Blue Jays flew in from Boston on their way to Baltimore. "You can use a day off when what happened back in June happened, but you know there's a price to pay later," Toronto manager John Gibbons said. ... Ventura's original three-year contract expires after next season, but he said he isn't interested in discussing a contract extension right now. "It has to be on both sides," he said, "but that's a discussion for another day." ... The White Sox will send Hector Santiago (4-9) against Ubaldo Jimenez (12-9) in Cleveland on Tuesday, while the Blue Jays will send Todd Redmond (4-2) against Baltimore's Chris Tillman (16-7).
CHICAGO — The Pittsburgh Pirates are going to the playoffs for the first time in 21 years.After two consecutive decades of losing, the Pirates (90-67) clinched at least a National League wild card Monday night when they beat the Chicago Cubs 2-1 and the Washington Nationals lost to St. Louis 4-3.It will be Pittsburgh's first trip to the postseason since Barry Bonds, Jim Leyland and Co. won three straight NL East titles from 1990-92. Bonds then left for San Francisco as a free agent, and the small-budget Pirates piled up 20 consecutive losing records — the longest streak in the four major professional sports.Starling Marte hit a tiebreaking homer in the ninth inning Monday night at Wrigley Field, and the Pirates threw out a runner at the plate for the final out.
CINCINNATI — No champagne. No curtain call in front of joyous fans. No celebrating at all, really. The Cincinnati Reds clinched a playoff spot with hardly any notice.If anything, they were a little bummed out.Shin-Soo Choo drove in the winning run with a single off the wall in the 10th inning, and the Reds secured their third playoff spot in four years shortly after beating the New York Mets 3-2 on Monday night.They want a whole lot more than the wild card that's already in hand."We're excited, obviously," shortstop Zack Cozart said, looking over a clubhouse where the only visible celebration was the image of Pittsburgh Pirates spraying each other on television. "That's not our goal. We're in the division hunt. We're not happy with a wild card."The Reds clinched theirs after Choo's drive smacked high off the wall in left-center field. Eight minutes later, the St. Louis Cardinals beat the Washington Nationals 4-3, clinching an NL wild card for Pittsburgh.The Reds were pulling for first-place St. Louis to lose. Instead, the Cardinals retained their two-game lead over Cincinnati and Pittsburgh in the NL Central."I was pulling for the Nationals to win, get a step closer to the Cardinals," manager Dusty Baker said. "We've still got five games to go. A lot of baseball."The Reds kept pace with St. Louis despite squandering plenty of chances to end it early. They wasted a chance in the ninth, when David Aardsma pitched out of a bases-loaded threat by retiring Todd Frazier on a fly out.Greg Burke (0-3) gave up a one-out single to Devin Mesoraco in the 10th, and Derrick Robinson singled him to third. Choo followed with his third hit of the game, off left-hander Sean Henn, a drive high off the wall in left-center. Choo headed for the dugout after crossing first base.Manny Parra (2-3) allowed one hit in the 10th.It was a notable win for the Reds — their 90th of the season, the third time in the last four years that they have reached the mark under Baker. They haven't had so many 90-win seasons since the Big Red Machine of the 1970s.Johnny Cueto made a second solid start since coming off the disabled list, an encouraging sign for Cincinnati's postseason plans. The right-hander has been sidelined three times by soreness near his shoulder.He gave up two runs — one earned — on Lucas Duda's sacrifice fly and solo homer, which snapped an 0-for-17 slump. In two starts, Cueto has allowed eight hits and one earned run in 12 innings.Cueto's 99-pitch outing was the most encouraging part of the night for the Reds, who could have their ace back for the playoffs."He was excellent," Baker said. "He's getting ready. Each time he goes out, he gets his endurance up."The Reds got two runs in six innings off Aaron Harang, who made his third start for the Mets. Choo singled home a run in the second and Joey Votto got one of his career-high five walks with the bases loaded.Harang is 3-0 in four career starts against the Reds, including a 4-2 victory with Seattle on July 5 at Great American Ball Park. The Mariners later released him with a 5-11 record.The Reds sustained their hopes of another division title by winning another long game — they are 13-9 in extra innings.Last September, Baker was in a Chicago hospital getting treated for an irregular heartbeat and a mini-stroke when the Reds clinched the NL Central title. They made a video of their spray-away celebration and wished for another when he returned.It didn't happy. Cueto had to leave the opening game of the playoffs at San Francisco after only eight pitches because of a strained muscle in his right side. With their rotation in flux, the Reds lost the five-game series.This season, the Reds have stayed in contention despite losing Cueto, setup relievers Sean Marshall and Jonathan Broxton, and cleanup hitter Ryan Ludwick for most of the season. Ludwick tore cartilage in his right shoulder while sliding into a base on opening day and was out for more than three months.They were six games out on Aug. 9, in danger of falling out of the division's three-team race. They regrouped and have taken the race down to the final week by winning 12 of their last 17.NOTES: New York's David Wright had his hitting streak ended at eight games. ... Billy Hamilton got in as a pinch-runner in the eighth and stole second, leaving him 13 for 13 in attempts. The Mets called for a pitchout but Frank Francisco threw it over the plate. ... Votto has walked 132 times this season, tying Joe Morgan's club record from 1975. The five walks also tied a club record. ... RHP Mike Leake (14-6) starts for the Reds on Tuesday against LHP Jonathon Niese (7-8).
PITTSBURGH — At the rate the Chicago Bears' defense is scoring, the offense might not be able to keep up.At the moment, that's hardly a problem.Major Wright returned an interception for a touchdown and Julius Peppers rumbled 42 yards after recovering Ben Roethlisberger's fumble for another score as the Bears remained unbeaten with a 40-23 win over the reeling Pittsburgh Steelers on Sunday night.The Bears forced five turnovers in all and improved to 3-0 for the second time in four years after racing to a 21-point lead then hitting the gas after the Steelers (0-3) drew within four in the fourth quarter."That's what we do, we take the ball away," Peppers said. "We stress it in practice every day, and it carries over to the game ... we have to continue to do that on a weekly basis to continue to win, and I believe we'll be able to do that."Here are five reasons the Bears extended Pittsburgh's miserable September.1. GETTING AFTER ROETHLISBERGER: Facing an offense that ranked 31st in the league coming in, the Bears decided to blitz Roethlisberger early and often. While Roethlisberger managed to throw for 406 yards passing and two touchdowns, he also tossed two interceptions and fumbled twice. Typically, ball security isn't an issue for Roethlisberger. It was when the Bears reached their paws out whenever he tried to step up in the pocket."I honestly thought the two fumbles were good plays," Roethlisberger said. "Sometimes I don't want to call it luck, but sometimes they hit the ball just right and it pops out."2. STEADY UNDER PRESSURE: A field goal by Shaun Suisham early in the fourth quarter cut Chicago's advantage to 27-23 when the Bears responded with a nine-play 74-yard drive that ended with a 17-yard touchdown pass from Jay Cutler to Earl Bennett. Chicago converted three lengthy third downs during the drive, including Bennett's acrobatic catch in the corner of the end zone."The (defensive) back was there, but the throw was perfect and I was able to make the play," Bennett said. "The way we played in the fourth quarter, that really shows how resilient we are."3. SLOPPY, SLOPPY: Pittsburgh spent the week leading up to the game preaching ball security. All that talk fell on deaf ears. Four of the turnovers led directly to points for the Bears. While the Steelers racked up 459 total yards, most of them came while they were trying to scramble back into the game."You're not going to beat anybody in the NFL playing like that," Pittsburgh coach Mike Tomlin said. "We know it. We understand it. It doesn't make it any less painful but that's just the reality of where we are."4. PICKING PITTSBURGH APART: Cutler spent most of the game focusing on short passes to negate the variety of blitzes the Steelers threw his way. He completed 20 of 30 passes for 159 yards and was sacked just twice. He also made one of the game's biggest plays when he scrambled for 13 yards to extend the game-clinching drive. Rather than slide, Cutler opted to lower his shoulder and plow into Pittsburgh cornerback Robert Golden.Cutler was on the better side of the collision."I wanted to make sure I had the first down," Cutler said. "We were struggling on third down in the second half so I wanted to make sure we kept the drive going."5. FAST STARTS: The Bears won their first two games thanks to furious rallies. It wasn't required this time after Chicago moved in front 24-3 after Wright dashed 38 yards after stepping in front of Roethlisberger's pass in the second quarter. The cushion sent some at Heinz Field dashing to an early exit and gave Chicago a major boost playing on the road for the first time this season."We kept our poise in the noise," Chicago coach Marc Trestman said. "That was number one tonight ... It wasn't easy to beat a great defensive team to the punch like we did at times tonight."
Enny Romero pitched well in his major league debut, combining with five relievers on a three-hitter, as the host Tampa Bay Rays beat the Baltimore Orioles, 3-1, on Sunday to maintain their lead in the American League wild-card race.Tampa Bay took three out of four from Baltimore, leaving the Orioles four and a half games behind the Cleveland Indians for the second wild-card spot.Romero, promoted from Class AAA Durham earlier in the day, gave up Manny Machado's leadoff single to start the game. But that was the only hit off Romero, who also walked four in four and two-thirds innings. Brandon Gomes (3-1) replaced Romero with two on and two outs in the fifth and struck out Machado.ROYALS 4, RANGERS 0 Justin Maxwell hit a grand slam with two outs in the 10th inning for host Kansas City.The Oakland Athletics clinched the A.L. West title with the Rangers' loss. Royals starter James Shields gave up six hits in eight innings, walking one and striking out two. Texas starter Alexi Ogando pitched two-hit ball for seven innings, striking out five.INDIANS 9, ASTROS 2 Michael Brantley and Michael Bourn each had two runs batted in, and Carlos Santana homered as host Cleveland clung to the second wild-card spot. Brantley hit a two-out R.B.I. single in the fourth inning off Erik Bedard (4-12), and Bourn tripled in a four-run sixth. Corey Kluber (10-5) dodged trouble through five and a third innings as the Indians improved to 50-18 against teams with losing records.RED SOX 5, BLUE JAYS 2 David Ortiz and Jackie Bradley Jr. homered to lead A.L. East champion Boston to a victory in the regular-season finale at Fenway Park. Felix Doubront (11-6) pitched seven strong innings, and Koji Uehara pitched a perfect ninth for his 21st save.WHITE SOX 6, TIGERS 3 Erik Johnson pitched into the seventh inning in his fourth career start to lead visiting Chicago. Prince Fielder homered for the Tigers.ATHLETICS 11, TWINS 7 Coco Crisp hit a three-run home run and Daric Barton and Jed Lowrie each had solo homers to lead host Oakland. Sonny Gray (4-3) gave up four runs and seven hits in five innings for the A's.REDS 11, PIRATES 3 The rookie Billy Hamilton had three hits and stole two bases to lift visiting Cincinnati to a tie with Pittsburgh for the National League wild-card lead. Jay Bruce hit a three-run double and Todd Frazier followed with a homer during a five-run outburst in the first inning. Bronson Arroyo (14-11) won for the first time in nearly a month.BREWERS 6, CARDINALS 4 Norichika Aoki scored three times and doubled home a run, and Milwaukee took advantage of three St. Louis errors to win at home. Wily Peralta (11-15) gave up five hits and walked five in five-plus innings for the Brewers.MARLINS AND NATIONALS SPLIT Third baseman Chris Coghlan's error allowed Eury Perez to score from third in the ninth inning, giving host Washington a 5-4 win in the second game of a doubleheader. Giancarlo Stanton and Christian Yelich homered as Miami won the opener, 4-2. The Nationals' loss assured the Braves the N.L. East title and the Cardinals a playoff spot.AROUND THE MAJORS The Phillies signed Ryne Sandberg, the interim manager, to a three-year contract. ... A swarm of bees caused a 23-minute delay in the Mariners' 3-2 win over the Angels in Anaheim.
CHICAGO — Gerrit Cole threw six strong innings and the Pittsburgh Pirates took over the NL wild-card lead, beating the Chicago Cubs 8-2 Tuesday night.The Pirates moved one game ahead of Cincinnati, which lost to the Mets 4-2. Pittsburgh remained two games behind NL Central-leading St. Louis.One night after clinching their first postseason spot in 21 years, Cole and the Pirates showed few signs of a letdown. Cole hit a two-run single, Pedro Alvarez drove in three runs and Jordy Mercer homered.Cole (10-7) won his fourth straight start, giving up two runs and seven hits. He struck out six and walked one.Cole's single came during a three-run second inning against Chris Rusin (2-6).The Cubs lost for the 11th time in 14 games, and their 50th defeat at home set a team record. Chicago plays its Wrigley Field finale Wednesday.Rusin lost his third straight decision. Alvarez opened the scoring when his second-inning double to right got stuck in the ivy, driving in Marlon Byrd. With two outs, Cole singled home Gaby Sanchez and Alvarez.Mercer hit a solo shot in the third, connecting for his seventh homer and first since Aug. 22.Starlin Castro hit an RBI single in the Cubs third. Pittsburgh broke open the game in the fifth when Alvarez hit a two-run double for a 6-1 lead.Chicago tried to rally in the sixth, scoring when Mercer mishandled Anthony Rizzo's bases-loaded grounder to shortstop, allowing Ryan Sweeney to score.But Cole struck out Dioner Navarro and pinch-hitter Luis Valbuena before Donnie Murphy flied out deep on Cole's 34th pitch of the inning and his last one of the night.NOTES: Pirates manager Clint Hurdle said struggling All-Star Jeff Locke will not pitch Sunday against Cincinnati, and said Cole could "potentially" start that day while RHP Charlie Morton would be on his regular rest Saturday. But Hurdle didn't formally announce his starters after A.J. Burnett on Friday. Locke is 1-3 with a 6.00 ERA in four September starts. ... Logan Watkins started at second base, and Cubs manager Dale Sveum said Darwin Barney was just getting a day off and would be back in the lineup Wednesday. Barney is hitting .156 in 20 September games. ... Pirates OF Andrew McCutchen didn't seem to enjoy too much of the champagne from Monday night. "After a while, it's a little too cold for me, but I'll take it," McCutchen said. "I think next time, we should just leave it hot." ... The pitching matchup Wednesday is Pittsburgh LHP Francisco Liriano (16-7, 2.88) against Chicago RHP Jake Arrieta (3-2, 3.94).
CHICAGO — Players chanted "MVP! MVP!" as they doused Andrew McCutchen in the visitors' clubhouse, two decades of futility finally washed away.The last time the Pirates made the playoffs, Barry Bonds was in the middle of the order. The average price of gas was $1.13 a gallon.Yes, it had been that long.The Pirates are going to the playoffs for the first time in 21 years, clinching at least a National League wild card Monday night when they beat the Chicago Cubs 2-1 and the Washington Nationals lost to St. Louis. And they hope that's just the start, not the end."We're definitely not done," McCutchen said. "We've got some games left. We still could move farther."Now, they can turn their attention toward bigger goals, the kind that seemed like nothing more than a pipe dream through all those losing seasons.It will be Pittsburgh's first trip to the postseason since Bonds, Jim Leyland and Co. won three straight NL East titles from 1990-92. Bonds then left for San Francisco as a free agent, and the small-budget Pirates piled up 20 consecutive losing records — the longest streak in the four major professional sports."For me, it's not about the last 21 years," Russell Martin said. "For me, it was just about this year, and what we could do this year. They had a good season last year, lost some steam late in September, but I knew that if you're having a good season all the way into September, you know you have a good club."Starling Marte hit a tiebreaking homer in the ninth inning at Wrigley Field, and the Pirates threw out a runner at the plate for the final out.The Pirates sprayed each other with bubbly and beer and sparkling cider in the visitors' clubhouse once St. Louis' 4-3 win over the Nationals became final.The Cincinnati Reds also clinched at least a wild-card berth, when they beat the New York Mets 3-2 in 10 innings. The Pirates and Reds, both 90-67, trail St. Louis by two games in the NL Central with five to go.Pittsburgh players sang Journey's "Don't Stop Believing." They took pictures and manager Clint Hurdle had them gather for a group photo in the middle of the cramped visitors' clubhouse."The people of Pittsburgh have been waiting a long time," said Neil Walker, who homered.The Pirates snapped a 1-all tie when Marte sent a drive off Kevin Gregg (2-6) with two outs in the ninth into the left field bleachers.In a fitting coincidence, they then preserved the victory on the final out in a play at the plate.McCutchen, the center fielder, picked up Ryan Sweeney's bloop single after right fielder Marlon Byrd failed in trying to scoop up the ball and threw to first baseman Justin Morneau, positioned just in front of the pitcher's mound. Morneau caught the throw on one hop and made the relay to catcher Russell Martin, who applied the tag on Nate Schierholtz trying to score from first base.Still on his knees, Martin held the ball over his head in jubilation. Then, he heaved the ball toward deep left field as the Pirates celebrated near the mound, and Jason Grilli grabbed him, having escaped with his 32nd save in 34 chances."Twenty-one years since we popped champagne in a Pirates clubhouse — and we're acting like it's been a long time," Hurdle said. "The hard work, the fun. I'm just proud of each and every man in here, the fans they represent, ownership, general manager, president ... the scouts, players. This has been a group effort for a long time."The Pirates' last trip to the playoffs ended with Atlanta's Sid Bream sliding home with the winning run in the bottom of the ninth inning of Game 7 of the 1992 NL championship series.The Cubs tied it in the eighth off Mark Melancon (3-2).Marte's 12th homer set off loud boos for Gregg (2-6), who was almost released last week after going on a rant to reporters when he thought he had lost the closer's job to Pedro Strop.Walker homered against Jeff Samardzija in the first to give the Pirates a 1-0 lead, and Charlie Morton pitched three-hit ball over seven scoreless innings before the Cubs tied it against Melancon.Brian Bogusevic led off the eighth with a single, his second hit, and moved up on a groundout by Darwin Barney. Then, after a wild pitch, he scored the tying run on a single by pinch-hitter Donnie Murphy.That spoiled a terrific start for Morton, who struck out five and walked one.Samardzija was almost as good, allowing one run and five hits over six innings. He struck out seven and walked four after going 0-1 with a 7.11 ERA in his previous four starts.Samardzija's only blemish in this one came when Walker drove a 1-1 pitch out to left-center with one out in the first.With the long ball, Walker matched a career high of 14 set last season. He has four homers in the past five games.Samardzija settled down after that but got little support as the Cubs lost for the 10th time in 13 games. It was also the second straight day an opponent celebrated at Wrigley Field.Atlanta clinched the NL East on Sunday, and this time, it was the Pirates' turn to party."That's what we need to do," Samardzija said. "I think we're getting there, but we need to get some things ironed out."
HARRISON, N.J. — Red Bulls goalkeeper Luis Robles is first to admit his play early in the season did little to engender confidence from his coach, teammates and fans."It's been an adjustment; at the beginning of the season there were a lot of changes," he said after recording his 10th shutout of the Major League Soccer season in the Red Bulls' 1-0 win over visiting Dallas on Sunday evening. "I was working with a new coach, new coaching staff, new players, new faces. I knew that during that rough patch if I had to just continue to keep my mind on the way I wanted to play and continue to work hard, and get support from the guys."That rough patch now seems like ancient history, a reference to a game in late March, a 1-0 loss at Montreal. A few games later came a subpar performance in allowing three goals against Chicago. With last year's rookie sensation Ryan Meara recovering from a hip operation, fans seemed to be growing impatient with some of Robles's erratic play and ill-timed forays off his goal line."I'm not oblivious to it but I think I felt more toward my teammates," he said. "When I was on the field, I wanted to be able to not only play well for them, but also let them know that I got their backs. There were some really difficult moments, but I got support from them and that helped a lot."Now, behind a relatively stable back line, Robles, 29, and the Red Bulls (15-9-6 for a league-leading 51 points) are riding a four-game winning streak into next Sunday night's match at Seattle, the first-place team in the Western Conference. The Red Bulls have four games left in the regular season, two home and two away. The club leads Sporting Kansas City by 3 points and third-place Montreal by 6, but has played 30 games to Kansas City's 29 and Montreal's 28.Against Dallas, Robles had only two shots on goal to deal with, but each of those saves preserved the 0-0 score line until the 76th minute when Dallas defender Erick pushed Jonny Steele's crossing pass into his own goal. Nearly on the stroke of halftime, Robles thwarted Fabian Castillo's shot from an extreme angle to the goalkeeper's right after Castillo walked in alone on goal."He was coming in at a pretty tight angle, so I figured I could close out that post and kind of entice him to go to the back post and he did," Robles said after the match. "And lucky for me, he hit more of a dink, he didn't just smash it. But I think that was the only shot on goal that our defense gave up. It just continues to show that there were some things we needed to work out at the beginning of the season, middle of the season, and at the beginning of the season, everyone was saying that we couldn't finish games. But if you look at the way we played the last 10 games, it's starting to show the fruits of our labor. Being diligent and disciplined, and working hard each and every week. So huge credit to not only the back four, but the team in general for putting in 90-minute work defensively."Coach Mike Petke said: "In a goalkeeper, you expect him to come up with one huge save a game, a game-changing save. And Robles has done that, if not more than that, so I'm very happy with where he's at."Steele echoed his coach's comments: "Huge save. Luis comes up big for us a lot of times, you know. At the end of the day, that's his job. You get one shot and you expect him to save it."Midfielder Tim Cahill said at the break that he told Robles that the save "could win us the game," a prescient prediction from the rugged Australian.The match against the Sounders is likely to draw another big crowd to CenturyLink Field and have an impact on the race for the league's Supporters Shield. The silverware goes to the No. 1 team over all in the regular season and includes an automatic berth in next season's Concacaf Champions League."When I first decided to come here, playing teams like Seattle and Los Angeles were the games I was looking forward to," Cahill said. "In England you always wanted to go up against the big teams and the big crowds — Manchester United, Manchester City, Arsenal. It's what we play for. It's exciting.
We preached patience in last week's article, and while the N.F.L. landscape has become a little more clear heading into Week 4, it is still too early to give up on some stars who have yet to produce as expected.Enter Robert Griffin III, who is one of our favorable matchup picks at quarterback for Week 4 against the Oakland Raiders. While the Redskins' passing game is clearly not the same beast it was last season, all it takes is one good matchup to right the ship (see Cam Newton versus the Giants).Good signs from Griffin's Week 3 outing included a third straight 300-yard passing game and a season-high six rushing attempts. He is on the verge of breaking out, and that could happen as soon as this week against a struggling Oakland secondary, which is surrendering the eighth most fantasy points to quarterbacks this season.If you have a tough lineup question for Week 4, you can ask us on Twitter. Follow us at @5thDownFantasy.Tony Romo (DAL) vs. San Diego — With DeMarco Murray busy beating up the Rams on the ground, Romo had to throw it only 24 times in Week 3, but he still managed three touchdowns. A date with the N.F.L.'s worst pass defense, which is also allowing a fantasy-best 32 points to the position in early 2013, is next.Ben Roethlisberger (PIT) vs. Minnesota — His 406 yards and 2 TDs versus Chicago were offset by 2 interceptions, 2 fumbles and 3 sacks in Week 3. Next up are the Vikings, who were lit up by the third-string Browns QB Brian Hoyer to the tune of 321 yards and 3 touchdowns in Week 3 and have allowed quarterbacks no less than 24 standard fantasy points per game this year.Andrew Luck (IND) vs. Jacksonville — With the new offensive coordinator Pep Hamilton's heavy ground attack in full swing last week against the 49ers, Luck's stat line suffered greatly (164 yards on 27 attempts). A better fantasy day should be in store this week against a dreadful Jaguars defense (seventh best QB matchup, 26 fantasy points per game) that just yielded 29 points to Russell Wilson last Sunday.Joe Flacco (BAL) vs. Buffalo — An already thin Buffalo defense suffered more significant injuries during Week 3's loss to the Jets, losing starting defensive end Alex Carrington for the season and cornerback Leodis McKelvin to a hamstring pull. Flacco should be able to put up decent QB2 numbers this week considering the Bills are fresh off a 331-yard, 3-touchdown shellacking from the Jets rookie Geno Smith.Bernard Pierce (BAL) vs. Buffalo — Assuming Ray Rice (hip) is held out another week, Pierce would be a must-start RB2 option against a banged-up Bills defense (30th versus run, N.F.L.) that surrendered 149 yards to the Jets' Bilal Powell last weekend. What Pierce lacks in elusiveness and ability he makes up for in toughness, as his grinding performance against a tough Texans front last week demonstrated (24 carries, 65 yards, 1 touchdown).Le'Veon Bell (PIT) vs. Minnesota — Bell is expected to play this weekend, and there is a good chance he'll handle lead back duties after doing so in practice for over a week now. He is set up to make an early impact as the Vikings have allowed the fourth most fantasy points to the position this season.Frank Gore (SF) vs. St Louis — Why Gore had only 11 carries in a close game with the Colts after averaging a robust 7.5 yards a tote is perplexing, and we cannot blame Gore for being upset with his coach. There seems to be a trend where backs complain about how they have been used and are then rewarded with more carries the following week. If this holds true, Gore and his owners should be much happier in a matchup with a Rams unit that is yielding 22 fantasy points per game to RBs through three weeks (sixth most).Trent Richardson (IND) vs. Jacksonville — We can't write off the idea of Ahmad Bradshaw seeing another healthy cut of the workload after his gutsy Week 3 performance (19 carries, 95 yards, 1 TD), but Richardson (13 carries, 35 yards, 1 TD) should be more involved after another week getting accustomed to his new surroundings. Jacksonville has allowed the third most rushing yards (384) and yards per carry (5.2) in the league.Bilal Powell (Jets) vs. Tennessee — The Titans have allowed the ninth most yards per carry (4.4) and Powell, who is coming off a career-high 27 carries for 149 yards against Buffalo, will have the backfield all to himself with Chris Ivory out for the next several weeks (hamstring).Torrey Smith (BAL) vs. Buffalo — Despite a goose egg in the touchdown category, Smth is tied for 9th in targets this season with 30 and is 10th in yards with 269. A touchdown could be in the cards this week as the Bills enter Week 4 in a five-way tie for most touchdowns allowed to opposing wideouts with five (31 fantasy points per game, fourth best WR matchup).
CHICAGO — On the first day of Chicago Blackhawks training camp, the questions came hard and fast. They were not about line pairings or the familiar early-season talk of expectations. These queries were larger in scope, more historical in perspective: Are the Blackhawks a budding dynasty?Chicago's Stanley Cup championship in June was its second in four years, and the Blackhawks are the only team with two championships in the salary cap era. A year ago, they opened the season with an N.H.L.-record 24-game point streak and posted an .802 winning percentage, the third best in league history.The nucleus and most of that roster's spare parts return this season, led by a talented group still considered young by league standards. The annual Hart Trophy contenders Patrick Kane, 24, and Jonathan Toews, 25, are signed through the next two seasons. The blue-line stalwarts Duncan Keith, 30, and Brent Seabrook, 28, are already signed to long-term deals."Hopefully we can go win another one," Kane said. "That's not trying to prove yourself as a dynasty; we just want to play well. But, sure, you get excited looking around the locker room because it's almost the same team as we had last year."Dynasty or not, all summer and throughout training camp, the hype surrounding Chicago has reached a low roar. Justin Bieber posted a picture on Twitter from the Blackhawks' locker room during a trip to Chicago; a commercial in which Kane shows off his stick handling was an Internet sensation; the W.W.E. wrestler Phillip Jack Brooks, known as CM Punk, wore a Keith jersey one night.Recently, General Manager Stan Bowman declared that Toews and Kane would "be here forever." Sports Illustrated then put Kane's picture on its cover — the magazine's fourth Blackhawks cover this year — and picked Chicago to repeat as Stanley Cup champions."Obviously when you win a championship, the expectations get raised for the team, the players — but also for the organization as well," Keith said.What makes the Blackhawks' run stand out is how hockey's landscape has changed with the economics of the salary cap. This year's cap, governed by a new collective bargaining agreement, fell to $64.3 million. Still, the Blackhawks navigated the change well, losing only a couple of key pieces — forwards Viktor Stalberg and Dave Bolland, who scored the Cup-clinching goal.Much of the Blackhawks' talent is homegrown. Toews and Kane were draft picks. Last season, Brandon Saad, 20, was a key contributor, and goaltender Corey Crawford, 28, stepped in three seasons ago after Antti Niemi was lost to free agency. Crawford signed a long-term deal in the off-season.There is more help on the way, should Chicago need it. Hockey Prospectus ranked the farm system in the league's top 10, highlighting forwards Teuvo Teravainen and Brandon Pirri. And Toews and Kane might still have untapped potential."These guys still got a ways to go where they're still going to be improving," Coach Joel Quenneville said. "I watch Kaner out here in practice, and he looks quicker, he looks stronger. Johnny's at that same place."Scotty Bowman, Stan's father and a senior adviser for Chicago, knows a thing or two about dynasties. He coached the Montreal Canadiens to five Stanley Cups during the 1970s, including four in a row (his 1977 and 1978 teams are the only two to have higher winning percentages than last year's Blackhawks), and won another four Cups with the Pittsburgh Penguins and the Detroit Red Wings.He cited health as a key to what the team has achieved, singling out Sidney Crosby as an example of how talent can be derailed by injuries."You can't predict it and you can't bargain for it when your top guys get hurt," he said.As for how the current Blackhawks stack against some of the great teams he coached, Scotty Bowman was skeptical, noting that his Canadiens teams had double-digit Hall of Famers."To have that many Hall of Famers is really something," Bowman said. "And to do it for a decade is a long, long time. There's a core, but I just don't know if you can do it for that long in today's game."The Blackhawks open the season Tuesday night in Chicago against the Washington Capitals. A banner will be raised, and later this season rings will be handed out. The first hurdle is ensuring there is no Cup hangover, as there was in 2010-11, when the Blackhawks got off to a slow start and squeaked into the playoffs. Quenneville said the focus had not been avoiding a slow start, but replicating the energy from last year's opening month.Players insisted that despite the attention and the buzz, their attention, as much as possible, remains firmly on the schedule's next game."It's flattering to hear, and obviously you've done something good if they call you a dynasty," defenseman Niklas Hjalmarsson said. "Maybe after your career when you think back on what you accomplished, you might be really proud of it. But now you just live day by day."
CHICAGO — In the Cubs' 137-year history, no two-season stretch has been worse, mathematically, than 2012 and 2013. After suffering 101 defeats a year ago, the Cubs lost another 96 games this season, and on Monday, the president for baseball operations, Theo Epstein, fired Manager Dale Sveum.Epstein arrived in Chicago two years ago with the task of bringing a World Series title to a franchise that had just finished its 105th season without one. Sveum was brought in to groom young talent as the organization embraced rebuilding. Before he was hired, Sveum appeared headed to the Boston Red Sox, the team Epstein had just left. But Boston settled on a flashier candidate, Bobby Valentine. Two seasons later, Valentine and Sveum are both out of a job.The Cubs have limped through the first two years of Epstein's tenure, with most of his resources and attention paid to acquiring young players. Chicago now has a handful of blue chip prospects and has one of the top farm systems. But Sveum never saw the benefits."Today's decision was absolutely not made to provide a scapegoat for our shortcomings or detract from our biggest issue: a shortage of talent at the major league level," Epstein said at a news conference.Sveum's undoing, Epstein said, was not his won-loss record but the lack of growth of the Cubs' young stars. Epstein signed shortstop Starlin Castro, 23, and first baseman Anthony Rizzo, 24, to long-term contract extensions, and both struggled this season. Castro batted a career-worst .245 after back-to-back All-Star seasons. Rizzo hit 23 home runs but struck out 127 times and hit only .233.As for where the Cubs turn next, many in Chicago are clamoring for the Yankees' manager, Joe Girardi, whose ties to Chicago are strong: he grew up in nearby Peoria, went to college at Northwestern and played his first four big league seasons in Chicago.The Cubs would need the Yankees' permission to interview Girardi because he is under contract until Nov. 1. Epstein did not cite any candidates but said he would start the formal process of speaking with teams and coaches Tuesday morning.He emphasized the importance of leadership, said he preferred a candidate with major league managerial experience and added that ties to the Cubs organization would be a plus. Girardi certainly checks all three boxes. Yet on Sunday in Houston, he did not sound keen on returning to his Midwest roots."I haven't lived there since 2006," Girardi said. "My father's gone. My mother's gone. So there's not as much there as there used to be."Girardi lives in Westchester County and seems to like it, noting that his young family is settled there. On Sunday, he sounded more like someone who had contemplated taking a year or two off and then returning to managing."It depends what everyone wants," Girardi said. "If I wasn't to manage next year, I don't think that would be the last time I would manage."Another name linked to the Cubs is Brad Ausmus, who played 18 major league seasons and is a special assistant with the San Diego Padres.
The rookie coach Mike Petke has been with the Red Bulls/MetroStars through bad times, worse times and sheer debacles. That is why he is guardedly sanguine about his team's current state."If anyone's wondering why I don't talk Supporters Shield and playoffs it's because I've been around this organization for a long time and for every two or three good things that happen it seems they come crashing down in the end," Petke said Tuesday during his weekly conference call. "I'm just not going to set ourselves up for that, and it's why I don't want to think past the next game."We do what we can do to be set up for some good things. But we've all lived this scenario for 16 years."No one who has followed the club, then called the New York/New Jersey MetroStars, since the inception of Major League Soccer in 1996 is likely to dispute Petke's measured reasoning. Petke is a New York native (Long Island) who played for the club from 1998 to 2002, with little collective success to show. The club has been in the title game once (losing to Columbus in 2008).Now in his first season as the team's coach after a few years as an assistant to Hans Backe (remember him?), Petke has the Red Bulls (15-9-7, 52 points) on a five-game unbeaten streak. If the Red Bulls can get through the last three regular-season games without a loss, the team would eclipse this season's longest streak without a loss, which is seven games from April 20 to May 26. Sunday's 1-1 tie in the rain at Seattle put the Red Bulls into the top spot over all in M.L.S. with a shot at winning the Supporters Shield that goes to the No. 1 team over all during the regular season (and includes an automatic berth in next season's Concacaf Champions League)."To look in the players' eyes before the game in Seattle and see they were ready was a great feeling," Petke said. "There's a belief that we can accomplish things. There's no question we have the backbone to go in to a hostile environment against a good team and get a result. A point there was phenomenal, it gives us confidence."While the Red Bulls have a lackluster 5-7-4 record on the road, that includes wins at Real Salt Lake and Sporting Kansas City, plus Sunday's draw at Seattle."I'm going to tell you something I told the players before our first game of the season, something I truly believe it and truly live," he said. "Any shortcomings we have this year, the failures are on my shoulders. Any success lies on players' shoulders. When we lose or don't perform right it comes down to my preparation. When we win games, I'm not on the field. It's the players who have to win the games. I'm very happy about the wins, but credit goes to the players. They're the ones who are living it, and I'm the one on the sideline freaking out."There have been some good moments, but I believe the finest are ones ahead and those can be erased if in the next three games we don't have the right mentality."The Red Bulls close out the regular season with games against New England (Saturday), at Houston (Oct. 20) and against Chicago (Oct. 27).Asked about a comment by Steve Nicol, the former New England coach, in The Daily News that Thierry Henry's absence from Sunday's game was a "disgrace," Petke stood by the decision to give the team's captain the week off so he would not aggravate a tender Achilles' tendon."I have not heard it," Petke said. "And it bothers me not one ounce that anyone outside has something negative to say. That said, I disagree wholeheartedly. It's a medical situation. We have known about it and it's not about just getting through a game uninjured. With Thierry there was the possibility that with the Achilles it takes him two to three weeks to get back. It wasn't worth it, to be honest. This comes from the medical staff advising and making decisions. Whoever said it, it doesn't bother me and doesn't effect the team whatsoever."
With other teams peering in from the outside, the Yankees made a contract offer to Manager Joe Girardi on Friday, and expect to find out within a few days whether a deal is likely to be reached.In the meantime, other potential suitors could be lining up to talk to Girardi if he does not immediately agree to a Yankees extension, although they will likely have to wait.The Washington Nationals, according to a person familiar with their planning, are interested in Giardi and were planning to ask permission to speak with him. Girardi's name has also been linked to the vacant Chicago Cubs managerial job. The Cincinnati Reds fired their manager, Dusty Baker, Friday and have an opening as well.But any team that would like to speak to Girardi in an aboveboard manner would first have to ask for permission from the Yankees because Girardi's contract does not expire until Nov. 1. The Yankees do not have any incentive to grant permission, which would negate their temporary exclusivity.General Manager Brian Cashman had coffee with Girardi on Monday and met with his agent, Steve Mandell, over lunch Wednesday.Because Girardi is from Illinois and played for the Cubs, there is a belief that he would have a strong pull to return to Chicago to manage. But Girardi has said he has few real ties to Chicago anymore and added that his family is settled in Westchester County.Also, before the Yankees' final game of the season, Girardi said money would have nothing to do with his final choice. He said the decision would be based on family considerations.
The long-simmering debate over the Washington Redskins ' name took a new turn when President Obama said that he would consider changing it if he were the team's owner.Obama's comments are likely to stoke the dispute, which has forced the team, the N.F.L. and politicians on both sides of the aisle into the awkward position of defending a nickname that some Native American groups find objectionable."I don't know whether our attachment to a particular name should override the real legitimate concerns that people have about these things," Obama said in an interview Friday with The Associated Press.Obama, who roots for baseball, football and basketball teams from Chicago, said he did not think that fans of the Redskins were deliberately trying to offend Native Americans. But advocacy groups and at least 10 members of Congress who insist that the Redskins name is derogatory are likely to embrace his comments.Dan Snyder, the Redskins' owner, has long promised to keep the name. On Saturday, Lanny J. Davis, a lawyer for the team, pointed to polls that showed that fans overwhelmingly supported the team's name, and that Native Americans did not consider it offensive."We at the Redskins respect everyone," Davis said. "But like devoted fans of the Atlanta Braves, the Cleveland Indians and the Chicago Blackhawks, we love our team and its name and, like those fans, we do not intend to disparage or disrespect a racial or ethnic group."The issue has dogged N.F.L. Commissioner Roger Goodell, who has supported the Redskins but has also tried to remain sensitive to their critics. In May, 10 members of Congress wrote to Snyder, Goodell and the chief executive of FedEx, which sponsors the team's stadium, and sponsored the Non-Disparagement of Native American Persons or Peoples in Trademark Registration Act of 2013.In June, Goodell wrote back to the members of Congress and said the Redskins name was "a unifying force that stands for strength, courage, pride and respect."Yet two weeks ago, he appeared to soften his stance when he said that the league had an obligation to consider all sides."If we are offending one person, we need to be listening," Goodell, who grew up a Redskins fan in Washington, told WJFK-FM, "and making sure that we're doing the right things to try to address that."Several reporters who cover football, including Peter King of Sports Illustrated, have stopped using the team's nickname in their articles.Other professional teams, including the Braves, the Indians and the Kansas City Chiefs, have Native American nicknames, yet they have not been embroiled in nearly as much controversy as the Redskins.Many college teams have changed nicknames and mascots in the last few decades. Teams at St. John's, for instance, are now known as the Red Storm rather than the Redmen. Stanford teams are known as the Cardinal, not the Indians.The Oneida Indian Nation, which is part of the Change the Mascot movement, will hold a symposium Monday at the hotel in Washington where N.F.L. owners will be meeting for two days.
When you think of the Saints, you probably picture a high-octane offense trying to cover up for their porous defense. When you picture the Bears, you probably see a suffocating defense forcing highlight-reel turnovers while their offense shuffles on and off the field without scoring.So far this season, Chicago has put up more points a game than New Orleans, whose defense, a year after setting an N.F.L. record for yards allowed, has given up fewer than half as many points a game as the Bears.It has certainly made for an interesting start for these teams, as the Saints seem to have regained the mojo they had in their 2009 Super Bowl championship season and the Bears, despite a solid record, must be wondering what is wrong.Last season, members of the Chicago defense, having had enough of watching the offense struggle, declared they would take care of scoring themselves. To a large extent they succeeded, with the Bears' defense accounting for 35 forced fumbles and 24 interceptions, scoring touchdowns on nine turnovers.This season, they are still getting turnovers and defensive touchdowns, but with no pass rush to speak of — Chicago has six sacks in four games — the Bears are being burned for an average of 278 passing yards a game. Their 3-0 start was exciting, but the team is allowing an unacceptable 28.5 points a game.New Orleans averaged 338 yards a game through the air, and will probably pad that statistic against Chicago, even if the price is a few turnovers.Tony Romo is on pace for 32 touchdown passes, which would be second-highest season total by a Cowboys quarterback; he had 36 in 2007. Peyton Manning is on pace to have 32 touchdown passes by Denver's eighth game.It has been an uneven season for Dallas, with a 2-0 record at home and 0-2 record on the road. But with a secondary that has allowed 305 yards a game through the air, it could get ugly against a Broncos offense that is firing on all cylinders.The one hope for the Cowboys, who are a heavy underdog despite playing with a significant home-field advantage, is that the Broncos' defense, which has been just as bad as their own, allows Romo to keep up in what is sure to be a shootout.The legend of Richard Sherman continues to grow. In a game that seemed unwinnable, with Seattle trailing Houston, 20-6, through three quarters, the Seahawks pulled to 7 behind with a Marshawn Lynch touchdown run in the fourth quarter. Then Sherman, the league's best cornerback, stepped in front of a Matt Schaub pass as if he were the intended receiver, returning it 58 yards for a touchdown. Afterward, he contended that he had known what was coming, having intercepted a similar pass in practice.The Seahawks were a fantastic story last season, hampered only by their reputation for struggling on the road. This season, no stadium or deficit seems an insurmountable obstacle.But Indianapolis is no longer a one-trick pony. The Colts' defense allowed just 10 points over the last two games, including a win over San Francisco, the defending N.F.C. champion.If the Seahawks can beat the Colts in Indianapolis, it will be time to call them the best team in the N.F.C.These teams were considered Super Bowl contenders before the season, but each has allowed more points a game than it has scored. A lot of the early-season inconsistency has to do with Arian Foster's slow recovery from injuries, and Frank Gore's being underused.Foster and Gore, the star running backs, got back to what they do best last week. Foster had 171 all-purpose yards and a touchdown for Houston in a heartbreaking loss to Seattle. San Francisco rode Gore, and his 153 yards on the ground, to a win over St. Louis.Although these team will most likely go back to the well and ask their running backs to carry them to victory, the 49ers must also hope that Colin Kaepernick — hampered by an injury-riddled receiving corps — can dominate the way he did against Green Bay in Week 1.
The Colts' Andrew Luck threw two touchdown passes to T. Y. Hilton against the Seahawks and picked up his ninth fourth-quarter comeback victory in 21 career games. Seattle rushed for 218 yards and ran more than three dozen plays in Indianapolis territory, but Luck still found a way to win, outdueling Russell Wilson in a matchup between last season's runners-up in the offensive rookie of the year voting. Luck finished with 229 passing yards, and Hilton had five receptions for a career-high 140 yards.Alshon Jeffery put together a career day for the Bears, with 10 receptions and a touchdown, and his 218 receiving yards broke a franchise record set in 1954. That was not enough against the Saints, though, who earned their first win in Chicago since 2000 with help from Jimmy Graham. Graham, who caught 10 balls for 135 yards, had his fourth consecutive 100-yard game, matching an N.F.L. record for a tight end.Elvis Dumervil recorded the Ravens' sixth sack of Ryan Tannehill in the game's final minute, pushing the Dolphins back to the edge of field-goal range, and a subsequent incomplete pass left the Miami rookie Caleb Sturgis facing a 57-yard attempt to tie the game. The kick sailed wide with 33 seconds to go, sealing the win for Baltimore.The Jaguars lost the rookie tackle Luke Joeckel to a broken ankle and quarterback Blaine Gabbert to a strained hamstring against the Rams. Joeckel, the second pick in this year's draft, will miss the rest of the season. ... Clay Matthews, returning from a hamstring injury, left the Packers' win over the Lions after the third quarter with a thumb injury. Another starting Green Bay linebacker, Brad Jones, hurt his hamstring, and Jones's replacement, Robert Francois, left with a torn Achilles' tendon. ... Dolphins linebacker Dannell Ellerbe hurt his shoulder against the Ravens.Atlanta no longer looks invincible at home, having lost to the underwhelming New England Patriots in Week 4. Steven Jackson did not practice last week, and Roddy White was nothing more than a decoy in the first four games, making the Falcons' offense a pale imitation of the one that played in the N.F.C. championship game last season.The Jets, ranked No. 5 against the rush and No. 8 against the pass, should be able to limit scoring to a degree, but they will not have enough help from their offense for it to matter.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Flawed teams find ways to lose, and by now the Giants must recognize the pattern. Interceptions, fumbles, penalties, blown coverages, even poor coaching decisions — this year's Giants are dexterous and resourceful architects of defeat.It makes it difficult to point to what makes the 2013 Giants so imperfect and unsound. But one thing is certain: The Giants do some things right every week. Then, when the game is on the line in the second half, almost everything they do is wrong.So there are the two constants to the season so far — another Sunday means another late Giants collapse and another defeat. The latest flop came at home against the unsteady Philadelphia Eagles, who twice rallied in a 36-21 victory.Not surprisingly, the Giants were booed off the field when the game was over."We deserved to get booed," defensive end Justin Tuck said. "They come here to see a good product, and right now we're not a good product."The Giants fell to 0-5 for the first time since the 1987 strike-interrupted season. They have given up 182 points, the most allowed by a team in the first five games since the 1961 Oakland Raiders of the A.F.L. And they will not have long to lick their wounds. The Giants travel to Chicago to play the Bears (3-2) on Thursday. "Very demoralizing," Giants Coach Tom Coughlin said.The Giants and the Eagles were comparable statistically on Sunday in a 1-point game entering the fourth quarter. Then Giants quarterback Eli Manning threw interceptions on three consecutive possessions, which the Eagles (2-3) turned into two touchdowns.While there was plenty of blame to go around — the Giants rushed for only 53 yards and wide receivers dropped at least four passes — the focus was on Manning, who has 12 interceptions this season.Coughlin called two of Manning's interceptions "almost unbelievable." On another occasion, he labeled the plays "terrible."But Coughlin also said that he felt Manning, who was whistled for three intentional-grounding penalties, was feeling the pressure to resurrect a winless team single-handedly."I honestly believe he is trying so hard to get us a win he's almost put too much on himself," Coughlin said. "I'm not making excuses. But I do think that he's trying so hard to make something happen that it's going out the other end."He's way, way too good a player to have these kinds of things happen."Like many of Manning's interceptions this year, at least two on Sunday were the outcome of quirky plays or a desperate effort by Manning to keep a game from spiraling out of control.Two third-quarter touchdown passes from Manning to Rueben Randle gave the Giants a 21-19 lead late in the third quarter. Philadelphia regained the lead on a field goal, but the Giants, backed by a loud home crowd, still seemed to have a measure of momentum when they took possession with 13 minutes 7 seconds remaining.Manning's first miscue came when he tried to force a pass over the middle to the backup running back Brandon Jacobs as he was being swarmed in the middle of a sagging pocket.As Manning was beginning his throwing motion, the blitzing Eagles linebacker Trent Cole slapped Manning's helmet with his hand near the quarterback's eyes, which could have been called a personal foul or a face-mask penalty. But the contact was fleeting, and no penalty was called. Then the ball ricocheted off center Jim Cordle's helmet and floated into the air just short of Jacobs, where it was easily intercepted by Eagles linebacker Mychal Kendricks.On the next play, Philadelphia quarterback Nick Foles, playing for the starter, Michael Vick, who strained a hamstring on a scramble in the second quarter, lofted a 25-yard touchdown to tight end Brent Celek.On the Giants' next possession, Manning was pressured again. Fleeing the pocket with a defender on his left arm, Manning tried a risky pass to wide receiver Victor Cruz that Cruz appeared to grab at his shoe tops, until Eagles cornerback Brandon Boykin wrestled the ball away for the second interception.That led to a 5-yard touchdown pass from Foles to DeSean Jackson and a 15-point Eagles lead.Forcing another pass into coverage late in the game yielded a third interception. Manning conceded that he was hit in the helmet on the first interception, but he took the blame."The ball came out of my hand kind of funny, but that's on me," he said. "I've got to be smarter, and if I feel pressure, I can't throw the ball there. It's just unfortunate that it gets tipped up there and intercepted."His explanation was similar for the second interception, although it revealed a bit more of the creeping desperation that seems to be enveloping Manning."You're trying to make plays because we're down 8 points and it's late and third down," he said. "I should tuck that one away or throw it in the ground. You can't afford to have any interceptions back there because it puts our defense in a bind."Manning was not the only one having a bad game. Coughlin made two sideline decisions that backfired. In the first quarter, the Eagles were facing a fourth-and-4 at the Giants' 48-yard line when Coughlin instead accepted a holding penalty, which gave the Eagles a third-and-19.On the next play, Vick scrambled for 34 yards. It led to one of Alex Henery's five field goals. Coughlin said he thought the Eagles were going to go for it on fourth down rather than punt, and he preferred to back them up on third down.Early in the third, with the Eagles leading, 19-7, Eagles running back LeSean McCoy caught a first-down pass along the sideline. Replays left some doubt as to whether McCoy had his feet in bounds or had possession of the ball as he went out of bounds, although it was hardly conclusive.First, Coughlin called timeout — to "settle things down," he later said — so the Giants could consider whether to challenge the ruling on the field, which they eventually did.But when the call was not reversed, the Giants lost another timeout, which left them only one for the remainder of the game.It was not a meaningful gaffe for a team making multiple blunders every week, but it helped symbolize the Giants' fortunes so far this season."I just put that on myself," said Coughlin, known for successfully challenging officials' rulings through the years.Coughlin's shoulders sagged, as if to say it had been that kind of year. The Giants are 0-5. Some things go right, until the end, when everything goes wrong.
The Giants' secondary has been banged up all season, but Thursday two of the N.F.L.'s better — and bigger — wide receivers will be going against an inexperienced and small cornerback, McBride, who is playing only because the starter Corey Webster is injured and because Webster's backup, Aaron Ross, is also hurt. McBride is 5 feet 9 and 185 pounds. Marshall is 6-4 and 230 pounds, and Jeffery is 6-3 and 216. Marshall and Jeffery have combined for 59 catches, 807 receiving yards and 5 touchdowns. McBride, a Chicago draft pick in 2007 who was cut by the Bears in 2009, is making his second start for the Giants.The number of fourth-quarter interceptions that Eli Manning has thrown in 2013. One of Manning's preseason goals was 10 interceptions or fewer for the season.'I've got a new B.F.F. this year.'Chicago tight end MARTELLUS BENNETT, an ex-Giant, speaking of Jay Cutler. Last year, Bennett repeatedly called Eli Manning his B.F.F.
When he was a third grader in Illinois in the 1970s, Joe Girardi said, he wrote a school paper about how he would one day play for the Chicago Cubs. Years later, after Girardi had achieved that goal, many people wondered whether the team of his boyhood dreams might lure him from the Yankees to be the manager on Chicago's North Side.But Girardi had fashioned newer and stronger bonds — as a player, a coach and a manager — in New York, where he built a home, raised a family and won championships. So when the time came to choose a future, Girardi remained with the Yankees and even asked to stay longer than most people had expected.During negotiations for a new three-year contract, Girardi asked the Yankees to add a year. On Wednesday, they signed him to a four-year, $16 million contract, giving him the task of shepherding the Yankees through a coming period of transition and uncertainty.The Cubs will look elsewhere."It will always hold a special place in my heart," Girardi said of Chicago. "I don't think that will ever go away. But this place is really special to me, too — because of what I've experienced here."Girardi asked the Yankees to extend his deal to four years to give his family long-term security. The Yankees, who value Girardi's consistent stewardship of the team, made him the second-highest-paid manager in baseball, behind Mike Scioscia of the Los Angeles Angels.There may have been a time, before Hal Steinbrenner took over as the team's managing general partner, when a Yankees manager who had failed to make the playoffs for the second time in his six-year tenure would have been fired, never mind given a lucrative four-year extension.But Girardi is precisely the kind of manager that this more studious ownership group covets. He is meticulous, prepared, protective of his players and cooperative with upper management. As for the disappointment of 2013, when the Yankees failed to make the playoffs for the first time since 2008, the ownership blames a rash of injuries and the inability of the farm system to develop replacements.Girardi will manage a team that is more vulnerable than at any other time in the last two decades, with aging players returning from injuries and payroll issues creating uncertainty heading into 2014.But he said he believed that during the term of his deal, which coincides with the remaining four years on Alex Rodriguez's contract, the Yankees would win their 28th title, and their second since he took over the team in 2008."I wouldn't have come back if I didn't think we could win a championship," he said on a conference call with reporters. "I know there's a lot of work to be done. I know there's a lot of holes that we have to fill. There's people leaving and people retiring. But I have faith in our organization."The organization also has faith that, among other things, Girardi will continue to oversee the transition away from its aging stars. It is quite possible, if not likely, that Girardi will be in uniform after the departures of the 39-year-old shortstop Derek Jeter and Rodriguez, the 38-year-old third baseman. Girardi has shown a willingness to take on the difficult task of phasing out previous stars, like Jorge Posada, and it is a challenge he will face again.Two pillars of the organization, Mariano Rivera and Andy Pettitte, recently retired, and several other key players, like Robinson Cano, Curtis Granderson and Hiroki Kuroda, may leave in free agency. The Yankees may have a strikingly different look in the next few years."I don't think you can expect to have everything that you want every year," Girardi said, "and there's things that you have to go through as a club. I want to be part of it. And I want to be part of us getting back to being on top."
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — The Giants visit Chicago on Thursday night to play the Bears, a team with a rich heritage at linebacker , from Dick Butkus to Mike Singletary to Brian Urlacher.Their style of play helped make linebackers symbolic of the most rugged elements of pro football.Enter this season the winless Giants, who have practically installed a revolving door at the linebacker position, rotating an eclectic and quirky mix of players, including castoffs from other teams, unwanted free agents, a once highly regarded talent whose Giants experience induced his retirement and a player who came into the league as a running back.It has been that kind of year for the Giants, once the home of Hall of Fame linebackers like Sam Huff, Harry Carson and Lawrence Taylor.But this year, because the Giants have invested most of their defensive payroll on pass rushers and defensive backs, the team has had something akin to an open casting call at linebacker. And so far the results have been predictable, as opposing teams have frequently taken advantage of the uncertainty in the middle of the field.The latest and newest Giants linebacker to be given a prominent role will be Jon Beason, who will play middle linebacker Thursday despite having been with the team for only seven days and having participated in only one practice with pads.Beason, 28, was a Pro Bowl pick three times, beginning in 2007, but he recently lost his starting job with the Carolina Panthers, not once but twice. Last week he was traded to the Giants for a late-round draft pick."Today was the first time we saw him live, and he was impressive," the Giants' defensive coordinator, Perry Fewell, said Tuesday. "He's an intelligent football man. He has a lot of quickness."But Beason joins a long list of players the Giants have tried out at linebacker this year. The group includes Aaron Curry, the fourth overall pick of the 2009 N.F.L. draft, whom the Giants signed in May. Curry was traded by Seattle in 2011 and cut by Oakland a year later. With the Giants, Curry was given four preseason games to show his potential. Then he was released.Three days after he was let go by the Giants, Curry, 27, who in 2008 was voted the Butkus Award winner as the nation's top college linebacker, retired from football.In the off-season, the Giants also signed Kyle Bosworth, a nephew of the famed pro flameout Brian Bosworth. In addition to auditioning as a Giants linebacker, Kyle Bosworth brought a little Hollywood to the Giants' locker room because his fiancée is Kara Keough, who was featured on "The Real Housewives of Orange County." Bosworth had some good performances in the preseason, but before the opening game of the season, the Giants surprisingly cut him as well.He was quickly signed by the Dallas Cowboys and has made three tackles this season.Another off-season free-agent acquisition was Dan Connor, who shortly after he was signed by the Giants was arrested in the Philadelphia airport for having a switchblade in his carry-on bag as he tried to board a flight. Connor, who played for the Cowboys in 2012, started the Giants' first game of the season. In that game, he sustained a neck burner, a nerve damage injury that made his arm temporarily numb. The Giants waited a few days, and when Connor's condition did not improve quickly enough, he was put on season-ending injured reserve.That led the Giants to claim linebacker Allen Bradford on waivers from the Seattle Seahawks. Bradford is best known for his career as a productive running back at Southern California, where he rushed for nearly 1,600 yards and 16 touchdowns. Bradford was drafted by Tampa Bay in 2011 and gained 13 yards on 5 carries as a rookie. The next year, he was reunited with his college coach, Pete Carroll, when he signed with Seattle. Carroll turned Bradford into a linebacker.The Seahawks later put him on waivers, and the Giants claimed him. Bradford has two tackles this season."We've had some injuries so sometimes the changes have not been by choice," Fewell said of the cavalcade of linebackers his defense has employed. "We'd like to have more consistency there. That would be ideal. But football is not ideal."Spencer Paysinger, who has played well and is perhaps the only constant at linebacker for the Giants this season, has welcomed each of the new faces with open arms. This week he even handed over No. 52, which he had been wearing, to Beason, who has worn that number since he came into the N.F.L. in 2007. It was a magnanimous gesture that Paysinger did to create good will — even if it means he will now wear No. 54, the fourth number he has had in three seasons with the Giants (No. 49 and No. 55 were the others).Paysinger said adjusting to new players around him was a matter of cooperation and communication, though he wondered if the rotating cast was not a larger reflection of the evolution of the linebacker position."I don't know if we're going to see that 265-pound linebacker who just covers up the run in the middle for much longer," Paysinger, 25, said. "We're ushering in a new type of linebacker who can play the run and also cover slot receivers or try to control running backs coming out of the backfield on pass patterns."It's a changing era, and some of the older guys have done a great job adjusting, and others have fallen by the wayside. Because the game changes, and it does not wait for you."That may or may not explain what the Giants (0-5) have been experiencing at a pivotal position. For now, Thursday is another step in this year's progression of the Giants' linebacker corps. Unlike some of the other players' auditions, the Beason era may last more than one game.Paysinger might welcome that."A lot of new faces have come and gone this year," he said Tuesday. "It would be nice to build on something."
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Tom Coughlin, who led the Giants to two Super Bowl triumphs, three N.F.C. East titles and five playoff berths in his first nine years as their coach, insists he and his staff have not lost their way after a devastating 0-6 start."We know the formula," Coughlin said Friday after the Giants returned from a 27-21 loss to the Chicago Bears that reduced their playoff hopes from remote to nearly impossible. "We used it for years here."Giants fans can practically recite the dictums that served Coughlin and the franchise so well through the last eight seasons — eight consecutive nonlosing seasons. Protect the ball. Complement solid, and sometimes outstanding, quarterback play from Eli Manning with a potent running game. Create turnovers on defense. Exert relentless pressure on the opposing quarterback.The Giants, off to their worst start since they dropped nine games in a row to begin the 1976 season, have not come close to achieving those goals. A teamwide breakdown leaves them desperate for answers during a respite in the schedule: they will not play again until a Monday night home game Oct. 21 against the Minnesota Vikings."We've got to win out," safety Antrel Rolle said. "Whether that can be done and will be done is to be determined."Given how far the Giants have fallen, the mere mention of winning out seems preposterous. They committed at least three turnovers in each of their six games. They have been guilty of an N.F.L.-worst 23 turnovers, 2 more than they had last season, when they finished 9-7 and narrowly missed a playoff berth.Manning accounted for all three turnovers at Chicago with interceptions, giving him a league-leading 15. He was picked off 15 times last season.Manning, a two-time Super Bowl most valuable player, said his confidence was not shaken."I'm going to keep throwing," he said. "I'm going to keep trying to make good reads. I'm not going to get gun-shy."Manning threw interceptions on the first two possessions against Chicago and acknowledged that the first came on a poor read. The second was a result of miscommunication with Rueben Randle, a second-year wide receiver with obvious talent but also a tendency not to make expected adjustments, and was returned for a touchdown by Tim Jennings."The two interceptions early in the game did not affect my confidence," Manning said.He was encouraged that the Giants rushed for more than 100 yards (the first time they had surpassed that mark this season), converted 7 of 11 third-down opportunities and turned both of their possessions inside the Bears' 20-yard line into touchdowns. He also said that a shuffled offensive line — which will be without Chris Snee, a Pro Bowl right guard, for the rest of the season because of a hip injury — provided better pass protection."It was the turnovers," Manning said, "and that's on me."Defensively, the Giants did not have a take-away for a second consecutive week, and they never got to Jay Cutler. They have only five sacks in six games, a statistic that is eating at Coughlin."We're going to take a hard look at that," he said. "Why is it we're not getting home?"The Giants' woes extend beyond this season. In their last 14 games, they have won three times. They have come up empty in eight road games since a 29-24 victory at Dallas on Oct. 28, 2012."There is plenty of blame to go all around, from coaches to players," said center David Baas, who has missed the last three games with a neck injury but expects to start in the Giants' next game. "We shouldn't be in this situation.""I respect the man to the fullest," said Baas, a ninth-year veteran who spent his first six seasons with the San Francisco 49ers. "He's the best head coach I've played for. There is no doubt whether we were 6-0 or 0-6, I'd be fighting for him the same way."Coughlin gave his players and coaches a long weekend off — they are to return Monday — urging each to take the time to evaluate what he could do better. He planned to continue working.DAVID WILSON, the Giants' first-round draft choice in 2012, said he would receive a second opinion Monday about a neck injury that caused him to miss the Bears game. He said he felt capable of returning, but X-rays continue to reveal a problem. TOM COUGHLIN called it a disk problem. He declined to speculate whether it might be season-ending or even career-threatening.
David Backes scored twice, and the host St. Louis Blues (4-0) beat the slumping Rangers , 5-3, on Saturday night.Ryan Callahan scored twice and Brad Richards had his team-leading fourth goal for the Rangers (1-4), who have four games left on a season-opening, nine-game trip. They have lost three in a row by a combined score of 20-5.PREDATORS 3, ISLANDERS 2 Seth Jones scored his first N.H.L. goal and visiting Nashville edged the Islanders, who lost for the third time in four games.BRUINS 3, BLUE JACKETS 1 Loui Eriksson scored from a hard angle in the opening minute of the third period for his first goal with Boston, and the visiting Bruins beat Columbus.BLACKHAWKS 2, SABRES 1 Corey Crawford made 28 saves to lead host Chicago to a victory over winless Buffalo.WILD 5, STARS 1 The rookies Justin Fontaine and Mathew Dumba scored their first N.H.L. goals, leading host Minnesota past Dallas.AVALANCHE 5, CAPITALS 1 Alex Tanguay scored twice and Semyon Varlamov made 40 saves in his return to Washington as Colorado defeated the Capitals.RED WINGS 5, FLYERS 2 Henrik Zetterberg had two goals and an assist, and Pavel Datsyuk and Niklas Kronwall each had a goal and two assists to lead visiting Detroit to a win over Philadelphia.PENGUINS 5, LIGHTNING 4 Sidney Crosby had three goals and an assist, lifting Pittsburgh to a victory at Tampa Bay.MAPLE LEAFS 6, OILERS 5 Dave Bolland scored in overtime after Joffrey Lupul had the tying goal with 31 seconds left in regulation, leading host Toronto past Edmonton.
BOSTON — The Boston Red Sox did what they had to do on Sunday, the only way they could have done it. They evened the American League Championship Series with a 6-5 comeback victory over the Detroit Tigers ' bullpen. They cannot solve the Tigers' rotation.In two games, the Red Sox have 2 hits and 25 strikeouts in 13 innings against Detroit starters. And they have not even faced Justin Verlander, who starts Game 3 on Tuesday at Comerica Park.The Tigers drafted Verlander in the first round in 2004, their consolation prize for losing 119 games the year before. The rest of this playoff rotation came in trades by General Manager Dave Dombrowski."I think it's remarkable, to be honest with you," Tigers Manager Jim Leyland said. "He's very thorough, he believes in his people, his scouts' opinions, and he makes tough decisions, and he's very good at it. It's a pretty good rotation; when you've got 60 percent of that by trades, that's impressive."None of the other teams in baseball's final four has more than one playoff starter acquired through a trade. The Tigers have three. Their fifth starter, the homegrown Rick Porcello, lost in relief on Sunday.Even after their World Series appearance in 2006, and a transformative trade for Miguel Cabrera in 2007, the Tigers quickly grew stale. Dombrowski went to work, acquiring Max Scherzer before the 2010 season, Doug Fister during the 2011 season and Anibal Sanchez last summer.The result is a rotation that led the league in victories innings, strikeouts and earned run average (3.44) in the regular season, and thoroughly dominated the Red Sox over the weekend.Sanchez struck out 12 and allowed no hits in six innings to win Game 1 on Saturday. Scherzer carried a no-hitter into the sixth in Game 2 on Sunday, fanning 13 in seven innings before the bullpen blew the game. Five relievers were charged with runs, with four coming on David Ortiz's grand slam off Joaquin Benoit.Dombrowski, perhaps, could have built a stronger bullpen. But if starting pitching matters most in the long haul — and it does — he could not have done a better job.Dombrowski, 57, started his career with the Chicago White Sox in 1978. As a young executive, he saw his boss, Roland Hemond, trade pitcher LaMarr Hoyt to San Diego one year after Hoyt had won a Cy Young Award. Reaction in Chicago was harsh, but the deal brought Ozzie Guillen, who held down shortstop for 13 years."You always have to remember," Dombrowski said Hemond had told him, "when you're the general manager and you trade the known for the unknown, you're going to get criticized. You just have to be prepared for it. It's part of the job."Scherzer was not quite an unknown in December 2009, but he had made only 37 starts for the Arizona Diamondbacks, with a 9-15 record. Dombrowski traded two players who had just been All-Stars — center fielder Curtis Granderson and starter Edwin Jackson — in a three-way deal with Arizona and the Yankees for Scherzer, relievers Phil Coke and Daniel Schlereth and Austin Jackson, a center fielder who had never played in the majors."No question Granderson was a very good player, and Jackson pitched well for us, too," Dombrowski said. "But we needed more depth in talent, and young talent."The Tigers had passed on Scherzer in the first round of the 2006 draft, taking another college pitcher, Andrew Miller, who became a centerpiece of their trade with the Marlins for Cabrera. But they had scouted Scherzer extensively, and did not believe his herky-jerky delivery would cause injury problems, as some teams feared.Scherzer — who learned of the trade via text messages from friends, and confirmed it by watching ESPN — said he had smoothed his mechanics over the years. He makes sure he pauses just before he comes set and breaks his hands by his chest as his leg comes down.Scherzer said it had helped his rhythm, allowing him to command four pitches. He strikes out hitters at the same rate he did with Arizona, but allows fewer hits and walks. He went 21-3 this season with a 2.90 E.R.A. and the WHIP (walks plus hits per inning pitched) at 0.97 in the league.
CHICAGO — Steve Bartman sat in the first row down the left-field line for Game 6 of the National League Championship Series between the Chicago Cubs and the Florida Marlins at Wrigley Field on Oct. 14, 2003. He wore a green turtleneck and had headphones over his Cubs cap. By the end of the night, he was the most infamous fan, perhaps, in the history of American sports.The Cubs were ahead, 3-0, in the eighth inning, five outs from their first World Series appearance in 58 years, when Bartman reached for and deflected a foul ball that left fielder Moises Alou had leapt for and appeared ready to catch. The Marlins went on to score eight runs in the inning, win the game and then win the series the next night.In the 10 years since, Bartman, 36, has all but disappeared, turning down more than 200 news media requests, including "Today" and "Dr. Phil," and has not returned to Wrigley, as far as anyone knows.Bartman still lives in the Chicago area and works for a financial services consulting firm."He's happy and healthy and he's still a Cubs fan," said Frank Murtha, a longtime friend and a spokesman for Bartman. "He values his privacy."Through Murtha, Bartman declined to be interviewed for this article.As Bartman became the symbol of the 2003 Cubs' playoff collapse, the organization contacted him to say he was always welcome at Wrigley."I never wanted there to be any lingering animosity," Jim Hendry, then the Cubs' general manager and now a member of the Yankees' front office, said last week.Bartman rebuffed the overtures, Murtha said, to avoid the notoriety and the inevitable uproar afterward. He has also turned down financial opportunities in the hundreds of thousands of dollars, Murtha said. Although a 10-year exile is a long time for Bartman, the Cubs said there were no plans to invite him back to Wrigley next spring for a special appearance.But the Cubs have not won a playoff game since 2003 and have now lost 197 games the past two seasons. Their mind-boggling championship drought stands at 105 years. Might enough be enough, finally? Could a moment between Bartman and Cubs fans heal his wounds and, as silly as it sounds, chase whatever supernatural juju seems embedded in the Wrigley bricks? After all, nothing else has worked."It would certainly be a nice gesture," said Scott Turow, an author and a lifelong Cubs fan. "Whether it would work, who knows?"Among Cubs fans, players and Chicagoans who were interviewed, most feel tremendous sympathy for Bartman. He was hidden inside the stadium during the remainder of Game 6 after he became the target of abusive fans. He was dressed in a disguise to leave Wrigley and hustled to a safe place after the game.Most agree that Bartman was a small part of that fateful eighth inning. The Marlins clubbed four hits after the foul ball, and shortstop Alex Gonzalez booted a potential inning-ending double-play ball. "He didn't cost us anything," said the former Cubs pitcher Mark Prior, who was on the mound when Bartman deflected the ball.The comedian Jeff Garlin, a Cubs fan, said, "I want to find Bartman and give him a hug and tell him, 'It's O.K.' "Still, whether a public appearance at Wrigley could help release Bartman from his moment of infamy, and the Cubs from their own history, remains in question. David Kaplan, a radio and television host in Chicago, said a Bartman appearance at the stadium would be strange."It would be like a sideshow, the same kind of publicity stunt he's been avoiding for years," Kaplan said.The Chicago Sun-Times columnist Rick Telander said of Cubs fans: "They'd rip him apart. He can't just waltz in when the Cubs are still losers and expect to be cheered."Michael Wilbon, a Cubs fan and a host of ESPN's "Pardon the Interruption," found the idea incredible."A Steve Bartman night? Are you kidding me?" Wilbon asked. "What does the organization have to gain by that? I'll tell you: nothing."If the goal is to move past the game, said Doug Glanville, an outfielder with the Cubs during 2003 who lived in Chicago for many years, then any public event detracts from that."You can't minimize it by calling more attention to it," he said.
These teams are racing to the bottom of their division — an inconceivable notion before the season. Atlanta is still harboring hopes that it can mount a winning streak, despite the season-ending foot injury to wide receiver Julio Jones, who was on pace for a 100-catch-plus season. But Tampa Bay is saddled with nearly biblical obstacles. Rumored betrayal aside, we don't often hear the term "infectious disease" thrown around an N.F.L. locker room. Here's some good news for the Buccaneers: They have been playing better than their record indicates, and sooner or later they have to catch a break. Just not against a team also fighting for relevancy.Last season ended in the worst possible manner for Washington: in a playoff loss, essentially on a play when its mercurial rookie quarterback Robert Griffin III tore ligaments that had hobbled him as the game progressed. Last season ended predictably for Chicago: unfulfilled expectations, a Jay Cutler roasting by the news media, and a change at offensive coordinator (adios, Mike Tice). This time, however, the Bears also mixed it up by replacing Lovie Smith as coach with the more offense-minded Marc Trestman. So far, so many points. To be continued Sunday. Pick: BearsTheir matchups are predictably unpredictable affairs, highlighted by big plays, suspect coaching decisions and a few dozen Jerry Jones-in-disbelief reaction shots. Philadelphia's LeSean McCoy is the N.F.L.'s leading rusher with 630 yards and will take advantage of Dallas's depleted front seven. Eagles quarterback Nick Foles acquitted himself well last weekend with his three passing touchdowns and his rushing touchdown. But not having Michael Vick, who said this week that he needed more time to put the rest of his stuffing back in, will limit the team.The Cowboys will probably outscore the Eagles, until Dallas quarterback Tony Romo begins to work his fourth-quarter magic. After that, it's anybody's game.Before the season, this looked to be a walkover game for New England. But then Tom Brady's plight — a lack of sure-handed receivers — became national news.The Jets have proved that they will probably lose a couple of games more than they will win, but that Rex Ryan's bunch will not be blown out or embarrassed. The rookie quarterback Geno Smith continues to absorb the playbook and, his cringe-worthy fourth-quarter reads aside, he is proving to be a solid enough field general of a ragtag army.New England will still be riding high from its last-second heroics Sunday against New Orleans and, as we have said, the Jets will not be blown out or embarrassed. Except for their 38-13 loss to Tennessee last month and, perhaps, this game.Bill Parcells once said, "You are what your record says you are," but that is not entirely true. Teams occasionally punch above their weight class before a correction occurs. And the N.F.L. is adept at correction. Bad teams don't go 12-4, and good teams don't go 4-12. Miami was probably playing over its head at 3-0, despite a gaggle of free-agent signings and the slow emergence of quarterback Ryan Tannehill. Still, the Dolphins have enough to beat the Bills, who actually are what their record says that they are.Fresh from a surprisingly strong showing Sunday against the Broncos, Jacksonville will now attempt something more doable: stopping a less productive but still dangerous San Diego offense at home. Conventional wisdom would dictate that, after their near-miracle 16-point loss at Denver, the Jaguars could fall into a trap on Sunday. Yet unconventional wisdom would dictate that, despite its lack of a victory, the home team seems due. Pick: JaguarsEach team obliterated its last opponent, and so they couldn't be heading into this matchup with any more momentum. The difference is that Carolina's tepid offense feasted upon an AWOL Minnesota defense, and St. Louis ran the score up against a talented Houston defense.
CHICAGO — The White Sox finished 2013 with 99 losses, the most since they lost a franchise-worst 106 games in 1970. Less than three weeks after their season ended, they made the first big free-agent splash of the off-season by agreeing to a six-year, $68 million contract with the 26-year-old Cuban first baseman Jose Dariel Abreu.The deal, which is pending a physical, is the richest first contract for an international player, surpassing the $56 million that pitcher Yu Darvish received last year from the Texas Rangers.Abreu, who is listed at 6 feet 3 inches and 250 pounds, is expected to play first base and hit in the middle of a lineup that was last in the 15-team American League in runs scored, 14th in on-base percentage and 12th in home runs in the regular season.His raw power is his greatest asset, and according to many scouts, Abreu projects as a 30-home-run-per-year slugger in the major leagues. His numbers in Cuba's Serie Nacional indicate that he should be a boon to a woeful attack. Over the last four seasons, Abreu hit 111 home runs in 284 games while never batting below .380 or posting an on-base percentage under .530. At the World Baseball Classic in March, he went 9 for 25 with three home runs in six games."Last year wasn't a very good year, and everybody's asking what we're going to do," Eddie Einhorn, the White Sox' vice chairman, said by phone. "Well, here you go: we did something. If he turns out to be what's expected, it's money well spent."The White Sox hope Abreu will inject a shot of energy into not just the lineup but also the franchise, which drew fewer than 1.8 million fans a year ago, an average of 22,105 per game."You got to show the fans that we don't quit," Einhorn said. Referring to the electric Los Angeles Dodgers outfielder Yasiel Puig, like Abreu a Cuban, Einhorn added, "Hopefully he's like Puig and can put people in the seats."The $68 million price comes with the risks of a somewhat unknown commodity — and the lofty expectations that Abreu will follow in the footsteps of Puig and Oakland's Yoenis Cespedes, two Cubans who starred for teams that made the playoffs.But Abreu is not an outstanding athlete like his countrymen, nor can he play multiple positions. While his numbers in Cuba provide a reason for optimism, nobody knows how he will hit against major league pitching."The caveat I keep hearing is that he's great but we wish we'd seen more of him," said Keith Law, a former member of the Toronto Blue Jays' front office and now an ESPN analyst. "That makes him riskier than your average free-agent signing."Law said he worried that the White Sox, given the holes up and down their roster, were perhaps not the best fit for Abreu."You wonder if they could have spent the money elsewhere," he said. But he added, "I get that this will be a fun team if Abreu is batting cleanup, and I don't think it's going to flop."The lucrative contract may be more reasonable than it appears at first glance. The White Sox will pay Abreu an average salary of a little more than $11 million annually, a bargain for a middle-of-the-lineup power hitter. In addition, the White Sox did not have to give up draft picks or prospects to obtain him.Abreu's signing made sense for the White Sox because they needed both a first baseman and a power bat. Paul Konerko, 37, who has played first base for the team for the better part of this millennium, is a free agent who has pondered retirement. Although the addition of Abreu appears to end Konerko's tenure with the White Sox, the team plans to sit down with him next month to discuss his future.Abreu will join two Cubans already in Chicago's everyday lineup: shortstop Alexei Ramirez and left fielder Dayan Viciedo."This is good for our fans because it gives us hope," Einhorn said. "Sometimes it works, sometimes it doesn't. But we listened to our scouts, and I hope we picked a good one."
After playing seven years in his 14-year professional soccer career for his hometown team, Mike Petke believes he can lead the Red Bulls to the promised land — a championship in Major League Soccer. The club, first as the MetroStars and later as an outpost in the energy drink empire of an Austrian company, have gone to the league's title match once — in 2008, losing by 3-1 to Columbus. After two years as an assistant to Hans Backe, Petke was named the team's interim coach, then got the job full-time only weeks before the start of the 2013 season. The first team to clinch a playoff berth, if the Red Bulls win their final two regular-season games (at Houston on Sunday and against Chicago on Oct. 27) they will finish No. 1 over all, win the Supporters Shield and a berth in next season's Concacaf Champions League. Petke spoke with Jack Bell of The Times before training on Tuesday at the Red Bulls training complex in Hanover, N.J.Q: There has been talk in the past week, most recently, of M.L.S. considering a move to the so-called European calendar. What are you thoughts about it?A: I've heard about it, but haven't really give it that not much thought. It would have an impact, though I feel it's weird for me to comment since I haven't read much about it. Ideally, I think it would be great. Of course you have to take the weather into account, but if teams are selling out games, then I don't know if the cold weather comes into it. To get away from the dog days of summer would help. I think there's a perception that in 100-degree weather the quality of play suffers, and it does.Q: We're here in the team's new training complex. How much does it mean to you and the players after so many years of training at Montclair State University?A: It's a 100 percent difference. To pull up everyday and go to work here is a pleasure. The fields are world class. Everything is provided for you and mentally it raises the level. In the past on the one field for nine months at Montclair, you had to worry about the quality during a simple passing drill. It wasn't easy. It wasn't a good atmosphere.I mean that from a team bonding and social aspect perspective. This place brings the team closer together. I'd be lying if I said the players didn't want to leave quickly in the past. But now, there's no rush to get out. It's a pleasure to stay here, whether watching games on something like the 20 TVs, the weight room or the cafeteria. It provides a professional environment that every team should have.Q: Do you think that a place like Montclair dissuaded any players from coming to the club and conversely, will the new complex help to attract players? Does it make a difference?A: To be honest with you, I'd be surprised if any player we signed, foreign or DPs ... it's really something that comes down to money.For me at least, once you make your mind up that you want a new experience, to come to M.L.S. or you need to change things like that, things like training facilities don't matter. That said, it can only help. I had Peguy [Luyindula], who has played on some top teams in Europe, come to me and say it's the best facility he's seen. To hear that makes you realize that it is a world-class facility.Q: Was there a point in your playing career when you began to think about coaching?A: About the closest I got was coaching my kids' teams while I was still playing. It was important for me to be involved. That was tough. This is easy. All some of the parents wanted to know was what I was going to do to turn their kids into Pelé in a seven-game season.I have to say that Alexi Lalas was a mentor during my playing days. I called him up a year before I retired. I had no clue what the next step was, and shouldn't I know what the next step would be. I was still playing, and he said that things would happen. Once I decided to retire with the Red Bulls and they asked me if I might be interested in joining the coaching staff it sparked my interest right away. Believe me, it wasn't the easiest thing. But I just started to love it.One of the initial things that attracted me is that I would be part of the club where my roots are in. I truly wanted to be a part of it. I loved breaking things down, talking to the players, challenging myself to come up with ways to challenge players. I like going back to office and going through my thought process, what I want them to do and making adjustments. It has always intrigued me.Q: In so many sports, soccer, basketball, baseball, whatever, it seems that the more modest players have more success as coaches while so many of the stars who get coaching or managing jobs don't seem to have the right temperament. In soccer, especially, you have guys like José Mourinho who is quite open that he realized during his playing career that he better start preparing himself for what comes next. Do you see yourself falling in with that sort of former player?A: In my opinion, I think a lot of it has to do with being a modest player. You don't have the skill set or ability of a Thierry Henry, for example. Guys who it seems that things come easy to, they really don't have to overthink things. But these things, these skills do not come easy to you. I can't see things three steps ahead. All athletes are motivated and have a lot of that drive to succeed. But for me, I was forced to read the game. My lack of speed my lack of ability to score. I had to see things from a different perspective. Later in my career, when I slowed down a bit, my ability to read the game got better. I started coaching myself really.Q: As a coach, which is more important to you: player management or tactics?A: For me you can't put percentage on it, but player management was huge. When I first took the reins, I didn't always get it right. That's where a guy like [assistant coach] Robin [Fraser] comes in because he has so much experience. When I'm dealing with players I get into it, but it's reassuring to come in in the morning and say to Robin, is this what I want to do? And he comes back with a practice plan that gets it right 90 percent of time. Just awesome. When you talk about player management you talk about [Kosuke] Kimura, who I played with in Colorado. Every one of these players know who I am as a person. I have no hidden agendas, if I fly off handle they know at end of day where I'm coming from. My roots are here. I want the team to succeed. It's never personal. I have to figure out a way to deal with 27 guys. You can't treat them all the same. Who do you need to talk to more? Who do you stay away from? It's a jigsaw puzzle.Q: How concerned were you after getting the job full-time that some of the veterans and foreign players would have doubts about playing for a rookie coach, for a rookie coach who is also American?
The Indianapolis Colts ' victory over Peyton Manning and the Denver Broncos came at a hefty price. The Pro Bowl receiver Reggie Wayne, who had played in 189 consecutive games, was found Monday to have a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his right knee that will cost him the rest of the season.Quarterback Andrew Luck blamed himself for putting Wayne in harm's way with a low, underthrown ball late in Sunday's game against Denver."I think I feel sick to my stomach about it a little bit," Luck said.Wayne was not hit on the play, but he clutched his right knee and stayed on the ground for several minutes before walking to the Colts' sideline.Wayne, who will turn 35 next month, leads the team with 38 catches and 503 yards this season. In 13 seasons, all with the Colts, he has 1,006 receptions, 13,506 yards and 80 touchdown catches — second in each team category, behind only his ex-teammate, Marvin Harrison.Coach Chuck Pagano said he believed Wayne would return next season."He's not going out like this. He's not going to leave this game like this. There's no way," Pagano said. "He'll fight, he'll get his surgery, and he'll rehab and he'll grind like nobody's ever grinded."The Colts' offense has been battered. The starting tight end Dwayne Allen (hip), the top two running backs, Vick Ballard (knee) and Ahmad Bradshaw (neck), and the starting left guard Donald Thomas (quad) are on the season-ending injured reserve list. Wayne is expected to join them.BRADFORD OUT FOR SEASON Rams quarterback Sam Bradford will have season-ending surgery for a torn ligament in his left knee. Bradford landed on his knee after being shoved out of bounds by Panthers safety Mike Mitchell in the fourth quarter of Sunday's loss at Carolina, which dropped St. Louis to 3-4Kellen Clemens, who filled in for Bradford on Sunday, has been the only other quarterback on the roster. Austin Davis, released late in training camp, is a potential backup.Bradford, the No. 1 overall pick in 2010, had 14 touchdown passes and 4 interceptions this season.INJURIES MOUNT FOR BEARS Chicago quarterback Jay Cutler will miss at least the next four weeks and the Pro Bowl linebacker Lance Briggs will be out for about six weeks, a double blow for the struggling Bears.Cutler tore a groin muscle during Sunday's loss to the Washington Redskins. Briggs left the game with a small fracture in his left shoulder. Neither player will need surgery."They're not done," Coach Marc Trestman said. "They're going to be back."Cornerback Charles Tillman also left Sunday's game, with a knee injury, as Chicago (4-3) lost for the third time in four games.GARRARD ON JETS ROSTER After a two-week tryout, David Garrard has won a spot on the Jets' active roster. The Jets swapped third quarterbacks, cutting Brady Quinn and activating Garrard, who will serve as a mentor for Geno Smith.Garrard retired in May, two months after signing with the Jets, citing chronic left knee troubles. When his knee improved, Garrard reconsidered and joined the team on Oct. 10. Coach Rex Ryan, on his weekly spot on ESPN Radio, said Matt Simms would remain Smith's backup. BEN SHPIGELHOUSTON LOSES LINEBACKER The Texans' Pro Bowl linebacker Brian Cushing is out for the season with a left knee injury that will require surgery. Cushing was injured in the third quarter of Sunday's loss at Kansas City during a low block by running back Jamaal Charles. (AP)INDICTMENT IN CHILD'S DEATH A South Dakota man accused in the death of the young son of Minnesota Vikings running back Adrian Peterson was indicted on second-degree murder and manslaughter charges. The authorities said that Joseph Robert Patterson, 27, assaulted 2-year-old Tyrese Robert Ruffin on Oct. 9 while the two were alone in a Sioux Falls apartment. Patterson is the boyfriend of the child's mother, they said. (AP)AROUND THE LEAGUE Packers tight end Jermichael Finley suffered a significant neck injury and will be tested to determine the severity. ... Falcons running back Steven Jackson, who missed four games with a hamstring injury, is expected to practice on Wednesday. ... The Ravens sent tackle Bryant McKinnie to the Dolphins in exchange for a conditional late-round draft pick. (AP)
There are no photographs of Tim Cahill's lightning fast goal at Houston on Sunday, probably because the photographers assigned to cover the game were as stunned and surprised as the Dynamo and Cahill's Red Bulls teammates.Cahill scored eight seconds into the Red Bulls' emphatic 3-0 win, which put the club within a victory of clinching its first Supporters Shield as the No. 1 team over all in Major League Soccer this season. It was Cahill's team-leading 11th goal of the season.Winning the Shield would give the Red Bulls the top seeding in the playoffs in the Eastern Conference and could mean the club would host M.L.S. Cup, the league's championship game, should the Red Bulls advance to the final. The Red Bulls close the regular season against visiting Chicago on Sunday at Red Bull Arena. The Red Bulls will host the second game of the opening round on Nov. 6 or 7 in a series against the lowest surviving seed in the conference.Cahill, who rejoined the club in the middle of last week after traveling to Europe to be with the Australian national team for two exhibitions (at France and against Canada in England), described the goal, which involved Thierry Henry, Dax McCarty and Peguy Luyindula:"I was ready to take the kickoff with Thierry, but then I thought we were practicing in training getting it back to Dax and fizzing it out wide. Peguy came up, Thierry played it back and Dax fizzed it into me on the wing. I jumped, and I thought, Should I head it to Thierry, or bring it down on my chest? Once I saw the player too far away, I controlled it in my direction and then, boom, back of the net. It was a great feeling because of what the goal meant for us to settle into the game immediately. We didn't have to chase the game and keep our position. For me it was a special goal and I'll never forget it because of the meaning of what it meant to our team and our football club."Coach Mike Petke said the play was planned, but the goal was not."It's designed, but I'd be lying if I said it's designed to score a goal," he said. "It's designed to put the ball in the opposing half on the road, and it worked out perfect for us."Here is a list of the fastest M.L.S. goals:
Braydon Coburn broke a tie early in the third period, and Steve Mason made the lead stand up as the host Philadelphia Flyers handed the Rangers a 2-1 loss Thursday night. It was the Flyers' second win.Matt Read scored a short-handed goal and added an assist, and Mason made 30 saves for Philadelphia (2-7), which snapped a four-game losing streak. The Flyers are off to their worst start through nine games.The Rangers' Cam Talbot was solid in his N.H.L. debut, making 25 saves in place of the injured Henrik Lundqvist, but the Rangers (2-6) lost for the fifth time in six games. The Rangers' home opener is Monday against Montreal.CANUCKS 3, DEVILS 2 Mike Santorelli scored the only goal in a shootout, and Vancouver edged the host Devils. In a matchup of former teammates, Roberto Luongo got the best of Cory Schneider, who used to be his backup in Vancouver. Luongo turned aside Travis Zajac, Adam Henrique and Patrik Elias in the shootout.BRUINS 2, SHARKS 1 David Krejci tipped in a shot with eight-tenths of a second left in the third period to lift host Boston past San Jose, sending the Sharks to their first regulation loss of the season. San Jose fell to 8-1-1.Bruins left wing Lou Eriksson will be sidelined indefinitely with a concussion sustained on a blindside hit to the head from the Buffalo enforcer John Scott on Wednesday. The N.H.L. suspended Scott indefinitely Thursday pending a disciplinary hearing.LIGHTNING 6, BLACKHAWKS 5 Martin St. Louis scored at 1 minute 16 seconds of overtime, and host Tampa Bay beat Chicago. St. Louis, the Tampa Bay captain, also had an assist and moved past Neal Broten for 93rd place on the career points list with 924.WILD 3, HURRICANES 1 Nino Niederreiter and Zach Parise scored for Minnesota with the first two shots of the season against the Carolina substitute goalie Justin Peters, and host Minnesota beat Carolina.PREDATORS 3, JETS 2 Craig Smith scored at 4:43 of overtime to give Nashville a win over visiting Winnipeg. Nashville has won three of four.STARS 5, FLAMES 1 Alex Chiasson and Jamie Benn each scored two goals to lead host Dallas over Calgary.
CHICAGO — It was an impossible shot, or at least it looked that way to Carmelo Anthony .Derrick Rose was searching for an angle to the basket as the final seconds evaporated Thursday night, and his options were limited. In fact, Rose, the Bulls' do-everything point guard, was left with only one as he took a final hard dribble along the baseline and elevated against Tyson Chandler, the Knicks' 7-foot-1 center.With both arms extended, Chandler constructed a 10-foot wall, so Rose simply flicked the ball toward the rafters, into the haze that lingered from some pregame pyrotechnics. Over Chandler. Over the side of the backboard, from Anthony's vantage point. Over everyone and everything, before it finally fell through the hoop.The shot lifted the Bulls to a dramatic 82-81 victory, Rose's game-winner coming with 5.7 seconds left in a tussle between two teams that have never been particularly fond of each other.Anthony, who labored his way to 22 points and 8-of-24 shooting, had one last opportunity of his own. After creating a bit of space between himself and the Bulls' Luol Deng, Anthony stepped back for a long jumper, but misfired. Chandler's tip-in attempt at the buzzer was also off the mark.Chandler grabbed 19 rebounds, and Raymond Felton added 13 points in the loss. The Bulls outscored the Knicks by 46-24 in the paint."We competed," Coach Mike Woodson said. "It says a lot for our club. Now I just need to do a better job getting us through down the stretch."Rose's theatrics spoiled a late surge by the Knicks (1-1), who scored 12 straight points in the fourth quarter, turning a 10-point deficit into a 2-point lead. Tim Hardaway Jr. and Felton connected on 3-pointers, and Anthony sank a pair of fadeaways, the second pushing the Knicks ahead by 78-76.With the score tied at 80-80, Anthony misfired on a long field-goal attempt. In the scrum for the loose ball, the officials called a foul on the Bulls' Joakim Noah. With 10.8 seconds left, Chandler hit the second of two free-throw attempts to give the Knicks a lead — one that was short-lived, thanks to Rose."He showed a lot of toughness," said Tom Thibodeau, the Bulls' coach. "He had the courage to take and make that last play."Rose's performance was a mixed bag in his first regular-season game at the United Center since he injured his left knee during the 2012 playoffs. Hindered after straining his neck in Tuesday's loss to the Miami Heat, Rose was 7 of 23 from the field and scored 18 points.Thibodeau, whose larynx appeared to be in midseason form, was less than expansive about Rose's health about an hour before the game, acknowledging only that Rose's body was sore and that he had not determined whether Rose would play.Rose missed 10 of his first 12 shots before hitting back-to-back 3-pointers early in the second half to give Chicago a 49-40 lead. He had a knack for big plays that maintained the Bulls' cushion for much of the second half, including a fast-break layup (61-51) and a double-clutch move under the basket (76-66).Armed with red glow sticks, a capacity crowd serenaded Rose with M.V.P. chants before the game. The atmosphere was electric. The Bulls celebrated their home opener with an elaborate show that left some thick haze that hovered inside the arena throughout the first half.As both teams struggled to piece together consistent stretches of offense, all that fog made for some easy metaphors. It was an ugly game, and perhaps neither team looked particularly proficient on offense because the players had trouble locating each other on the court.The Bulls were clear in their intentions: get to the basket as often as possible, by any means necessary. Early on, that meant letting Deng use his length and quickness to maneuver past Iman Shumpert for three straight buckets inside.The Knicks, meanwhile, could not find their rhythm. Each possession was more tortured than the last, and their shooting percentage dipped to 31.6 percent by the end of the first quarter. Even Amar'e Stoudemire's first appearance of the season failed to provide a jolt.Still, the Knicks showed some resolve. As the third quarter turned into the fourth, they kept hanging around, jostling, competing.The fog eventually lifted for them, but not soon enough.Having declared his plan to opt out of his contract next summer and test free agency, Carmelo Anthony tried to clarify his position in an interview shown during TNT's broadcast, saying that he wants to stay in New York. "They pulled all the strings to get me here, and I wanted to be here," he said. "And I want to retire in New York." ... Andrea Bargnani, who was booed Wednesday by fans at Madison Square Garden in the Knicks' season-opening win over the Milwaukee Bucks, started Thursday and scored 9 points on 4-of-7 shooting.
CHICAGO — In the aftermath of Derrick Rose's game-winning shot, Carmelo Anthony could only shake his head at his locker.Anthony knew there was little the Knicks could have done Thursday night to prevent Rose's extraordinary floater with 5.7 seconds left, a shot he seemed to put up almost blindly, his view of the hoop blocked by Tyson Chandler's 7-foot-1 frame. Rose was going by feel, if not by sight.With everything else falling apart, Rose had no choice but to improvise.In a way, he was underscoring — albeit in a highly artistic way — the challenges that almost every team in the league has faced in the season's opening week. Few plans feel especially firm. Few plays go exactly as planned.That is certainly true of the Knicks. Each early-season game, including their 82-81 loss to the Bulls, provides another opportunity for Coach Mike Woodson to evaluate his personnel, weigh his rotations and monitor his blood pressure."We haven't been together that long," Woodson said. "We've experimented a little bit in the exhibition season, but not the big minutes where you can actually sit back and know how you feel about things: Is this going to work, not work?"The Knicks (1-1) are hardly the only team searching for continuity at this early stage. No less a collection of superstars than the Miami Heat came to the same conclusion Wednesday night after being upset by the Philadelphia 76ers, a team that could set records for futility this season.The Bulls, a championship contender, endured stretches in Thursday's game when they were completely baffled by the Knicks' defense.While Rose was transcendent in the final moments, his game-winner overshadowed an otherwise uneven effort: 18 points and 7-of-23 shooting from the field. In his first two games since missing last season with a knee injury, Rose has averaged 15 points while shooting 28.9 percent."We need to get our rhythm back," Chicago forward Carlos Boozer said. "We'll get back in the lab and work on our offense a little bit."In other words, the Knicks have leaguewide company when it comes to the pursuit of chemistry. To start, Woodson said he would prefer to settle on regular rotations. He likes stability, and he likes for players to know their roles. But that luxury does not exist for this team, at least not yet.J. R. Smith will miss three more games, including Sunday's contest against the Minnesota Timberwolves, for violating the league's drug policy. Amar'e Stoudemire and Kenyon Martin, aged and injured, are supplying the team with extremely limited minutes in the frontcourt.Andrea Bargnani finally flashed some potential against the Bulls, scoring 9 points on 4-of-7 shooting in 24 minutes. Still, his defense remains a work in progress — for now and for the indefinite future — and Woodson opted to go with swingman Tim Hardaway Jr. late in the fourth quarter.Woodson said he was pleased with his team's effort. When the Knicks arrived in Chicago at 2 a.m. Thursday after Wednesday's win over the Milwaukee Bucks, Woodson expected that the game would be a challenge.The Knicks had not played their best basketball at United Center in recent seasons, and the game seemed sure to double as an impromptu celebration for the Bulls and their fans, who were eagerly anticipating Rose's first regular-season home game since 2012.The Knicks could have come unglued after Rose connected on consecutive 3-pointers in the early moments of the second half, baskets that helped Chicago build a double-digit lead. Instead, the Knicks clogged the paint and threw defenders at Rose, whose frustration and misses mounted.The fourth quarter featured some of the Knicks' stingiest defense in recent memory, an especially satisfying stretch given their inability, or at least general reluctance, to guard anyone in the preseason.The Bulls shot 2 of 15 from the field in the fourth quarter. Chicago sank its last attempt, though, and it mattered.As Woodson noted after the game, the Knicks were one of the league's better late-game defensive teams last season, and he wants them to have the same approach. Through two games, the anchor has been Chandler, who appears re-energized after an injury-marred postseason. He had 19 rebounds against Chicago."The way he's been playing on the defensive end, we feed off that emotion and feed off his energy," Anthony said. "As a whole, man, we're just all on the same page on the defensive end. We're talking, we're communicating, and everybody's doing their job."That the Knicks were even in position to win, despite shooting 36 percent, was a credit to their defense and perhaps even some early solidarity. For a team hoping to build a foundation, it was a start.
After a workout on Friday at the team's training complex, Red Bulls Coach Mike Petke, with a smile, sidestepped the inevitable question: Would a tie at Houston in the first-game of a home-and-home playoff series suffice?He said he was going for the win, but late in the game, depending on the situation, a draw would not be the worst thing in the world.That might have been easy for him to say. The reality Sunday afternoon at BBVA Compass Stadium was different. The result, a 2-2 tie against the Houston Dynamo, was certainly not the worst thing in the world, but it was about as crushing as a tie away from home can be."The rule is on the road, you get a tie — you go home to your place pretty much 0-0 — it's a good thing," Petke said after the game. "But our guys are angry, the way we allowed them back in the game. At end of the day, their goals were our fault, they didn't do anything spectacular. They were self-inflicted."After skating through the first 45 minutes and taking a 2-0 lead a halftime, the Red Bulls gave up an early goal after the interval, saw defender Jamison Olave harshly ejected for a hard tackle and then yielded a second goal in added time. The Red Bulls return home for Wednesday's second game even in goals, but with a hole in the center of their defense.The Red Bulls took a 1-0 lead 22 minutes in the game when Thierry Henry, unchallenged on the left side, let the ball roll past him, turned his body and lofted a soft left-footed cross into the Houston goal box. Tim Cahill slipped the mark of Corey Ashe, coiled and jumped for a header that he put past goalkeeper Talley Hall.Ten minutes later, Dax McCarty's pass from the back to Cahill launched a lightning counterattack. Cahill settled the ball and waited for Eric Alexander to move into position to his right. Alexander dribbled into the penalty area, cut the ball back on defender Eric Brunner, and while Hall leaned toward his far post, Alexander hit a left-footed shot with the back heel of his cleat to the near post to make it 2-0.Houston cleaved the lead in half five minutes into the second half. A cross from the left by Brad Davis was allowed to bounce in front of Robles. Left back David Carney shanked his clearance, and it landed at the foot of Ricardo Clark. The former MetroStar draftee took a shot that was deflected to the near post by Olave as goalkeeper Luis Robles dived to his rightPetke made only one change to the lineup that defeated Chicago, 5-2, on Oct. 27 to clinch the league's Supporters Shield. Alexander moved into the slot in right midfield instead of Lloyd Sam. Peguy Luyindula kept his spot in midfield, right behind Henry and Cahill up front. The tandem in central defense, Ibrahim Sekaya and Olave, made the space in front of Robles nearly impenetrable.The outcome of the game — and perhaps the series — changed when Olave swooped in for a tackle on Omar Cummings, a second-half substitute by Houston's tandem of interim coaches, Wade Barrett and Steve Ralston. (Dynamo Coach Dominic Kinnear was suspended by M.L.S. on Friday for leaving the bench area during a late-game melee in Thursday's play-in game against Montreal.) Olave never got the ball but got plenty of Cummings, and the referee Ricardo Salazar ran over and yanked the red card out of his pocket. The Red Bulls were sentenced to playing the rest of the match with 10 men and face Wednesday's return match at Red Bull Arena without the services of their best defender.Petke was swift in adjusting to the altered circumstances, moving Markus Holgersson to the middle of the defense and replacing midfielder Jonny Steele with right back Brandon Barklage. He later brought fresh legs in Sam for Alexander and then Bradley Wright-Phillips for Luyindula.The Red Bulls saw little of the ball in the final 25 minutes and limped into second-half added time clinging to a one-goal lead. That was erased when Brad Davis lofted a corner kick from the left that was headed down to the near post by Bobby Boswell. Robles could only push the ball out, but right to Cummings, who had stepped in front of defender David Carney and jammed the ball inside the near post. It was the second critical mistake by Carney, the veteran defender from Australia.The Red Bulls' disciplinary situation, in addition to Olave's one-game suspension, should be a concern to Petke. Four Red Bulls — Carney, Henry, Barklage and Cahill — took yellow cards in Game 1. Though all disciplinary records were wiped clean at the end of the regular season, two yellows in the playoffs brings a one-game suspension."In the end they were buzzing," Cahill said. "For us, we're disappointed, but there's one more game to go. This is playoff football. We're ready for it. There's nothing to fear. We have a home game, we feel comfortable. There were just a few errors and you draw 2-2. But i don't think we were fazed at all that whole game. We made just a few mistakes and it happens."
Browns wide receiver Greg Little accused Baltimore Ravens safety James Ihedigbo of choking him during a pileup in Cleveland's 24-18 win Sunday.After a running play in the first quarter, Little found himself on his back at the bottom of a stack of players. He said Ihedigbo, who was on top of him, put his hands around his neck and choked him.Little was able to free himself from Ihedigbo's grasp, popped to his feet and then flung Ihedigbo's helmet, drawing a 15-yard unsportsmanlike conduct penalty."I know the ref was saying, 'Let go of his face mask,' but he was choking me, so I'm not," Little said.Speaking Wednesday at the Ravens' practice facility, Ihedigbo denied the charge."I would never personally cross a line or play outside the rules in any manner," he said.The Little-Ihedigbo altercation was the second major incident between the Browns and Ravens this season. In Week 2, Browns nose tackle Phil Taylor accused Ravens running back Ray Rice of spitting in his face.CUTLER'S STATUS UNCLEAR Chicago Bears quarterback Jay Cutler's status for this week's game against the Detroit Lions will probably come into clearer focus Thursday as he recuperates from a groin injury.Coach Marc Trestman said Cutler would have been listed as limited had Chicago practiced Wednesday. Instead, the team held a walk-through. "I don't know where he's at really," Trestman said.Cutler tore his left groin muscle against Washington on Oct. 20 and sat out Chicago's victory against the Packers, after the Bears had a bye the previous week. The veteran Josh McCown has played well in Cutler's place, but Trestman insisted that would not have an impact on his decision.VILMA'S SEASON ENDS The New Orleans Saints have moved linebacker Jonathan Vilma to injured reserve, ending his season — and possibly his career — only three days after he had returned for his first game of the season.Vilma began the season on short-term injured reserve because of an arthroscopic procedure in August on his left knee, which has troubled him through multiple operations over the past two-plus seasons. The designation allowed Vilma, a 10th-year linebacker, to return to practice in Week 8 and to the active roster in Week 9.Vilma played 12 defensive snaps in a 26-20 loss to his former team, the Jets, on Sunday. He was credited with one tackle.INTERIM COACH FOR TEXANS Wade Phillips, the Houston Texans' defensive coordinator, will take over as the team's interim head coach and try to help it end a six-game skid, with Gary Kubiak out indefinitely after having a mini-stroke this weekend."I'm just keeping the seat warm," Phillips said.It's a familiar position for Phillips, a 30-plus-year N.F.L. coaching veteran, who was last a head coach in Dallas and has twice served as an interim head coach in the league.STADIUM PROJECT MISSES GOAL An official involved in the Minnesota Vikings' stadium project said planners would not meet a goal of completing key elements of the financing by week's end.Michele Kelm-Helgen, the chairwoman of the Minnesota Sports Facilities Authority, said her staff, team representatives and the main contractor were still working to reach a guaranteed maximum price for construction work. The project is capped at $975 million. Preliminary bids for materials and labor have come in higher than expected, putting pressure on the budget for the 68,000-seat enclosed stadium.The authority had hoped to reach a price deal this week so the Vikings could complete loans on their $477 million private share. The state will not sell bonds for a $498 million public portion until the Vikings do that.
Ryan Johansen and Brandon Dubinsky each had a goal and two assists as the Columbus Blue Jackets beat the visiting Islanders , 5-2, on Saturday night to snap a five-game losing streak.Cam Atkinson and R. J. Umberger also scored for the Blue Jackets, who pulled away with three goals in the third period. James Wisniewski added an empty-net goal and an assist. Frans Nielsen and Thomas Hickey scored for the Islanders.The win ended Columbus's longest skid in two years.FLYERS 4, OILERS 2 Philadelphia's captain, Claude Giroux, scored a goal to end a 21-game drought, and Jay Rosehill, Scott Hartnell and Vinny Lecavalier each added a goal in a win at home over Edmonton.David Perron and Taylor Hall scored for the Oilers. Flyers goalie Steve Mason had 32 saves.BRUINS 3, MAPLE LEAFS 1 Patrice Bergeron scored a power-play goal early in the third period, and Tuukka Rask stopped 33 shots, lifting host Boston over Toronto in the teams' first meeting since their playoff series last spring.SENATORS 3, PANTHERS 2 Kyle Turris had a goal and an assist to help Ottawa beat visiting Florida, spoiling Peter Horachek's debut as the Panthers' coach.Horachek was promoted from the team's American Hockey League affiliate in San Antonio on Friday after the club fired Kevin Dineen and two assistants.BLUES 2, PENGUINS 1 Kevin Shattenkirk's first goal of the season midway through the third period gave St. Louis Blues a victory at home over Pittsburgh. Ryan Reaves also scored for St. Louis. Jaroslav Halak stopped 19 shots.WILD 3, HURRICANES 2 Jason Pominville scored a goal in regulation and the game-winner in the shootout to lift visiting Minnesota over Carolina.LIGHTNING 4, RED WINGS 3 Teddy Purcell's goal at 3:51 in the extra period gave Tampa Bay a win at Detroit.BLACKHAWKS 5, STARS 2 Marian Hossa scored two goals as Chicago defeated host Dallas. Patrick Sharp assisted on the first four goals for Chicago.COYOTES 4, CAPITALS 3 Shane Doan scored his second goal to cap a rally late in regulation, and host Phoenix scored on both attempts in the shootout to end Washington's five-game winning streak.
Known for having one of the loudest home stadiums in the league, Kansas City has somewhat quietly remained the N.F.L.'s only unbeaten team.It may not seem fair that Denver is drawing far more attention than the division-rival Chiefs. But it is more exciting to watch Broncos tight end Julius Thomas execute a gorgeous catch-and-run for a 74-yard touchdown, as he did in Week 10, than to watch the Chiefs plug away with a quietly efficient offense and a defense that is the hardest to score against in the N.F.L.Looking to stay perfect, Kansas City may catch a break because Peyton Manning further injured his ankle, making him even slower on his feet than usual. That will be music to the ears of Justin Houston and Tamba Hali, who have combined for 20 of the Chiefs' league-leading 36 sacks.Denver has a lot of threats on offense, and is especially tough at home. But the Chiefs are no fluke, and if they can neutralize Manning, they could be 10-0 for the first time in franchise history.Since Drew Brees arrived in New Orleans, pinning down his favorite receiver from week to week has been an exercise in frustration. He can seemingly create a new star in each game.San Francisco's Colin Kaepernick drew recent criticism from Trent Dilfer, a former 49ers backup. Dilfer said Kaepernick becomes a remedial quarterback when his first read on a play is covered.In fairness to Kaepernick, he has spent most of the season with only one capable wide receiver, Anquan Boldin. So opponents have blanketed the less-than-speedy Boldin on every play, and he has not been able to get going alone. Mario Manningham returned from injury in Week 10, and Michael Crabtree is expected back soon.But a road game against the Saints, without the star tight end Vernon Davis (concussion), will probably mean this is not be the game for Kaepernick to prove Dilfer wrong.Even if Percy Harvin serves mostly as a decoy in his first action since the middle of last season, it will be a welcome addition for dominant Seattle. As good as the Seahawks have been, a season-ending injury to Sidney Rice has limited their passing options. Having the versatile Harvin on the field should help Doug Baldwin and Golden Tate, both of whom can do damage if they get open.The prospect of improvement for Seattle's offense is great news for a team hoping for a long playoff run. But nothing dramatic should be required to beat a terrible Minnesota team.Chicago's injury report is filled with big names like Jay Cutler, Lance Briggs and Charles Tillman. And the Ravens may be looking at this game as the chance to win at Soldier Field for the first time (unless you count the Cleveland Browns, who beat the Bears on the road in 1954 and 1969, then moved to Baltimore in 1996).The Ravens might not want to get overly excited. Josh McCown has proved to be a reliable backup for Cutler, and Matt Forte anchors a strong Bears running game, which should lead to plenty of points for Chicago. Baltimore, with no running game to speak of and Joe Flacco prone to turnovers, will struggle to keep up.The Jets' season has made little to no sense. A bad offense and a defense that allows far too many points have somehow led to a winning record, including huge upsets against New England and New Orleans. They have followed each win this season with a loss. The Jets' lack of consistency can be largely attributed to Geno Smith, their rookie quarterback, whose turnovers have often negated a solid running game.Following their pattern, the Jets might as well lose to Buffalo and set an N.F.L. record for alternating wins and losses.Nick Foles may not seem like the ideal quarterback for Chip Kelly's up-tempo Philadelphia offense, but his 16 touchdowns and no interceptions this season seem to show he is a good fit.Although Foles, a second-year player out of Arizona, will probably come back to earth soon, there is no reason to believe that will happen against a Washington defense that has allowed the second-most points a game in the N.F.L.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — The Giants' defensive coordinator, Perry Fewell, gave Trumaine McBride, a well-traveled sixth-year cornerback, the opportunity to start in place of the injured Corey Webster five games ago. It was not a decision that left Fewell feeling comfortable."So far, so good — knock on wood," Fewell said after Thursday's practice. He tapped the side of his head in a self-deprecating gesture in discussing McBride's lack of size (5 feet 9 inches, 185 pounds) and experience (18 starts).Not surprisingly, McBride shares Fewell's uneasiness, even though he started at left cornerback and held up well throughout the three-game winning streak the Giants take into Sunday's home game against the Green Bay Packers."I feel like I've got a lot to prove still," McBride said. McBride is accustomed to proving himself. He said he first received the "too small" label in junior high school and continually worked to prove otherwise. He enjoyed a productive four-year career at Mississippi, leading the Rebels in passes defensed in three of his four seasons, but he was bypassed in the draft until the Chicago Bears took him in the seventh and final round, selecting him 221st over all.He enjoyed a promising start with Chicago, appearing in every game through his first two seasons before injuring his knee in the 2009 opener against Green Bay. Stints with the Arizona Cardinals, the New Orleans Saints and the Jacksonville Jaguars followed before the Giants signed him as a free agent last January. They believed he could be an asset on special teams while adding depth to their secondary.Webster played poorly before he hurt his groin. He then sustained an ankle injury. Fewell saw enough to award McBride the job but said it was not easy to watch him tangle with some of the league's taller receivers."You're always concerned about that, but you know what? He plays bigger than his size," Fewell said. "You hear that term a lot, but he does. When he comes into the ballgame, he plays big."Fewell added: "You think he's going to get engulfed by a large receiver. For whatever reason, he has that knack to win that situation, win that down and not get picked on."McBride has been targeted since he first saw extensive action, replacing an injured Aaron Ross in the second half of a 31-7 loss to the Kansas City Chiefs on Sept. 29. But McBride has looked increasingly comfortable as a starter. He is one reason the Giants' defense went 10 quarters without allowing a touchdown before a fumble on the opening kickoff last Sunday set up the Oakland Raiders for a 5-yard touchdown.McBride said his lack of height had hurt him with some teams."A lot of teams, they don't like small corners," he said. "I feel I did not get the opportunity a lot of guys would have gotten based on the fact that I'm small."McBride works to offset that disadvantage through extensive film study. He said he prepared as if he were starting even when he was low on the depth chart."Once I find a person's weakness, then that's my opportunity to know what I have to do to put myself in the position to be most dangerous," he said.It is unclear when McBride might feel comfortable with the Giants, if ever. "I've been through so much," he said. "You just never know what's coming."JASON PIERRE-PAUL sat out his second consecutive practice with a shoulder injury and appears likely to miss his first N.F.L. game. DAMONTRE MOORE, a third-round draft choice from Texas A&M who has done well on special teams, would join the rotation of defensive ends in Pierre-Paul's absence. ... BRANDON JACOBS, who has missed three games in a row with hamstring and then knee problems, resumed practice. He said his availability would depend on how well his knee withstood the rigors of practice.
DeKALB, Ill. — Three weeks ago, Northern Illinois opened the Chessick Practice Center, a $9.5 million building with a full-size indoor turf field that will help its football team cope with Midwestern winters and perhaps further its rise from an anonymous team on the prairie to a national powerhouse.Near the 50-yard line, a large banner honors the team's trip to last season's Orange Bowl. In a hallway is another homage to that game: a display with a jersey and a helmet, decorated half in Northern Illinois colors and half in those of its opponent, Florida State.The Huskies lost to the Seminoles, 31-10, on Jan 1. It was a thud of an ending to what had been a dream season, culminating in the Mid-American Conference's first invitation to a Bowl Championship Series game. To some, the loss reaffirmed Northern Illinois and the M.A.C.'s second-tier status: not big, fast or good enough to compete with college football's elite.A year later, the intentions of the Huskies, who are 10-0 and ranked 15th in the B.C.S. standings, are unambiguous."After losing that game, we had a bad taste in our mouth," quarterback Jordan Lynch said. "We came up with a motto: Finish the fight. That's what we want to do this year. We want to go back to a B.C.S. bowl, and we want to win."On Wednesday night the Huskies had their largest stage this season to broadcast that message, with a nationally televised home game against Ball State.Two days after the season's first snow dusted DeKalb, students and fans bundled up, many toting signs that ESPN's cameras did not miss.One read "We Want Bama," a request for a date with the top-ranked Crimson Tide.The Huskies, behind Lynch, a Heisman Trophy hopeful, delivered a performance worthy of the exposure. They outscored Ball State, which entered the game 9-1 and undefeated in conference play, 28-3, in the second half on the way to a 48-27 win.With N.F.L. scouts on hand, Lynch was sublime, rushing for 123 yards and 2 scores and throwing for another 345 yards and 2 touchdowns.On a third down in the second half, he was caught in the backfield by two defenders but slipped the tackle and scrambled for a first down. In the go-ahead drive in the fourth quarter, on third-and-long, he evaded several potential sacks and found a receiver for a first down.Ball State Coach Pete Lembo described Lynch as "built like a linebacker with tailback speed." He added, "He's got a lot of savvy, too."A season ago, Lynch finished seventh in the Heisman voting. This year, he is fourth in the F.B.S. in rushing yards (1,273) and tied for 13th in touchdown passes (21).Northern Illinois Coach Rod Carey said after the game: "If Jordan isn't in the conversation for the Heisman, I don't know what people were watching. Obviously, they were asleep."Lynch's Heisman campaign may be gaining momentum, but his team's path to a B.C.S. game remains steep.The Huskies entered Wednesday behind another nonqualifying conference team, No. 14 Fresno State, in the B.C.S. standings. Without a Fresno State loss, a B.C.S. game remains a long shot.Lynch, though, is lobbying. "I feel like we get disrespected all over the place," he said. "All we do is do our job and win games. We shouldn't be punished for that."Still, the B.C.S. is not the only measuring stick. Northern Illinois, for the second straight season, is probably the best team in the state. Its two wins against Big Ten teams are more than the conference members Northwestern and Illinois have: They are winless in Big Ten play.Then there is the Chessick center. In the Huskies' first practice — they have had only three there — players and coaches were so impressed that they walked around taking pictures.Carey sent a photograph to Joe Novak, who coached at Northern Illinois from 1996 to 2007. His old office, Carey said, is now a closet."That ought to tell you how far we've come," Carey said.Northern Illinois wore uniforms decorated in a patriotic pattern Wednesday night: stars and stripes on the shoulders, the word "heroes" replacing players' names on the jerseys. It was a gesture to the armed forces for Veterans Day, but also a nod to the national brand the Huskies hope to become.Asked if Northern Illinois would relish following in the footsteps of Boise State, a perennial underdog and national darling, Carey replied: "We don't want to be Boise State, we want to be N.I.U. I don't know where the ceiling is for this program, and I think that's probably a good thing."
Robbie Rogers generally prefers to avoid reminiscing. Even this week, as he considered all that had happened over the past 12 months — his decision to announce his sexual orientation, his brief retirement and his return to soccer as the first openly gay male athlete in a prominent North American professional league — he interspersed his memories with sizable dollops of excitement about what lies ahead.But as much as Rogers, 26, might prefer to avoid looking back on it, his decision to come out publicly in February — while at the same time announcing he would step away from professional soccer — was the spark for an extended public debate about how a gay athlete would be received in professional sports. That debate, he said, should continue.When Rogers ended his retirement in May and joined Major League Soccer's Los Angeles Galaxy, he found a team and a league that were mostly welcoming. There were times, though, he said, when even some of his teammates unknowingly left him feeling a familiar discomfort."The guys were so supportive and it was great, but there were also times when the guys didn't know they were being homophobic," Rogers said in a telephone interview this week. "Maybe they didn't know I was in the room, but they'd say things like 'no homo,' or they'll say something is pretty fruity."It doesn't really bother me, but it's like they still need to learn. Someone that is closeted is very hypersensitive to that stuff, and if that's going on in locker rooms where I am — and everyone knows about me — imagine what happens in other places."Rogers said that he had also heard occasional insensitive comments from spectators at games, and that he had received a slew of emails that he described as variously "hateful" and "just completely, totally, oh-my-god over the top."Ignoring those emails was easy enough, Rogers said. He spent more time reading the correspondence he received from other closeted athletes, many of them teenagers or young adults, who said they saw him as an inspiration.That is part of the reason that Rogers, a midfielder, says he plans to continue playing. The rest of his drive stems from a belief that he can still be a top player despite struggling with injuries this season and failing to make a strong impact with the Galaxy.Technically, Rogers was traded to the Galaxy by the Chicago Fire, who had retained his rights while he was playing in England before his retirement. The Galaxy sent forward Mike Magee to Chicago, an exchange that now appears lopsided: Magee finished with 21 goals over all, 15 for the Fire, the second-best total in the league. Rogers had none in 11 games.Rogers said he did not concern himself with that aspect of the transaction — Magee had requested a trade to Chicago independently so he could be closer to his family — and would instead work on making his own impact in Los Angeles."Those positive emails from kids are probably the part of this that makes me most proud because I know I'm reaching people," Rogers said. "I think if I play, it helps younger athletes and younger adults to have someone to see how it works. They can see that I'm a pro athlete, and they don't need to be afraid to go after whatever dream they have."Rogers is working with a new entity, known as BeyondIT, that is seeking to raise money and awareness for nonprofit organizations that fight labels and stereotypes in society. One of BeyondIT's first significant pushes will be the widespread distribution of a magnetic green bar, designed to be worn on shirts or lapels, that Rogers hopes athletes will wear at the Sochi Olympics. It will be a way to speak out against a Russian law that bans the distribution of gay "propaganda" to minors."We're planning to work with Olympic athletes and other people in sports to be public ambassadors for the group," Rogers said, adding that he was also hoping to have Jason Collins, the former N.B.A. player who also came out this year, work with the organization. "That's a big part of what I'm hoping to work on during the off-season. I really hope we'll have a lot of success and make an impact."The Galaxy were eliminated from the M.L.S. playoffs last weekend, but Rogers does not plan to be away from soccer for long. After a vacation, he said, he intends to resume training, already thinking of what next season might bring. The rest of his off-season will be devoted to other projects, including his advocacy work, his clothing line and a memoir. He is also still adjusting to the more basic aspects of life that come with no longer keeping his sexuality hidden."I've been dating someone for about four and a half months," he said. "Until I was 25, I had never really dated someone that I was actually interested in, so that's a new experience for me. We've gone out, I've brought him to meet my parents, all of that. It's like all of this; it's one of those things that I'd never really done before."
Tolzien was a member of Green Bay's practice squad when Aaron Rodgers broke his left collarbone Nov. 4 against Chicago. He made his N.F.L. debut in last Sunday's 27-13 loss to visiting Philadelphia, completing 24 of 39 passes for 280 yards with a touchdown and two interceptions. The Giants must capitalize on his inexperience by using blitz packages to rattle him.The Giants' defense has allowed one touchdown in the last 14 quarters, when Oakland needed to advance only 5 yards after Jerrel Jernigan fumbled on the opening kickoff of last Sunday's 24-20 victory against the Raiders.'Anytime you get flexed out of prime time, it's a bad thing. We're hoping later on this season to get that game back.'Giants linebacker JON BEASON, on the decision to move the game to late afternoon. TOM PEDULLA
Ovechkin once. Ovechkin twice. Steen not at all.Just like that, there's a tie atop the N.H.L. goal-scoring race as well as a new leader in the Metropolitan Division.Alex Ovechkin scored his 16th and 17th goals in the first period and Alexander Steen was held pointless for only the second time this season Sunday night in the host Washington Capitals' 4-1 win over the St. Louis Blues."For me, it means a lot," Ovechkin said. "It's always nice to score big goals in big games, but it was a very good team effort today."Braden Holtby made 46 saves, a career high for a regular-season game. Mikhail Grabovski and John Carlson also scored, and Nicklas Backstrom had three assists for the Capitals, who have won three straight and seven out of nine to leapfrog the Pittsburgh Penguins for first place in the division.Vladimir Sobotka scored in the second period for the Blues, who had won eight of 10. The Capitals caught them at a good time, with St. Louis playing for the third time in four nights and on the second half of a back-to-back after a home win over the Carolina Hurricanes on Saturday.WILD 2, JETS 1 Mikko Koivu scored two goals, including the winner with 3 minutes 12 seconds remaining, and host Minnesota extended its winning streak to four games with a victory over Winnipeg. Josh Harding made 21 saves for his 12th victory.The Wild have an eight-game points streak and pulled into second place, 2 points behind Chicago, in the Central Division.STARS 2, CANUCKS 1 Kari Lehtonen made 42 saves, and visiting Dallas defeated Vancouver. Valeri Nichushkin and Erik Cole scored for the Stars, who were coming off a 7-3 victory over Calgary on Thursday and extended their road winning streak to six.Henrik Sedin scored for the Canucks, who got 21 saves from Roberto Luongo as they dropped their fourth in a row.BLACKHAWKS 5, SHARKS 1 Patrick Sharp scored two goals, including one on a third-period penalty shot, and Kris Versteeg had a goal and an assist to lead host Chicago past San Jose.Jonathan Toews and Brandon Pirri, a rookie, also scored for the Blackhawks.BLUE JACKETS 4, SENATORS 1 Ryan Johansen, R. J. Umberger and Fedor Tyutin each had a power-play goal to lead visiting Columbus over Ottawa.Derek MacKenzie also scored for Columbus, and Sergei Bobrovsky stopped 30 shots.Erik Karlsson scored for the Senators in the third period.
Staggered, Drew Brees recovered. Garrett Hartley made a stirring comeback, too, for the New Orleans Saints on Sunday.After absorbing a hard hit in the final minutes, Brees wiped blood off his chin and guided the host Saints to two field goals, with Hartley kicking a 31-yarder as time expired to beat the San Francisco 49ers, 23-20.The Saints trailed by 20-17 when Ahmad Brooks leveled Brees and forced a fumble that Patrick Willis pounced on for the 49ers. But Brooks was called for a 15-yard penalty because his forearm had hit Brees at the base of the neck, bending his head back awkwardly. Brees moved New Orleans into position for Hartley's tying 42-yard kick with 2 minutes 6 seconds left, then set him up for the victory.Brees completed 30 of 43 passes for 305 yards and a touchdown, a 3-yarder to the rookie tight end Josh Hill.Hartley, who had missed four field-goal attempts in the previous three games, converted on all three of his tries in the fourth quarter. Those kicks and sound defensive play allowed the Saints to overcome three turnovers."You're going to have games like this," Brees said. "You still find a way to win against a playoff-caliber opponent with a lot at stake at this point in the season. That says a lot."San Francisco running back Frank Gore managed 48 yards on 13 carries. Quarterback Colin Kaepernick was 17 of 31 for 127 yards and rushed only three times for 25 yards. Kaepernick threw two touchdown passes but was sacked three times and intercepted once.Marques Colston finished with five catches for 80 yards to become the Saints' career leader in receiving yards with 7,923.EAGLES 24, REDSKINS 16 Nick Foles threw for 298 yards and ran for a touchdown, LeSean McCoy had two rushing scores, and Philadelphia beat Washington to stop a 10-game home losing streak and take over first place in the N.F.C. East. The Eagles moved a half-game ahead of idle Dallas.Philadelphia's defense harassed quarterback Robert Griffin III, who was sacked four times, lost a fumble and threw an interception. But Griffin helped the Redskins rally from a 24-0 deficit in the fourth. He threw long touchdown passes to Darrel Young and Aldrick Robinson, and Washington converted two 2-point conversions.The Eagles needed a late stop to earn their first home win since Sept. 30, 2012, against the Giants.BEARS 23, RAVENS 20 Robbie Gould kicked a 38-yard field goal in overtime to lift host Chicago past Baltimore in a game delayed about two hours by a severe rainstorm.With 4:51 left in the first quarter, the players headed to the locker rooms amid a downpour and strong winds at Soldier Field.The interruption was nothing new to the Ravens. They waited through a power failure during last season's Super Bowl, and this season's opener, at Denver, was delayed by lightning.The Bears took a 20-17 lead with 10:33 remaining in regulation after Matt Forte scored on a 14-yard screen pass from Josh McCown. But the Ravens answered, driving for a tying 21-yard field goal by Justin Tucker.SEAHAWKS 41, VIKINGS 20 In his season debut, Percy Harvin returned a kickoff 58 yards to set up a touchdown, helping Seattle defeat Minnesota for its franchise-record 13th straight home win.Harvin, who missed the Seahawks' first 10 games while recovering from hip surgery, also made a 17-yard, third-down catch that led to a scoring run by Marshawn Lynch. Lynch had two touchdowns rushing and one receiving.Seattle's Russell Wilson left early in the fourth quarter after completing 13 of 18 passes for 230 yards and a career-best passer rating of 151.4.STEELERS 37, LIONS 27 Detroit scored 27 points in the second quarter, setting a franchise record, but went scoreless in the second half as the Lions remained winless at Pittsburgh since 1955.Matthew Stafford threw for 362 yards to become the Lions' career passing leader, topping Bobby Layne's 15,710 yards. Stafford had two touchdown passes to Calvin Johnson, who finished with six catches for 179 yards. But Stafford went only 3 of 16 in the second half.Still, the Lions entered the fourth quarter with a 27-23 lead. Lining up for a short field-goal attempt on fourth-and-5, they ran a fake. The holder, Sam Martin, fumbled while trying to run for the first down, and the Steelers recovered.Pittsburgh responded with a 16-play, 97-yard drive that ended with a 1-yard touchdown catch by Will Johnson.BENGALS 41, BROWNS 20 Andy Dalton threw two touchdown passes, helping host Cincinnati strengthen its hold on first place in the A.F.C. North.The Browns took a 13-0 lead in the first quarter after Joe Haden intercepted two Dalton passes, returning one of them 29 yards for a score. But the Bengals exploded for 31 points in the second, the highest-scoring quarter in team history.DOLPHINS 20, CHARGERS 16 Ryan Tannehill connected with Charles Clay for a 39-yard score and finished with 268 passing yards, leading Miami past San Diego at home.The Dolphins, coping with the fallout from the bullying case involving Richie Incognito and Jonathan Martin, held the Chargers without a touchdown in the final three quarters. Brent Grimes broke up a Philip Rivers pass in the end zone as time expired, boosting Miami's playoff hopes and damaging San Diego's. The Dolphins won for the second time in seven games."We're fighting through this," offensive tackle Tyson Clabo said. "Someone's got to get that last wild-card spot. Why not us?"Dolphins players were advised that they would meet this week with Ted Wells, the N.F.L. special investigator for the Martin case.RAIDERS 28, TEXANS 23 The rookie Matt McGloin threw three touchdown passes in his first N.F.L. start, and visiting Oakland extended Houston's franchise-record losing streak to eight games. Texans Coach Gary Kubiak returned from a ministroke, working from an upstairs booth.McGloin, who joined the Raiders as an undrafted free agent, was 18 of 32 for 197 yards in place of the injured Terrelle Pryor. Rashad Jennings had 22 carries for 150 yards and a touchdown for Oakland.BUCCANEERS 41, FALCONS 28 Mike Glennon completed 20 of 23 passes for 231 yards and 2 touchdowns with no interceptions, helping host Tampa Bay defeat Atlanta for its second straight win after an 0-8 start.The Falcons have lost four straight by a combined 135-61.CARDINALS 27, JAGUARS 14 Carson Palmer connected with nine receivers, finishing with 419 yards passing and 2 touchdowns, as Arizona won at Jacksonville. It was Palmer's first game without an interception this season.
It did not take long on Saturday night for fans and commentators at Madison Square Garden to realize something was amiss between the Knicks and the Atlanta Hawks. Their uniforms looked alike. Too alike.The Knicks have worn their new orange alternate jerseys four times already this season, but in each previous outing, the other team arrived wearing a contrasting shade. Not the Hawks. The result was a jumble of blood red versus burnt orange that became an exercise in facial recognition, looking twice, squinting, guessing: Which ones are the Hawks?According to the N.B.A. rule book, the home team is mandated to wear light-colored jerseys, and the visitors dark jerseys, unless otherwise approved. This would explain Atlanta's uniform choice."Neither team was at fault," Tim Frank, the N.B.A.'s vice president for basketball communications, said. "The Knicks orange has been designated as a light alternate home uniform. Going forward, we'll ensure that the opponent wears a more distinguishing color uniform when the Knicks wear orange."The color scheme drew mostly critical notice from fans via Twitter and the MSG Network broadcaster Mike Breen, who said he thought even the players might have been having a difficult time telling one another apart. The first half especially was filled with sloppy play and errant passes.Carmelo Anthony dismissed a question that the uniforms had any effect on the game, which the Knicks lost, 110-90.He referred to the suggestion as "nitpicking."The Knicks have already worn the orange jerseys four times this year (all losses) and plan to wear them at least six more times.The N.B.A. has had other games in which teams have worn single-color uniforms — with separate shades for each team. But ESPN's Paul Lukas, the founder of Uni Watch, which tracks and analyzes aesthetics in sports, wrote in an email that Saturday's game "definitely had less uniform contrast than any N.B.A. game in recent memory."It is not the first time this fall that on-field attire by teams made headlines. On Sept. 8, the Arkansas State football team was assessed two penalties — one at the start of each half — for wearing dark gray uniforms at home against Auburn, which wore navy blue.Arkansas State Coach Bryan Harsin told reporters after the game that wearing the uniforms was his decision.Auburn Coach Gus Malzahn said of the penalties, "You don't hear about that very much."In September, two baseball games featured opposing teams wearing dark uniforms: the Los Angeles Angels and the Texas Rangers, each in red; and the Tampa Bay Rays and the Minnesota Twins, each in blue.Basketball, with its close confines and fast pace, is a different form of sport, and uniform colors would perhaps play a bigger role in helping fans, broadcasters and even players keep pace.On Feb. 18, 2004, Wisconsin and Illinois met at Assembly Hall in Champaign, Ill., both wearing dark jerseys in a memorable matchup of bright orange versus bright red.Wisconsin committed 17 turnovers. But the uniforms were probably toughest on those fans straining to discern one team from the other.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — Monday morning dawned sunny and bright in the Chicago area, a day after a series of tornadoes touched down across Illinois and high-powered wind and heavy rainfall pummeled the city.At Soldier Field on Sunday, where the Bears hosted the Baltimore Ravens, the downpour and warnings of more dangerous weather resulted in a delay of 1 hour 54 minutes. Stands were evacuated as fans crowded into the stadium concourses and players returned to their locker rooms for shelter.Trailing by 10-0 when play was suspended in the first quarter, the Bears rallied for a 23-20 overtime victory.Their 6-4 record is good enough for a share of the lead of the N.F.C. North despite the loss of quarterback Jay Cutler last month to a groin injury. The Detroit Lions hold the head-to-head tiebreaker."There's a lot of emotions, people worrying about their family and friends and you hear about the tornadoes hitting," offensive lineman Roberto Garza said."To come up with a victory in those conditions is a statement to the character of this team," he said.Behind Marc Trestman, the first-year coach, and the journeyman quarterback Josh McCown, the Bears have made a surprising run that suddenly has them in the thick of the playoff race.The bookish and bespectacled Trestman spent the past five seasons as coach of the Montreal Alouettes. Fondly called the quarterback whisperer by fans in Chicago, Trestman was hired to resurrect an offense that had seemingly been in search of a reliable signal caller since Sid Luckman retired in 1950.Cutler's play had improved this season, but when he was hurt in Week 7 against Washington, the burden fell to McCown, an 11-year veteran. When McCown filled in for Cutler in 2011, he posted a quarterback rating of 68.3. In four games this season, including two starts, his rating is a cool 100 and he has yet to throw an interception. The Bears have won both of his starts.Trestman said of McCown: "He knows what his strengths are; he plays to his strengths. He tries to keep things simple and he's got a great work ethic. He's detail-oriented."Adding to the turbulence of Trestman's first season in Chicago, has been the injuries the defense has had to endure. The perennial Pro Bowl linebacker Lance Briggs has been out with a shoulder injury since Week 7, and the stalwart cornerback Charles Tillman is lost for the season with a triceps injury. The interior of the defensive line is missing Henry Melton and his backup, Nate Collins, who both tore anterior cruciate ligaments.Trestman, though, was reluctant to view his situation as unique."We can't control the injuries and we appreciate the opportunities to work with these players," he said. "We know where we are and we know where we're going."Perhaps never was his even-keeled and intellectual approach more apparent than on Sunday — with the ominous weather conditions and the nearly two-hour delay that wreaked havoc on what are often painstakingly precise pregame routines in the N.F.L.During the break, the Bears rode stationary bicycles to keep loose. Some read books and others listened to music, Trestman said. McCown took a nap. Trestman tossed a football with wide receiver Brandon Marshall. The Bears ate a snack of turkey sandwiches and pasta salad. They also game-planned.In the second half, gusts were so strong that the goal posts shook and had to be tested to make sure they remained sturdy. The field was a mud pit."We were concerned about ever taking a snap in the shotgun, the wind was coming so hard from sideline to sideline," Trestman said.Early Sunday morning, Garza said his wife told him that she would not attend the game with their two children because of the storm."You guys saw the chunks of grass getting thrown everywhere, the divots," Garza said. "Sitting down for two hours, coming back and it's sunny and it's windy and it's cold. Then overtime; movies are made of stuff like that."And there was McCown leading a winning drive in overtime late in the afternoon, as the sun set over Lake Michigan. But how long he will lead the Bears' offense remains a question.Cutler attempted to come back from his injury against the Lions in Week 10 but was stiff and ineffective in a Bears loss. On Monday, Trestman ruled him out this week against the Rams in St. Louis.After Sunday's win, McCown was quick to call Cutler the starter; Trestman echoed the sentiment. But until Cutler returns, the Bears will carry on, a team like no other Chicago has seen: injury-riddled, offensive-minded and impressively resourceful.
CHICAGO — Several hours before his Indiana Pacers met the Chicago Bulls Saturday night at United Center, General Manager Kevin Pritchard lounged in a courtside folding chair during the afternoon shootaround.His team was off to a 9-0 start, and he watched with a smile, recounting how the Indiana roster was assembled. He was sure, though, to offer a caveat. "It's early," he said. "We know it's early."He added: "This is the biggest test of our season. We'll learn more about our team after tonight."Sure enough, the Bulls laid a smack-down on the Pacers, 110-94, emphatically ending the Pacers' undefeated run.But even with Saturday's loss, Indiana still shares the league's best record — with San Antonio — heading into Wednesday's meeting with the Knicks. The Pacers' visit to Madison Square Garden is their first since they emphatically dispatched the Knicks from the playoffs a season ago in the Eastern Conference semifinals.Early returns indicate the team that then pushed the Miami Heat to seven games in the Eastern Conference finals is every bit as formidable this season — perhaps more so. The Knicks? Well, that's another matter.Before the loss to Chicago, Indiana's defense was allowing 83.7 points per game. For perspective, only the 1998-99 Atlanta Hawks allowed fewer than 84 points over an entire season in the shot clock era. And even after Saturday's loss, the Pacers were still allowing just 86.3 points a game, best in the league.The Pacers' defensive success is built in part on perimeter players with length, like Paul George (6 feet 8 inches) and Lance Stephenson (6-5). The 7-footer Roy Hibbert guards the lane. Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau, a noted defensive guru whose own team was allowing 90 points per game (third in the N.B.A.) going into Monday's games, spoke effusively about Indiana's effort, ball pressure and continuity before Saturday's confrontation."Each year they've gotten better, and they've made a strong commitment to defense," Thibodeau said. "They challenge shots, cover for each other. If there's a mistake that's made, Hibbert's always waiting."Indiana had one of the league's best defenses last season — something the Knicks can attest to — and in the off-season the team's president of basketball operations, Larry Bird; its senior consultant, Donnie Walsh; and Pritchard set about buttressing the offense. Pritchard said Bird targeted Luis Scola of the Phoenix Suns and the free agents C. J. Watson, who played for the Nets last season, and Chris Copeland, who was an intriguing part of the Knicks..The Pacers landed all three. Scola was acquired in a trade, and the Pacers signed Watson and Copeland."We were so close last year, we felt like a couple more players really to help us score the ball is what we needed," Pritchard said. "Every player we brought on added to our offensive efficiencies."George has raised his game, too, putting himself in early consideration for the league's Most Valuable Player award with averages of 23.3 points and 7 rebounds. Thibodeau called him a superstar."The second half of last year, we showed a great deal of offensive execution," Coach Frank Vogel said. "It seems we've not just picked up where we left off in that regard, but with the bench changes we made, we've taken another step."The Pacers' emergence as one of the league's most formidable teams has come rather quickly. They had five consecutive losing seasons, from 2006-7 to 2010-11, although the last of them, when they had a meager 37-45 record, got them into the Eastern Conference playoffs, where they lost in the first round. In 2011-12, the Pacers were 42-24 and lost in the conference semifinals. Last season, they were 49-32 and again took a step forward in the postseason, losing in the conference finals.All of this coincided with key players arriving through the draft, free agency or trades. Hibbert became a Pacer in the summer of 2008, acquired in a trade with Toronto a month after the Raptors took him with the 17th pick in the first round.
CHICAGO — The somber news was delivered in a terse statement from the Chicago Bulls on Monday afternoon. "Earlier this morning, Chicago Bulls guard Derrick Rose underwent successful surgery to repair his previously torn medial meniscus in his right knee," it read."Rose," it added, "is out for the remainder of the season."And so, after missing all of the 2012-13 season while he recovered from a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee, Rose now finds his 2013-14 season over after playing in just 10 games.The blow — to Rose, to his team and to a city in which he is without question the most popular current athlete — is a devastating one and leaves the future of one of the N.B.A.'s youngest superstars in doubt.Rose's two knee injuries came 19 months apart, with both occurring on noncontact plays. In April 2012, Rose's left knee buckled after he drove and planted during the first game of the first round of the playoffs. This time, his right knee gave out as he cut to the basket without the ball in a game in Portland on Friday night.Rose, 25, is now a former most valuable player who has undergone two serious knee operations in an N.B.A. career in which he has played all of 289 games, with 29 more in the postseason. As a result, the Bulls find themselves in a considerable state of uncertainty as they look ahead toward the rest of this season and beyond.Without Rose, Chicago, at least for now, remains a tough-minded playoff contender in a relatively weak Eastern Conference. Last season, the Bulls put on a scrappy, determined performance as they knocked out the Nets in the first round of the playoffs and harassed Miami in the second round, even though Rose was unavailable to play and other players were sick or injured. At this point, the Bulls might have to try the same thing again next spring, with essentially the same group of players. But without Rose, it is hard to see them doing any better than last season."It's devastating," the TNT analyst Steve Kerr said Monday in assessing the impact of Rose's injury on the Bulls. "Everything really was lined up for them this year, and I think most people felt like they could make a great push. Big picture, it throws everything out the window. They may have to totally reshuffle the deck."Indeed, Chicago's nucleus could very well have played its last game together. The All-Star forward Luol Deng will be a free agent next summer. The team could wipe out Carlos Boozer's hefty contract under the amnesty clause.The financial future of the team is heavily invested in Rose, too. The Bulls paid him more than $16 million last year and owe him about $17.6 million this season, less reimbursement from an insurance policy. And there are still three years and more than $60 million remaining on Rose's contract after that.This season was supposed to be Rose's redemption tour. He spoke repeatedly about not just returning to the lineup, but becoming an even more dominant player. He said he was stronger and a better shooter.Still, he started the regular season somewhat slowly, his timing not quite right, the rust not quite gone. Slowly, his quickness began to re-emerge. And then came Friday night.Barring a setback, he should have little trouble returning to form; the difficulty, though, is knowing what that form will be. With so much time missed, with another injury always possible, questions about his confidence on the court may follow him for years."One A.C.L. or one meniscus injury is one thing," Kerr said. "But some guys spend a lot of their careers fighting injuries. When you go three years where he's always getting hurt, you can't help but start to wonder if he's an injury-prone guy."Kerr, though, was not all doom and gloom."On the bright side, he's very young still," Kerr said. "If your glass is half full, he's going to come back at 26 with the meniscus healed and the A.C.L. at full strength."But that's little solace to shellshocked Bulls fans. Rose graduated from Simeon Career Academy on Chicago's South Side in 2007. During pregame introductions at United Center, he is introduced not from his college, Memphis, but from Chicago.That is where Rose will now spend much of this season, doing the long grind of rehabilitation work for the second year in a row.
Baltimore quarterback Joe Flacco hates his team's use of the Wildcat formation, and on Tuesday he let everyone know just how much.He was not happy with Coach John Harbaugh's decision to employ the backup quarterback Tyrod Taylor in the Wildcat on Sunday in an effort to enhance the Ravens' running attack against the Jets. Taylor took five snaps — running four times and throwing an incomplete pass — in addition to lining up as a receiver on seven other plays."I don't like that stuff," Flacco said. "I think it makes you look like a high school offense. That's just my opinion."He added: "I don't care how we use it in the game, I'm just not a huge fan of it. I'm the quarterback. I want to be behind the line of scrimmage. I want to be taking the snaps."After earning Super Bowl most valuable player honors in February, Flacco received a $120.6 million, six-year contract from the Ravens, who are 5-6.GIANTS LOSE CENTER Jim Cordle, who has started seven of the last eight games at center for the Giants, was placed on season-ending injured reserve because of an injury to the patellar tendon of his left knee.Cordle, who was injured in Sunday's loss to the Dallas Cowboys, is the third Giants offensive lineman this season to be put on injured reserve, joining guard Chris Snee and David Baas, the original starting center whom Cordle replaced. Left guard Kevin Boothe took Cordle's place Sunday and is likely to finish the season as the starting center. The reserve lineman James Brewer is expected to take over at left guard for Boothe.SUSPENSION UPHELD The N.F.L. has upheld the one-game suspension of Titans safety Michael Griffin as a repeat offender of rules prohibiting hits to the head and neck area of defenseless players. The suspension will cost Griffin $205,882.35 of his $3.5 million base pay this season, and he is prohibited from any football activities until Monday. (AP)SEAHAWK SUSPENDED Seahawks cornerback Walter Thurmond has been suspended for the next four games for violating the league's substance-abuse policy. Thurmond will be eligible to return to the active roster on Dec. 23 before the final game of the regular season. (AP)BOWEN OUT FOR SEASON Washington Redskins defensive end Stephen Bowen is out for the season with a left-knee injury. Bowen joined the Redskins as a free agent in 2011 and had started 36 straight games for Washington before missing Monday's loss to the San Francisco 49ers. (AP)RODGERS PRACTICES Packers quarterback Aaron Rodgers has returned to practice on a limited basis, but he is unlikely to face the Detroit Lions on Thursday. Rodgers has been out since Nov. 4, when he hurt his left collarbone in a 27-20 loss to Chicago. The Packers, 5-2 at the time, have been winless since. (AP)
Sunday's 26-26 tie at home against Minnesota should have put Green Bay's season on life support, and it would have but for the woeful performances turned in by Chicago (a 42-21 loss to St. Louis) and the Packers' Thanksgiving opponent. Detroit's stunning ineptitude — Matthew Stafford threw four interceptions in a 24-21 loss to Tampa Bay — was a bitter reminder that these are the Lions, despite their play in recent weeks.The N.F.C. wild-card teams will very likely come out of the West and the South, so Green Bay and Detroit are playing for a division title or bust. Packers Coach Mike McCarthy has said that Aaron Rodgers's chances of playing in this game are "slim to none."That is probably a great disappointment to the Lions' defense, which "takes cheap shots all the time," as Packers guard Josh Sitton recently said. And not in a nice way.Dallas won a hard-fought game against its bitterest rivals, the Giants. Coach Jason Garrett appeared to be calling the offensive plays behind his clipboard, and it appeared to be working. (The Cowboys won, 24-21, on a late field goal.) Garrett might also have been catching up with the owner Jerry Jones, who has been busy offering his brand of insightful tips to Dez Bryant on ways to avoid fumbling. Hint: It has to do with holding the ball closer to his body, which the coaches might not have mentioned.Oakland has one of the league's most porous defensive backfields, and Tony Romo has thrown for more than 2,900 yards with 23 touchdowns. The Cowboys also have Bryant, whose considerable skills have earned him 835 yards and 8 touchdowns, and the enmity of defensive backs everywhere. The Raiders will struggle to keep up.At this point on Thanksgiving evening, you might awaken from a tryptophan-induced coma, or perhaps one brought on by the Raiders-Cowboys game. And you could very well feast your eyes on a prime-time defensive struggle. These teams stifled their opponents on Sunday: Baltimore gave up only a field goal to the Jets, and Pittsburgh surrendered 11 points to Cleveland. It was a throwback afternoon for both defenses.As hard to believe as it may be, the Steelers and the Ravens are still in playoff contention, thanks to the doggedness of their coaching staffs and, frankly, the mediocrity of the A.F.C. The Thursday night forecast for Baltimore called for a low around 30 degrees; that could also be the game's over-under. Go with the under.
CHICAGO — Jrue Holiday made a three-point play with 2.6 seconds remaining in the third overtime Monday night, giving the New Orleans Pelicans a 131-128 victory over the Chicago Bulls.Holiday had 19 points and 12 assists for the Pelicans. He made an 18-footer with 3.9 seconds remaining in regulation to tie the score at 103 and force overtime.Ryan Anderson had a career-high 36 points on 12-of-20 shooting, including 7 for 11 on 3-pointers. Eric Gordon added 23 points for New Orleans (9-8).Luol Deng led the Bulls with 37 points and also had eight rebounds and seven assists. Reserve Taj Gibson had 26 points and 14 rebounds, Mike Dunleavy added 23 points and Joakim Noah had a double-double with 19 points and 10 rebounds.It was the Bulls' first game at home following a 1-5 road trip while the circus took over the United Center for two weeks. The Bulls (7-9) lost for the first time at home after winning five in a row.In the extra session, the teams traded one-point leads for nearly three minutes before Deng's drive gave the Bulls a 109-106 advantage with 2:08 left. The Bulls then got consecutive defensive stops and had two chances to stretch the lead, but couldn't convert. Gordon then hit a 3-pointer with 10.2 seconds to go tie the score at 109 to force a second OT.In double overtime, it was the Bulls who made a comeback. Trailing 118-113, they took advantage of New Orleans' mistakes and tied the score at 122 on Deng's drive with 4.7 seconds to go.The Bulls jumped on top in the third session, but the Pelicans rallied and took a 127-126 edge on Anderson's 3-pointer with 1:08 to go. Noah tied it 128.NOTES: For the second straight season, Pelicans center Anthony Davis — the No. 1 pick in the 2012 draft — missed the team's only visit to his hometown. The 6-foot-10 big man broke his left hand Sunday in New York and is out in definitely. Last year, Davis was held out with a mild concussion. "One of the first things he said to me when I got back in the locker room was, 'Two years in a row,'" Pelicans coach Monty Williams said. "Took me a minute to realize what he was talking about. He just really wanted to play here. I feel bad for him." . Derrick Rose, who had surgery a week ago to repair a torn meniscus in his right knee, didn't attend the Bulls' first home game since the injury. "I've been talking to him," Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau said. "He's doing fine.". Thibodeau and Williams were added to USA Basketball coach Mike Krzyzewski's staff last and spent a lot of time together. "I learned a lot just being with him every day for a week, just talking basketball, family," Williams said of Thibodeau. "Just listening to the way he goes about his business for me was beneficial."
COLUMBUS, Ohio — Cam Atkinson, Nick Foligno, Boone Jenner and R.J. Umberger scored and Curtis McElhinney posted his first shutout since 2011 in leading the Columbus Blue Jackets to a 4-0 victory over the Minnesota Wild on Friday night.It was the Blue Jackets' second win in a row, the first time they've won back-to-back games since Oct. 25.They did it in their first game without last year's Vezina Trophy winner as the NHL's top goalie, Sergei Bobrovsky, who will miss the next month or so with a strained groin.McElhinney made 20 saves in his first shutout since Feb. 5, 2011, while with the Anaheim Ducks.Foligno and Umberger each also had assists and Ryan Johansen added two assists to stretch his points streak to four games.The Blue Jackets have been struggling with injuries.In addition to Bobrovsky, top offensive threat Marian Gaborik (sprained knee) is out for another two weeks and top offseason free-agent signing Nathan Horton (shoulder surgery) has yet to play in a Columbus sweater and likely won't be ready for at least another month.McElhinney's third NHL shutout came in his 78th game.After a scoreless first period, the Blue Jackets took over.At the 1:17 mark of the second, Atkinson took a pass from Dubinsky and wristed a shot from the top of the right circle that Minnesota goalie Niklas Backstrom didn't appear to see. He barely moved as the puck beat him high and near his right shoulder.The Blue Jackets went on their first power play when Matt Cooke went off for hooking. Columbus soon took advantage on the man advantage.Johansen passed to Umberger for a shot from a hard angle that handcuffed Backstrom, with Johansen then following the puck to get a whack at it on the rebound.Before the puck could be cleared, Foligno found the net on his second attempt from the right doorstep at the 5:40 mark.Soon after, the Wild had a prime chance to get back in the game.After Artem Anisimov went off for hooking, Dubinsky was whistled for a slash, giving Minnesota a 5-on-3 advantage for 1:13.Columbus' Derek MacKenzie, playing for the first time after missing five games with a back injury, collected a loose puck and skated up the right wing before Backstrom deflected his shot with the Blue Jackets still two men down.The Wild did recover to squeeze off a couple of good shots on the power play, with McElhinney smothering a hard slap shot from the left point by Jason Pominville and then later appearing to stop a high shot by Zach Parise off his mask.The last few minutes of the second period were chippy with Umberger — playing his 400th game for the Blue Jackets and the 628th of his career — in the middle of a couple of scraps.He was called for boarding after smashing Jonas Brodin into the corner, but that was offset when Ryan Suter roughed Umberger.After that 4-on-4 ended, Keith Ballard got 2 minutes for high-sticking Umberger but the Blue Jacket responded by roughing Ballard.Columbus was still controlling the play early in the third when, on a 3-on-3 rush, Jenner wristed a shot from the top of the left circle that eluded Backstrom high on his glove side. The goal, at the 4:38 mark, was the rookie's third of the season.Umberger closed the scoring at the 9:05 mark when, while trailing the play, he benefited from a nifty feed from Foligno. Foligno had only one defender to beat but instead whipped a blind pass to Umberger who had virtually an empty net.Notes: The Blue Jackets improved to 35-0 under coach Todd Richards when leading after two periods. ... The Wild were coming off a come-from-behind 4-3 win over the Chicago on Thursday night for their first home win over the Blackhawks since 2008. ... The teams were both 5-4-1 over their past 10 games, had almost identical stats on the power play and penalty kill and were each giving up 2.4 goals a game. ... It was the Wild's third loss in a row on the road. ... It was the second consecutive shutout for the Blue Jackets. Bobrovsky had 18 saves before being injured and McElhinney had eight saves in a 1-0 win over Tampa Bay on Tuesday night. ... Minnesota has been shut out in two of its past three games.
CHICAGO — The way everything was crumbling, the Chicago Bulls sure needed a reprieve. Knocking off the defending champions was a nice one.Carlos Boozer scored 27 points, and the Bulls pounded LeBron James and the Miami Heat 107-87 on Thursday night.Luol Deng had 20 points, Taj Gibson chipped in with 19, and Joakim Noah added 17 points and 15 rebounds as the Bulls had no trouble taking out the Southeast Division leaders.Chicago took control early on and hung on down the stretch after watching a 25-point lead in the third quarter dwindle to 12 late in the game.It was an impressive showing by a team that had dropped six of seven and is once again trying to get by without the injured Derrick Rose."Our team needed it," Noah said. "We went through a lot the past couple of weeks. It's really hard to play without Derrick. I want to win with Derrick Rose."The Bulls shot 50 percent and were 10 for 19 on 3-pointers — four by Deng and three by Kirk Hinrich, who scored 13. They also outrebounded Miami 49-27.James scored 21 points for Miami, but the Heat shot a season low for the second straight game, converting 41.6 percent from the field after hitting 43.9 percent in Tuesday's loss to Detroit."We can't just brush this loss aside," coach Erik Spoelstra said. "We have to really own it, to understand what happened. They just got whatever they wanted, right in the paint, at the rim and if they missed those, then they're just beating us up at the glass."It didn't help that Dwyane Wade stayed back at the hotel with an illness after sitting out the previous game because of knee soreness.Chris Andersen missed this one for personal reasons, but the Heat will get no sympathy from Chicago.After all, the Bulls lost Rose to a torn meniscus in his right knee in a game at Portland on Nov. 22, and although the former MVP left the door slightly open for a playoff return earlier in the day, the team has ruled him out for the rest of the season."We really got snake-bitten," Gibson said. "When that happened to Derrick, that was really like, 'Wow.' We're a family in here. When that stuff kind of happens, it was just ... tough. We were on the road, odds were against us."And as if that six-game trip wasn't difficult enough, there was a triple-overtime loss to New Orleans on Monday in their first game back at the United Center.The Bulls did just fine on Thursday, although things got a little tight down the stretch.Miami cut it to 93-81 on Norris Cole's runner with 5:38 remaining. But Gibson answered with a jumper and blocked a layup by Udonis Haslem.Deng made a 3 with just under four minutes left to make it 98-81, and Chicago hung on from there.Before that, the only tension came early in the third quarter when Hinrich took a shot to the neck from Cole away from the ball. The result was an angry exchange, a flagrant foul one for Cole and a technical for Hinrich.The Bulls' guard hit both free throws after James missed a foul shot, making it 67-45.Boozer led a scorching start by Chicago, scoring 19 points as the Bulls built a 58-44 halftime lead.But in the end, it was the Bulls' rebounding and defense that had the Heat shaking their heads."We've never been a great rebounding team but we've been able to overcome that," James said. "Teams have done a much better job of rebounding against us. It could be an effort thing, it could be a lot of things but we just got to go out and just go get them."I'm going to do a better job of that, get more rebounds. But it's a group thing for a team. We don't have a Kevin Love or Joakim Noah or Dwight Howard, those types of guys who can get you 15-plus, we have to do it as a collective group."NOTES: There was a moment of silence before the game to honor Nelson Mandela, who died Thursday at the age of 95. ... This was the Bulls' most lopsided win over the Heat since a 126-96 blowout at Miami on Jan. 16, 2008. ... Andersen expected to rejoin Miami on Friday in Minnesota. The Heat play the Timberwolves on Saturday.
It would be easy to overlook (as many have) the Major League Soccer championship match, which is scheduled for Saturday afternoon between host Sporting Kansas City and Real Salt Lake.After all, the attention of the soccer world, in the United States and elsewhere, has been fixated this week on Friday's World Cup draw in Brazil.Add to the equation the starts-stops-starts of the M.L.S. playoffs: a two-week break between the conference semifinals and finals and another two-week hiatus between the conference finals and the M.L.S. Cup.While a multitude of computer widgets and websites have played endless simulations of the World Cup draw, EA Sports took the opportunity to play a simulation of the M.L.S. Cup using the engine at the heart of the FIFA 14 game.The company said the match was played under the same conditions the players (and fans) are expected to find on Saturday in Kansas City, Kan., where the weather forecast is for temperatures below freezing.According to the simulation, Kansas City erased a 2-1 second-half deficit on goals by Graham Zusi and the game-winner by Dom Dwyer.Here is the scoring summary:NOTES Major League Soccer announced on Thursday that Chicago Fire striker Mike Magee had won the Most Valuable Player award. Magee, a Chicago native, was traded to the Fire by Los Angeles in midseason for Robbie Rogers.The league also announced that Vancouver's Camilo Sanvezzo had won this year's goal of the year honors:Real Salt Lake goalkeeper Nick Rimando won the save (actually, saves) of the year award:
CHICAGO — Derrick Rose, the Chicago Bulls' point guard, hobbled on crutches into a room in the basement of the United Center on Thursday morning to meet the news media for the first time since he had surgery last week to repair a meniscus tear in his right knee. He wore a red hooded sweatshirt with his trademark logo, a design with the letter "D" inside a rose.Ten minutes into his news conference, Rose, 25, was asked what he might say to people who think the Bulls ought to reconsider his role as the centerpiece of the franchise, given his injury history. He missed all of last season recovering with a torn anterior cruciate ligament in his left knee and played in just 39 games during the shortened 2011-12 season. The Bulls ruled him out for this season when they announced his operation.Rose paused, pondering the question. He scratched his chin thoughtfully. Then he said: "You can be a fool if you want to. I know I'm going to be all right."While fans in Chicago and plenty of others around the N.B.A. fret about Rose's future, the former most valuable player remained defiant in the wake of his latest setback, assuring everyone that he would be back — again."I could get hurt 10 more times," Rose said. "I'm never going to stop."Rose spoke for more than 20 minutes about his faith in God, in himself and in his body to heal. He said he knew in the locker room immediately after the injury — which occurred as he cut to the basket without the ball in a game at Portland — that it was serious. He said that he had hoped it was not another injury to his anterior cruciate ligament and that he was relieved when tests revealed the meniscus tear.The injury is considered less severe than the one to the A.C.L. Rose said he has put weight on the leg, something he did not do for several months after his last operation. He has also begun his rehabilitation, which includes swimming and yoga."This is the nature of the N.B.A.," Bulls Coach Tom Thibodeau said. "Most players, at some point in their career, they're going to deal with injury. That he made it through the A.C.L., I think that gives him a frame of reference to deal with this one."Rose said he chose not to be bogged down by negative thoughts and self-pity. Instead, he promised he would be the same explosive player he was before tearing his A.C.L., although his aggressive style of play has been cited as a possible cause for the injuries."I could care less what people say about me, criticize my game, or whatever," he said. "I have a unique way of playing basketball and I can't change that."Contrary to the team's statement after the injury, Rose also left the door open for a return should the Bulls advance to the playoffs. "If I'm healthy and the situation is right, I'm going to be back," he said.What precisely those circumstances might be are unclear, but the Bulls, despite recent struggles, remain in playoff contention in the notoriously bad Eastern Conference. The Bulls were 6-4 when Rose went down. They wound up losing to Portland after his exit, and have gone 1-4 since, including the worst loss in franchise history, a 121-82 defeat to the Los Angeles Clippers on Nov. 24.At 7-9, the Bulls were in seventh place in the Eastern Conference heading into Thursday night's game against the visiting Miami Heat. It would have been a matchup of heavyweights if Rose were healthy.Three seasons ago, the Bulls fell to the Heat in the Eastern Conference finals. It looked like the beginning of a worthy rivalry."I think about it," Rose said of the disappointing thought that he and the Bulls' other current core players might never get another shot at Miami in the postseason. "But at the same time, I have to deal with the reality. I have an injury and I'm rebuilding my other leg all over again."
CHICAGO — Brandon Jennings scored 33 points and the Detroit Pistons beat the short-handed Chicago Bulls 92-75 on Saturday night for their fourth consecutive victory.Andre Drummond (14 rebounds), Greg Monroe (12) and Josh Smith (10) helped Detroit to a 51-44 rebounding edge as the Pistons (10-10) stretched their road winning streak to four games dating to Nov. 24.It was Detroit's first victory in Chicago since Feb. 24, 2006. The Pistons had lost 14 in a row at the United Center.The Bulls (8-10) shot 33 percent from the floor while playing without leading scorer Luol Deng, who was sidelined by tightness in his left calf. He is averaging 26.2 points over his last six games.Taj Gibson led Chicago with 21 points and 10 rebounds. Mike Dunleavy Jr. scored 16 and Carlos Boozer finished with 13 points.The Pistons outscored the Bulls 24-9 in the third quarter to break away from a first-half tie.Jennings made 12 of 22 shots from the floor, including a 5-for-8 performance from 3-point range. The Pistons shot 12 for 19 from beyond the arc overall.Kyle Singler scored 12 points for Detroit, and Josh Harrellson had 10.Deng is day to day. Already without star point guard Derrick Rose, the Bulls were missing their two best scorers, and it showed.After 11 points in the first quarter, Boozer didn't score again until the final two minutes.Gibson was especially active on the offensive glass. He battled for two offensive boards and a putback on one possession three minutes into the second quarter.Detroit went 6 for 8 from 3-point range in the first half to make up for an inability to finish inside. The Pistons failed to convert a bunch of opportunities under the rim but the game was tied at 47 at halftime.Chicago has lost seven of its last nine games, but was coming off a 20-point win over Miami on Thursday.NOTES: Both Gibson and Joakim Noah were whistled for technical fouls. ... Bulls coach Tom Thibodeau said Deng has been dealing with the injury since the teams met in Detroit on Nov. 27. ... Pistons guard Rodney Stuckey left in the second quarter with a sore left knee and did not return. He finished with two points in 10 minutes.
EAST RUTHERFORD, N.J. — Giants Coach Tom Coughlin interrupted a reporter the instant he recognized the question pertained to the possibility that linebacker Jon Beason would become a free agent after the season."I don't look down the road. Please," Coughlin said. "We've got a game."For the time being, Coughlin successfully directed attention back to Sunday's road game against the San Diego Chargers, a matchup of 5-7 teams with dwindling playoff hopes. But the issue of whether management will be able to retain Beason will not go away. He has made a major impact since being acquired from the Carolina Panthers on Oct. 4 for a late-round draft choice in 2014.When defensive end Justin Tuck was asked to describe what the fiery Beason has meant to a defense that was repeatedly gashed during an 0-6 start, he replied: "I don't know if I can. I think he's been a godsend for us."Carolina drafted Beason in the first round in 2007, selecting him 25th over all out of Miami. He rewarded the Panthers' confidence by reaching the Pro Bowl from 2008 to 2010, while amassing 490 tackles. But injuries limited him to five games the past two years and led to such a slow start this season that he was replaced by the free agent Chase Blackburn, a former member of the Giants, by the third game.Beason competed like a man on a mission since being dumped by the only team he thought he would ever represent."One day you wake up, and the opportunity of a lifetime is at hand," he said of the Giants' first in-season trade since 1986.His play since he joined the Giants has been dynamic. Beason appeared to be everywhere at once when he made 17 tackles, 13 of them unassisted, in the Giants' come-from-behind victory last week against the Washington Redskins, keeping alive their faint N.F.C. East hopes. Alfred Morris, who began the night as the league's third-leading rusher for Washington, was limited to 26 yards on 11 carries. Beason also led the charge when Adrian Peterson (28 yards) of the Minnesota Vikings and LeSean McCoy (48 yards) of the Philadelphia Eagles were stymied.The Giants often complained about miscommunication as they yielded a league-high 182 points in their first five games before Beason's vocal and physical presence was added to the lineup against the Bears in Chicago. The Giants lost, 27-21, for their worst start since 1976, but the game also signaled a turnaround of sorts. The defense limited the Bears to a field goal in the second half, and went on to hold opponents without a touchdown for the next 10 quarters and to only two through 18.Coaches and teammates point to the 6-foot, 232-pound Beason as the difference maker."On defense, you don't think that you need a quarterback, but you do," the defensive coordinator Perry Fewell said. "You need someone who can come in and command the front and relate to the back row, and Jon has been able to do that. He is very good at understanding situations, being able to talk to his defensive players and playing the game at a fast tempo."Carl Banks, a former Giants linebacker who is now part of their broadcast team, views Beason as being exactly what the defense needed."He is a very instinctive linebacker, something in the middle that they haven't had in a while," Banks said. "He brings leadership, toughness and a higher level. He plays at a very different level."Beason, 28, reflects the no-nonsense upbringing he and his brother Adrian, 30, received from Terry Beason, their single-parent mother. She worked double shifts for a marketing company in Miami, with her hours stretching from 7:30 a.m. until midnight, six days a week. She would begin her lone day off on Sunday by hearing Jon sing as part of the church choir."I motivated them, and they motivated me," she said of her struggle to meet financial obligations. "We put our hearts together and made it happen. 'Can't' was not in our vocabulary."Francesco Zampogna, a former kicker at Miami who remains close to Beason, recalled that Beason would follow a workout prescribed for teammates — and then repeat it."He separates himself, whether it's in fitness or on the football field," Zampogna said.Beason began his N.F.L. career by making 65 consecutive starts before tearing his left Achilles' tendon in the 2011 opener. He started the first four games for Carolina last year before the combination of a torn labrum in his left shoulder and damage to his right knee sidelined him for the rest of the season. He had microfracture surgery on his right knee last October and said his recovery was continuing."I have another gear, another level, that this organization and these fans haven't seen yet," he said.He conceded that the Achilles' injury might have been the result of excessive training. He said the Giants were limiting him in the weight room and on the practice field, restrictions he grudgingly accepted as part of his effort to show his new team how much he wants to stay."I want to be a New York Giant and nowhere else," he said.
CHICAGO — The Chicago Bears are back in the playoff race, and they can thank Josh McCown for that.McCown threw for a career-high four touchdowns, and the Bears scored on their first eight possessions to grab a share of the NFC North lead with a 45-28 victory over the Dallas Cowboys on a frigid Monday night.The Bears (7-6) retired Hall of Famer Mike Ditka's number at halftime and pulled even with Detroit in the division race on a night when the game-time temperature was in single digits and the wind chill factor was below zero.The loss left Dallas (7-6) a game behind Philadelphia in the NFC East and owner Jerry Jones calling for more aggressive play-calling on defense.The bone-chilling conditions didn't stop McCown from throwing for 348 yards or keep the Bears from running away with a lopsided victory.It was one they desperately needed after consecutive losses, and although Detroit holds the head-to-head sweep, the Bears are back in the thick of the playoff race."All we could do is try to beat the Dallas Cowboys," coach Marc Trestman said. "We kept it as simple as that. We didn't get into all the hypotheticals and all the things that go into winning or losing a game."Alshon Jeffery's leaping catch between two defenders in the corner of the end zone in the closing seconds of the second quarter gave the Bears a 24-14 lead, and they continued to pour it on in the second half after a gut-wrenching overtime loss at Minnesota last week.Here are five things we learned on a frigid night at Soldier Field:STILL NO. 2: No matter how well McCown plays, the Bears insist he's still the back up to Jay Cutler.Even after the veteran became the first Bears quarterback to throw for 300 or more yards, that message came through.Cutler will get his job back once he's ready to return from a high left ankle sprain. McCown will get a nice pat on the back — and maybe a contract for next season."We'll see where Jay is this week," he said. "He'll have to be released by the doctors and when Jay is ready to play, he'll be playing."NO DEFENSE: Jerry Jones isn't happy, either. The Cowboys boast the league's worst defense, and after watching Chicago rack up 490 yards, their owner is calling for some changes."Basically, we will have to make some adjustments in what we are doing defensively," Jones said. "What that usually means is taking more risks on defense. But if you're going to have the kind of match like we had tonight or certainly in New Orleans you have to take some risks. We have to double up and I'm sure that will be part of the plan on defense; more risks."DOMINANT DUO: No matter who's throwing them the ball, Brandon Marshall and Alshon Jeffery continue to wreak havoc.Marshall caught six passes for 100 yards, giving him 1,090 on the season. Jeffery is now up to 1,193. He had 84 yards receiving after breaking his own team record the previous week with 249.STOPPING THE RUN: The Bears came in ranked last against the run, and they continued to struggle in that area. They held Tony Romo to 104 yards passing but couldn't do much against the run. DeMarco Murray ran for 146 yards, and the Cowboys finished with 198 rushing on just 28 carries.A ROMO FADE?: Romo's regular-season record as a starter in December and January is now 12-17. But Jones insisted he's not concerned by that."I really don't think I ever made a decision regarding Tony in any way that involved a thought about his December record," he said. "It's not an issue. We need to win a game. We need to win next week. The December thing is not a big factor."
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — The Chicago Bears insisted all along that quarterback Jay Cutler would get his job back once he was ready, no matter how well Josh McCown was playing.On Thursday, they stuck to their word.Coach Marc Trestman said Cutler will start Sunday at Cleveland after missing four games because of a high left ankle sprain.McCown goes back to a reserve role after excelling."I don't think that risk was part of this decision," Trestman said. "This decision was made a long time ago. That was that when Jay was ready to play, that he would play. That's how we planned to do it, so I don't look at it like that. I look at it, Jay's our quarterback, and when he was ready to play, he was going to play, and that's the same words I used a month ago and there's no change today."Cutler worked with the receivers following Wednesday's walkthrough. Trestman said there was no swelling or any "residual issues" from that, and he was a full participant in Thursday's practice.He also said Cutler is "100 percent or certainly close to it if not."The news on linebacker Lance Briggs wasn't quite as promising. He participated on a limited basis and Trestman wasn't optimistic about him returning this week, meaning he could miss his seventh straight game because of a broken shoulder.Cutler's return comes on the heels of a blowout win over Dallas on Monday night that vaulted the Bears back into the NFC North race after back-to-back losses at St. Louis and Minnesota. They're tied with Detroit at 7-6, but the Lions beat them twice.That includes the game at Soldier Field on Nov. 10, when Cutler returned after sitting out the previous week because of a groin injury only to hurt his ankle when a defensive player rolled up it. He stayed in until the Bears' final drive, even though he was laboring, when McCown led them to a touchdown and the potential tying two-point conversion failed.Cutler was hoping to return against Dallas. Instead, he'll face the Browns, a team that's 4-9 after losing four straight but boasts one of the league's top defenses. They're seventh overall and tied for eighth against the pass.Lurking not too far beneath the surface is that Cutler has an uncertain future with an expiring contract."Can't worry about it," he said. "We're trying to win football games. Whatever it takes to win that game, that's kind of my mindset. It'll take care of itself. It always does."When healthy, Cutler has played as well as he has since he arrived from Denver before the 2009 season. He has thrown for just over 1,900 yards, and his 88.4 rating is his highest as a Bear.More than anything, he appeared to be clicking with Trestman, which was one of the main reasons Lovie Smith was fired after last season. The Bears wanted to get the most out of their quarterback, so they switched to an offensive-minded head coach.McCown has also excelled in Trestman's system, and there were at least some calls to stay with the hot hand.Cutler insisted he's not paying attention to that debate, saying he's simply focusing on Cleveland. McCown provided plenty of fuel through his play even if he and Trestman did their best to squash any controversy, saying all along that the job still belonged to Cutler."There is not a debate in this building so that is kind of where my concern lies," Cutler said.If nothing else, the Bears know they can count on McCown if they need him again. Considering he was coaching high school football in North Carolina when they first signed him during the 2011 season, that's not bad.McCown has thrown for more than 1,800 yards and completed nearly 67 percent of his passes in seven appearances. He has 13 touchdowns and just one interception, and his performance against Dallas might have been his best.He became the first player in franchise history with three straight 300-yard passing games, throwing for 348 yards and a career-high four touchdowns. He also ran for one, getting spun like a helicopter as he leaped into the end zone, but he's headed back to the sideline."I'll do everything I can to help him," McCown said. "And he's going to study, he's going to work hard and he's going to put himself in a position to be successful. Before he got hurt he was playing some of the best ball of his career. So there's no reason to think that won't continue."If Cutler struggles this week, could he get a quick hook?"I wouldn't be prepared for any of those hypotheticals," Trestman said. "We plan on him playing and playing well and those situations come up game by game with anybody. But I wouldn't go near that one other than the fact that I expect Jay to play efficiently and play well and that's why he's going to be up."
IRVING, Tex. — N.F.L. players should expect rule changes next year regarding behavior in locker rooms and with teammates in the wake of reports of bullying on the Miami Dolphins .As a special report is being compiled about conditions on the Dolphins, "we are also looking at the workplace environment and what changes should be necessary," Commissioner Roger Goodell said Wednesday at the end of a one-day meeting of league and team executives."We'll be reaching out to players, to clubs, to evaluate them in the next several months," Goodell said. "So we anticipate there will be changes in that for next season."Goodell's comments came six weeks after Jonathan Martin, a second-year offensive lineman, left the Dolphins amid reports that he was repeatedly bullied by his teammate Richie Incognito. The allegations were an embarrassment to the league, which has been grappling with several issues involving player conduct.The Dolphins initially played down the severity of the allegations, but after Martin's lawyers provided evidence, Miami suspended Incognito for conduct detrimental to the team.Incognito filed a noninjury grievance against the Dolphins challenging his suspension. Under the N.F.L.'s collective bargaining agreement, an independent arbitrator hears all noninjury grievances, and Incognito asked that his be heard as soon as possible.In a television interview, Incognito said that he never intended to hurt Martin and that his way of motivating Martin had been misinterpreted. Incognito said that although his text and voice mail messages might appear inappropriate to those unfamiliar with his relationship with Martin, the messages were typical of the players' friendship."When the words are put in the context, I can understand why a lot of eyebrows are raised," Incognito said in the interview with Fox Sports. "People don't know how Jon and I communicate to one another."Martin has not returned to the team and was placed on the reserve/nonfootball illness list, effectively ending his season.Ted Wells, a well-known defense lawyer hired by the league to investigate the matter, has interviewed Incognito, Martin and many of their coaches and teammates. Goodell said Wednesday that he did not expect a report from Wells for at least several more weeks, casting doubt that it would be ready before the end of the year.The Miami Herald reported that Wells's findings would not be made public until after the Super Bowl.Goodell said Wells had not given him a timeline and had not been asked for one."We want him to be thorough and not to compromise in any way," Goodell said. "When it's complete, he'll present it to me, and I have not given him any deadline."SHANAHAN BENCHING GRIFFIN Although he is medically cleared to play, Robert Griffin III will be Washington's inactive third quarterback for the Redskins' final three games, behind Kirk Cousins, who will start, and Rex Grossman.Coach Mike Shanahan spoke passionately at times while explaining his reasoning during a 28-minute news conference that included references to the team's "circus atmosphere" and insistences that his move to bench Griffin was not a ploy to get himself fired.Shanahan said he feared that Griffin, who has taken a pounding in recent weeks, would be hurt and that it would ruin Griffin's off-season — a reversal of Shanahan's often-stated position that Griffin needed as much game experience as possible and would play to the end of the season.Griffin, who has at times publicly clashed with Shanahan, clearly was not happy with the decision, gesturing, shrugging and shaking his head during his turn at the podium. Asked if he would rather play for a different coaching staff next year, however, Griffin said, "I think that's the general misconception, that players in our locker room want people gone."Shanahan went into great detail about his decision to sit Griffin, at one point saying: "What I'm trying to do is be as honest as I can. And I don't normally do that." He also conceded for the first time that his decision to keep an obviously injured Griffin in a playoff loss to Seattle last season cost the Redskins the game.Shanahan said he first broached the topic of benching Griffin with the Redskins' owner, Dan Snyder, last week. He said Snyder and General Manager Bruce Allen offered their "100 percent" support. Shanahan cited that consensus as evidence that he was not trying to be fired. If he were to resign, he would forfeit the final year's salary of his contract.Nevertheless, Shanahan again conceded he might not return next season. (AP)BEARS HOPEFUL ON CUTLER Chicago Coach Marc Trestman said that he was optimistic that quarterback Jay Cutler would return from an ankle injury this weekend against Cleveland and that the Bears would know Thursday if Cutler was ready to start. The chances that linebacker Lance Briggs (shoulder) would play appeared slim. (AP)AROUND THE LEAGUE Running back Adrian Peterson shed the walking boot on his sprained right foot but was not expected to practice until Friday at the earliest for the Minnesota Vikings, who will start Matt Cassel at quarterback, with Christian Ponder as the backup. ... Denver receiver Wes Welker will not play Thursday night against San Diego as he recovers from his second concussion in less than a month. ... Green Bay quarterback Aaron Rodgers took some first-team snaps in practice but still had not been cleared to play in a game. (AP)
(Reuters) - The Green Bay Packers, still hanging on to longshot playoff hopes, were dealt a blow on Friday with word that quarterback Aaron Rodgers was not cleared to return to action for Sunday's game against the Cowboys in Dallas.Coach Mike McCarthy said Rodgers would miss his sixth game since breaking his collarbone and that the quarterback was disappointed and frustrated by the decision since he feels capable of playing."Frankly, it's been a difficult morning going through the conversation with Aaron and Dr. (Pat) McKenzie," said McCarthy, according to the Milwaukee Journal Sentinel. "He feels that he's ready to play. He's had a good week of preparation."Speaking with Dr. McKenzie (the team physician), this is the right decision," the coach added, saying the call was in the best interests of Rodgers.The Packers are 6-6-1, with NFC North co-leaders the Chicago Bears and Detroit Lions both at 7-6.Matt Flynn, who will start his third consecutive game, took all of the first team reps for Green Bay on Friday, while Rodgers stood and watched on the sidelines with his helmet off. Scott Tolzien took the backup reps.Detroit hosts Baltimore this week and then the New York Giants before finishing the regular season at Minnesota. Chicago is at Cleveland, at Philadelphia and then has Green Bay at home in the finale.The Packers host Pittsburgh after their trip to Dallas before ending the season in Chicago.
"He's been cleared to work out at full speed," Bears Coach Marc Trestman said Wednesday, referring to quarterback Jay Cutler, who had been sidelined for weeks with an ankle injury.Cutler's backup, Josh McCown, has become something of a folk hero in Chicago. McCown played so well that some questioned whether Cutler should get his job back. One notable McCown proponent is the former Bears linebacker Brian Urlacher."He should be the starting quarterback for the Bears, even if Jay Cutler is healthy," Urlacher, a former teammate of Cutler's, said Tuesday on "Fox Football Daily." "You can't take a guy who's this hot out of the football game. If I was on that team, I would have a hard time with them taking him out."Nevertheless, with the N.F.C. North up for grabs, Trestman is sticking with Cutler, who will start Sunday barring a last-minute setback."We're certainly very, very happy about the way Josh has performed," Trestman told reporters, "but this has been the plan, and we're going to execute it when Jay is ready to come back."Lately the Saints have been hearing that they do not play nearly as well on the road (3-3) as they do in the New Orleans Superdome (7-0). The talk only intensified after the Saints lost in Seattle by 34-7 in Week 13. (Drew Brees, it should be noted, takes issue with this.)A lot of that discussion has centered on their having particular trouble playing outdoors in colder temperatures. But the Saints have also struggled on the road against St. Louis, a lowly Midwestern team that plays its home games in a dome.In Week 8 of the 2011 season, the 5-2 Saints, who finished 13-3, visited the 0-6 Rams, who finished 2-14. In one of the more stunning upsets of that season, the Rams won, 31-21.Additionally, in Week 10 of 2009, the season the Saints won the Super Bowl, New Orleans, then undefeated, barely escaped St. Louis with a 28-23 victory against the 1-7 Rams, who finished 1-15.This season, the Rams are loaded with explosive young talent on offense and their defense has been tougher than a diner steak at times, making them more than capable of pulling off an upset. The Saints will win, but only by the skin of their teeth.In her 1967 essay "Goodbye to All That," about losing her love for living in New York, Joan Didion wrote: "Everything that was said to me I seemed to have heard before, and I could no longer listen. I could no longer sit in little bars near Grand Central and listen to someone complaining of his wife's inability to cope with the help while he missed another train to Connecticut. I no longer had any interest in hearing about the advances other people had received from their publishers, about plays which were having second-act trouble in Philadelphia, or about people I would like very much if only I would come out and meet them. I had already met them, always. There were certain parts of the city which I had to avoid."Didion, who turned 79 this month, wrote that without having to see Eli Manning play quarterback for the Giants this season."If you're really a mean person you're going to come back as a fly and eat poop."In light of Mike Tomlin's impeding a Jacoby Jones kickoff return, did karma have anything to do with Antonio Brown's stepping out of bounds when returning a kickoff that would have improbably won the game for Pittsburgh against Miami in Week 14. It effectively squashed the Steelers' playoff hopes.Cobain would probably think so.It speaks to the weakness of the A.F.C. that Jacksonville, which started 0-8 and appeared to be without hope, can actually make the playoffs if it wins the last three games. A seemingly countless number of dominoes need to fall their way, but it is possible.All of those Jaguars fans who took to the streets this season to petition the team to sign Tim Tebow should immediately drop to their knees and thank the football gods for Chad Henne. How could they have ever doubted him?For a team with only three playoff wins in the past 21 years, and one with no chance of making the postseason this time, Washington sure does get a lot of attention. Anyone who tuned in to recent television or radio sports shows knows about the drama surrounding the Redskins' three-headed turmoil monster: the owner, Dan Snyder; Coach Mike Shanahan; and quarterback Robert Griffin III. The Redskins might be the most talked-about 3-10 team in N.F.L. history. Imagine if they were good!If the national news media are going to obsess over 3-10 teams, Atlanta is a much more interesting subject. The Falcons were a home win away from going to the Super Bowl last season, and many considered them a favorite to win the N.F.C. this season. But hardly anyone outside of the Atlanta metropolitan area is debating whether Matt Ryan should be benched for the rest of the season, as Griffin has been, or whether Coach Mike Smith will hold on to his job after the season, as Shanahan will.One could chalk it up to "East Coast media bias," but Atlanta is in an East Coast state. So what gives?Well, Washington was the setting for the climactic scene in "Earth vs. the Flying Saucers," a 1956 science fiction film. This can be the only reasonable explanation.
CHICAGO — Inside an LA Fitness health club on the South Side of Chicago, dozens of young tennis players vied for space in the cramped five-court complex on a brisk fall afternoon.Some were from single-parent homes on the South Side and were the first in their social circle to pick up a tennis racket. Others were middle-class children from the suburbs whose parents did not mind making a two- or three-hour round trip to XS Tennis, a nonprofit junior tennis program run by Kamau Murray, a former collegiate player who grew up on the South Side.Donald Young and Taylor Townsend, the last two Americans to reach No. 1 in the world junior rankings, learned to play here. Twenty-one players from XS Tennis have received scholarships to play college tennis since the club was founded in 2008, and graduates of the program have won three of the last four Illinois high school girls' tennis championships.Still, lessons here start at only $12 an hour, and many of the students pay nothing. Murray's elite group plays tennis for only two hours per day, rather than the six that is customary in Florida's renowned tennis academies.Next fall, Murray plans to move his growing program from Hyde Park, one of the South Side's most prosperous neighborhoods, to one of Chicago's most dangerous. Murray intends to build a $6 million, 100,000-square-foot athletic complex on a long-vacant stretch of State Street that was once nicknamed the Hole — the most notorious section of the Robert Taylor Homes, which was at one time the largest public housing project in the United States.Murray, 33, said he believed that the next great American tennis champion could emerge from this unlikely place, adding that his mission was to expand his program so that the next Young or Townsend would not have to leave Chicago to achieve similar success."Kids are hungry and tough here — they can thrive right here on the South Side," said Murray, a lean, tall bundle of energy and salesmanship who played tennis at Florida A&M and who also works in sales for a pharmaceutical company. The United States Tennis Association, he said, "wants to extract kids from their comfort zone, their homes, and send them to Florida or California."The athletic center, which will be in the Washington Park neighborhood, will initially feature 27 tennis courts, along with a basketball court and a place for track and field and soccer. XS Tennis hired the former tennis pro Zina Garrison, who recently joined Townsend's team, to oversee the tennis program. The retired N.B.A. player and South Side native Quentin Richardson and the three-time Olympic gold medalist Jackie Joyner-Kersee will direct new basketball and track and field programs.According to a Chicago Tribune analysis of police statistics, Washington Park has one of the highest rates of violent crime of any neighborhood in the city. Joyner-Kersee, who grew up in East St. Louis, Ill., another struggling community, said the new complex would be a safe place for children to grow and thrive."We know when there are vacant spaces, bad things can happen," she said. "The community will finally see something positive happening in this space. We might not be able to alleviate all the crime and violence, but we can decrease it and give kids hope."Murray said his organization would provide nearly $2 million in scholarships for children who live in Chicago public housing. An existing mentoring and tutoring partnership with the University of Chicago will be expanded, and Murray hopes to host a women's professional tournament there.Murray said he hoped to break ground on the new complex in the spring and open it in the fall, but the plan still needs formal approval from the Chicago Housing Authority, which owns the site and will vote on the plan in the coming months. XS Tennis is seeking $2 million in tax increment financing, a special funding tool used by the city government to revitalize underdeveloped districts, to pay for the complex, along with $4 million to $5 million in private financing.Matthew Aguilar, a spokesman for the housing authority, said the proposal would "encourage job growth and reuse of vacant land for community building purposes." One sector of the land where the Taylor Homes stood has been developed into affordable housing, and the authority said that it had latitude to use XS Tennis's proposed site, which has been vacant for more than 10 years, for any initiative that would help "strengthen its housing mission and create vibrant communities."
Quarterback Aaron Rodgers feels ready to play, but the Green Bay Packers will keep him on the bench for their road game against the Dallas Cowboys on Sunday, Coach Mike McCarthy said."This is clearly a decision that's made in the best interest of Aaron Rodgers," McCarthy said after practice Friday. It came as a disappointment to Rodgers, who had practiced on a limited basis this week."He's had a good week of preparation," McCarthy said. "He's very disappointed. He's frustrated."Rodgers has been out since he broke his left collarbone in Green Bay's loss to Chicago on Nov. 4. Matt Flynn will make his third straight start in place of Rodgers as the Packers (6-6-1) try to stay in contention in the N.F.C. North. They are a half-game behind Detroit and Chicago, both 7-6.JETS PUT HILL ON INJURED LIST The Jets placed Stephen Hill on the injured reserve list because of knee problems, ending his season. Hill, a second-year receiver, had 24 catches for 342 yards.Coach Rex Ryan said Hill had been battling knee trouble the entire season. "He'd come back, he'd rehab, get back," Ryan said. "But it just seemed like almost any time that he would do a football-related activity, whether it was practice or more specifically games, his knees would swell."Ryan said surgery was possible. ZACH SCHONBRUNPIERRE-PAUL STILL OUT Giants defensive end Jason Pierre-Paul will miss his third straight game with a shoulder injury.Coach Tom Coughlin said cornerback Corey Webster (ankle) and safety Copper Taylor (hamstring) would also miss Sunday's home game against the Seattle Seahawks. (AP)BRONCOS' MILLER FINED FOR HIT Broncos linebacker Von Miller was fined $25,000 for a helmet-to-helmet hit on Titans quarterback Ryan Fitzpatrick on Sunday.Miller's hit drew a penalty that led to a touchdown for the Titans in Tennessee's 51-28 loss. (AP)STABBINGS AFTER DENVER GAME At least three people were stabbed during a fight in the parking lot at Sports Authority Field in Denver after the Broncos' loss to San Diego on Thursday.The police said the altercation stemmed from a near collision, not a team rivalry. A 29-year-old man was being held, they said. (AP)CHIEFS RETURNER IN DOUBT Kansas City's Dexter McCluster, who has returned two punts for touchdowns this season, was listed as questionable for Sunday's game against Oakland after a cut on his ankle became infected.McCluster sustained the cut last week against Washington. (AP)PETERSON PRACTICES The Vikings' Adrian Peterson returned to practice with a sprained foot, but his status for Sunday's game against the Eagles was questionable.Peterson was in a walking boot earlier in the week. (AP)AROUND THE LEAGUE Dallas linebacker Sean Lee will not play against Green Bay because of a neck injury. ... The Jaguars released the veteran defensive end Jeremy Mincey after he was late for a meeting. (AP)
(Reuters) - The Arizona Diamondbacks bolstered the back end of their bullpen on Monday by acquiring young right-handed reliever Addison Reed from the rebuilding Chicago White Sox in exchange for third-base prospect Matt Davidson.Reed, who turns 25 later this month, served as the closer for the White Sox the past two seasons, saving 29 games in 2012 and 40 last season for a Chicago team that finished last in the American League Central with a 63-99 record."Alright, its official! Im an arizona diamondback!" Reed said on Twitter.Reed went 5-4 last season with a 3.79 earned run average and joins an Arizona team that finished second in the National League West at 81-81, 11 games behind the Los Angeles Dodgers.Davidson, 22, was named Most Valuable Player of the All-Star Futures Game last July and hit .280 with 17 home runs, 75 runs batted in and a .350 on-base percentage at Triple-A Reno.He also played 31 games for Arizona, including 18 starts at third, hitting .237 with three homers and 12 RBI.It was the second trade involving the Sox and Arizona in the last week. Chicago sent starting pitcher Hector Santiago as part of a three-team deal to the Diamondbacks last Tuesday and got back outfielder Adam Eaton.Davidson, drafted by the D-backs in the first round (35th overall) of the 2009 draft, became expendable when the team acquired third baseman Martin Prado prior to last season.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — The great quarterback debate in Chicago is over. Now, the Bears can focus on a bigger issue, like making the playoffs.They got Jay Cutler back from an ankle injury and took a step toward the postseason with a 38-31 victory at Cleveland on Sunday.The Bears are one game ahead of Detroit in the NFC North after the Lions lost to the Ravens on Monday night.Chicago (8-6) has back-to-back wins just when it looked as if it was dropping out of contention. They Bears are in a better spot now as they get ready to visit Philadelphia this weekend.Cutler overcame a shaky start against the Browns while completing 22 of 31 passes for 265 yards after missing the previous four games with a high left ankle sprain. He also validated coach Marc Trestman's decision to go with him even though Josh McCown had played so well in his absence."It means a lot," left tackle Jermon Bushrod said. "If he can do that, if he can live up to his word with the way Josh was playing, then you know if he can do that and let the quarterback know he can do it ... He was just being true to his team, true to his word. And that just means a lot to our team."Trestman had said for weeks that the job was Cutler's when he was ready to return.Even so, there was plenty of debate leading up to the game.There were reports of division in the locker room, and Cutler even acknowledged after the game that he was feeling some extra pressure. He talked to Brandon Marshall and Matt Forte and the leaders on the offensive line in Roberto Garza and Bushrod to make sure they were on board with him playing.Trestman was adamant, and he saw no need to take the temperature of the locker room. In his mind, playing Cutler was the right decision — period. And he made that clear early on."I stayed resolute, I think, in that I felt it was in the best interest of the team from the beginning to make sure that everybody knew the direction that we were going to go," Trestman said.Cutler threw two first-half interceptions but came on strong down the stretch, finishing with three touchdown passes to help the Bears strengthen their playoff standing. They could get another boost this week if star linebacker Lance Briggs returns from his fractured shoulder. Trestman said the Bears will make a decision on Friday.He also said to forget about cornerback Charles Tillman returning in the playoffs. Tillman tore his triceps against Detroit on Nov. 10 and the Bears left open the possibility of a comeback in the playoffs after he was injured against Detroit on Nov. 10 by placing him on the injured reserve/designated to return list.Tillman was eligible to start practicing this week, but Trestman said the two-time Pro Bowl pick is out for the rest out for the rest of the season.As for Cutler, Trestman liked what he saw on Sunday."We all saw how he handled the adversity in the game," he said. "It didn't start out well for him. ... I'm sure the way his teammates rallied around him — not just the offensive side, the entire team rallied around him. It wasn't a good start, we all know that. The team continued to move forward and play hard."
EUGENE, Ore. — Jason Calliste scored a career-high 31 points and No. 13 Oregon stayed unbeaten, topping BYU 100-96 in overtime Saturday night.Joseph Young added 25 points for the Ducks (11-0). Calliste, a senior guard, made all 13 of his foul shots.Tyler Haws led the Cougars (8-5) with 32 points and Kyle Collinsworth added 15 points, five rebounds and eight assists.Both teams went into the game averaging nearly 90 points. Oregon had a chance to win in regulation, but Elgin Cook missed two foul shots with 1.8 seconds, sending it into overtime tied at 84. Cook finished 1 for 6 on free throws.Damyean Dotson scored on a drive in the final minute, putting the Ducks ahead for good at 96-94.BYU led by 10 points in the second half and was still ahead 83-77 before Young's 3-pointer with 1:58 left.Johnathan Loyd made two free throws with 1:12 left to cut the margin to 84-82. Mike Moser blocked a shot by BYU's Matt Carlino on the next possession, and Moser made a jumper for the Ducks with less than a minute left.In overtime, with the score tied at 94, Moser drew a charge by Frank Bartley IV with 46.5 seconds left. Dotson scored on the next Ducks possession. Dotson finished with 15 points.Oregon is 11-0 for the fourth time in school history. The previous time was in 2006-07, when the Ducks made it to the final eight.
(Reuters) - Green Bay Packers quarterback Aaron Rodgers says he will know by Thursday whether he will be cleared medically to play in Sunday's pivotal regular-season finale against the Chicago Bears.The 30-year-old, a three-time Pro Bowl selection, has missed the last seven games after breaking his left collarbone against the Bears in early November.Rodgers on Tuesday apologized to his team's fans for keeping them in suspense in recent weeks over whether he had sufficiently recovered to make a competitive comeback."We are going through the process of evaluation," Rodgers said on Milwaukee's WAUK-AM 540. "But I can say definitively there will be (on) Thursday, one way or another, there will be a definitive conclusion to this week's unknown.""I'm feeling better and not thinking about my injury at all. Ultimately it comes down to ... is the bone healed or is there a large risk in going back out there that's too great, that the organization would not want to put me out there?"Obviously, I want to be out there. I know what's at stake. This is an important week for us. We're somehow back in this position to be able to get into the playoffs. What a better way to do that than against the Chicago Bears?"The return of Rodgers, the Super Bowl's most valuable player in 2011, would give the Packers (7-7-1) a massive boost as they bid to clinch their third consecutive NFC North title.Sunday's game in Chicago is a winner-take-all affair that will not only decide the division but also hand the victorious team a berth in the playoffs.
GREEN BAY, Wis. — When the Green Bay Packers take the field for practice on Thursday, they will know whether quarterback Aaron Rodgers is going to start Sunday's NFC North showdown at the Chicago Bears.There was no word Tuesday on the most scrutinized collarbone in Wisconsin. The team is hoping to make a call early this week."We've done a scan and we're going through the process of evaluation," Rodgers said on his weekly ESPN radio show. "Probably not what everybody wants to hear, but I can say definitively (on) Thursday - one way or another - it will be a definitive conclusion to this week's unknown. We wanted to give everybody a rest for Christmas, be able to enjoy their Christmas."Rodgers broke his left collarbone Nov. 4 against the Bears and has missed the last seven games. He started practicing on a limited basis four weeks ago and has been pain-free for about two weeks. He had hoped to get medical clearance for each of the past two games.The Packers are 2-5-1 since Rodgers' injury, which occurred on the opening series of their 27-20 loss to the Bears. If Rodgers is unable to go, Matt Flynn would start his fifth straight game.The winner of Sunday's game at Soldier Field gets the division title.Since relieving Scott Tolzien and rallying Green Bay to a 26-26 tie against Minnesota on Nov. 24, Flynn has led the Packers to four fourth-quarter comebacks, including last Sunday's loss to Pittsburgh. The Packers are 2-2 with Flynn as the starter, although the players are clearly hopeful of Rodgers' return."Gut feeling? That Christmas is tomorrow," veteran wide receiver James Jones said. "I don't know. I think we will get some good news."Rodgers wouldn't reveal the results of his scan but certainly seemed upbeat during the 45-minute show."I'm feeling better and not thinking about my injury at all," Rodgers said. "I think ultimately it comes down to, it's big on the medical side. Is the bone healed or is there a large risk of going back out there that's too great, that the organization would not want to put me out there?"Obviously I want to be out there. I know what's at stake. This is an important week for us. We're somehow back in this position to be able to get into the playoffs. What a better way to do that than against the Chicago Bears?"Coach Mike McCarthy said Monday that the team wanted to make a decision on Rodgers' status early in the week and let his teammates know the plan. Until now, the Packers have not announced their decision on Rodgers' status each week until Friday, when he has been ruled out."I think No. 1 for the football team and also Aaron Rodgers, I think it's important for us to make a quicker decision," McCarthy said. "This has obviously been frustrating and stressful for Aaron, rightfully so, but also our football (team). I want them to know who the quarterback's going to be."Rodgers has thrown for 2,218 yards and 15 touchdowns in eight games. The 2011 NFL MVP has completed 66.9 percent of his passes with only four interceptions."I thought as of last week there'd be a lot more healing that would have gone on," Rodgers said. "Learned a lot about the clavicle and the kind of blood flow or lack of that it gets as being a reason it didn't look as good as we all wanted it last week."
With Tony Romo at risk of missing the Cowboys ' season finale against the Eagles , Dallas is close to bringing Jon Kitna out of retirement to serve as the team's emergency quarterback.The team reported on its website Tuesday that Kitna would join the team in time for practice on Christmas Day. The move is pending a physical for Kitna, 41, who retired after the 2011 season. Kitna, who has been teaching and coaching in Tacoma, Wash., made nine starts for an injured Romo in 2010.Romo injured his back in a 24-23 win over Washington that set up the Cowboys (8-7) for their third straight playoffs-or-bust finale against an N.F.C. East rival. The Cowboys say Romo is being evaluated daily, but the backup Kyle Orton is being readied to take his place if needed.Whether it is Romo or Orton under center for the Cowboys, the Eagles say they are approaching the game in the same way."We've got a great challenge, no matter who the quarterback is," the Eagles defensive coordinator Billy Davis said. "I don't think the offense changes too much with one or the other. I think we're prepared for both of them, and we're prepared to give the Dallas Cowboys the absolute best, no matter who is the quarterback."PRODUCTIVE GARCON In a season where so little has gone right for the Washington Redskins, receiver Pierre Garcon is having a record-setting year.If Garcon maintains his seven catches per game pace, he'll finish the season with 114, a total exceeded by only 12 receivers in N.F.L. history."I'm just enjoying the moment, trying to get wins," Garcon said. "No matter whether it's preseason, regular season or playoffs, I'm always out there trying to make a play."PRYOR BACKPEDALS Terrelle Pryor backed away from comments his agent made accusing the Oakland Raiders of putting him in a position to fail by inserting him back into the starting lineup for Sunday's season finale against Denver.The agent Jerome Stanley said he believed Coach Dennis Allen had hoped Pryor would struggle to justify the decision to play Matt McGloin. Pryor apologized on Twitter and in a conversation with Allen.RODGERS DRAMA When the Green Bay Packers take the field for practice Thursday, they should know whether quarterback Aaron Rodgers is going to start Sunday's N.F.C. North showdown with the Bears in Chicago. Rodgers said on his weekly ESPN radio show in Milwaukee that his left collarbone, fractured on Nov. 4, was being evaluated.FACE TIME FOR WATT Houston Texans defensive end J. J. Watt's penchant for violent collisions left a deep gash on the bridge of his nose that required six stitches in Week 4. Each time he has played since, the wound has reopened. Watt, the 2012 defensive player of the year, said he would look into having plastic surgery to repair the injury.
(Reuters) - Standout quarterback Aaron Rodgers will return from injury to start for Green Bay in Sunday's crucial National Football League game against the Chicago Bears, the Packers said on Thursday."He's just relieved to play. He just wants to focus on football," Packers coach Mike McCarthy told reporters on Thursday.The winner of Sunday's game at Chicago will win the NFC North title and qualify for the playoffs."I know they're excited about my return," Rodgers said of his team-mates. "(But) my coming back doesn't alleviate any of the pressure on the guys."Rodgers has missed the past seven games with a broken left collarbone. He has been chomping at the bit to return to action the past few weeks, and the Packers' medical staff has finally given him the green light."Every football player that plays Sunday will have risk," McCarthy said. "We all understand that. We've done our due diligence, gone through all the evaluations and we feel Aaron is ready to play."Aaron has accepted the level of risk."McCarthy said it has been a stressful period for the 2011 Super Bowl most valuable player but now Rodgers was ready to play."He's throwing the ball very well going on three weeks, getting ready for this moment, and the moment's here," the coach said.The Packers (7-7-1) have struggled without Rodgers - going 2-4-1 in his absence - but remain in playoff contention in the weak NFC North, which the Bears lead with an 8-7 record.
(Reuters) - One of the wildest and most unpredictable regular seasons ever in the National Football League will conclude in gripping 'what next?' fashion on Sunday with 10 teams still in the hunt for the last four playoff spots.Thirteen of the 16 games have postseason implications, and all of them are division contests to add further intrigue to what promises to be a pulsating Week 17.In the American Football Conference, the Denver Broncos, New England Patriots, Cincinnati Bengals, Indianapolis Colts and Kansas City Chiefs have all secured playoff berths, leaving four teams to battle it out for the final wildcard spot.However each of those four - the Miami Dolphins (8-7), Baltimore Ravens (8-7), San Diego Chargers (8-7) and Pittsburgh Steelers (7-8) - need to win on Sunday and also have other results go their way if they are to advance.The National Football Conference is wide open with all four division crowns still up for grabs and only the Seattle Seahawks (12-3), Carolina Panthers (11-4) and San Francisco 49ers (11-4) having claimed spots in the postseason.Six teams - the Philadelphia Eagles (9-6), Chicago Bears (8-7), New Orleans Saints (10-5), Arizona Cardinals (10-5), Dallas Cowboys (8-7) and Green Bay Packers (7-7-1) - will be vying on Sunday for the three playoff berths available.The Eagles are away to the Cowboys while the Bears are at home to the Packers and in each of those 'do-or-die' games the winner would automatically clinch the divisional title with the loser shutting down for the season."This is why you play the game," said Eagles quarterback Nick Foles, who leads the league with a 118.8 passer rating that includes 25 touchdowns and just two interceptions. "You play for meaningful games at the end of the season."In the NFL, it's for the playoffs. In high school, it's to get to the state championship. In college, you want to go to a big bowl game. This is what you play for all season, and it's a special time."The Packers-Bears game at Soldier Field in Chicago will mark the return of Green Bay quarterback Aaron Rodgers, who has missed his team's past seven games while recovering from a broken collarbone."We're preparing for the Chicago Bears with Aaron Rodgers as our starting quarterback," Packers coach Mike McCarthy told a news conference on Thursday. "I would say he's ready to play."Rodgers, the Super Bowl's most valuable player in 2011 who fractured his left collarbone against the Bears in early November, has been eager to be back in the lineup."This is an important week for us," he said recently. "We're somehow back in this position to be able to get into the playoffs. What a better way to do that than against the Chicago Bears?"The New Orleans Saints, who host the Tampa Bay Buccaneers, will aim to rebound from a disappointing 17-13 loss to the Carolina Panthers on Sunday when victory would have earned them the NFC East title and a first round bye."It's all out there in front of us," Saints quarterback Drew Brees said, referring to multiple scenarios this Sunday that could earn his team a place in the postseason."Obviously, we need some help in order to win the division and be the two seed, but the fact of the matter is all we can worry about is what is ahead of us."Peyton Manning and the Broncos (12-3), who sealed a third consecutive AFC West division title with a 37-13 win over the Houston Texans last week, would clinch home-field advantage throughout the playoffs by beating the Raiders in Oakland.Should Denver slip up on Sunday, however, that advantage would fall to the Patriots (11-4), as long as they can claim a home victory over the Bills (6-9) - a team they edged 23-21 in Buffalo on September 8 to launch the 2013 season."It's going to be a huge game for us, so I think we'll need our best effort," said Tom Brady, who has set a quarterback record by winning 11 division titles with New England."We're playing one of the best defenses in the league, a team that's sacked the quarterback more than anybody in the whole league. It's the holiday season, but at the same time, it's the most important game of the year."We've really got to focus on what we need to do, which is play our best game and be on top of things right from the kickoff all the way through the fourth quarter."Brady's words can certainly apply to several other teams on Sunday as they bid to stay "on top of things" with pivotal postseason implications on the line.
(Reuters) - Dallas Cowboys quarterback Tony Romo has had season-ending back surgery on an injury suffered in last Sunday's game against the Washington Redskins, head coach Jason Garrett said on Friday.Back-up quarterback Kyle Orton, who has played only two games this season, will start this Sunday's crucial clash with the Philadelphia Eagles in which the winner will qualify for the NFL playoffs and the loser's season will be over."He's devastated," Garrett said of Romo. "He put a lot into this."The Cowboys had earlier hoped the standout quarterback would be able to play on Sunday."We spent the week exhausting all options - treatment, rehab, all the different things - consulted a lot of people and we felt this was the best decision for him and our organization and we felt it was better to have this done sooner rather than later," Garrett told reporters."We felt like the surgery went well and Tony should be able to come home hopefully later today and start his rehabilitation for the 2013-14 season."Cowboys owner and general manager Jerry Jones said he expected Romo back for pre-season team activities and the surgery would not force him to use an early-round pick on a quarterback in May's NFL draft."With my expectation of Tony's career, which I think will be for several years to come, it's too early to be drafting a highly ranked or, if you will, costly quarterback," Jones told Texas radio station KRLD-FM.The surgery was Romo's second in eight months. He underwent a procedure in April to remove a cyst."They were unrelated," Garrett said. "Obviously he (Romo) played very well coming off the first procedure he had in the spring, so we're completely confident he's going to rehab and come back 100 percent."Romo, 33, has played 136 games for the Cowboys since 2004, completing 64.6 percent of his passes and helping his team to the playoffs in 2006, '07 and '09.Apart from his back problems, other injuries have included a broken collarbone, broken ribs and a punctured lung.Although Orton has hardly played this year, completing three of five passes, he is no NFL novice, having started in 69 regular season games with Chicago and Denver, going 35-34.Dallas has signed 41-year-old Jon Kitna to be Orton's back-up against the Eagles.Kitna, who spent 15 years in the NFL and last played in 2011, has said he will donate his $53,000 salary from the game to the Washington state high school where he teaches.
LAKE FOREST, Ill. — At Halas Hall, the Chicago Bears ' practice complex, the news trickled in on Thursday afternoon — tweet by tweet, unconfirmed report after unconfirmed report — until it was finally official: The Green Bay Packers had named Aaron Rodgers their starting quarterback for their visit to Soldier Field on Sunday.Rodgers will return to the lineup after missing seven games with a fractured collarbone he sustained against the Bears in Week 9. And his presence will add a dose of intrigue to what was already a winner-take-all showdown for the N.F.C. North title in the 188th meeting between the teams, the N.F.L.'s oldest rivals.The news did not so much reverberate around the campus here as slowly sink in. When Bears quarterback Jay Cutler was asked his reaction, he deferred. "I play offense," he said.Despite his nonchalance and the fact that he and Rodgers will never share the field, there may be no one more affected by Rodgers's status. Cutler, in the final year of his contract with the Bears, could be playing his final game for Chicago. After five inconsistent seasons, he is still in search of a legacy — and, perhaps, a few million dollars.Cutler, 30, arrived in Chicago via a trade with Denver and was anointed the franchise quarterback, charged with buttressing a perennially elite defense. He has guided the Bears to a 39-27 record but just one trip to the playoffs, in the 2010 season, when he notched the only postseason win of his career, a division-round victory against the Seattle Seahawks.Faced with a string of offensive coordinators and patchwork offensive lines, Cutler has been closer to a pouty-faced enigma than an All-Pro. During his time in Chicago, his leadership credentials and his body language have remained frequent topics on sports talk radio. And a perceived arrogance has been as much a part of his reputation as his laser of a throwing arm. When the backup Josh McCown, with Cutler injured, led the Bears to a 3-2 record in five starts this season, some fans called for him to start even after Cutler returned.With Rodgers playing Sunday, it will be difficult not to contrast his success with what Cutler has yet to accomplish. Rodgers is a Super Bowl winner. He gracefully replaced the Packers legend Brett Favre. He has the highest career passer rating in N.F.L. history.Bears players were reluctant to paint Sunday's matchup as simply Cutler versus Rodgers. Bears Coach Marc Trestman played down the notion that the game would offer a verdict on Cutler's past and future. Players emphasized team themes."It's going to take all of us to win this game," Cutler said. "It's not a personal game for anyone in the locker room."McCown added, "No quarterback has ever intercepted another quarterback."Packers Coach Mike McCarthy was less shy about the comparison in a conference call. "In my humble opinion, I've always liked my guy," McCarthy said of Rodgers. "I think he's the best player in the league."The Bears may be wise to play down the matchup. Cutler has struggled mightily against the Packers, with a record of 1-8 and a woeful quarterback rating of 59.9. And fair or not, the most visible moment of his Chicago career came in 2011, in the N.F.C. championship game against Green Bay, which he left with what was later announced as a torn knee ligament.As Cutler stood and watched from the sideline, a bemused expression on his face, he became the object of ridicule around the league. His toughness was questioned and his character mocked.Asked Thursday if he could explain his previous struggles against Green Bay, Cutler replied curtly, "We weren't as good an offense."Indeed, this Bears team, while flawed at 8-7 (the Packers are 7-7-1), is an offensive juggernaut, averaging 27.8 points per game, third most in the league. But last week, with a chance to wrap up the division with a win at Philadelphia, Chicago lost, 54-11.If Cutler has another performance that resembles last week's debacle at all, it is hard to imagine the organization convincing Bears fans that he is worth the $15 million to $20 million annually he is said to be seeking. Cutler, true to form, was terse when asked to comment on his future."I haven't thought about it," he said. "Not going to think about it. I've got too much on my plate worrying about Green Bay."Still, come Sunday evening, Cutler's Chicago tenure will look notably different regardless of the game's outcome. Either he will have vanquished the Packers — and Rodgers — on the last day of the season, or he will have come up short. Whether he wins or loses, there will be consequences.
GREEN BAY, Wis. — The buffet line is open again for the Packers' offense with Aaron Rodgers back.Coach Mike McCarthy has made a few adjustments to the playbook with the franchise quarterback back for the first time in nearly two months after breaking his left collarbone. Rodgers is expected to start Sunday in Green Bay's showdown in Chicago with the Bears for the NFC North title.Keeping Rodgers untouched and upright is as paramount as ever. At the same time, the return of Rodgers figures to give the Bears' defense a dilemma that hasn't existed for Packers opponents in nearly two months — focus on the passing game at the expense of giving 1,100-yard rusher Eddie Lacy more room to run, or stop the run and give Rodgers more room to operate."Well, it's a lot like going to the restaurant. You have a menu. You decide what you want to use and what you probably shouldn't use," McCarthy said Friday about play-calling. Tweaks could also be made the next few days."You have to trust your plan, trust the process and we definitely trust Aaron Rodgers," McCarthy said.It's hard not to after Rodgers helped lead Green Bay (7-7-1) to a 5-2 record before getting hurt Nov. 4 during the 27-20 loss to Chicago at Lambeau Field. The 2011 NFL MVP was a big reason why the team weathered the spate of early injuries.The Packers were 2-5-1 without Rodgers, counting the loss to the Bears. McCarthy said Rodgers has looked good in his first couple days as a full practice participant this week since before the injury."The decision's been made. Obviously, it was a thorough one, and it's time for Aaron to play," McCarthy said. "We're going to cut him loose and we're going to go play. We're going to play to win."Things could get even trickier for Chicago if the Packers activate playmaking receiver Randall Cobb from the injured reserve/designated for return list. Cobb has been moving well during the brief spurts of practice open to media.Sidelined since October, Cobb was given extra work Friday to determine how he would feel Saturday, when the Packers could decide to activate him.Green Bay knows it will already be without pass-rushing linebacker Clay Matthews, who had surgery this week after re-aggravating a right thumb injury. There's no timeline for his return, and it appears highly unlikely that Matthews would be available for a first-round playoff game the weekend of Jan. 4 should the Packers beat Chicago on Sunday to win the NFC North.Defensive coordinator Dom Capers should otherwise have a full complement of linebackers with inside man Brad Jones (ankle) and outside rushers Nick Perry (foot) and Mike Neal (abdomen) all listed as probable for the Bears game.Chicago gave them trouble the last time around, when the Packers also didn't have Matthews. Matt Forte ran for 125 yards and a score, while physical receivers Brandon Marshall and Alshon Jeffery each had touchdown catches.Marshall (6-foot-4) and Jeffery (6-3) have distinct height advantages over cornerbacks Sam Shields and Tramon Williams, each listed at 5-11."I have 100 percent confidence in our ability to cover them. It just becomes harder if they're allowed to push and pull and grab, and we're not allowed to stand our ground to stay with them," cornerbacks coach Joe Whitt said.Aiding the Packers the last few weeks is an increase in takeaways that were too few and far between earlier in the year. Working against them is the absence again of Matthews, who has been OK this year when healthy but still had a team-high 7½ sacks.One star down, another star back. Rodgers doesn't play defense, but he can provide an emotional boost to players on that side of the ball."It'll be nice to see him back out there," Capers said. "But I think our guys know, hey, we've got to go do our part, you know?"Notes: Lacy was listed as probable after being limited in practice again this week with an ankle injury. ... Backup TEs Ryan Taylor and Jake Stoneburner are probable after each missed a day of practice this week due to illness. "It's that time of year and we've had a couple guys go home," McCarthy said. ... The team signed undrafted rookie cornerback Jumal Rolle off the practice squad Friday.
(Reuters) - Green Bay quarterback Aaron Rodgers heaved a 48-yard touchdown bomb to Randall Cobb with 38 seconds left to lift the Green Bay Packers to a thrilling 33-28 win over the Chicago Bears that gave them the NFC North title on Sunday.Rodgers was playing in his first game after missing seven contests with a broken collarbone and Cobb was returning after being out 10 games with a broken leg, but the pair connected on a fourth-and-eight from the 48-yard line in the showdown game.The victory improved the Packers to 8-7-1 and dropped Chicago to 8-8.Green Bay will host a playoff game during next weekend's wildcard round of playoffs.
CHICAGO — Aaron Rodgers is back leading the Green Bay Packers and that could be bad news for every other playoff team.He returned from a broken collarbone and is taking aim at a postseason run, even if it took one big pass to get there.Rodgers fired a 48-yard touchdown to Randall Cobb in the final minute, and the Packers beat the Chicago Bears 33-28 to capture the NFC North championship on Sunday."This is a special group of guys who've been through a lot," Rodgers said. "It's been a rollercoaster."Back after missing seven games with a broken left collarbone, Rodgers found a wide-open Cobb on fourth-and-8 to wipe out a one-point deficit with 38 seconds left.Green Bay will host San Francisco next weekend in the wild-card round.The Bears had one final drive, but Jay Cutler's deep pass to Alshon Jeffery was intercepted by Sam Shields on the final play.That gave the Packers (8-7-1) their third straight division title and fifth postseason appearance in a row. It also kept the Bears (8-8) out of the playoffs for the sixth time in seven years.Things weren't looking great for the Packers after Chicago's Brandon Marshall spun away from Tramon Williams in the end zone on the first play of the fourth quarter to make it 28-20. But Green Bay answered with a touchdown drive.Eddie Lacy ran in from the 6 after a 22-yard pass from Rodgers to Andrew Quarless went through safety Chris Conte's hands, making it a one-point game.Then, on the winning drive, Green Bay converted twice on fourth-and-1 before Rodgers eluded pressure and unleashed that winning pass to Cobb.A block by John Kuhn on Julius Peppers helped Rodgers roll to the edge and find Cobb by himself down the field."We had a blitz on," Bears coach Marc Trestman said. "We lost an edge. Aaron was able to get outside. Once he got outside things happen. When you've got a zero blitz on things can happen. And we just lost coverage with our eyes in the backfield."For Rodgers, it was a strong finish after a shaky start, and it gave him some payback against the team that nearly ended his season.He was intercepted on the Packers' first two possessions but threw for 318 yards and two touchdowns in his first appearance since he was injured in a loss to Chicago on Nov. 4.Cobb, in his first appearance since Oct. 13, caught just two passes but both were for touchdowns."To be in that moment at the end of the game and have that opportunity, it's a blessing," Cobb said.Jordy Nelson had 161 yards receiving. James Starks ran for 88 yards. Eddie Lacy aggravated his ankle injury in the third quarter and finished with just 66.For the Bears, their first season under Marc Trestman ended the same way five of the previous six did under Lovie Smith — on the outside looking in at the playoffs.This loss is sure to spark memories of Green Bay's victory in the 2010 NFC title game at Soldier Field on the way to the Super Bowl championship — and fuel more questions about Cutler's ability to win big games even though he played well.With a playoff spot on the line and his contract set to expire, Cutler threw for 226 yards with two touchdowns and an interception. He is now 1-9 against Green Bay, including that conference final and a loss with Denver in 2007.Marshall guaranteed Cutler will be back next season, and Cutler said he'd like to return."You'd love to," Cutler said. "You can't predict the future, though. I'm not really going to get into what's going to happen. It always works out how it's supposed to."Matt Forte ran for 110 yards and two scores. He also had 47 yards receiving with a touchdown catch.Alshon Jeffery had 80 yards receiving, and Brandon Marshall had 74.Two unusual plays late in the first half turned a 7-3 deficit into a 13-7 advantage for the Packers.Green Bay had a first down at the Chicago 17 when a sack and strip against Rodgers by Julius Peppers turned into a wild touchdown. Jarrett Boykin ran across the field, picked up the loose ball as play stopped. One thing, though: The whistle never blew.With Rodgers standing nearby, Boykin turned and headed 15 yards to the end zone, and after a replay review, it stood.That stunned the crowd and gave the Packers a 10-7 lead.Green Bay caught another big break on the Bears' next possession when Jeffery fumbled a pass at the Chicago 41. Morgan Burnett picked up the ball and lateraled to Shields, who returned it to the Chicago 28. That led to a 27-yard field goal by Mason Crosby to make it a six-point game at the half.As for Boykin's fumble recovery, Rodgers said it was one of the strangest plays he could recall."Boykin finally picked it up, I looked back at (referee) Clete (Blakeman), he was looking at us so I think myself and everybody on the sideline was telling him to start running," Rodgers said. "It was one of the crazier plays I've been part of."Notes: Bears RT had his left foot in a walking boot and was on crutches after being injured on the game's first offensive series. ... Green Bay's Josh Boyd suffered a hip injury in the second half.
It was late on a mid-October night when Eli Manning 's voice cracked, a trembling quiver that said what everyone around him already knew: The 2013 Giants season, after six weeks, was irretrievably broken and ruined.At a lectern near the locker room in Chicago, Manning was speaking minutes after yet another late rally had failed, after a potentially game-winning fingertip catch had instead turned into a familiar and crushing interception. His usual singsong, untroubled manner of speech was halting and uneven."It's not fun playing this game and losing and not feeling like you're helping your team," Manning said. "It's just not working out."It was an emblematic moment for the Giants, and not just because the usually unflappable Manning was nearly brought to tears. A deeply flawed, ill-conceived team was laid bare, free from excuses. With the team 0-6, what was apparent was that this was just not working out.But how did that happen? And so swiftly?The blame can go in almost every direction — underperforming players, injuries, bloated salaries, poor personnel decisions.As General Manager Jerry Reese said during his only public comments this season: "Everybody has a lot of opinions about what went wrong. As far as I'm concerned, everybody is right."How bad are the Giants? They are 6-3 in their last nine games, but still there is little sense that the unit taking the field Sunday in the season finale has built anything sustainable.Is that because the Giants are 9-14 in their last 23 games? Is it because they are 2-7 against teams with winning records in that stretch? Is it because a top team like the Seattle Seahawks made the Giants look uncompetitive three weeks ago, so inferior that Coach Tom Coughlin called the offense pathetic?That is low for a team that won a Super Bowl less than two years ago.The explanation of what went wrong with the 2013 Giants is not complicated, though the fix may be. In essence, the responsibility for the Giants' first losing season since 2004 can be traced to one overarching miscalculation.The Giants took expensive and risky gambles on several players who were injury prone or aging, or both. When those gambles failed, the team's absence of depth, the result of years of poor draft choices, was exposed.It was an incurable combination. As the astounding series of injuries mounted — the Giants have used 46 starting players, almost a league record — the second string was generally not laced with enough talent because important players selected in recent drafts were not of N.F.L. quality.Nearly half the Giants' draft picks since the 2007 Super Bowl season have been busts, unwanted and drummed out of the league.So when the anchors of the offensive line from two seasons ago, guard Chris Snee and center David Baas, were lost to injury, the Giants were grasping at straws. The remaining reserves were inexperienced, and only the rookie Justin Pugh was a high draft pick. It did not help that the highest-paid lineman, left tackle Will Beatty, was struggling.The result was chaos in a Giants backfield crowded with backpedaling offensive linemen and hard-charging defenders.In times like these, the Giants have traditionally sought refuge in a stout rushing game powered by seasoned running backs. But in another gamble of sorts, the Giants entrusted that pivotal area to the smallish second-year player David Wilson and his oft-injured backup Andre Brown.Wilson fumbled twice in the first game, never found his stride and by midseason was sidelined with a neck injury that may end his career. Brown broke his leg in the final preseason game, the same leg he broke last season.Without a running game and with a porous offensive line, it was no surprise that Manning's production declined. It was astounding, however, how far Manning fell. He has had productive moments, but he also has had five games with three or more interceptions (and seven games with three or more sacks).As the season wore on, the fault for Manning's woes also drifted to Hakeem Nicks, once the Giants' foremost receiver. Whether Nicks is injured or distracted by his looming free agency, he has not played or practiced like a top player, and his lack of dynamism has only made Manning appear more aimless.
CHICAGO — One bizarre play sealed two teams' fates, one of them maybe for seasons to come.It tore a hole in the NFL's space-time continuum.And if the league is lucky, it might be the prelude to a postseason so wacky, you'll have to watch most of it wearing a seat belt.The Green Bay Packers strolled off Soldier Field on Sunday whooping and hollering and bumping fists after sneaking past the Chicago Bears, 33-28. The win gave them an improbable third straight NFC North division title, plus home-field advantage against San Francisco when the playoffs open next weekend.The play that decided the outcome was plenty entertaining, though in this game, it rated a distant second. It came on fourth-and-eight at Chicago's 48-yard line, with 46 seconds left, right after fullback John Kuhn figured out on the fly that the Packers couldn't protect quarterback Aaron Rodgers. So he cut in front of his quarterback as Bears end Julius Pepper was closing in.Kuhn hit Peppers hard enough to make just enough room for Rodgers, who hadn't played since November because of a broken collarbone, to slide to his left. Rodgers quickly set his feet and determined to take advantage of his narrow escape, threw a 48-yard touchdown to wide-open Randall Cobb, who hadn't played since October because of a leg injury."To happen with those two guys, in that manner, whew," Green Bay defender Mike Neal said, letting out a low whistle."All the ups and downs the last two months, losing guys to injuries, the one-point wins — all the crazy stuff that happened to us and now this. It's, it's ..." concurred teammate B.J. Raji, searching for the right words. "It's just like real life."But life in the NFC North? Where the Packers, Bears and Lions spent most of the season refusing to capitalize on each other's mistakes?In real life, opportunity rarely sits out in the open practically screaming "pick me up!" the way the football did on the turf Sunday with some three-and-half minutes left in the second quarter. For the record, Green Bay faced a first-and-10 at the Bears' 17, when the play began at exactly 3:34.But at least three seconds elapsed before Peppers roared around right end and knocked the ball from Rodgers, just as he was preparing to launch it. With nearly everyone assuming it was an incomplete pass — despite no whistle — the ball lay on the ground for a few seconds more.Bears linebacker James Anderson, an eight-year veteran, walked right past it. The first time Packers receiver Jarrett Boykin tried to pick it up, he knocked it a few feet forward. Once he got his hands around the ball, Boykin casually stuck it on his hip and started walking back toward the Green Bay huddle.That's when Rodgers rushed over, looked back at referee Clete Blakeman and realized the play was still live. He yelled at Boykin to turn around and head for the end zone and his receiver did exactly as instructed."I looked back at Clete and he was just looking at us," Rodgers recalled.Untouched, Boykin ran the last 15 yards to put the Packers ahead 10-7. Though at least a dozen seconds or more elapsed from the play's start to finish, the score was recorded at 3:28.Blakeman, the referee, acknowledged afterward that the game clock was turned off "at some point" and officials in the booth upstairs suggested "we should make an adjustment to the game clock."But under that situation," he continued, "we can't, because we don't know if it's 3 seconds, 5 seconds or 10 seconds ..."Ultimately," Blakeman concluded in remarks to a pool reporter, "it doesn't really make much difference for us because we'd have to estimate it."Truth be told, it wasn't until the Bears opened the second half by driving for three straight touchdowns that players on both teams realized how important that play turned out to be."I guess the one time that you don't," Anderson said about being "programmed" to play until the whistle, "it hurts you."Exactly how much remains to be seen.The Bears had the division seemingly wrapped up just one week ago, then got rolled 54-11 at Philadelphia. This loss dropped quarterback Jay Cutler, whose contract is up, to 1-8 against the Packers, with only one trip to the postseason over that same five-season span. The debate on his future in Chicago, already percolating, will be boiling over for weeks.Rodgers, meanwhile, is headed back to the playoffs for the fifth time, having already won a Super Bowl for the Packers just three years ago. This time, it's in large part because of a great athletic play at the end; but also because Rodgers had the presence of mind to recognize a gift — and cash it in — when he saw one."Most guys had no clue what was going on, but Aaron's a pretty smart guy. That's only one reason why he gets the big bucks," Packers receiver Ryan Taylor said, "and this was one time he was worth every cent."Jim Litke is a national sports columnist for The Associated Press. Write to him at jlitke@ap.org and follow him at Twitter.com/JimLitke.
CHICAGO — They will be talking about this one for a long time in Wisconsin: on bar stools in Milwaukee, in cheese factories in Fond du Lac and forever in reverence at Lambeau Field. The legend of Aaron Rodgers, already larger than life, grew Sunday when he returned from a broken collarbone after an absence of nearly two months and led the Green Bay Packers to a stirring come-from-behind victory, 33-28, over the rival Bears at Soldier Field.The Packers (8-7-1) beat out the Bears (8-8) for the N.F.C. North title and a playoff berth. Chicago was eliminated.Green Bay trailed Chicago by 28-27 with 6 minutes 24 seconds left in the fourth quarter when Rodgers jogged onto the field to begin a drive at his 13-yard line. Fourteen plays later, the Packers faced fourth-and-8 at the Bears' 48. Rodgers dropped back, sidestepped a charging Julius Peppers and lofted a rainbow of a pass that hung in the air for several moments before nestling into the arms of a wide-open Randall Cobb. Cobb, returning from a broken fibula, caught the ball and outran the beaten secondary into the end zone, silencing the stunned crowd."The man's got wings," Packers defensive lineman Mike Neal said of Rodgers.It was a deliberate and painstaking drive that repeatedly took the Packers' season to the brink. On a fourth-and-1 at their 22, John Kuhn plowed ahead for a first down. Rodgers later hit Jordy Nelson to convert another fourth-and-short from just beyond midfield. On third-and-3, Rodgers — healing collarbone and all — scrambled for a first down, juking a defender along the way.Rodgers finished 25 of 39 for 318 yards with two touchdowns, both to Cobb, and two interceptions."I felt good," Rodgers said of both his body and his mechanics. He added: "It was a lot of joy and excitement. This has been a wild season. I feel very blessed to have this job."For more than two decades, when the Packers have visited Soldier Field, they have usually taken with them an All-Pro quarterback to carve up the Bears' secondary and wreak havoc on the job security of defensive coordinators. For much of that time, it was Brett Favre. More recently, it has been Rodgers, who beat the Bears here in January 2011 in the N.F.C. title game.When Rodgers was cleared to play Sunday in this de facto playoff game after missing seven-plus games, there was a sense of inevitability that he would mete out the kind of spirit-crushing punishment Bears fans had grown accustomed to.Elements of theater swirled around the 188th meeting between the teams, the league's oldest rivals. Fog rolled in off Lake Michigan shortly before kickoff, and freezing rain fell sideways as the wind whipped and temperatures dropped. The Soldier Field turf looked a sickly pale green, perhaps foreshadowing for Chicagoans what was to come.Before the late-game heroics, Rodgers had to shake the rust in his first action since Nov. 4, as he threw interceptions on the Packers' first two drives. The first came after he drove Green Bay deep into Bears territory before Chicago's Chris Conte snagged an errant pass in the end zone. On the next drive, Rodgers threw a shade high to Nelson, and the ball ricocheted into the arms of Tim Jennings.Nothing was more bizarre than a second-quarter play that looked at first like a harmless incompletion. The Bears' Peppers rushed in and speared Rodgers as he let go of the ball. The ball squibbed along the ground and came to rest at the Bears' 15. No whistles blew. Green Bay receiver Jarrett Boykin scooped up the ball and, prodded by Rodgers, ran untouched into the end zone as Chicago players looked on incredulously.An official review confirmed that Rodgers had fumbled, and the touchdown counted, giving the Packers a 10-7 lead."If you want me to explain how that happened, I really can't," Bears Coach Marc Trestman said.The Bears, though, were game in the second half. Matt Forte scored two rushing touchdowns, and Jay Cutler threw a scoring pass to Brandon Marshall to put the Bears ahead, 28-20, at the start of the fourth quarter. Green Bay's Eddie Lacy, battling a sprained ankle, scored to cut the lead to 1 and set up the winning drive.For three and a half quarters, Rodgers was nearly overshadowed by Cutler, who managed the game effectively, completing 15 of 24 passes for 226 yards with two touchdowns and an interception. But his last attempt, a desperation heave, was intercepted as time ran out."That's a tough one to swallow," said Cutler, who is now a free agent after five seasons in Chicago.Meanwhile, the Packers, on the winged — and healed — arm of Rodgers, are headed back to the postseason.
ANAHEIM, Calif. — Ryan Getzlaf and Jonas Hiller propelled the Anaheim Ducks into the second half of their season with the NHL's best record and ample reason to think they could get even better in the new year.Getzlaf scored his 20th goal and added two assists, Francois Beauchemin got his first goal of the season, and the Ducks beat the San Jose Sharks 6-3 Tuesday night, closing the best December in club history with their 11th victory in 12 games.Nick Bonino and Matt Beleskey each had a goal and an assist, and Hiller made 33 saves in his ninth consecutive win as Anaheim improved to 15-0-2 at Honda Center, remaining the only NHL team without a regulation loss at home.With another overpowering offensive performance despite a slow start, the Ducks also avenged San Jose's 3-1 victory at the Shark Tank on Sunday that snapped Anaheim's franchise-record winning streak."We're a good hockey club, and we know it," said Getzlaf, the NHL's third-leading scorer with 47 points. "But we also know we've got to get better. Games like this, when you come out flat, teams will bury you."Andrew Cogliano scored a short-handed goal while playing in his 500th consecutive game for Anaheim, which kicked off the second half of its schedule and headed into the new year at a franchise-record 29-8-5.The Ducks lead San Jose by seven points in the Pacific and sit even with Chicago atop the overall NHL standings with 63 points. Anaheim coach Bruce Boudreau has built one of the best teams in hockey, but the Ducks' dissatisfaction with their start against San Jose indicated a hunger to get better."It's been a lot of fun, and I hope we can keep this going," said Hiller, whose winning streak is the longest in club history. "It's nice to be up there in the standings and to be able to achieve something like we have this year, but I don't think anybody is satisfied yet."Kyle Palmieri also scored for the Ducks, who shredded their Pacific Division rivals and chased Antti Niemi with five goals in an 11½-minute span of the final two periods.Dan Boyle and Bracken Kearns scored power-play goals as the Sharks' four-game winning streak ended with a dismaying defensive effort in front of Niemi, who stopped 29 shots.Logan Couture also scored for San Jose, which dominated the first period before falling apart in the second. Alex Stalock replaced Niemi after Getzlaf blasted a wrist shot past the Finnish goalie for Anaheim's fifth goal early in the third period."You want to keep the momentum going, but the second period we were just caught staring, and it definitely cost us," Sharks captain Joe Thornton said.Two nights after the Sharks held Anaheim to one goal for the first time in 17 games since Nov. 22, the Ducks showed they haven't lost their teamwork and offensive power by putting up a franchise-record 25 shots in the second period."We were on our toes, winning the races," San Jose coach Todd McLellan said. "Where did it go in the second? I guess that's the big question we have to ask our group. What do you do? What do you bring to the team? Are you an energy guy? Do you hit, block shots, or just take up space?"We have got some guys ... that need to perform a little bit better."Beauchemin got a rebound goal after a lengthy cycle in the second. Couture tied it with his 12th goal before Bonino dived headfirst onto the ice to slap home Getzlaf's rebound, ending Anaheim's eight-game drought on power plays. Bonino then stole a pass behind San Jose's net and got it in front to Beleskey for the grinding forward's second goal of the season.After Getzlaf chased Niemi, Cogliano put home Saku Koivu's rebound when the Sharks gave up a 3-on-0 short-handed rush moments later. Cogliano became the fifth NHL player to play in 500 consecutive games from the start of his career.NOTES: San Jose announced F Tomas Hertl had successful surgery Tuesday to repair damaged ligaments in his right knee. ... Dustin Penner was a healthy scratch for the Ducks. Jakob Silfverberg took his place on the top line with Getzlaf and Corey Perry. ... Sharks C Tommy Wingels missed his first game of the season after running into the boards on Sunday. ... Sharks rookie LW Matt Nieto had an assist while making his first NHL appearance in his native Southern California. He is from nearby Long Beach.
Had their reputations been pure, buses chartered from St. Louis, Chicago, Boston, San Francisco and Pittsburgh might have gridlocked Cooperstown streets. Instead, fans officially estimated at 2,500 (but looking more like a few hundred) watched the induction of three men who have been dead since the 1930s: the Yankees owner Jacob Ruppert, the umpire Hank O'Day and catcher Deacon White.Throughout the weekend, Main Street was as easy to navigate as on any other summer day. You could view the Hall's exhibits without bumping into crowds and get the autographs of Hall of Famers without waiting in line.But help appears to be on the way. Next July's induction class could be packed. Managers Tony La Russa, Bobby Cox and Joe Torre have been elected by the expansion committee. But newly inducted players of a recent vintage are the biggest draws; if they are popular enough, they can boost induction attendance, as Cal Ripken and Tony Gwynn did in 2007, when at least 75,000 people jammed the streets and Clark Sports Center's fields.When the voting is announced next month, three players could be elected on their first try: Greg Maddux and Tom Glavine, winners of more than 300 games and, for a decade, mainstays of the Atlanta Braves' pitching staff, and Frank Thomas, who hit 521 home runs and had a career .301 batting average, mostly for the Chicago White Sox.If all three get in, that might be all the writers choose. Usually, one or two candidates are elected. The writers have elected three players seven times, most recently in 1999 (Nolan Ryan, George Brett and Robin Yount), and four players three times, the last in 1955 (Joe DiMaggio, Ted Lyons, Gabby Hartnett and Dazzy Vance).The election of Maddux, Glavine and Thomas could damage the chances of two players on the ballot for a second time: Craig Biggio, who received 68.2 percent of the vote last year, and Mike Piazza, who received 57.8 percent. The election of two 300-game winners could also doom Jack Morris, who came close last year, with 67.7 percent.
